[]

“There is no one, I will risk saying, who better captures the spirit—the
promise and the risk—of revolution than Rosa Luxemburg … The moment has
clearly come for a return to Rosa Luxemburg.”

Jacqueline Rose, _London Review of Books_

“One cannot read the writings of Rosa Luxemburg, even at this distance,
without an acute yet mournful awareness of what Perry Anderson once
termed ‘the history of possibility.’ ”

Christopher Hitchens, _Atlantic_

“Transports us directly into the private world of a woman who has never
lost her inspirational power as an original thinker and courageous
activist … and reveals that the woman behind the mythic figure was also
a compassionate, teasing, witty human being.”

Sheila Rowbotham, _Guardian_

“She emerges as one of the most emotionally intelligent socialists in
modern history, a radical of luminous dimension whose intellect is
informed by sensibility, and whose largeness of spirit places her in the
company of the truly impressive.”

Vivian Gornick, _Nation_

“Wonderful … The self-portrait in these pages is that of a professional
revolutionary whose vocation is, if you’ll pardon the expression,
spiritual. Reading … this book, I could not help falling in love with
you, dear Rosa.”

Scott McLemee, _Bookforum_

“This huge project is long overdue. Luxemburg’s correspondence reveals
an extraordinary range and breadth of concerns and interests”

_Times Literary Supplement_

“Paced almost like a novel, the twenty-eight years covered by this
collection pass by almost too quickly.”

Joel Schalit, _Jewish Daily Forward_

“Rosa Luxemburg comes alive in these pages … if you love or admire or
are just fascinated by her, then you’ve no excuse not to buy this
excellent book.”

_Pop Matters_

“_The Letters of Rosa Luxemburg_ comes as near as anything to the way
this extraordinary woman talked with loved ones and friends … a
wonderfully compelling record, both poignant and timely.”

_Observer_

“Rosa Luxemburg expressed unfailing passion in her letters … This volume
gives personal insight into a remarkable (and controversial) woman and
adds meaningful context to any study of early Western socialism.”

_Publishers Weekly_

“Useful and exciting.”

Emily Witt, _New York Observer_

“Fascinating … these passionate letters, which commemorate the 140th
anniversary of Luxemburg’s birth, show the living, breathing and loving
woman behind the legend of ‘Red Rosa.’ ”

Irene Gammel, _Toronto Globe and Mail_

“Rosa Luxemburg’s letters, with all their exquisite details, read as
well as any novel … Personal or political, they are beautiful, powerful,
and succinct.”

Kaye Cain-Nielsen, _Idiom_

“_The Letters of Rosa Luxemburg_ includes everything from Luxemburg’s
youthful mash notes to her theoretical arguments, as well as her uncanny
prediction of ‘pogroms against Jews in Germany.’ ”

_Tablet_

“Verso is once again to be congratulated for this publishing initiative,
in an excellent translation by George Shriver … The letters give a
unique insight into her character, her deep humanity as well as her
passionate commitment to the struggle for socialism.”

_Morning Star_

“Luxemburg’s letters are extremely well written, elegant in their use of
language as well as exciting in their expression of ideas … that is
precisely what makes this book so absorbing and so pleasurable to read.”

George Fish, _New Politics_

[]

Verso would like to express its gratitude to Rosa Luxemburg Stiftung for
help in publishing this book.
[]
This paperback edition first published by Verso 2013
First published by Verso 2011
© Verso 2011, 2013
Based on the German selection _Herzlichst, Ihre Rosa_
[In the Most Heartfelt Way, Your Rosa]
© Dietz Verlag Berlin 1990
English translation © George Shriver 2011
Introduction © Peter Hudis 2011
Introduction from the Editor of the German Edition
© Annelies Laschitza 2011

All rights reserved

The moral rights of the authors have been asserted

1 3 5 7 9 10 8 6 4 2

VERSO
UK: 6 Meard Street, London W1F 0EG
US: 20 Jay Street, Suite 1010, Brooklyn, NY 11201
www.versobooks.com

Verso is the imprint of New Left Books

eISBN: 978-1-78168-233-3

BRITISH LIBRARY CATALOGUING IN PUBLICATION DATA
A catalogue record for this book is available from the British Library

LIBRARY OF CONGRESS CATALOGING-IN-PUBLICATION DATA
A catalog record for this book is available from the Library of Congress

v3.1



CONTENTS


_Cover_

_Title Page_

_Copyright_

_Introduction: Rediscovering Rosa Luxemburg_
by Peter Hudis

_Introduction from the Editor of the German Edition_
by Annelies Laschitza

_Translator’s Note_

The Letters, July 17, 1891–January 11, 1919

A Glossary of Personal Names

Selected List of Publications

Abbreviations

Archive Locations of the Letters



INTRODUCTION: REDISCOVERING ROSA LUXEMBURG BY PETER HUDIS


As one of the most insightful theorists and original personalities of
modern radicalism, Rosa Luxemburg deserves a new hearing in light of the
complex problems facing efforts at social transformation today. Few
figures in the Marxist tradition thought harder about the central
phenomenon that defines the contemporary world, the globalization of
capital. Her analysis of how capitalist expansion depends upon the
absorption and destruction of non-commodified social relations takes on
new importance in light of capital’s relentless intrusion into the nooks
and crannies of everyday life. Her painstaking analysis and passionate
opposition to the logic of capital speaks especially powerfully to our
time, poised as we are at the edge of an economic, political, and
ecological catastrophe if it is not reversed. At the same time,
Luxemburg’s life and work speak not only to the need for a critique of
capitalism but most of all to the search for an _alternative_ to it. Few
thinkers in the Marxist movement thought more deeply about the political
dimension of opposition to capitalism, as seen in her wide-ranging
critique of both reformists and revolutionaries who made a fetish of
hierarchical and centralized organizational forms while neglecting the
potential found in rank-and-file initiatives and spontaneous struggles.
Most of all, no one within the canon of major radical thought was more
insistent upon the inseparability of democracy and socialism and
struggled with the ramifications of that fundamental connection. Now
that the many efforts to impose “socialism” from above over the course
of the past 100 years have proven to be abject failures, while the need
to uproot capitalism remains more imperative than ever, the time has
come to comprehensively revisit her life and legacy.

What has stood in the way of such a comprehensive re-examination is that
much of Luxemburg’s work has been unavailable to an English-speaking
audience, and some of it has not been readily available anywhere.
Although _The Accumulation of Capital_ was published some time ago, one
of her most important works on economics—the _Introduction to Political
Economy_—has never appeared in full in English. Dozens of her essays and
articles connected to the political analyses found in such works as
_Reform or Revolution, The Mass Strike, the Political Party, and the
Trade Unions_, and _The Russian Revolution_ have also never been
published in English. Although many readers first encountered Luxemburg
through her moving and thought-provoking letters, close to 90 percent of
her total correspondence is inaccessible to the Anglophone monoglot. And
many manuscripts and articles discovered by scholars and researchers
only in the past several decades, the subjects of which range from
debates within the Polish socialist movement to theoretical
investigations into pre-capitalist society as well as Marx’s _Capital_,
have yet to be published anywhere. In all, less than a quarter of her
total writings have so far been published in English.

We aim to fill this gap by issuing _The Complete Works of Rosa
Luxemburg_, which will make her entire body of writing available in
fourteen volumes, each with comprehensive annotations and introductions.
All of her previously published work in English will be newly translated
from German, Polish, Russian, and Yiddish originals. By building upon
and extending the earlier work of Dietz Verlag in Berlin, which issued
Luxemburg’s _Gesammelte Werke_ and _Gesammelte Briefe_, we aim to bring
the contributions of this remarkable thinker and personality alive for
new generations.

_The Letters of Rosa Luxemburg_ is a companion volume to the forthcoming
fourteen-volume collection. The most comprehensive selection of her
letters ever published in English, it is a translation (with some
additional letters) of _Herzlichst, Ihre Rosa_, edited by
internationally renowned Luxemburg biographer Annelies Laschitza and
Georg Adler. Although drawing on the collected letters, which will
eventually appear as part of the _Collected Works_, the present volume
is a separate and independent entity. Spanning the entire reach of her
adult life, it contains letters dating from her earliest involvement in
the socialist movement, in the 1890s, to her final letters, composed
shortly before her murder in January 1919. We have chosen to issue this
companion volume to her _Complete Works_ because it brings to life the
depth and breadth of Luxemburg’s political and theoretical contributions
as well as her original personality.

The _Complete Works_ will begin with two volumes of economic writings,
containing all of her published as well as unpublished books, essays,
articles, and manuscripts on economic issues. One volume will include
the first ever complete English translation of the _Introduction to
Political Economy_, as well as several manuscripts related to the
subject of that book that have not previously been published; a second
volume will contain a new translation of _The Accumulation of Capital_
and _Anti-Critique_. This will be followed by seven volumes of
Luxemburg’s complete political writings, arranged in chronological
order, ranging from her critiques of reformism and studies of
imperialism to her analysis of spontaneous mass movements and their
relation to revolutionary organization, and from her response to the
Russian Revolutions of 1905 and 1917 to her writings on democracy,
nationalism, and women’s rights. The _Complete Works_ will be rounded
out with five volumes containing all of her extant letters.

No thinker is merely the sum of ideas that flow from their pen; there is
a real person behind the thought, and few personalities are as engaging
and unique as Luxemburg’s. She was a woman who contended for leadership
of the largest socialist organization in the world at a time when
left-wing organizations (let alone mainstream ones) hardly encouraged
women to assume leading roles as theoreticians. Yet Luxemburg clawed her
way to the top of German Social Democracy, despite facing considerable
hostility from many inside and outside of the party for being a woman, a
Pole, and a Jew. Her struggle as a woman theoretician reclaiming ground
long reserved for males can be discerned throughout these letters and
forms an important context for understanding her overall political
development and orientation. We lose a great deal by reading Luxemburg’s
works abstracted from the internal as well as external conflicts that
she engaged in as she sought to chart an independent path on an array of
political and economic issues. She was a deeply analytical thinker who
mastered the language and literature of economic theory in a manner
perhaps unsurpassed for the Marxists of her generation; yet at the same
time she was in many respects an _idealist_ in raising questions about
the ultimate aims of the struggle for freedom that went beyond the
immediate political or economic problems that preoccupied many of her
colleagues. As she once put it, “I do not agree with the view that it is
foolish to be an idealist in the German movement.”¹ She was a thinker
deeply committed to a historical _materialist_ explanation of social
relations; yet at the same time she insisted, “I cannot separate the
physical from the spiritual.”² She was a thoroughly political individual
who immersed herself in an array of political debates and controversies
throughout her life; yet at the same time she took an intense interest
in the natural world, to the point of writing in one letter, “my
innermost self belongs more to my titmice than to the ‘comrades.’ ”³
These statements do not reflect some internal inconsistency in
Luxemburg’s approach to the world, nor are they opposing determinations
resting side by side. They, rather, express Luxemburg’s
multidimensionality as a thinker and a person—a person and thinker who
cannot be neatly sliced and diced into the conventional political or
psychoanalytical categories. To get to know Rosa Luxemburg’s thought is
to get to know a way of seeing the world, and it is not truly possible
to grasp that if one lacks access to what is found in her
correspondence. It is for this reason that we thought it best to
announce the _Complete Works of Rosa Luxemburg_ with a translation of
_Herzlichst, Ihre Rosa_ (the literal English translation is _In the Most
Heartfelt Way, Your Rosa_).

Our aim is for this volume to provide a new vantage point for getting to
know and appreciate more fully Rosa Luxemburg’s distinctive contribution
to Marxism. We hope that it will enable us to grasp what she herself
consciously struggled to give expression to throughout her life:

It’s the _form_ of writing that no longer satisfies me. In my “soul” a
totally new, original form is ripening that ignores all rules and
conventions. It breaks them by the power of ideas and strong conviction.
I want to affect people like a clap of thunder, to inflame their minds
not by speechifying but with the breadth of my vision, the strength of
my conviction, and the power of my expression.⁴

This volume would not have been possible without the input and
assistance of the members of the Editorial Board of _The Complete Works
of Rosa Luxemburg_, which consists of (in addition to George Shriver and
myself as General Editor) Paul Le Blanc, Lea Haro, Axel Fair-Schulz,
William A. Pelz, and Susan Weissman. We also wish to thank Sebastian
Budgen and Mark Martin of Verso Books for their creative work in
bringing this volume to fruition. Most of all, this volume would not
have been possible without the support of the Rosa-Luxemburg-Stiftung in
Germany. Our words cannot express our thanks to all those who made this
publication possible.

1 See the letter of May 1, 1899, to Leo Jogiches, in this volume.

2 See the letter of September 27, 1908, to Kostya Zetkin, in this
volume.

3 See the letter of May 2, 1917, to Sonja Liebknecht, in _The Rosa
Luxemburg Reader_, edited by Peter Hudis and Kevin B. Anderson (New
York, 2004), p. 391.

4 See the letter to Leo Jogiches of April 19, 1899, in _The Rosa
Luxemburg Reader_, p. 382.



INTRODUCTION BY THE EDITOR OF THE GERMAN EDITION BY ANNELIES LASCHITZA


The present volume contains 230 letters by Rosa Luxemburg, addressed to
forty-six different recipients. The first letter is dated July 17, 1891,
and was sent from Geneva to her Russian friends Nadina and Boris
Krichevsky, in Zurich. The last letter was written on January 11, 1919,
four days before her death, and sent to Stuttgart, to Clara Zetkin, with
whom she had a relationship of close personal trust from 1898 on.

Here readers will find a representative selection of her letters: to
fellow fighters in the socialist movement, such as Leo Jogiches, Adolf
Warski, Julian Marchlewski, Feliks Dzierzyński, Franz Mehring, Karl
Kautsky, August Bebel, Karl Liebknecht, Jules Guesde, Camille Huysmans,
Émile Vandervelde, Georgy Plekhanov, and Vladimir Lenin; to her women
comrades, such as Luise Kautsky, Henriette Roland Holst, Mathilde Jacob,
Sophie Liebknecht, and Mathilde Wurm; and to men who were at different
times her lovers, Leo Jogiches, Kostya Zetkin, Paul Levi, and Hans
Diefenbach.

All these letters provide informative glimpses into the life and work of
their author. They shed light on her development as a student, a
candidate for a doctoral degree, a theoretician, journalist, teacher,
politician, and revolutionary. They exude the atmosphere of her times
and elucidate the stirring experiences and conflicts of her life, and
they make more transparent the motivation behind her thinking and her
relationships.

The letters show clearly that political engagement, a fighting spirit,
and revolutionary fire, as well as profound humanity, talent as a writer
and painter, feminine yearnings, and a bond with nature, all combined to
create the charm and fascination of her personality. The essential
traits of her character become evident, her qualities, capabilities, and
passions, and make evident her joys and sorrows, her strengths and
weaknesses, the high and low points of her personal development.

More than two-thirds of the letters in the present selection have now
become available in English for the first time. This compares favorably
with an earlier selection of letters in English, edited with great care
by Stephen Eric Bronner and first published in the United States in
1978, followed by a new edition in 1993.¹

The letters are based on the texts in the six-volume German edition,²
which consists of more than 2,800 letters, postcards, and telegrams to
more than 150 correspondents.

The letters provide specific factual information about the international
workers’ and socialist movements of her time and give the reader an
indication of Luxemburg’s role in them, her variously motivated
relations with friends in the movement and, more generally, with her
contemporaries, as well as her interest in the experiences of other
socialist parties and movements and her opinions on current events and
new international developments. The contents of the letters range from
mundane biographical details to more intimate matters, and encompass
Luxemburg’s thoughts about particular individuals, events, and
theoretical problems, as well as the positions she took in disputes
among the various tendencies not only in the Polish and Russian Social
Democratic movements but also in the Danish, French, and Dutch, as well
as in the International Socialist Bureau (ISB) of the Second
International. Here she makes pointed observations on the concept of a
revolutionary socialist party and on the natonal question. She protests
against dogmatic narrow-mindedness and against any arrogant attempt to
dominate a group, whether it comprises socialist parties, nations, or
nationalities. The issues discussed include editorial and financial
matters and considerations of how to win over or influence the
masses—questions that arise during revolutionary actions, in the
formation of parties, and in the development of party publications. Of
particular interest, the letters of 1917–18 contain precisely summarized
statements of her position of hopeful solidarity as well as her
extremely critical views on the events of, and prospects for, the
revolution in Russia and in all of Europe.³

The letters help to enrich our understanding of how Luxemburg lived and
worked over the course of nearly three decades as she creatively and
critically contributed in her combative way to the history of Marxist
theory, taking part in major actions of the international workers’
movement. Twice, she herself participated directly in revolutions, and
throughout her life, regardless of the risk to her person, she sought to
accelerate any and all developments in the direction of a socially just
and peaceful society. At the same time, through all kinds of difficult
situations she remained a woman, with the human strengths and weaknesses
and the same problems as any other woman.⁴

For the most part Luxemburg’s letters are highly intimate sources that
provide information about the world of her thoughts and feelings as well
as the heights and depths of her life experiences and vital
relationships. They tell about where she lived, the cares and concerns
of her daily life, her troubles and joys, her love relationships,
friendships, and family relations, and relationships with and attitudes
toward people who interested her. They bring out her views on how to
relate to nature and society and on interactions among individuals. The
letters are testaments to her healthy spiritual and mental condition,
shown in the richness of her perceptions, observations, judgments,
discussions, and responses, and the diverse ways in which they are
consciously geared to the person to whom she is writing.

Walter Jens made the following pointed observation about Luxemburg and
her letters:

To be able to speak where others remain silent; to give expression,
thanks to a great power of precision, to the most secret stirrings of
the soul, the varied inflections of thoughts, and of feelings as they
take shape, as well as the barely perceptible emergence of a sense of
sympathy with other human beings, with animals, even with things—a
quality that is detectable elsewhere only in early Expressionist prose,
in the young Rilke, and in the Musil of _Törless_⁵: _This_ above all
else truly confers the title of letter-writer.⁶

Luxemburg’s correspondence was part and parcel of her life, which she
liked to talk about in imagery that stems from the tradition of Romantic
poetry.⁷

Anyone who tries to get to know Luxemburg can hardly avoid noticing in
her letters a tension between two aspects of this remarkable woman: on
the one hand, her universal interests and the refined sensibility of an
artist and, on the other, at times, a rough, refractory quality
expressive of her political and cultural ambitions. As Walter Jens also
observed, there have been few letter-writers in the history of world
literature in whom one can find, as one does with Luxemburg, a maximum
of self-analysis together with a huge amount of reliable information
about the external world.⁸ Thus it is no accident that even condensed
collections of her letters carry substantial autobiographical weight.⁹

For Luxemburg, letter-writing was part of her daily routine, and it was
one of her passions. Letters served many purposes: information, the
exchange of ideas, organization, self-clarification, personal contact
with others, helping friends, and seeking clarification of issues in
dispute and answers to unresolved questions. Especially during her times
in prison, the composition of long, detailed letters was meant to help
break through the confines of solitude and overcome it. When it came to
writing letters, Luxemburg was prolific, even fanatical. From the
letters that have survived it can be seen that there are many days in
which she produced multiple letters. Now and then she complained about
how much time she lost attending to her mail. But actually a current of
joy flows through most of the letters in which she shared herself with
friends and comrades. Again and again Luxemburg sought to encourage and
bring cheer to her friends, both men and women.

Her frank and forthright way of writing letters has impressed quite a
few people, not least her biographers,¹⁰ creative writers,¹¹ filmmakers,
and playwrights.¹²

Luxemburg’s letters served quite varied purposes. She wanted to provide
her friends and comrades with information and to draw them into an
exchange of ideas. Many letters were purely factual, containing only
impersonal observations. Others recorded her attempts to clarify her own
position with regard to situations, experiences, opinions, observations,
premonitions, or fears. In part, the letters took the place of a diary.
They helped her to keep an even keel when, for political reasons or
because of arbitrary judicial decisions, she was imprisoned. Often she
sought through her letters to give pleasure and encouragement to her
friends.

In writing her letters Luxemburg was able to lift her own spirits. She
wrote about what was important, endearing, awe-inspiring, astonishing,
right alongside completely trivial things, never imagining that, later
on, a third party might read her words. The naturalness of her letters
is the most characteristic general impression they leave with the
reader. As Gilbert Badia has written,

There is nothing forced or artificial. Rosa Luxemburg presents herself
in her letters as she is, with her moments of dejection as well as her
serene heroism, her feeling for nature and her great love for particular
works of world literature, her opinions about the world and the people
who make history, but also her rare and never-failing humor.… She writes
out of a superabundance of the heart, never out of routine or adherence
to convention. And all the while, these letters, in which she speaks so
much about herself, hardly ever have the quality of confession. They
constitute a prolonged conversation, broken off but taken up again,
many-sided but actually directed toward a definite number of themes and
topics that often recur in her writing, now serious, now joking, on
occasion profoundly penetrating, and always interesting, a prolonged
conversation that never shades off into empty chatter.¹³

As a letter-writer, Luxemburg was an artist of consummate skill, one
able to utilize many different shadings and tones. She wrote with
heartfelt spontaneity, but she could also write with carefully
calculated coldness. She communicated in German, Polish, Russian, and
French, so that in addition to the varied tones, varying degrees of
intimacy, and a nuanced candor, one encounters the stylistic differences
associated with the language being used.

Self-aware and empathetic as she was, she entrusted to her
correspondents what she thought, felt, and did, and what her opinions
were of various third parties. As primary sources, letters are highly
contextual. They are tied to specific situations and governed by the
feelings of the moment. They are written for the day or for the hour,
born of particular moods and in most cases intended for only one
recipient. Seldom are their authors able to observe things in a balanced
way, seeing them from all sides, nor do they want to. To a very great
extent letters are testaments to individuality. Their appeal lies in the
extremely intimate perspective they offer, stamped with the unique
aspects of personality, including natural self-contradictoriness. Such
letters definitely tempt the reader to go further into the extensive
literature about the most important events and circumstances of
Luxemburg’s life and work.¹⁴

It seems miraculous that so many of Luxemburg’s letters and postcards
have survived, although of course a great many were lost. After all,
they passed through the devastation of two world wars, the fury of
fascist-like soldiers who ransacked her apartment at the time of her
assassination, as well as ravaging the dwellings of her comrades-inarms
in January 1919, events which were followed by the persecution and
emigration of so many of her associates in subsequent decades.

Luise Kautsky, for example, let it be known that the letters Luxemburg
wrote to her from August to October 1918 were lost.¹⁵ The Kautskys moved
from Berlin to Vienna in 1924, taking their large archive with them,
which included many of Luxemburg’s letters. In March 1938, when Hitler
annexed Austria, the Kautsky family emigrated to Prague, then
immediately flew to Amsterdam, and in the process, the large family
archive was often in danger of being confiscated. Also, during the
evacuation of Amsterdam, in May 1940, there was a real threat that the
Kautsky papers would become war booty in the hands of the invading
German army.¹⁶

Luxemburg’s letters to Mathilde Jacob were also in Germany, where
Hitler’s fascist dictatorship was persecuting, robbing, and
exterminating Jews, and thus for a long time those documents were
endangered until a way was found to get them to the United States. But
Jacob personally remained in Germany, blocked from going to the US,
because she did not have the necessary financial resources.¹⁷ Help from
friends overseas came too late for her. Her life ended in a Nazi
concentration camp at Theresienstadt on April 14, 1943. No more worthy
tribute can be paid to Mathilde Jacob for the help she provided in
saving and preserving Luxemburg’s legacy than was done by Heinz Knobloch
in his book _Meine liebste Mathilde_¹⁸ and by Sibylle Quack, together
with Rüdiger Zimmermann, who made available a reproduction, entirely
faithful to the original, of Mathilde Jacob’s memoirs about Rosa
Luxemburg and her friends.¹⁹

The letters that did survive were saved by timely publication and also,
above all, by being turned over for safekeeping to various archival
institutions, especially in Moscow but also in Amsterdam, Antwerp,
Berlin, Bonn, Karslruhe, New York, Stanford, Warsaw, and Zurich, and by
being locked up in the private safes of family members and friends of
the recipients, such as Paul Levi, Berta Thalheimer, Rosi Wolfstein, and
Clara Zetkin.

The process by which the letters were tracked down, gathered together,
and published is a turbulent and eventful story in its own right. It
began with a joint initiative taken by Sophie Liebknecht²⁰ and the
Communist Youth International, and the result was _Briefe an Freunde_,
published in 1920, a work that has become legendary.²¹ The publishers of
that first volume of letters wrote as follows:

Here the youth, the workers, all those for whose well-being and freedom
she fought, suffered, and died—murdered by cowardly criminal hands—will
find the soul of this much-reviled woman fully revealed. Here any
shyness about divulging the truth of one’s personal life disappears.
These private letters are no longer private. Whoever knows only Rosa
Luxemburg the fighter and the scholarly author does not yet know all
sides of her as a person. The letters from prison round out the picture.
Rosa Luxemburg’s supporters and fellow fighters have the right to know
the richness of the inexhaustible wellsprings of her heart. They have
the right to see how this woman, rising above her own sufferings,
embraced all the products of creation with understanding love and truly
poetic power, how her heart leapt up at the song of a bird, how vibrant
and exalted lines of verse echoed in her soul, how she kept the secrets
of both fateful events and everyday doings in the lives of her friends.

The twenty-two letters and postcards in this small book, written to
Sophie Liebknecht in the years 1916–18, helped from then on to bring to
life the image of Rosa Luxemburg as a person, especially for those who
felt closely linked to her or who sought to be guided by her example.
Despite the arbitrary breaks in continuity and the conflicts over
Luxemburg’s theoretical heritage, resulting from a process of
dogmatization and the imposition of party discipline, her letters to
Sophie Liebknecht won an indestructible place for her in the memories of
many people, including those who were far removed from Communist and
Socialist circles.

For a large number of people the letters aroused strong sympathies for
this controversial revolutionary woman (notorious among conservatives as
“Red Rosa” or “Bloody Rosa”). Many also felt ashamed that they had
previously regarded Rosa Luxemburg too narrowly and one-sidedly, only as
a political figure and scholarly author and less as a human being.

The danger of “mythologizing” Luxemburg by calling her a “giantess of
the soul” or “lyrical dreamer,” a tendency which Elzbieta Ettinger
protests against,²² is far less serious than that posed by her
demonization as the result of widely circulated slander.

It is not at all uncommon to meet people who report that the _Briefe an
Freunde_ gave them the faith and strength to hold out and come through
terrible, unbearable situations. Especially among young people in the
New Left of the 1960s—and this extended far beyond Europe—Luxemburg’s
letters to Sophie Liebknecht awakened new interest in this courageous
advocate of resolute and unwavering opposition to war and to any form of
injustice.

“There is nothing unusual,” wrote Ossip K. Flechtheim, “in the fact that
over the course of half a century, thanks to historical perspective, the
image and characterization of a particular person should take on new
forms.” Luxemburg has almost constantly grown in stature since her
assassination. Bloody Rosa, once the bogeywoman, the bane of the
philistines and pundits, is now all but forgotten. Nowadays people are
often inclined to see only the gentle, kind woman of the _Letters from
Prison_ and _Briefe an Freunde_. In this many-sided individual, an inner
musical and lyrical quality was always inseparable from her ethical and
political engagement as a public figure.”²³

In 1946, after the defeat of Hitler’s fascist government, the _Letters
from Prison_ to Sophie Liebknecht were immediately reissued. In 1977,
this book, after being reprinted in many editions, was expanded to
include additional letters, along with passages that had been left out
in 1920. All in all, thus far, we know of thirty-five letters and
postcards to Sophie Liebknecht, and they can be found in the most recent
editions of the _Briefe aus dem Gefängnis_ as well as in Volume 5 of the
_Gesammelte Briefe_.²⁴ Seven of the letters to Sophie Liebknecht have
been selected for inclusion in the present volume.

From the very beginning, the publication of Luxemburg’s letters was an
important part of the continuous struggle over the interpretation to be
given to their author’s historical role and legacy. Immediately after
Luxemburg’s assassination on January 15, 1919, Mathilde Jacob, Leo
Jogiches, Paul Levi, and Clara Zetkin applied themselves to the task of
saving and preserving her papers, and they were supported in this effort
by the attorney Kurt Rosenfeld. As early as January 18, 1919, Clara
Zetkin wrote to Mathilde Jacob: “Dearest friend, it is your task to see
to it that not a single piece of paper, not a single line of writing,
among Rosa’s manuscripts is taken away or misplaced.”²⁵ In her reply,
dated January 25, 1919, Mathilde Jacob was already hinting that for the
memoirs she herself intended to write Rosa Luxemburg’s letters would be
an especially important source.²⁶ On February 7, 1919, she suggested
that Hans Diefenbach’s sister be asked to let them have the letters her
brother had received from Luxemburg. They were sure to be “extremely
valuable letters,” Jacob said, because she knew that Luxemburg herself
had kept a large part of the letters she had received from Hans
Diefenbach.²⁷ On March 31, 1919, Jacob reported that she had just
remembered that Leo Jogiches had told her he had a large quantity of
letters in Polish from Luxemburg. Now that Jogiches had also been
murdered, she intended to search for those letters. At the same time,
Jacob’s letter contains a reference to a wish expressed by Luxemburg
that, after her death, all letters addressed to her should be burned.²⁸

Initially, Leo Jogiches and Clara Zetkin had considered themselves to be
“jointly the ‘natural’ executors and curators, or trustees” for the
acquisition, protection, and publication of Luxemburg’s written
legacy.²⁹ Then in 1921 Zetkin, after denouncing Paul Levi earlier that
year for having published Luxemburg’s manuscript on the Russian
Revolution,³⁰ took the initiative on her own to force the pace of
publication of Luxemburg’s papers. On June 25, 1921, in a letter to
Grigory Zinoviev, chairman of the Executive Committee of the Communist
International (ECCI), she proposed the formation of a commission to
acquire, administer, protect, and publish those papers.³¹ And that
proposal was put into effect.³² This commission included Clara Zetkin,
Adolf Warski, Julian Marchlewski, and Edwin Hoernle. As Zetkin stated in
the _Rote Fahne_ of September 10, 1921, the commission counted on
support from the wider circles of Luxemburg’s friends. She wrote further
that she had known nothing about the actions taken by Wilhelm Pieck.
Parallel to her efforts, Pieck had taken steps to ensure that the party
congress of the KPD in Jena in August 1921 would adopt a proposal
submitted to the central leadership by the district party conference of
Berlin-Brandenburg to move forward immediately with the publication of
Luxemburg’s writings. The leadership responded as follows:

The _Zentrale_ speaks in favor of accepting this proposal, but its
practical implementation may well fail because Rosa Luxemburg’s papers
are in the hands of a woman who, as the result of breaking party
discipline, no longer belongs to the party. It is an open question
whether she will turn over this material to us. We will try to obtain
the material, so that the proposal can be carried out.³³

In a personal statement, Mathilde Jacob emphatically rejected this
incredible accusation.³⁴ In reply she received a public assurance from
Zetkin:

No one knows better than I do what a great and lasting service was
performed and how much credit was earned by my friend Mathilde for
having kept Rosa’s political and literary legacy together and protecting
it with unflagging loyalty and many sacrifices—to the extent that it was
possible to locate, identify, and gather this material together.
Therefore I am convinced that our committee can rely on her as a willing
and knowledgeable consultant and assistant in securing, arranging, and
publishing that legacy.³⁵

But this did not come about. The two longtime traveling companions went
separate ways because of party and political disagreements.

The committee headed by Clara Zetkin and Adolf Warski was responsible
for putting forward the idea of publishing a collected works edition of
Luxemburg’s writings, with Paul Frölich assigned to carry out this task.
Among the nine volumes envisioned for this project, one volume of her
letters was included. But it was not published. Only three thematically
arranged volumes of her writings came out, consisting of her longer
works and some articles and speeches. After the expulsion of Paul
Frölich from the KPD for “right deviation” the publication of the
collected works was broken off.³⁶

No larger editions of letters emerged from the Communist Party milieu at
that time. Until Stalin’s dictatorial pronouncement against Rosa
Luxemburg, in 1931,³⁷ the publication of individual letters or groups of
letters did continue, but solely in newspapers, magazines, and special
anthologies or collections of documents on particular themes; but after
that nothing more was passed by the censor. The intensified campaign
against Luxemburgism blocked any further publication for many years.³⁸

Paul Frölich did not let himself be discouraged. He continued to work on
Rosa Luxemburg and her legacy. Shortly before the outbreak of World War
II he was able to publish his biography of her, in which his vivid
depiction of her personality rested in part on his knowledge of hundreds
of her letters. He no longer had them in his possession, but he could
elaborate on them from memory.³⁹

With his expulsion from the German Communist Party and from the
Communist International his assignment as editor of Luxemburg’s works
was withdrawn and he was ordered to surrender the fund of source
material he had collected.⁴⁰

We have Luise Kautsky to thank for the appearance of a second volume of
letters in the 1920s. In 1923, she published most of the letters she and
her husband had received from Luxemburg. Luise Kautsky had been one of
her closest confidantes for a very long time. From her own experience
she was able to highlight, in a memorial article, how well her friend
understood the importance of giving courage to the timid and strength to
the weak.⁴¹

At a later time Luise Kautsky wrote:

As far as her outer appearance was concerned, Nature had certainly
treated her in an almost stepmotherly way. At first glance she made
anything but an impressive appearance, given her delicate constitution,
her short stature, like that of a child, and the somewhat misshapen
frame of her body. But it was as if Mother Nature wanted to make up for
what she had denied Rosa in physical attributes, because she fitted Rosa
out with so many richer spiritual gifts.…

Rosa hated any kind of oppression, and to rebel against it was in her
blood.… All the qualities of a true fighter were united in her to a rare
degree: the highest personal courage, great knowledge, paired with
quickness of wit and repartee, exceptional ability as a public speaker,
backed up by an elegant manner of expression, a lively imagination, and
plenty of gumption—she never shrank from facing any and all opponents.
On top of that was the pleasant sound of a lovely voice, so that it was
no wonder, when all these resources were working in harmony together,
she had a magical effect on almost everyone who encountered her, except
for those prejudiced against her. In our own ranks there were certainly
more than a few who had a burning hatred of her. That was because she
dealt with political opponents just as sharply and ruthlessly as she did
when lambasting capitalism and its abominations, and she directed her
fire just as fiercely against comrades she suspected of half-heartedness
or betrayal of party principles.…

At home and among friends she was quite different from her public
persona. There she was considerate, helpful, and full of tender
feelings, with compassion for every living creature. She was effusively
enthusiastic about all the fine arts, with a passionate love of music
and painting, an art that she in fact pursued successfully, and she was
as much at home in the realm of good literature as she was in many
fields of science.… And then there were her letters! Their appearance
within a few years after Rosa’s violent death had a truly sensational
impact in all party circles, extending even into the ranks of the
bourgeosie. They captured the world’s attention: What was this? The work
of Bloody Rosa, the much-despised Megaera? This woman of great
sensitivity, full of feeling and spirit, to whom nothing human was
alien, who knew how to console and support her friends even from
prison?!

In these letters from prison to Karl Liebknecht’s wife, Sophie (Sonya),
and to the writer of these lines Rosa reveals herself with all the
greatness of her soul and her most lovable qualities. These letters are
all the more to be wondered at because during her many years of
imprisonment Rosa endured great physical suffering and many torments of
the soul.⁴²

There was an astonished and emotional reaction to the appearance of this
new volume of letters to the Kautskys, so different from the first. In
the letters to Sophie Liebknecht, Luxemburg had wanted, above all,
simply to give warm, human support to a woman who was anxious and
worried about the fate of her husband, the imprisoned Karl Liebknecht,
and about the welfare of their three children during the war years
1916–18. In contrast, the letters to Karl and Luise Kautsky reflected
the many-sided relationship that had developed over years of a life
shared together, based on close friendship, almost as though they were
family. In these letters, in addition to personal matters, burning
political issues of the day came up for discussion.

After reading this volume, for example, Hans and Gretel Müller wrote
about the great admiration they felt for this unique woman, although
they had never been influenced by her in their political views. They
wrote that Luxemburg’s friendship with Hans Diefenbach, who is often
mentioned in the letters to Luise Kautsky, filled them with pride
(Gretel, or Margarete, being Diefenbach’s sister and Hans Müller,
Diefenbach’s brother-in-law).⁴³ Dr. Dossmann, the director of the
Breslau prison, where Rosa had been held in 1917–18, appreciated the
reinforcement of his favorable memories of Rosa Luxemburg, with whom he
had spent so many hours in conversations that still stirred his
feelings, a woman who had been so undeservedly and hatefully torn from
this life.⁴⁴ Irmgard Delbrück also wrote about the very profound
impressions made by this book.⁴⁵

On the other hand, Adolf Braun expostulated at some length on the
contradiction between the person and the politician. Braun’s
self-description and comments on the topic “New Letters of Rosa
Luxemburg” include the following:

He [i.e., Adolf Braun] was always a fierce political opponent of Rosa
Luxemburg, and he always perceived her as a foreign body in our party,
as a woman who sought to influence the German workers’ movement in a
decisive way and with the greatest zeal without understanding the
essential nature of the German work force, a woman who wanted to
influence the German workers in their struggle for emancipation on the
basis of methods constructed in her brain and derived from Russian
socialist politics. Although the present writer encountered her many
times at party congresses and other sessions—“special conference” was
the technical expression—we repelled one another and not the slightest
human connection was formed between us.… Now this book comes along.…
Whoever reads this book, judging just by a few sentences, will not be
able to imagine at all the fiery revolutionary, the tireless
conspirator, the woman who pronounced ill-considered and unjust
judgments against the German workers’ movement, and who at the same time
was a highly commendable leader of our party.⁴⁶

For Eugen Dietzgen as well, Luxemburg’s sensitive and artistically
inclined personality was something completely new.⁴⁷

Luise Kautsky, with her knowledge of and feeling for the enlightening
and informative value of the letters, felt so encouraged by the
many-sided and even contradictory reactions to the collection of letters
she had published that she immediately decided to continue her work by
putting together a new volume of letters. She wanted to bring it out on
the tenth anniversary of Rosa’s murder. She energetically made contact
with Józef Luxemburg, one of Rosa’s brothers, who had attended her
funeral in Berlin in 1919 and was the family member responsible for
matters connected with her papers and other matters involving her
estate.⁴⁸ Luise also wrote to (and received responses from) Gretel
Müller-Diefenbach, Mathilde Wurm, and Adolf Geck.⁴⁹

Thus Luise Kautsky gathered together an impressive number of interesting
letters. But this undertaking ran aground in 1927, because the German
Communist Party (KPD) did not want to allow the publication of the
letters if Luise Kautsky was to have priority in presenting the
manuscript.⁵⁰ The KPD in a court case had won exclusive rights to the
publication of Luxemburg’s papers, and it immediately asserted those
rights.⁵¹ Luise refused to allow KPD censorship of her book, and she
defied these intentions, which pained her deeply, by bringing out a
different book in 1929 in memory of Luxemburg. This _Gedenkbuch_ took
the place of the intended volume of letters.⁵²

The manuscript for the book that was to become _Briefe an Freunde_ went
with the Kautskys when they emigrated from Vienna in 1938, and in 1950
that volume was published by Luise’s son Benedikt Kautsky with the
support of the International Institute for Social History, in Amsterdam.
It included an introduction outlining the history of the book’s writing
and publication. That volume contained 128 letters or parts of letters
to the following individuals: Konrad Haenisch, Arthur Stadthagen,
Emmanuel and Mathilde Wurm, Camille Huysmans, Hans Diefenbach and his
sister Margarete, Marta Rosenbaum, Adolf Geck, Gertrud Zlottko, and
Mathilde Jacob, as well as to Luise Kautsky herself, to Luise’s
mother-in-law Minna Kautsky, and to Luise’s son Benedikt Kautsky.

Benedikt Kautsky, as he himself acknowledged, disregarded a wish
expressed by Mathilde Wurm concerning the letter of December 28, 1916,
to her from Luxemburg.⁵³ Wurm had stated that under no circumstances
should the letter be published.⁵⁴ During the preparation of _Briefe an
Freunde_ for publication, a discovery was made among the documents at
police headquarters in Berlin—a copy of Wurm’s reply to that letter.
Wurm’s reply makes it possible to conclude that she expressed her wish
that the document not be published not only out of concern for other
persons who were still alive but also, in all likelihood, because she
wished to avoid personal embarrassment. Luxemburg had been right about
many points in her sharp criticism of Mathilde Wurm, including the
latter’s personal weakness—her desire not to have it known to party
public opinion that she held views different from those of her husband,
Emmanuel Wurm. “For people who are as closely connected as E[mmanuel]
and I,” she wrote, “a difference of opinion can be taken as a heavy
blow, to the point that weakness and a lack of personal freedom result.
In our case, I have quite consciously assumed the role of the weaker
person, and in the process have burned up more physical and psychic
energy than you can imagine.”⁵⁵ Mathilde Wurm also argued that the
moderate opposition was not at all as bad as Luxemburg judged it to be.
Nothing would be accomplished or improved if people held onto illusions
that had no basis in reality. Out of her own personal embarrassment
Mathilde Wurm, in her letter of January 20, 1917, directed very sharp
criticisms at Rosa Luxemburg:

Very few people would think of doing what you demand and expect, because
you are ready at any moment to offer yourself as a sacrifice. And I am
convinced as always that you and Karl [Liebknecht] have not been
helpful, either to the cause of peace or to that of socialism … Has a
battle commander ever placed himself right in the very front line? Must
a strategist _prove_ that he has no practical obligations beyond the
mental work he performs, the drawing up of the necessary military plans?

Is the proletariat still so immature that it can acknowlege its leaders
and believe in their superiority and greatness only if those leaders
subject themselves to every danger? If so, then _you_ should not make
this concession to it, but should educate this
giant-with-the-mind-of-a-child so that it will have greater sense. Yes,
I repeat, what is the point and who benefits if our best, keenest, most
knowledgeable people are laid low? And if a leadership that is clear
about its goals is replaced by a weak and uncertain waffling back and
forth?⁵⁶

These extracts show how beneficial it would be to efforts to create a
fully rounded critical understanding of Luxemburg if more of her
correspondents’ letters could be discovered and were published.

Before World War II, a third woman friend of Luxemburg’s managed to
bring out her personal reminiscences of the great revolutionary. That
was Henriette Roland Holst-van der Schalk. In the 1930s, she published
five lengthy letters she had received from Rosa as an appendix to her
biography of Luxemburg. These five letters have been chosen for
inclusion in the present volume because they not only provide
documentary evidence of the open-hearted relations between the two women
but also give insight into Luxemburg’s conception of how
internationalism should be understood and treated in the socialist
movement if it was to remain viable and effective in accomplishing the
emancipation of workers and of all humanity from exploitation and
oppression by international capital.⁵⁷

Equally rich in commentary on fundamental political problems of the
workers’ movement are the letters to Alexander Potresov, Pavel Axelrod,
Leo Jogiches, Adolf Warski, and others that were published in journals
and anthologies by her Polish comrades-in-arms or Russian historians in
the first twelve years after Rosa Luxemburg’s death (and before Stalin’s
pronouncement against her).⁵⁸

In the 1960s and 1970s, there was a great upsurge in the publication of
Luxemburg’s letters, unparalleled in its size and scope. This was the
result, first of all, of the increased attention paid to her as the
hundredth anniversary of her birth drew near. Secondly, it had to do
with the wide-ranging, though differentiated, waves of opposition and
rebellion by activists advocating alternative positions—waves that
engulfed and shook both the capitalist world and the “socialist”
countries, and because of these movements, Luxemburg’s concepts of
freedom, democracy, and socialism were brought to the fore. Thirdly,
after the revelations about Stalin’s crimes and personality cult at the
Twentieth Congress of the Soviet Communist Party in 1956, opportunities
opened up for researchers on Luxemburg in the Communist and Socialist
parties to pursue their research on the basis of authentic original
sources without being officially accused of or condemned for the harmful
promotion of “Luxemburgism.” Thus, it became possible to break out of a
closed circle, the ideological vise of the “struggle against
Luxemburgism,” and to have done with Stalin’s charges that Luxemburg was
tainted with numerous errors and on fundamental questions had gone
astray as a “semi-Menshevik.”

While she had still been officially honored as a revolutionary, an
opponent of war, and a cofounder of the KPD, in effect Stalin’s
allegations led to her being treated as a bloodless, petrified icon. To
counter all that, it was now necessary that editions of her original
letters and other writings appear in order to direct attention to her
true theoretical legacy and her impressive individuality.

Meanwhile, in the 1950s (and early 1960s), some significant publication
of letters by Rosa Luxemburg had already occurred—from the materials
held by the International Institute of Social History (IISH), in
Amsterdam, thanks to the efforts of IISH Director Werner Blumenbug.⁵⁹

The most comprehensive and at the same time the most significant
breakthrough in the publication of Rosa Luxemburg’s letters was
accomplished by Feliks Tych with his three-volume Polish-language
edition of her letters to Leo Jogiches.⁶⁰ In addition, Feliks Tych
published collections of letters to Cezaryna Wojnarowska, Franz Mehring,
Kurt Eisner, Hans Kautsky, Bratman-Brodowski, and Julian Marchlewski.⁶¹

In 1961 Feliks Tych began publication of Luxemburg’s letters to Leo
Jogiches, the largest and most interesting part of her written legacy
with enormous value as historical source material.⁶² In doing so he
resumed a project that Polish Communists had begun in 1930–31 in the
Polish-language journal _Z pola walki_ (From the Field of Battle), then
published in Moscow, an undertaking that was broken off under Stalinist
pressure.⁶³ It soon became clear to Tych that it was necessary to embody
these letters in book form. He accurately described them as living
sources that provided first-hand observations about persons and events
as seen through the eyes of their author. Questions of concern to the
Polish and international working-class movement were refracted in the
most impressive way “through the prism of her uniquely fine-tuned
sensibilities in matters both political and personal.”⁶⁴ The
three-volume Polish-language edition that Tych brought out, with over
900 letters from Luxemburg to Jogiches (and to some others), furnished
with a comprehensive and highly informative scholarly apparatus,
immediately became a standard work. Tych’s editorial efforts made a
contribution of the most fundamental kind to filling out our picture of
the real essence of this woman’s life and laid the basis for the
publication of an authoritative edition of her collected letters.

The next major contribution, a selection of about 450 important letters
to various persons, was made by a research group in Paris, consisting of
Claudie Weill, Irène Petit, and Gilbert Badia, working under the
direction of Georges Haupt.⁶⁵ Haupt had previously made available in a
special edition the letters that had been in the possession of Camille
Huysmans, a former secretary of the ISB. Above all, the work of the
researchers and editors in Paris, in addition to newly discovered
letters, shed light on the significant results achieved in the ongoing
search for Luxemburg’s letters.

The Japanese Luxemburg researcher Narihiko Ito, who also undertook
important initiatives in helping to found the International Rosa
Luxemburg Society, published the previously little-known letters of Rosa
Luxemburg to Mathilde Jacob, which before then could only be seen in the
Hoover Institution at Stanford University. Narihiko Ito brought these
out in two German-language editions, first as a reproduction of the
original manuscripts, published in Tokyo,⁶⁶ and then as a book entitled
_Ich umarme Sie in grosser Sehnsucht_.⁶⁷

Around the same time or soon after came the publication of substantial
groups of letters by Götz Langkau⁶⁸ and Jürgen Rojahn⁶⁹ of the
International Institute of Social History, who added to the earlier work
of Werner Blumenburg with important new discoveries.

In addition to the fundamental collections of letters that have already
been mentioned, a great many individual items appeared in periodicals
and anthologies as well as in translations and reprinted editions, and
those are listed in bibliographies, such as the one published by Masao
Nishikawa.⁷⁰

On the basis of this extensive and thriving industry of editorial work
and biographical research, it became possible at the end of the 1970s to
begin the process of bringing together and publishing in a single
edition all the letters whose existence had become known and that were
accessible. This work was provisionally concluded in 1993 with the
appearance of Volume 6 of the _Gesammelte Briefe_. We say
“provisionally” because it cannot be ruled out that, in the future,
additional letters will come to light or be discovered. From 1993 to the
end of 2008, only four such items became known.⁷¹

If one is to judge by the large number of people in the international
workers’ movement with whom Luxemburg maintained correspondence—people
whom she valued highly and who had become her friends—or to judge from
the entries in her prison calendar about incoming and outgoing mail,⁷²
it can be seen that quite a few letters are still missing. And we do not
know the situation in every case, as in the cases of Vaillant or
Schoenlank, where there is either a certainty or a high probability that
the correspondence with Rosa no longer exists. In France, the papers of
the most important Luxemburg correspondents in that country are not
accessible to the public.⁷³ The losses caused by wartime destruction in
Warsaw are irretrievable. Their toll includes documents located there,
presumably ones of importance, that were in the possession of Rosa’s
brother, Józef.⁷⁴

Perhaps the appearance of the present volume will, in turn, encourage
others to come forward if they have letters of hers in their possession
or know of the existence of such documents. It may also be that for
various reasons other letters are lying ignored somewhere.

At the end of the 1970s, the time had grown ripe to bring together in
one edition all the known letters, including those that had not yet been
published, for example, the more than 800 letters to Clara and Kostya
Zetkin, and to make these available in the German language to a
relatively large number of readers. That was and is the intention of the
six-volume _Gesammelte Briefe_, whose publication was begun by the
Institute of Marxism-Leninism under the Central Committee of the
Socialist Unity Party of Germany. The greater part of this project was
completed by 1989, and after that it was supported by the substantially
smaller Institute for the History of the Workers’ Movement, which was
conceived in a new way; then, after spring 1992, the project was finally
brought to completion without institutional support, but with the
sympathetic assistance of friends.

Since 1999 the publisher of corrected and expanded editions of the
letters has been the Rosa Luxemburg Foundation, together with the Karl
Dietz Verlag in Berlin.

In 1989 a special volume containing 190 letters appeared under the title
_Herzlichst Ihre Rosa_ (In the Most Heartfelt Way, Your Rosa), which was
very well received, especially because it included sixteen photos and
illustrations in both color and black and white, as well as fourteen
color reproductions from Luxemburg’s herbariums.⁷⁵ That collection of
190 letters, expanded to include forty letters from Volume 6 of the
_Gesammelte Briefe_, which appeared in 1993, constitutes the basis for
the present volume. May the present work arouse as much interest as have
all previous such letter collections—and above all as their author has
always deserved. It certainly has the potential to prompt people to go
more deeply into her life and work and to inspire them to intensify
their efforts for a better world. Rosa Luxemburg was always persuasive
about encouraging people in that direction, because “what you take on
with fire and passion becomes firmly rooted inside you” [_was man so mit
Glut erfaßt, das hat in einem feste Wurzeln_].⁷⁶

1 See _The Letters of Rosa Luxemburg_, edited and with an Introduction
by Stephen Eric Bronner, new edition (New Jersey, 1993).

2 Rosa Luxemburg, _Gesammelte Briefe_ (Collected Letters), vols. 1–5
(Berlin, 1982–1984); a third revised and enlarged edition of vol. 2 was
issued by the same publisher, Dietz Verlag, in 1999, as well as a third
revised edition of vol. 4 in 2001; vol. 6, edited by Annelies Laschitza,
was published by Dietz Verlag in 1993.

3 See Rosa Luxemburg, “Zur russischen Revolution” (On the Russian
Revolution), in her _Gesammelte Werke_, vol. 4, 1st ed. (Berlin, 1974),
and 6th revised ed. (Berlin, 2000), pp. 332ff. See also _Rosa Luxemburg
und die Freiheit der Andersdenkenden. Extraausgabe des unvollendeten
Manuskripts “Zur russischen Revolution” und anderer Quellen zur Polemik
mit Lenin_ (Rosa Luxemburg and Freedom for Those Who Think Differently:
Special Edition of the Uncompleted Manuscript “On the Russian
Revolution” and Other Source Materials Relating to Her Polemics with
Lenin), compiled, and with an Introduction, by Annelies Laschitza
(Berlin, 1990).

4 Numerous biographical and other works about Luxemburg are available,
including the following: Peter Nettl, _Rosa Luxemburg_ (Oxford, 1966), 2
vols.; Hannah Arendt, “A Heroine of Revolution,” _New York Review of
Books_, October 6, 1966; Hannah Arendt, “Rosa Luxemburg 1871–1919,” in
_Menschen in finsteren Zeiten_ (Human Beings in Dark Times), ed. Ursula
Ludz (Munich, 1989), pp. 49ff; Norman Geras, _The Legacy of Rosa
Luxemburg_ (London, 1976); Raya Dunayevskaya, _Rosa Luxemburg, Women’s
Liberation and Marx’s Philosophy of Revolution_ (New Jersey/Sussex,
1981); Elzbieta Ettinger, _Rosa Luxemburg: A Life_ (Boston, 1986);
Stephen Eric Bronner, _Rosa Luxemburg: A Revolutionary for Our Times_
(New York, 1987); Richard Abraham, _Rosa Luxemburg. A Life for the
International_ (Oxford, 1989); Paul Frolich, _Rosa Luxemburg: Ideas in
Action_ (Chicago, 2010); _Rosa Luxemburg: An Intimate Portrait_, by
David Fernbach, Mathilde Jacob, Hans Fernbach (London, 2000).

5 The “Musil of _Törless_” refers to a novel first published in 1906,
_Die Verwirrungen des Zöglings Törless_ (The Confusions of Young
Törless) by the Austrian writer Robert Mathias Edler von Musil
(1880–1942).

6 Walter Jens, “Rosa Luxemburgs Briefe” (Rosa Luxemburg’s Letters), in
_Die Friedensfrau_ (The Woman of Peace) (Leipzig, 1989), p. 290.

7 See Evelyn Radczun and Günter Radczun, “Wirklichkeitsbewältigung in
den Briefen Rosa Luxemburgs aus dem Gefängnis 1915–1918” (Coping With
and Overcoming Reality: Rosa Luxemburg’s Letters from Prison,
1915–1918), in _Zeitschrift für Geschichtswissenschaft_ (Journal of
Historical Science; hereafter cited as _ZfG_), no. 2, 1979, p. 106.

8 Walter Jens, “Rosa Luxemburgs Briefe,” p. 292.

9 Samples of such condensed collections of Luxemburg’s letters in German
include the following: Rosa Luxemburg, _Briefe an Leon Jogiches_
(Letters to Leo Jogiches), with an Introduction by Feliks Tych
(Frankfurt on the Main, 1971); Rosa Luxemburg, _Ich umarme Sie in großer
Sehnsucht. Briefe aus dem Gefängnis 1915–1918_ (I Embrace You with Great
Longing: Letters from Prison, 1915–1918) (Berlin-Bonn, 1980); Reinhard
Hoßfeld, _Rosa Luxemburg oder Die Kühnheit des eigenen Urteils_ (Rosa
Luxemburg, or the Keenness of One’s Own Judgment) (Aachen, 1993); Heide
Inhetveen, “Glück im Winkel—Rosa Luxemburgs botanische Leidenschaft im
Spiegel ihrer Gefängnisbriefe und herbarien” (Happiness in One’s Own
Little Corner—Rosa Luxemburg’s Passion for Botany as Reflected in Her
Prison Letters and Herbariums [Albums of Pressed Plants]), in _Frauen
und Hortikultur_ (Women and Horticulture), ed. Mathilde Schmidt
(Hamburg, 2006).

10 In addition to the biographical works already cited, see also Gilbert
Badia, _Rosa Luxemburg. Journaliste, Polémiste, Revolutionaire_ (Paris,
1975); _Rosa Luxemburg mit Selbstzeugnissen und Bilddokumenten
dargestellt von Helmut Hirsch_ (Rosa Luxemburg’s Testimony about
Herself, with Documentary Photos, Drawings, and Paintings, presented by
Helmut Hirsch) (Reinbek bei Hamburg, 2002); Max Gallo, _Rosa Luxemburg.
Eine Biographie_, translated from the French by Rainer Pfleiderer and
Birgit Kaiser (Zürich, 1993); Frederik Hetmann, _Eine Kerze, die an
beiden Enden brennt. Das Leben der Rosa Luxemburg_ (A Candle Burning at
Both Ends: The Life of Rosa Luxemburg) (Freiburg im Breisgau, 1998);
Annelies Laschitza, _Im Lebensrausch, trotz alledem. Eine Biographie_
(Enraptured with Life, In Spite of Everything: A Biography) (Berlin,
1996).

11 Among writers of fiction who have chosen Rosa Luxemburg as a subject,
compare Alfred Döblin, _November 1918. Eine deutsche Revolution.
Erzählwerk in drei Teilen. Dritter Teil. Karl und Rosa_ (November 1918:
A German Revolution—Narrated in Three Parts, Part 3: Karl and Rosa)
(Frankfurt on the Main, 2008); and Peter Weiss, _Die Ästhetik des
Widerstands_ (The Aesthetic of Resistance), 3 vols. (Berlin, 1983).

12 See, for example, Margarethe von Trotta and Christiane Ensslin, _Rosa
Luxemburg. Das Buch zum Film_ (Rosa Luxemburg: The Screenplay for the
Film) (Nördlingen, 1986). Also by Margarathe von Trotta and Christiane
Ensslin, _Die bleierne Zeit und andere Filmtexte_ (Times Heavy as Lead
and Other Film Scripts) (Berlin, 1988). Also, Róza Berger-Fiedler and
Harry Hornig, “_Liebster Dziodzio_”_—ein Liebesfilm über Rosa_ (“Dearest
Dziodzio”—A Love Story in Film about Rosa) (Berlin, 1995); and Volker
Ludwig and Franziska Steiof, _Rosa. Schauspiel mit Musik_ (Rosa: A Stage
Play with Music), Grips Theater (Berlin, 2008).

13 Gilbert Badia, _Rosa Luxemburg: Journaliste, Polémiste,
Revolutionnaire_ (Paris, 1975), p. 754.

14 The literature about Rosa Luxemburg’s life and work, in addition to
books listed above, includes the following: Masao Nishikawa, “Rosa
Luxemburg: Bibliographie ihrer Schriften und der Literatur über sie
1945–2003” (A Bibliography of Her Writings and the Literature About Her,
1945–2003), _Studies in the Humanities, a Journal of Senshu University,
Tokyo/Kanagawa, Japan_, no. 74, March 2004; Narihiko Ito, _Wegweiser zum
Gedanken Rosa Luxemburgs_ (Guide to the Thought of Rosa Luxemburg)
(Tokyo, 2007); Narihiko Ito (ed. by Annelies Laschitza and Ottokar
Luban), _Rosa Luxemburg im internationalen Diskurs. Internationale
Rosa-Luxemburg-Gesellschaft in Chicago, Tampere, Berlin und Zürich
(1998–2000)_, (Rosa Luxemburg in International Discourse: The
International Rosa Luxemburg Society in Chicago, Tampere, Berlin, and
Zurich [1998–2000]) Annelies Laschitza and Ottokar Luban, eds (Berlin,
2002); Narihiko Ito, Theodor Bergmann, Stefan Hochstadt, Ottokar Luban,
eds, _China entdeckt Rosa Luxemburg. Internationale
Rosa-Luxemburg-Gesellschaft in Guangzhou am 21./22. November 2004_
(China Discovers Rosa Luxemburg: The International Rosa Luxemburg
Society in Guangzhou, November 21–22, 2004) (Berlin, 2007); Annelies
Laschitza, _Die Welt ist so schön bei allem Graus. Rosa Luxemburg im
internationalen Diskurs, Rosa-Luxemburg-Stiftung_ (The World Is So
Beautiful, With All Its Horrors: Rosa Luxemburg in International
Discourse) (Saxony, 1998); _The National Question: Selected Writings by
Rosa Luxemburg_, edited and with an Introduction by Horace B. Davis (New
York, 1976); Peter Hudis and Kevin B. Anderson, eds, _The Rosa Luxemburg
Reader_ (New York, 2004). See also the following revised or new editions
of her Collected Works in German: Rosa Luxemburg, _Gesammelte Werke_,
vol. 1, pt. 1 (1893–1905), 8th rev. ed. (Berlin, 2007); vol. 1, pt. 2
(1893–1905), 7th rev. ed. (Berlin, 2000); vol. 2 (1906–June 1911), 6th
rev. ed. (Berlin, 2004); vol. 3 (July 1911–July 1914), 6th rev. ed.
(Berlin, 2003); vol. 4 (August 1914–January 1919), 6th rev. ed. (Berlin,
2000); vol. 5, 4th ed. (Berlin, 1990).

15 See Rosa Luxemburg, _Briefe an Karl und Luise Kautsky (1896–1918)_
(Letters to Karl and Luise Kautsky), ed. Luise Kautsk (Berlin 1923), p.
231.

16 After Karl Kautsky’s death in October 1938, Luise deposited the
family papers with the International Institute of Social History (IISH)
in Amsterdam. The Kautsky family archive survived World War II because
it was transferred to the British section of the IISH.

17 See Ralph H. Lutz, “Rosa Luxemburg’s Unpublished Prison Letters,
1916–1918,” in _Journal of Central European Affairs_, vol. 23, no. 3,
October 1963, pp. 303–12; Agnes F. Peterson, “A working woman: Mathilde
Jacob, 1873–1942,” in _Internationale wissenschaftliche Korrespondenz
zur Geschichte der deutschen Arbeiterbewegung_ (International Scholarly
Correspondence on the History of the German Workers’ Movement; hereafter
cited as _IWK_), no. 18, April 1973, pp. 51–5; also, there has existed
since 1989, in the Hoover Institution Archives at Stanford University, a
“Register of the Rosa Luxemburg–Mathilde Jacob Papers,” prepared by
Katherine A. Reynolds.

18 See Heinz Knobloch, _Meine liebste Mathilde. Geschichte zum Berühren_
(My Dearest Mathilde: A Painful, Deeply Moving Story) (Berlin, 1985).

19 See “Von Rosa Luxemburg und ihren Freunden in Krieg und Revolution
1914–1919” (On Rosa Luxemburg and Her Friends in War and Revolution,
1914–1919), a manuscript by Mathilde Jacob, edited and introduced by
Sibylle Quack and Rüdiger Zimmermann, in _IWK_, vol. 24, no. 4, December
1988.

20 See Annelies Laschitza, _Die Liebknechts. Karl und Sophie—Politik und
Familie_ (The Liebknechts: Karl and Sophie—Politics and Family) (Berlin,
2007), pp. 304ff., 317, 438ff.

21 Rosa Luxemburg, _Briefe aus dem Gefängnis_ (Letters from Prison),
published by the Executive Committee of the Communist Youth
International (Berlin, 1920). The quotation from the publishers is from
page 4 of the 1920 edition.

22 In general, Ettinger values Luxemburg’s letters quite highly. See
_Comrade and Lover: Rosa Luxemburg’s Letters to Leo Jogiches_, edited
and translated by Elzbieta Ettinger (Cambridge, MA, 1979).

23 Ossip K. Flechtheim, _Rosa Luxemburg zur Einführung_ (Rosa Luxemburg,
by Way of Introduction) (Hamburg, 1985), p. 68.

24 See Rosa Luxemburg, _Briefe aus dem Gefängnis_ (Letters from Prison)
16th expanded ed. (Berlin, 2000); see also her _Gesammelte Briefe_, vol.
5, pp. 129ff.

25 Clara Zetkin to Mathilde Jacob, January 18, 1919, in Bundesarchiv
Berlin (Archives of the Federal Republic of Germany), hereafter cited as
BArch Berlin), section designated: NY 4005/79.

26 See _ibid_., Mathilde Jacob to Clara Zetkin, January 25, 1919.

27 See _ibid_., Mathilde Jacob to Clara Zetkin, February 7, 1919.

28 See _ibid_., Mathilde Jacob to Clara Zetkin, March 31, 1919.

29 Jogiches was, however, murdered in March 1919, following the defeat
of the Spartacus League uprising. See Clara Zetkin, “Rosa Luxemburgs
literarischer Nachlass” (Rosa Luxemburg’s Literary Legacy), _Rote
Fahne_, no. 417, September 10, 1921 (morning edition).

30 See “Gegen den Verrat Paul Levis, Erklärung von Adolf Warski und
Clara Zetkin, 20. Dezember 1921” (Against the Treachery of Paul Levi: A
Declaration by Adolf Warski and Clara Zetkin, December 20, 1921),
_Internationale Presse-Korrespondenz_, vol. 1, no. 39, 1921, p. 344.

31 Clara Zetkin to G. Ye. Zinoviev, July 25, 1921, in BArch Berlin, NY
4005/95.

32 See the 1921 resolution of the ECCI, in ibid., NY 4005/106.

33 _Rote Fahne_, August 25, 1921 (evening edition). The reference is to
Mathilde Jacob, who had sided with Paul Levi and been expelled from the
KPD along with him.

34 See “Rosa Luxemburg’s Literary Legacy,” _Die Freiheit_, no. 414,
September 5, 1921, p. 3.

35 Clara Zetkin, “Rosa Luxemburg’s Literary Legacy,” _Rote Fahne_, no.
417, September 10, 1921 (morning edition).

36 See Elke Reuter, Wladislaw Hedeler, Horst Helas, and Klaus Kinner,
eds, _Luxemburg oder Stalin. Schaltjahr 1928—Die KPD am Scheideweg.
Eine_ _kommentierte Dokumentation_ (Luxemburg or Stalin: “Year of the
Great Leap” 1928—The KPD at the Crossroads: Documents with Commentary)
(Berlin, 2003).

37 See Joseph Stalin, “Über einige Fragen der Geschichte des
Bolschewismus. Brief an die Redaktion der Zeitschrift ‘Proletarskaja
Revoluzija’ ” (On Some Questions of the History of Bolshevism: Letter to
the Editors of _Proletarskaya Revolyutsiya)_, in Rosa Luxemburg,
_Ausgewählte Reden und Schriften_ (Selected Speeches and Writings), vol.
1 (Berlin, 1951), pp. 136ff.

38 See Erwin Lewin, “Einige Aspekte der Wirkung von Stalins
Luxemburg-Urteil 1931 in der Kommintern” (Some Aspects of the Effects on
the Comintern of Stalin’s 1931 Verdict against Rosa Luxemburg),
_Beiträge zur Geschichte der Arbeiterbewegung_ (Essays on the History of
the Workers’ Movement—hereafter cited as _BzG_), vol. 33, no. 4, 1991,
pp. 483ff.; and Annelies Laschitza, “Zum Umgang mit Rosa Luxemburg in
Vergangenheit und Gegenwart” (On the Treatment of Rosa Luxemburg in the
Past and Present), ibid., pp. 435ff.

39 See Paul Frölich, _Rosa Luxemburg. Gedanke und Tat_ (Frankfurt on the
Main, 1967, and Berlin, 1990). English-language editions include Paul
Frölich, _Rosa Luxemburg: Ideas in Action_, translated by Joanna
Hoornweg (Chicago, 2010). Paul Frölich’s biography of Luxemburg first
appeared in English in a translation by Edward Fitzgerald in 1940.

40 Rosi Frölich reported in a 1981 letter to Hermann Weber that in 1933,
when Paul Frölich still sat on the Central Committee of the
Sozialistische Arbeiterpartei, or SAP, and it had fled to Belgium,
“friends with whom the Rosa Luxemburg material had been deposited in
February 1933 sent it for safekeeping to the Marx-Engels Institute in
Moscow by way of the Soviet Embassy.” Cited by Hermann Weber in “Neue
Tendenzen in der SED-Geschichtsschreibung” (New Trends in SED
Historiography), _Deutschland-Archiv_, no. 8, 1981, p. 804.

41 See Luise Kautsky, “Rosa Luxemburg zum Gedächtnis” (In Remembrance of
Rosa Luxemburg), _Die Freiheit_, no. 36, January 20, 1919, pp. 2ff.

42 Luise Kautsky, “Rosa Luxemburg anlässlich ihres 15. Todestages” (Rosa
Luxemburg on the Ocassion of the Fifteenth Anniversary of Her Death), an
unpublished manuscript in the Kautsky Family Archives at the
International Institute of Social History, in Amsterdam, document no.
2201.

43 Hans Müller-Diefenbach to Luise Kautsky, August 2, 1923, in the
Kautsky Family Archives, IISH, no. 1240.

44 Dr. Dossmann to Luise Kautsky, August 9, 1925, in _ibid_., no. 998.

45 Irmgard Delbrück to Luise Kautsky, February 28, 1926, in _ibid_., no.
3379.

46 Typed manuscript of an article written by Adolf Braun for _Fränkische
Tagespost_ in the International Institute of Social History, item no.
2274.

47 _Ibid_., no. 991.

48 See Józef Luxemburg to Luise Kautsky, July 29, 1922, and July 28,
1924, in _ibid_., no. 1207.

49 See Gretel Müller-Diefenbach to Luise Kautsky, April 29, 1923; June
11, 1924; August 29, 1924; January 20, 1925; February 19, 1925; February
22, 1925; May 9, 1925, in ibid., no. 1241; Mathilde Wurm to Luise
Kautsky, January 19, 1925, in _ibid_., no. 1471; Luise Kautsky to Adolf
Geck, May 6 and June 23, 1924, in the Generallandesarchiv Karlsruhe
(General Archives of the State of Karlsruhe), 69 N 1, no. 967/9 and
967/10.

50 See the editor’s foreword (p. 7) in Rosa Luxemburg, _Briefe an
Freunde_ (Letters to Friends), edited by Benedikt Kautsky on the basis
of the manuscript prepared by Luise Kautsky (Frankfurt on the Main,
1986).

51 See the letter of the “Sekretariat V/5” to Wilhelm Pieck, dated March
22, 1927, which states: “Dear Wilhelm! We have now won the trial in the
federal court in the matter of Rosa Luxemburg’s papers. After this Rosa
Luxemburg’s papers belong to us in their entirety, that is to say, Viva!
Until now the executor of the papers has been the attorney Rosenfeld.”
This document is in BArch Berlin, NY 4002/1. Two related documents are
also found there, from which the further course of events and related
problems become evident. They are an undated note of Rosi Wolfstein, who
had appeared in the federal court in behalf of the KPD, and a letter
from an attorney, Dr. Artur Samter, to the Central Committee of the KPD,
dated November 11, 1927. The year 1927 also opened with serious
difficulties for Luise Kautsky in her dealings with Józef Luxemburg and
Gretel Müller-Diefenbach. Both of them went back on, or placed new
restrictions on, previous agreements concerning the right to publish
certain letters. See, for example, in the Kautsky Family Archives at the
IISH, no. 1241, the letters of Gretel Müller-Diefenbach to Luise Kautsky
of June 25, August 10, and September 27, 1927, and of February 1, 1929.

52 See Luise Kautsky, _Rosa Luxemburg. Ein Gedenkbuch_ (A Book in Memory
of Rosa Luxemburg) (Berlin, 1929).

53 See, below, the letter to Mathilde Wurm of December 28, 1916.

54 See Luxemburg, _Briefe an Freunde_, p. 10; see also Mathilde Wurm to
Luise Kautsky, January 19, 1925, in the Kautsky Family Archives at the
IISH, in Amsterdam, no. 1471.

55 Mathilde Wurm to Rosa Luxemburg, January 20, 1917, in
Brandenburgisches Landeshauptarchiv (Main Archives of the State of
Brandenburg), Potsdam, Pr. Br. Rep. 30 Berlin C, Polizeipräsidium
(Police Headquarters), Titel 95, Sektion 7 15851, die
sozialdemokratische Frauenbewegung in Deutschland 1915–18 (The Social
Democratic Women’s Movement in Germany), Bl. 128 R.

56 _Ibid_., B1. 129.

57 See Henriette Roland Holst-van der Schalk, _Rosa Luxemburg—Haar Leven
en Werken_ (Rosa Luxemburg—Her Life and Work) (Rotterdam, 1935); see
also the German edition, _Rosa Luxemburg: Ihr Leben und Wirken_ (Zürich,
1937), esp. pp. 210ff.

58 See, for example, “Letters of Rosa Luxemburg to A. Warski und J.
Hanecki” published (in Polish) in _Z pola walki_ (From the Field of
Battle), no. 7–8, 1929; “Letters of Rosa Luxemburg to Leo Jogiches (J.
Tyszka), 1893–96,” prepared for publication and annotated (in Polish) by
H. D. Zakrzewska, in _Z pola walki_ (Moscow, 1930), no. 9–10; “Letters
of Rosa Luxemburg of January 1905,” and “Letters of Rosa Luxemburg to
Leo Jogiches (J. Tyszka),” in _ibid_., 1931, no. 11–12; and (in Russian)
Alexander Potresov and Boris Nikolaevsky, eds, _Sotsial-demokraticheskoe
dvizhenie v Rossii. Materialy_ (The Social Democratic Movement in
Russia: Documentary Materials) (Moscow-Leningrad, 1928), vol. 1.

59 See Werner Blumenberg, “Einige Briefe Rosa Luxemburgs und andere
Dokumente” (Some Letters of Rosa Luxemburg and Other Documents),
_Bulletin of the International Institute of Social History Amsterdam_,
vol. 7, 1952, pp. 39ff.; and Werner Blumenburg, “Einige Briefe Rosa
Luxemburgs” (Some Letters of Rosa Luxemburg), _International Review of
Social History_, vol. 8, 1963, pp. 94ff.

60 Róza Luksemburg, _Listy do Leona Jogichesa-Tyszki_ (Letters to Leo
Jogiches-Tyszka), compiled and annotated with an Introduction by Feliks
Tych, vol. 1 (1893–99) (Warsaw, 1968); vol. 2 (1900–05) (Warsaw, 1968);
vol. 3 (1908–14) (Warsaw, 1971).

61 See Feliks Tych, “Rosa Luxemburg’s Letters to Cezaryna Wojnarowska
(1896–1905),” _Z pola walki_ (Warsaw, 1971), no. 1; “Rosa Luxemburg’s
Letters to Franz Mehring,” _Z pola walki_ (Warsaw, 1969), no. 1; “Zwei
Briefe Rosa Luxemburgs an Kurt Eisner” (Two Letters of Rosa Luxemburg to
Kurt Eisner), IWK, no. 15, 1972; “Briefe Rosa Luxemburgs an Hans
Kautsky. Mit einer Vorbemerkung von Feliks Tych” (Letters of Rosa
Luxemburg to Hans Kautsky, with Introductory Comment by Feliks Tych),
_BzG_, no. 2, 1979; “Drei unbekannte Briefe Rosa Luxemburgs über die
Oktoberrevolution” (Three Previously Unknown Letters of Rosa Luxemburg
about the October Revolution), IWK, vol. 27, no. 3, September 1991.

62 See Feliks Tych, “The Letters of Rosa Luxemburg to Leo Jogiches
(Tyszka),” in _Z pola walki_ (Warsaw, 1961), no. 3, and 1965, no. 2.

63 The Polish journal that had been published in Moscow, _Z pola walki_
was “revived,” in the sense that a Polish-language journal with the same
name, and dealing mainly with party history, began to appear in Warsaw
after the turbulent events of 1956 connected with “de-Stalinization.”

64 Feliks Tych, “Inroduction to _The Letters of Rosa Luxemburg to Leo
Jogiches (Tyszka),” Z pola walki_ (Warsaw, 1961), no. 3, p. 130.

65 See Rosa Luxemburg, _Vive la lutte! Correspondance 1891–1914_ (Long
Live the Struggle! Correspondence of 1891–1914), compiled, translated,
and annotated under the direction of Georges Haupt by Claudie Weill,
Irène Petit, and Gilbert Badia (Paris, 1975); and Rosa Luxemburg,
_J’étais, je suis, je serai! Correspondance 1914–1919_ (I Was, I Am, I
Shall Be! Correspondence of 1914–1919), compiled, translated, and
annotated under the direction of Georges Haupt by Claudie Weill, Irène
Petit and Gilbert Badia (Paris, 1977).

66 See Rosa Luxemburg et al., _Briefe an Mathilde Jacob (1913–1918)_
(Letters to Mathilde Jacob, 1913–1918), edited and with a Foreword by
Narihiko Ito (Tokyo, 1972).

67 Rosa Luxemburg, _Ich umarme Sie in grosser Sehnsucht. Briefe aus dem
Gefängnis 1915–1918_ (I Embrace You with Great Longing: Letters from
Prison, 1915–1918), with a Foreword by Narihiko Ito, and “Versuch eines
Dialogs: Mathilde Jacob im Gespräch von Charles Schüddekopf” (An Attempt
at a Dialogue: Mathilde Jacob as Discussed by Charles Schüddekopf)
(Berlin-Bonn, 1980).

68 See Götz Langkau, “Briefe Rosa Luxemburgs im IISG—ein Nachtrag”
(Letters of Rosa Luxemburg at the International Institute of Social
History), _International Review of Social History_, vol. 21, 1976, part
3, pp. 412ff.

69 See Jürgen Rojahn, “Um die Erneuerung der Internationale: Rosa
Luxemburg contra Pieter Jelles Troelstra. Zur Haltung der radikalen
Linken in Deutschland nach dem 4. August 1914. Anhang: Unveröffentlichte
Briefe Rosa Luxemburgs und Karl Liebknechts an Sozialisten im neutralen
Ausland, August 1914–Januar 1915” (For the Renewal of the International:
Rosa Luxemburg versus Pieter Jelles Troelstra—On the Conduct of the Left
Radicals in Germany after August 4, 1914, with an Appendix: Unpublished
Letters of Rosa Luxemburg and Karl Liebknecht to Socialists in Neutral
Foreign Countries, August 1914–January 1915), _International Review of
Social History_, vol. 30, 1985, part 1, pp. 137ff.

70 Masao Nishikawa, “Rosa Luxemburg: Bibliographie ihrer Schriften und
der Literatur über sie 1945–2003” (A Bibliography of Her Writings and
the Literature About Her, 1945–2003), _Studies in the Humanities, a
Journal of the Senshu University Research Society_, Tokyo/Kanagawa, no.
74, March 2004.

71 A letter by Rosa Luxemburg addressed to a “Highly Esteemed Professor”
(Hochverehrter Professor—probably Julius Wolf) and dated June 30, 1896,
was discovered by Narihiko Ito in 2001 in the archives of the Friedrich
Ebert Foundation (Archiv der Friedrich-Ebert-Stiftung), Bonn and Bad
Godesberg; for a letter by Rosa Luxemburg reprinted in issue No. 100,
June 20, 1910, of the newspaper _Zihna_ (The Struggle) of the Latvian
Social Democratic Party, see Annelies Laschitza, “Ein neuer Brief von
Rosa Luxemburg” (A Newly Discovered Letter by Rosa Luxemburg), in
_UTOPIE kreativ_, no. 142–3, July–August 2002, pp. 720ff.; for a letter
by Rosa Luxemburg to Dr. Kurt Rosenfeld, dated February 1, 1915, see Ute
Speck, “Ein weiterer Brief von Rosa Luxemburg und Ergänzungen zu einem
Karl-Liebknecht-Brief” (A Further Letter by Rosa Luxemburg and Additions
to a Letter by Karl Liebknecht), in _IWK_, no. 1, March 1997, pp. 83ff.;
for a postcard by Rosa Luxemburg to Berta Thalheimer, dated November 14,
1918, see Annelies Laschitza, “Meine liebste Berta. Eine unbekannte
Postkarte von Rosa Luxemburg an Berta Thalheimer” (My Dearest Berta: A
Previously Unknown Postcard of Rosa Luxemburg to Berta Thalheimer), in
Ursula Balzer, Heiner M. Becker, and Jaap Kloosterman, eds, _Kein
Nachruf! Beiträge über und für Götz Langkau_ (No Obituary! Articles for
and about Götz Langkau), International Institute of Social History
(Amsterdam, 2003), pp. 117ff.

72 See Rosa Luxemburg’s Prison Calendar at the Hoover Institution on
War, Revolution and Peace, in the Rosa Luxemburg-Mathilde Jacob Papers.
Excerpts from it were published in _Rosa Luxemburg im Gefängnis. Briefe
und Dokumente aus den Jahren 1915–1918_ (Rosa Luxemburg in Prison:
Letters and Documents from the Years 1915–1918), edited and with an
Introduction by Charlotte Beradt (Frankfurt on the Main, 1973), pp.
115ff.

73 See the Foreword by Georges Haupt in Rosa Luxemburg, _Vive la
lutte!_, p. 11.

74 This assertion is based on statements made to the author (Annelies
Laschitza) by Kazimierz Luxemburg, son of Józef Luxemburg, in
conversation, June 1989, in Berlin.

75 See Annelies Laschitza and Georg Adler, eds, _Herzlichst Ihre Rosa.
Ausgewählte Briefe_ (In the Most Heartfelt Way, Your Rosa: Selected
Letters) (Berlin, 1989; 2nd expanded ed., Berlin, 1990).

76 See, below, Rosa Luxemburg’s letter to Hans Diefenbach of March 30,
1917.



TRANSLATOR’S NOTE


In her letters Rosa Luxemburg often used very long paragraphs, but we
have not broken those down into shorter ones, as would be more common in
English and which might be easier to follow. Similarly, she often
started a new topic within a paragraph merely by inserting a dash, or
just starting a new sentence. And often she used a comma to connect
separate, complete thoughts, rather than using a period to start a new
sentence. It seems that in her haste to write down thoughts crowding
fast on one another, rules of punctuation took second place. Generally
we have tried to repeat the punctuation and paragraphing as they
occurred in the letters (except where the meaning might be confused) in
order to convey the tone of the originals as much as possible.

ON THE LETTERS TO JOGICHES

Most of the first half of _Herzlichst Ihre Rosa_—the source of most of
the letters in the present selection—consists of Luxemburg’s letters to
her comrade and lover, Leo Jogiches. Luxemburg wrote to Jogiches mostly
in Polish, and I have consulted the published Polish edition of these
letters: Róża Luksemburg, _Listy do Leona Jogichesa-Tyszki_. Listy
zebral, sŀowem wstępnym i przypisami opatrzyŀ, Feliks Tych (Letters to
Leon Jogiches-Tyszka, collected, edited, annotated, and with an
introduction by Feliks Tych), 3 vols., Warsaw, 1968–71.

Sometimes the version of a letter to Jogiches in the German edition
contains material that was not in the published Polish edition. We have
not been able to check copies of the original, mostly Polish
manuscripts—and that is also true of letters to others that were
originally in Polish, Russian, and French; thus we were often obliged to
retranslate from German rather than from the exact wording of the
original letters. At present the originals (or copies of them) are
mostly preserved at the Russian State Archive for Social and Political
History (Russkii Gosudarstvennyi Arkhiv Sotsialno-Politicheskoi Istorii,
or RGASPI), in Moscow.

PROBLEMS OF STYLING IN THE LETTERS TO JOGICHES

While the letters are mostly in Polish, there are frequently words,
phrases, or entire passages in other languages—Russian, German, French,
Latin, Italian, even English.

I think it is important to include much of this foreign-language
material in the body of the letters (rather than simply turning it all
into English) to graphically illustrate Luxemburg’s multilingual
capabilities, which are closely related to her unique qualities as a
Marxist internationalist. Her use of Polish and Russian, as well as
German, for example, reflects her close links with the revolutionary
movements in all of those countries.

Following the style used in the German edition, I have given the shorter
foreign texts in the original language with an explanation either in
brackets within the text or in the Notes.

In the case of longer passages, I have usually not included the
foreign-language material in the text of the letter, but have indicated
with bracketed notes what language was used, other than Polish. Such
passages are usually _italicized_ to indicate they were not in Polish in
the original letter.

To indicate Luxemburg’s use of emphatic type, I have used boldface
rather than the more usual italics. This is in conformity with the
German edition, and is necessitated by the plentiful use of italics to
convey the polyglot character of the letters.

If Luxemburg emphasized a word or phrase in the body of a non-Polish
language passage, I have used _ITALIC BOLD_ for such occurrences, which
are quite rare, because the style used in the German edition (of extra
space between the letters of an italicized word) is not one normally
used in English.

A similar editorial style has been used for letters that were originally
written in Russian (e.g., to Boris Krichevsky and Aleksandr Potresov) or
in Polish to recipients other than Jogiches (e.g., Cezaryna Wojnarowska,
Adolf Warski, and others).

In the letters to Jogiches, Rosa Luxemburg, who was then in her early
twenties (born 1871), addresses him, her comrade and lover, with
endearing terms such as “Ciucia” or “Dziodzio” (which have many variant
forms: “Ciuciuchna,” “Dziodziusiu,” “Dziodziuchna,” etc.). In Polish (or
in the family where Rosa grew up) endearing terms like these were used
for children. (An English-language equivalent of “Ciucia,” for example,
might be “Poopsie.”) It is almost as though her inner child was speaking
to his inner child. She also calls him “my golden one” and just plain
“Gold” (or “treasure”), as well as such terms of endearment commonly
used between lovers as “beloved,” “darling,” etc.



 


TO NADINA¹ AND BORIS KRICHEVSKY²

Geneva, July 17, 1891

Hello, my dears!

Recently I would have liked very much to go [on foot to] visit my dear
friends (I see the way you’re smiling wickedly at how small I am, I see
it [i.e., too small for such a walk]). But since walking from Geneva to
Zurich is rather hard (especially on the purse) one must content oneself
with a handshake in writing, which, however, is meant no less sincerely
from the heart. —I hope that you are both in good health and that all
your affairs are in good order. By the way I have heard some stories
about events in Zurich, but people say they have a bad smell to them,
and I have no desire whatever to learn the particulars. And you know, it
makes an unpleasant and peculiar impression on a person who is at a
distance when an entire mass of serious and intelligent people keep
themselves busy for weeks on end to the point of obsession with someone
else’s dirty linen, don’t you agree? At any rate that’s the impression
made on me by the letters of my friends, who apparently have forgotten
everything else in the world except this craziness, and at the same time
you yourself write that it is an entirely personal matter.

I will not write to you about Geneva in general. You know the place
yourself. It pleases me (1) as a beautiful city with a European look to
it, and (2) by the absence of anything in the nature of _Oberstrass_.³
On the whole, things are going very well for me here—I’m working hard
and making the acquaintance of interesting people. Only on Sundays do my
“thoughts filled with longing” turn to _Oberstrass_ and toward evening I
“accompany” all of you, my dears, to the Axelrods—for kefir and herring.
—Seriously, sometimes I would very much like to see my _Oberstrass_
again, but in general I am quite content to be living here alone and am
not complaining. Actually, I have now completely grown up, my dears, and
am proud of that.

I was in Mornex,⁴ but I won’t go there again, although I’d like to see
them. I won’t go there again because Plekhanov is too highly developed
for me, or more exactly, is too highly educated. What can a conversation
with me offer him? He knows everything better than I do, and such
original, “spontaneous” ideas, you know, I can’t come up with them, and
to tell you the truth I don’t even consider them of very great value. At
the Axelrods I observed Plekhanov from the corner, [and] simply to watch
the way he talks, how he moves, and to observe his face—that was
extraordinarily pleasant for me. But to go to Mornex, and to sit in the
corner and admire him, that just won’t do. —Vera [Zasulich] can’t talk
at all, but she’s a splendid person.

Of the people here, I am in closest contact with a splendid young
Bulgarian and with Sarchi; also, I have two or three Polish women
friends here from Warsaw, and besides that, Romanowski, who was in
Zurich briefly for a few days.

Yes, I did like Plekhanov’s wife very, very much—her outward appearance,
the way she walked, her voice. But I didn’t get to know her any better—I
was only there twice and now I [do not] want to go back there. In
addition of course I know Lurye and Selitrenny, but for some reason no
friendship has been struck up between us.

“Today we have cookies and cakes!” which means: some dear people are
coming to visit me today from Zurich on their vacation. Ooh, perhaps
that means a soldier will come to visit you! Well, my dears, I must
stop, because I’m beginning to talk nonsense.

Keep healthy and happy and be sure to give a thought sometimes to your
dear friend,

R. Luxemburg

In case it occurs to you to make me happy by sending greetings this is
my address: _627 Rue de Lancy_.

Heartfelt greetings to Mrs. Axelrod

TO LEO JOGICHES

[Clarens, Switzerland, March 20, 1893] Monday

Ciucia, my golden one! I just now (around 4 p.m.) received your letter
and the card. So, two more days of waiting! And I was already at the
station today at 3 p.m., and had the intention of going back again at
8:20 this evening.

Today it’s been quite gray, ever since morning—for the first time. But
not a trace of rain. The whole sky is covered with clouds of different
sizes and different shadings and has the look of a deep, stormy sea. The
lake [Lake Geneva] glistens with smooth surface areas the color of
steel. The mountains are shrouded in mist and look sad, and as for the
Dent du Midi range, it’s like seeing it through a fog. The air is mild
and fresh and filled with the fragrance of apple trees and grasses.
There is stillness all around, and the birds chirp softly and
steadily—as if asleep. I’m sitting near the house in the grass, under a
tree, by the small path that leads to the well. The grass is growing
quite luxuriantly. There are flowers in abundance, especially those
large yellow ones. The bees are buzzing around them in such massive
numbers that I’m surrounded by _sploshnóye zhuzhzhánie_.⁵

There’s also a smell of honey. Over there now and then a huge bumblebee
flies by, droning loudly. I’m in a melancholy mood, and at the same time
I’m in very good spirits, because I love such quiet, pensive weather
immensely. The only thing that’s too bad is that it puts me in the mood
for dreaming rather than for work. Dziodzio, hurry up!

You won’t even come on Wednesday, most likely. In the card you started
to add the word OR [_ili_]. That means what you already have in mind
is—Thursday! See here, Dziodziu, we must get away from here as soon as
possible. […]

Enclosed I’m sending you a letter from home [i.e., from Poland or
Lithuania] again. Today a thick package of newspapers came, also from
your people in Wilno.⁶

So there’s still this evening [to get through], and then all day
tomorrow, and half a day more the day after tomorrow! How empty it feels
here all by myself. The truth is, we were together here for not even
three weeks. We’re still going out in a rowboat, aren’t we? And taking a
long hike in the mountains, isn’t that right? So hurry, my precious
Gold, AS QUICK AS YOU CAN, back to yours.

Don’t forget to bring the Chartism [book].⁷

Somebody’s voice woke me up last night. I listened—but it was I myself
who had been muttering. […] Awakened by my own voice, I realized I had
been dreaming and I became aware of the sad reality that my Dziodzio is
far, far away and I am utterly alone. But the very next moment someone
was going loudly up the stairs. Still under the influence of the dream,
I conjectured that it was YOU going upstairs, that you had come on the
last train at 1 a.m. (in the dream I changed the train schedule a
little), and that, in order not to wake me, you had gone to your room
upstairs to sleep, planning to surprise me in the morning. I smiled with
satisfaction and went back to sleep. Today I got up early and flew
upstairs to you, and—came to see that my nighttime conjectures were only
a dream. So if you don’t arrive Wednesday, I’ll come bounding to Geneva
on the early train. You’ll see!

TO BORIS KRICHEVSKY

[Zurich, November 27, 1893]⁸

Worthy comrade!

I thank you for asking about my health—it is satisfactory. The issue [of
_Sprawa Robotnicza_] is almost finished and will soon be available to
you.⁹

I would like to have an exchange with you about some pleasant pieces of
news. First, I received news from home. You have probably heard that we
had a setback at the beginning of the month in which seven persons were
involved and which threatened to become an epidemic. Now, in a letter of
the 18th, they write that for the time being there has been nothing
further and that the work is proceeding successfully. Invariably people
are waiting with impatience for the _Sprawa_ [_Robotnicza_], especially
the workers—imagine that!—and especially for the report to the
congress¹⁰ (and they got that issue immediately after it was published).

But the most interesting thing is this: In Wilno (but this is TOP
secret) at present there is a strike by tailors [i.e., garment workers],
which has been going on for a long time. They appealed to our people in
Warsaw through a Muscovite and asked for a loan of 30 rubles. This was
explained to the workers [in Warsaw] at a meeting and they decided
unanimously not to lend the sum, but to GIVE it to them, and beyond
that, they expressed the desire to establish permanent ties with the
Wilno people and with the Russians in general. A gratifying development,
no? But don’t even think of telling anyone except Fenya¹¹ (not even
Rayechka,¹² because she does like to chatter all day long).

The second piece of news is that yesterday I received a letter from Mr.
_WL_ [Wilhelm Liebknecht, editor] of _Vorwärts_, who writes that my
article will go in, but only if I “_allow him to make a few editorial
comments_,” in which connection he “_hopes nevertheless_” that I will be
“_satisfied with that_.” This is something you didn’t expect, right? Are
you ready to start believing once more that the truth sometimes finds
its way even to Katzbach Street?¹³ Now the _comments_ of Mr. L are quite
interesting. By the way, I don’t know why he addresses me as a man,
calling me _Genosse_¹⁴ (after all, I did sign with my first name). He
explains the delay until now by the fact that he “_had to deal
beforehand with some matters about the opportuneness of publishing
this_” [_“hatte noch vorher einiges über die Opportunität der
Veröffentl(ichung) zu verhandeln”_]. We conclude from this that he
consulted with authoritative circles and that someone there was against
the article—possibly Bebel.

Nevertheless the article has come through.¹⁵ Grosowski¹⁶ told me that an
item from your dissertation will be reprinted in _Neue Zeit_.¹⁷ That is
interesting. But still, you are not resourceful [enough], it is, after
all, much more in keeping with the times nowadays to write about the
customs duty on tobacco [_Tabaksteuer_], or about the elections to state
assemblies [_Landtagswahlen_], or at least about the superiority of the
political struggle to that in the factories and workshops. In this
connection, our [SPD] Executive finds it necessary for BERFUS of the
Polish-German party to explain in _Vorwärts_ that, in his view, trade
unions are not at all possible in German Poland, but only a political
organization is possible.¹⁸ (Do you understand? In a region where the
masses are completely downtrodden and indifferent, where they can be
brought into motion only by appealing to their most immediate interests,
[such as] the the fight for higher wages [_Lohnkampf_]! And thus German
Poland represents a classic justification for the views of His Majesty
Bebel! —But after my article in _Vorwärts_ they will probably notice
that all this bootlicking …¹⁹ with the German Executive will not help
them.

For now, fare thee well, I send kisses to Fenya and Rayinka.²⁰ How is
your health? I firmly clasp your hand, worthy comrade [_werter
Genosse_].

R.

TO LEO JOGICHES

[Paris, March 11, 1894] Sunday

My most precious, beloved child!

At last I can write you. It’s now 11 o’clock at night. I just returned
from Adolf [Warski]’s and am sitting in my little room on the fifth
floor. Considering the conditions here [in Paris], the room isn’t bad.
But that’s beside the point. I wanted only to write to you and about you
now, but my head is drooping from exhaustion. Undoubtedly you’ll notice
that more and more often as this letter goes on.

Precious gold, my Ciucia! My Dziodzio! My little mite! What are you
doing now? No doubt you’re lying in bed, with the lamp on the table next
to you, and you’re reading or scribbling something and puffing clouds of
smoke from your cigarette. My only one, my Bobo! When will I see you? I
miss you so much that my soul is simply thirsting! Do you know what, my
gold? It’s soon going to be midnight, but down below [on the streets]
all around there’s noise and shouting, paper boys crying out—just like
at noontime.

What did I do today? Nothing. I slept for about three hours. Then Morek
[Warszawski] came to Adolf’s, and also a worker, another Pole. So I
wasn’t able to get anything done. Besides I had such a racket in my head
that I wasn’t fit for anything. Ah, my gold, if only I had you here with
me! Anyhow, later [today] we went by streetcar to the Bois du Boulogne
and came back. I saw the Trocadero, the Arc de Triomphe, the Eiffel
Tower, and the Grand Opera. I’m deafened by the noise. And how many
beautiful women there are here! Really, ALL OF THEM are beautiful, or at
least they seem to be. No, under no circumstances will you come here!
You stay in Zurich!

You ask how it was to see Adolf again? Very good. We haven’t really
talked about anything yet. However, he has given his advice about what
should be published next, etc. He asked whether I had printed his letter
about Kaspr[zak]²¹ and the article about artisans [_rzemieslniki_].²² He
denies having written that he didn’t want [the letter about Kasprzak]
printed. In a word, the same as usual.

Now to business. Gold! Just imagine! There are four columns still
unfilled for the [next] issue. I really don’t know what to do. You see,
unfortunately I didn’t bring with me the article by Julek.²³ But it will
be two days before you get this letter, and then two more days before he
corrects it and you send it to me, another day before Reiff typesets
it—five days at the minimum!

So this is what I’ve decided to do. Early tomorrow I’ll go to Reiff and
inquire. If he has letters for the May pamphlet, then instead of ripping
the issue apart, I’ll let it wait, and in the meantime he can typeset
the pamphlet (in two parts). But if he has no letters, I’ll telegraph
you for the article by Julek. I’ll go over it myself, and shove it in.
Gold!…

I’m exhausted and nerve-racked. I can’t [write] any more.

I kiss Dziodzio, my Ciucia. R.

[P.S.] Dziodziu, have you solicited articles from K[richevsky] and
G[elfand]? Especially from K! He should hurry and so should Julek, but
[they should] write as succinctly as possible, because I will also need
a column for small notices from the French.

Flora Wislicka brought with her the news that in the next few days the
sentence against the oldtimers²⁴ is supposed to be announced. Meanwhile
Bolek [Dębiński] received news that Lopek [Bein] has been arrested
again.

My address: Faubourg St.-Denis 7, Chambre Nr. 11.

Send me the brown dress (and the petticoat) and be timely about it,
because I must be at a banquet the French are putting on, on March 18.

TO LEO JOGICHES

[Paris, March 25, 1894] Sunday

My dear! I have been very angry with you [and] I have a few nasty things
to reproach you for. It’s put me in such a melancholy mood that I had
the intention of not writing you any more until my departure. But
feelings gained the upper hand. Here, then, is what I have to reproach
you for.

1. Your letters contain ABSOLUTELY NOTHING besides _Sprawa Robotnicza_,
criticism of what I’ve done, and indications of what I should do. When
you indignantly say that, after all, you do send me so many loving words
in every letter, my answer to you is that tender LITTLE WORDS aren’t
enough for me, and I’d gladly send them back to you [in exchange] for
the tiniest bit of information about your personal life. Not the
slightest word! The only thing that connects us is the cause and a
leftover tradition of earlier feelings. That’s very painful. It has
become especially clear to me here. [Recently] When I sat myself down to
rest for a moment, so exhausted I was ready to drop from the constant
work for the cause, I let my thoughts wander and I got the feeling that
I don’t have my own personal corner anywhere and that nowhere do I exist
and live as MYSELF. In Zurich it’s the same thing, in fact with an even
heavier load of editorial work. I felt I had just as little desire to
remain here as to return to Zurich. Don’t tell me that I can’t bear the
ongoing pressure of work, that what is speaking from me is the desire
for rest. Oh no, I can put up with twice as much work. The only thing
that causes me agony and makes me feel dreary is that wherever I turn,
on every side, the only thing I have is the _Sprawa_ [the _Cause_]. And
why is it necessary for me to have others keep my head turned in this
direction, when for my own part I already do enough thinking about the
_Sprawa_ and am concerned about it quite enough. It really annoys me—the
fact that whenever I take a letter in hand, whether from someone else or
from you—everywhere it’s the same—it’s either the next issue, or it’s
the pamphlet, or it’s this article or that one. That would all be fine
if at least IN ADDITION TO THAT, ALONGSIDE OF THAT, there was a bit of
the HUMAN PERSON, the soul, the individual to be seen. But from you
there’s nothing, absolutely nothing. During this time have you had no
impressions, have no thoughts occurred to you, have you read nothing,
had no perceptions that you could share with me? Perhaps you might ask
me the same question. Oh, but in my case it’s quite the contrary. I have
encountered IN SPITE OF THE _SPRAWA_ a whole crowd of thoughts and
impressions at every turn—only I’ve had NO ONE I could share them with.
With you? Oh, I value myself too highly to do that! Sooner than that I
might have an exchange of views with [Wladyslaw] Heinrich, Mitek
[Hartmann], or Adolf [Warski], but unfortunately I’m not in love with
them, and so I have no desire to do that. You on the other hand I do
love, but—[and here I repeat] exactly what I’ve written above. It isn’t
true that things are getting too hot now, that the press of work is too
great: In a certain kind of relationship—one always finds something to
speak about and a moment of time to write. See, for example, how typical
what follows is, and this is what I reproach you for:

2. Supposedly you live only for our and your cause. So then, let’s take
the Russian matter. Have you written me even one little word about it?
What’s going on, what was printed, what about the young fellows there in
Zurich? You don’t consider it necessary to write even the slightest bit
about that. I know that [probably] nothing special has happened over
there, but it’s precisely to people who are close to you that one writes
even about small things. You think it’s enough for me if I scribble for
the _Sprawa_ and do a good job of presenting your “inconsequential”
opinions [“_unmassgebende_” _Meinung_]. THAT IS VERY CHARACTERISTIC.

3. E.g., Hein[rich] has come (to Zurich). As I find out from today’s
letter from him he has reported the whole business to you and discussed
it with you, and YOU have DEMANDED UNCONDITIONALLY from him some changes
in the _Sprawa_’s organizational relations with the party. And not a
word to ME about all this? Without my opinion, without an exchange of
ideas with me about this, you make a decision and insist on it.
H[einrich] was at least honest enough to write me about it (today for
the first time!) and to ask my opinion. But you—you didn’t do that.

4. From Brzez[ina]’s letter I learned that he has authorized Heinrich to
pass on to me all information about border crossings. He naturally told
you right away, but from you to me—not a word. I sit here, hurrying up
with the work, sending things off, and HAVE NO INKLING what’s really
going on with the border crossings, whether things are getting through,
how much and how quickly, and who is looking after it—Brz[ezina] or
Hein[rich]. People seem to think that all this is none of my business.

The magnanimous explanation that I ought not to WORRY MYSELF over
practical matters, because they’re already being taken care of without
me—only a person who DOESN’T KNOW ME AT ALL could hand that out. Such an
explanation might perhaps be quite sufficient for Julek [Marchlewski],
since he doesn’t worry about anything, because of his weak nerves. But
as far as I’m concerned, such a mode of operation—with the word “little
bird” [_ptichka_] being thrown in on top of everything—to me that’s an
insult, to put it mildly. Add to that the crass, heavy-handed
instructions: Do such-and-such with Adolf, conduct yourself in
such-and-such a way when you visit Lavrov, stop doing this or keep doing
that—when it’s all put together it leaves a single, indelible impression
on me, a feeling of uneasiness, fatigue, exhaustion, and restlessness
that comes over me in moments when I have time to think about it. I am
not writing all this as a reproach to you. I cannot DEMAND that you be
different from what you are. I am writing partly because I still have
the stupid habit of saying what I feel, and partly because I want you to
be _au courant_ with how things are between us.

Enclosed I’m sending galley proofs of all the articles to be published,
except the one by Julek [Marchlewski] and the feature article.²⁵ Of all
things, I haven’t yet received galleys of Julek’s article, but I did go
over it so carefully that I feel quite calm about that one. As for the
feature article, you know about it. The article by Krich[evsky]²⁶ is not
yet ready for typesetting. I’ll rework it today.

I’m sending these to you because I’m already a little tired, the
articles don’t make a sufficiently fresh impression on me, and I’m
afraid I’ll be reprimanded. So look through them and send your comments.
Don’t go using force on our space limitations. I haven’t gone through
the galleys at all yet, and they’re teeming with awkward phrases. Pay no
attention to that, but focus only on the content. If we put in
Krichevsky’s article, which takes up more than three columns, this issue
would not, in any case, have to be more than one signature long. There
won’t be anything special in the issue, because even the fight for a
shorter workday,²⁷ although it was written very superficially, used up a
lot of space. Judge for yourself whether it could have been written more
concisely. —In the article about shortening the workday I also added
facts from OUR OWN struggle, along with the results. I’ve put a somewhat
better ending on the article, as a transition to discussion of the
eight-hour day. —What do you think of putting in the little item signed
“Ch.,”²⁸ as an extra “topping”? (It’s a translation, done by Jadzia
[Warska], of an item by Defnet [about May Day in Belgium], which has
been worked over by me.) Adolf says that it won’t be suitable as an
introduction, that [instead] a signed statement by the editors should
appear at the beginning. What do you think about this? In contrast [to
Adolf], I like the item so much that I want to put it at the beginning.

With all these articles plus the one by Krichevsky, if we use a double
signature, seven columns would remain unfilled. They can be filled in as
follows: one column on women; one or one-and-a-half columns on wages;
and finally, I’ll have to write another lead article, a political one.
That one worries me the most because on that subject my head feels quite
empty. Naturally, I’ll write it anyhow. But I want to keep it short.
Something like two or two-and-a-half columns. For the remaining space,
I’ll put in a small article about the preparations for May Day in other
countries, where I’ll mention three things: The English have moved their
observance from Sunday to May 1 itself; the Germans have united for a
CELEBRATION; and all the French²⁹ have united for their observance of
the holiday: for the first time all the parties will observe it
TOGETHER. In this way the issue will be very full and rich in variety.
—Adolf’s article about the holiday³⁰ may not inspire you, but I have no
possibility of making everything perfect.

He, the poor fellow, wrote it once, whereupon I rejected it and wrote
him an outline. He wrote it a second time, following the outline, and
then I revised and improved it another two times. In the end, I can’t
ask anything more of him. Besides, it isn’t bad at all now. —Write your
opinion of the article without beating around the bush and without
sweetening the pill with compliments about MY article. They (that is,
such compliments) leave a bad-tasting impression. —I’m going to break
down the article about labor time into several parts, each standing by
itself and taking up a different country, so that it will be easier to
read. I’ll have the whole thing cut and stitched, so that the pages will
be easier to turn. I didn’t like Krichevsky’s article. I would much
rather have written it myself, but I do intend to make the effort to
rewrite it. Your observations about it coincide [_sovpadayut_]
approximately with my own.

Now I want to ask you about the following things:

1. Can one say that the French people in 1848 were mainly fighting for
universal suffrage?

2. Were the explosions in Chicago³¹ in 1886 or 1887?

3. How many rubles to the dollar?

(In the order they’re listed, these questions are somewhat similar to
those asked during the “Discussion Evening” at the Eintracht.)³²

4. The strikes by gas workers and dockworkers in England—were they in
1889? And were they over the eight-hour day?³³

The rest of the questionable passages you’ll undoubtedly discover on
your own. —Today is Sunday. You’re sure to receive this letter with the
galley proofs tomorrow, that is, Monday. Hurry up with the proofreading
and sending back by mail, so that I’ll have everything here on Tuesday,
or AT THE LATEST on Wednesday. Because on Tuesday I’ll definitely be
done with all the articles. (Adolf is writing about wages.) —I’ve gotten
on Reiff’s back so much that he hired another typesetter, a Pole, but
now he’s crying for material to typeset.

I’m sending you Reiff’s receipt and the bills. Together with the 100
that I received today, I have 118 for our business matters. The pamphlet
will certainly take 90 or 100 of that. (Paper is expensive, apparently 7
francs for a thousand small sheets, plus the pamphlet, plus stitching.)
I’ll take the rest of the money for my own use in the meantime.
Unfortunately I’ve been paying out a lot of money here—I myself don’t
know what for. For the room I pay 28 francs, for the [room-cleaning]
service a minimum of 5 francs, but it’s paid in advance for two weeks,
and so I gave them 16 francs. For Jadzia, 1.5 [francs] daily (because I
eat with them at noon and in the evening), which means 23 francs [for
two weeks]. All together that’s 40, and I brought 60 with me. Well—all
of it has flown away. I myself don’t know where it went. A lamp, 1.50;
cocoa, 1.20; milk, 1.65; Jadzia made me a hat for 2.25, and gloves, 2;
bread and sugar for breakfast, about 2 francs. But where did the rest
end up? I don’t know. I paid one franc, or 1.5, for flowers and pastries
for Jadzia, who loves them enormously (I don’t eat them); after all, she
cooks so much for me. Maybe Adolf borrowed a few francs and the accounts
are thrown off. At any rate I’m stuck here without a penny and, for the
time being, will have to borrow about 18 francs from the funds for our
cause. —Your money transfers, since the time I asked for them, have been
delayed so much that you will soon have to send me about 125 to pay for
the February issue. Bear in mind that the issue will be ready on
Wednesday. Would you perhaps also send me, only to avoid additional
charges, something to live on and to buy the ticket for the return trip?

As far as sightseeing in Paris goes—I have my doubts about whether I’ll
go anywhere at all, because the insane noise here and the crowds leave
me feeling weak and give me a migraine. After a stay of half an hour in
Bon Marché³⁴ I could barely make it back out to the street. The
celebration of the anniversary of the Commune was done very shabbily.
The speakers included Lafargue, Paula Mink, Zévaès, Chauvin, and a few
others. Their speeches were rather flat, especially Lafargue’s. Guesde
did not come, despite having consented to speak. At the most there were
two hundred people. (Supposedly a great many would be present on the day
when all the parties would celebrate in unison, but because of my nerves
I didn’t feel up to going.) —

I’ll close now, because [otherwise] it will be too late for the mail. Do
you regard it as not necessary to send me newspapers? You do know, don’t
you, that among the French there’s only the stupid Parisian rubbish. I
no longer have any inkling about [what’s going on in] Germany or
Austria. It’s odd that the idea hasn’t occurred to you [to send
German-language newspapers]. Is Anna [Gordon] still sick in bed? Isn’t
she getting better? I would definitely write to her, but I HAVE NO TIME.
Have you received the issues yet (four hundred)? Did you receive the
pamphlet, and what are its weaknesses?

HOW MANY COPIES OF THE FEBRUARY ISSUE SHOULD BE PRINTED, AND WHERE
SHOULD THEY BE SENT AND HOW MANY?

What’s going on with the German appeal?³⁵ It really is essential! And
what about the Polish [version]? I’m no longer up to doing it myself.

To Krichevsky I sent a pamphlet. How did he like it? And did Anna?

I sent two thousand pamphlets to Munich. What should I do with the rest?

I received a letter from Możdż[eński]: No doubt nothing will come of it.

_Prochitai vnimatelno moyo pismo_ [Read my letter attentively]³⁶ and
answer ALL QUESTIONS.

TO LEO JOGICHES

[Paris, March 29, 1894]

My most precious Ciucia!

Today I received your letter with the one from Wlad[yslaw Heinrich]
enclosed. By now you’ve surely calmed down; [because] it was possible to
get everything straightened out in good time. NOT A SINGLE COPY of that
edition has been delivered anywhere. Only this man Reiff—the idiot—gave
something to this police agent [_Spitzel_] here.³⁷ I don’t agree with
everything you’ve just written. But that’s of no significance, now that
everything has been taken care of. As far as the appeal is concerned, at
present, for health reasons, I am absolutely not in a position to
undertake it. Write it, Gold, with as much detail as possible, and since
I don’t have a lot of work to do, send it DIRECTLY TO ME, without Julek
[Marchlewski] translating it. Adolf [Warski] might hear something from
Julek, and I don’t want them to know that you wrote it. Your supportive
attitude about having the appeal in the next issue has inspired the
Adolfs [i.e., the Warskis], especially Jadzia [Warska]. Of course, they
expressed total agreement about the appeal all along, but in their
hearts they were having a hard time over it, and above all they were
very pleased with your knowledgeable response in regard to the
complaints.

Be sure to send me the appeal. I’ll be waiting for it. I received the
brassiere and the underclothes. I’m sending you, finally, the bill from
Reiff for the pamphlet. It will definitely give you a shock. I hesitated
about sending it to you because I was absolutely determined to get the
price reduced somehow. At first I categorically refused to pay, and
Reiff said that we should go to Janiszewski. We had a furious argument.
I demanded an itemized bill instead of a lump sum, and I inquired among
the workers whether he had really paid them so much. It turns out that,
with a few minor exceptions, he’s right. What was I to do? After a long
back and forth I got 5 francs off the price. Nothing in the world will
make him go lower! It seems, in fact, on top of everything, that you
made too low an estimate when you spoke of something like 75 francs. At
any rate, the next thousand will cost 25 francs—I found this out later
with reference to other newspapers. The paper [for the pamphlet] is much
more expensive than that used for _Sprawa Robotnicza_; also, the Elzevir
binding is more expensive.³⁸ At any rate, it will by no means be more
expensive than that wretched Berlin pamphlet.³⁹ I’m enclosing bills for
the recent shipment of (ten) packages to you, amounting to more than 10
francs. Together with the forwarding charge that makes a total of 11.50.

With that I’ve accounted for over 200 [francs]. But I’ve received 300
from you (by mail). Of the remaining 100, I paid a goodly 40 to Reiff on
the bill for issue No. 8, and I spent 60 (!) on myself. My golden one,
don’t be angry that I’m giving you such a detailed accounting, but I
feel ashamed because of the large sum, and it seems to me that you
probably can’t imagine what I’m doing here with the money. So then, dear
golden heart, once again, to Jadzia for two weeks—23, for the room in
the hotel (with [cleaning] service)—17, for the doctor and medicine (my
eyes)—5 francs; all together, 45. Then we also went once to the
Eldorado⁴⁰ and once to see Sarah Bern[hardt] (about 1 F.), once to a
student café, and once on an outing to St.-Cloud. That cost me 15 F.,
but don’t forget that I also paid for them—they have nothing, and I
couldn’t do otherwise. And that’s the end of it. I won’t pay out more
for anything; I feel terribly ashamed that I’ve spent so much. Besides
all that, trips on public transport have cost me a lot. Every time I
turn around I have to take a streetcar to Reiff’s, because the distances
here are many miles long! On one occasion I wasn’t well, and we had to
take a carriage there and back, and that cost exactly 3 F! And so I
repeat, to make the accounting quite clear: I took 300 for the cause and
65 for myself when I left. Of that 300, 282 went to Reiff and [other]
expenses for our cause and 18 for my personal expenses. Then you sent me
by mail 100 and 200. Of that I’ve already spent 200 for the cause and 60
for myself. (I’m saving the remaining 40 for the next _Sprawa_ bill.)
—In an hour I’m going to Reiff’s, to expedite the sending of issue No. 8
to you. My dearest Gold, how I wish I was already back with you. You
know, the thought keeps running through my head that this Polish lecture
project⁴¹ may not be such a bright idea, because in such cases different
impressions always remain afterward, as after the lectures about
Mendelson. We say we’ve smashed them to pieces, and they say we haven’t
proven anything. Perhaps it’s better simply to wait, and knock them to
pieces in our publications. But when I have these thoughts I say to
myself that perhaps they’re an expression of a hidden longing to be with
you and a wish to get away from here sooner. Therefore I’ve decided not
to pay any attention to them. But, oy! I have no desire to work on this
lecture project at all! I haven’t yet prepared anything. Until now I’ve
been busy all day long with matters involving the _Sprawa_, trips to
Reiff’s shop, sending things off, etc. This evening, however, I’ll talk
with Adolf [Warski]. It seems that we’ll agree on it. And the lecture
will have to be on a Sunday, because otherwise it will have to start at
9 [p.m.] at the earliest (they have their meals here at 7 [p.m.]), and
the travel time is about an hour. And yet I should be writing the appeal
all over again and getting it printed. When am I supposed to prepare for
the lecture? I’ll end up sitting here for an eternity. Oy, my dearest
gold, I would like so much, as soon as possible, to stop being a
“mature, responsible” person (especially because this doesn’t work out
well [_ne vezyot_] for me). I’d like to get back to you, and be in your
arms, because everything here leaves me completely unmoved. I didn’t
always have this fear that in one hour a telegram could turn to nothing
everything I’ve been working to build. Dear golden heart, this isn’t a
reproach AGAINST YOU. You’re not to blame. —Krichevsky’s opinion about
the pamphlet made me very happy. IMMEDIATELY after you get word from
Wlad[yslaw Heinrich] of the shipment’s having come through successfully,
TELEGRAPH ME: “Congratulations” [_Gratuliere_] at Adolf’s address … I
haven’t received the books yet. —I’ll answer your ten questions in
another letter. […]

Ciuciutka, several times I’ve wanted to imagine you laughing, and how
you look when you do—and I can’t. Why? Why do you laugh so seldom?
You’ll see what a nasty, awful wife will come back to you, with a long,
thin nose and circles under her eyes, and a beard. Do you want one like
that?

Ciucia, what is the tomcat up to? Does he come to you? Are you good to
him?…

TO LEO JOGICHES

[Paris, April 1, 1894] early Sunday

My dearest, my most precious creature, I just this moment got your sweet
letter. You’re mistaken, my only one: in the given instance we are not
“racing each other” [_nie “gonimy się”_]. My status, or situation
[_stan_], is the same as yours. I dream of seeing you again, my only
happiness. I have to fight hard to keep myself from saying to hell with
the public talks [_referaty_] and all the rest, and not to go flying
back to you, but I’m ashamed of myself for that. Besides, I have a
feeling, and I’m sure of it, that you yourself will call me back when
everything is done. My _Krümelchen_, my dear one, my little golden boy
[Bengelchen]!⁴² Do you want to make a trip to Locarno?

Wherever you want to go! Even if you just want to stay in Zurich the
whole summer—for me it’s good to be anywhere with you. I am totally
incapable now of thinking about a village [to go to]. I think only of
YOU. Besides, in this filthy, noisy city of Paris, where I constantly
have terrible catarrh from the bad air and a headache from the clanging
and banging—Zurich, so still and calm and sweet smelling, with Mount
Zurich right there, seems to me a true paradise. My Gold, perhaps you
would prefer to go to Weggis right away, let me know! I will very gladly
go there too, right away, if you just write me [to do that]. I repeat:
wherever you want, wherever you write me to go—I’ll go there without a
second thought [_bez namysłu_]. — […] I must remain here at least one
more week for sure: two public talks [_referaty_], the visit to Lavrov,
and talking things over with Adolf [Warski]. That’s what’s still waiting
for me. […] Now I have to ask you for only one thing: get together some
[current] statistics on the production and export of grain in Poland,
just a few (for earlier times there is an entire table in Poznanski).⁴³
Also on Russian imports. I have not yet thought about an outline, but it
looks like I will decide to write a critique, against this background,
of the article in _Przegląd_ [_Socjalistyczny_], because it is an
expression of the conceptions here. Anyhow, you have the article, and
whatever statistics you find necessary—send them to me, but [do it]
quickly.

From Hein[rich] I received the _Glos_—and once again he has made a
complete muddle of things. Maybe you can make sense of it.

In his letter he writes: “I am sending you the _Glos_ in which there are
certain signs—very faint to the eye. If there will be something
important for my trip to our home country—send a telegram to Katowice.
My signs are on page 6 and following.” I took [the publication] and
searched—nothing, I mean absolutely nothing. On page 6 there actually
are some signs. I try [deciphering] them with the key I have for Kazius
[Ratyński] (1648753)—the result is the following words: “Pamphlets on
the way, prepare some places _hzlosie_.” What does it all mean, who’s
writing to whom, and what does the last word mean? —I don’t understand
anything. Most likely it means, “Get a storage place ready in advance,”
and H[einrich] is writing to Kaziuta [Ratynski].⁴⁴ But then, why in the
world did he send it to me? Either this [issue of] _Glos_ has gone to
our home country with this message and now has come back. (But has all
this actually been done?) Or is it that H[einrich] meant to send this
copy of _Glos_ to Kazius and a different one to me and got the addresses
mixed up? In that case, will there be bad consequences? Please advise,
what should be done! I wanted to warn him at any rate, but I don’t have
his address here with me!! He writes (the ass!): “Write to poste
restante at Katowice,” but he doesn’t indicate WHAT NAME TO WRITE!
Whether it should be Alex or Hein[rich] or Miad. I’ll write him a letter
in any case addressed to Alex. Do whatever you consider necessary.
Yesterday I sent you the sample copy. Reiff doesn’t want to print it
today. It will be done tomorrow; you’ll receive everything on Tuesday.
As for money, dear Gold, send 150 F. to cover all eventualities. So long
for now, golden one, my only, precious, sweet beloved. R!

TO BORIS KRICHEVSKY

[January 19, 1895]⁴⁵

Worthy comrade!

Enclosed I am sending a short article in German for you to check over.
This time at least your efforts are not for nothing, because its
acceptance by the _Arbeiterstimme_ is guaranteed in advance.⁴⁶ Please be
so kind as to go through it nicely, so that it will be more succinct and
stronger, and if possible, more dazzling as well. This accursed language
[German] has dampened the finest outbursts of my thought, and so you
must do this for me. Also, the article takes up 9 of my pages, when it’s
supposed to be 6 or 7 pages, _maximum_. Actually, I was unable to
shorten it any more, because there’s almost nothing left that can be
crossed out without hurting the presentation, and that’s exactly what
I’m incapable of doing in a foreign language. If each thought is
presented strongly and concisely, one can avoid repetition. I especially
recommend pages 8 and 9 for condensation by you. Please tighten it up
and reduce it to 7 of MY pages, _maximum_.

Finally, I have one more request. Please, please start on this
IMMEDIATELY upon receipt of this letter. I promised Seidel faithfully
[_hoch und heilig_] to deliver the article to him tomorrow morning
(Saturday). Well, as far as I’m concerned, to hell with it. I’ll deliver
it [tomorrow] in the evening, or at least on Sunday, if only you do it
early and send it back right away, then I can see that he gets it
tomorrow or the day after. Please forgive me for imposing on your time,
but is it my fault that you can do German better than anyone else?

I thank you in advance and await your reply by tomorrow afternoon.

Heartfelt greetings to Fenya.⁴⁷

How are things with her eye? Is she still wearing glasses or is there no
more trace [of the problem]? What are the two kidlets [_Schnipse_]
doing? Actually, you haven’t even written what kind of place you’ve
found to live in.

Stay healthy, all of you, [and] I send hearty handshakes to all.

Yours,

  R. L.

TO LEO JOGICHES

[Paris, March 18, 1895]

Ciuciu, poor thing, you did the proofreading of the December issue in
vain. Looking through it, I see after all that nothing important needed
to be changed. There was only one thing that went wrong: I wasn’t able
to include an item specifying “Corrections for the November Issue.” The
last words of [that] issue, the most important, were changed
disastrously—they don’t bear looking at. Adolf [Warski] and the
typesetter give the excuse that there was no more room, not even a tiny
bit, so little room in fact that after shortening my final paragraph by
about six lines, they also had to throw out the subtitle “What the Tsar
Is Paying Out Money For” and had to merge [the ending of my article]
with the beginning of [another] article. I myself would have done it
differently of course, but what can one do?

I’m now going to Reiff’s, to look through my corrections for the May
issue and to send it to be printed. I’ve already reached agreement about
the paper (color and weight). He delays the work so much that it’s
enough to make a person explode, but there’s no possibility of
persuading him to do otherwise. I was at Goupys and gave them a good
scolding because of the way the shipment was packed; they apologized
profusely and promised to do the packing differently. I didn’t scold
them about the paper, because they had given Adolf samples, and Adolf
chose, entirely in accordance with our requirements that the paper
should be as light as possible. As regards the color and the firmness of
the paper, he thought the three qualities [light weight, firmness, and
the color] could not be combined.

I gave Reiff the finished article to be printed, and I should receive
the proof sheets today. I have already written “The Verdict,” together
with details,⁴⁸ and so five compactly written pages have been done. All
together it’s enough, so that I myself favor leaving out the poems, for
which once again there isn’t room. I’ll put the poems together with the
March issue, but again I have no inkling of what I should do with my
Foreword, which is hardly appropriate to put anywhere in the special
workers’ issue.⁴⁹ —Together we read out loud the letters in the March
issue and the article by the workers. They are excellent. The issue will
be very successful, in my opinion.

I’m experiencing a great disappointment. Adolf is giving me almost no
help at all. He comes home late, and is generally in no condition to
write anything reasonably good. For that reason in living here with the
Adolfs [i.e., Warskis] I have run into various obstacles, because people
come here to meet with me, and I didn’t feel I could move again from
Adolf’s to some place else, because in order to do that, one would have
to find a good place to live, and one would have to search for a long
time to find it, and, once again, I have neither time nor energy for
that. But this is going to come to an end now, because today, for sure,
I’m going to rent a room. Wojnarowska has a room for me in the same
building where she lives. It’s fairly close to the Adolfs’ but on the
other hand it’s far from Reiff’s and the Bibiliothèque Nationale, and I
will have to travel by streetcar to those places. But there is no other
possibility, because there are few furnished rooms in the vicinity of
the library, and they are frightfully expensive. All in all, Zebrak’s
talk about a splendid room for 25 francs turned out to be a fairy tale.
No one has heard of any such thing. The CHEAPEST acceptable room costs
30. And I will have to take such a room, but [at least] it will be
decent, as Wojnarowska says.

For the library I even have two cards to choose from, already.

I got to know Wojnarowska yesterday. She came to the Adolfs [i.e.,
Warskis]. She’s very pretty, kind, and intelligent. What she’s like
other than that, we’ll have to see. At any rate I can make use of her as
a neighbor to make some acquaintances among the French, because
unfortunately Guesde is not around. His mental instability is a tale
unto itself. He’s in a weakened condition, with a kidney ailment, and is
keeping himself in the South of France. We have the intention, all of us
together, of visiting Lavrov.

Yesterday I was at a banquet in honor of the Commune held by the
Guesdistes.⁵⁰ I heard Camélinat speak, among others (he’s the only one
from the first section of the International who’s still alive). He
reported on the history of 1864–71. Carnaud from Marseille spoke
brilliantly. No one begins their remarks without compliments for the
Germans; it’s almost enough to make a person sick. Among the Germans
have you ever heard an expression like _le sentiment de la lutte des
classes_?!!…⁵¹ [Here] they mention that and similar things all the time.
But just imagine, they’ve never translated the article by Engels from
_Neue Zeit_.⁵² In general they don’t consider it a big issue. Neither
Guesde nor Lafargue is thinking about altering the program. —In the
letter from home that you forwarded to me I found the news that my
mother, when she went out of the house for the first time to pick a
rose, fell down in the yard and broke her left arm (two weeks ago).
Supposedly, it’s already better. —In the letter from Gutt there was a
card with one mark for Wladek [Olszewski]. I’ll enclose it. —

We’re eating in a restaurant [these days]. Jadzia [Warska] no longer
cooks at home, because it’s too far for Adolf to come home from the
office.

In general I’m not in especially good spirits. I feel sluggish and
nothing appeals to me. It would be quite different if you were here.
There’s an interesting state secret of the party that Adolf revealed to
me yesterday, but it’s too late at night for me to write about it now.
I’ll write tomorrow or the day after.

I’M WAITING FOR THE FIRST AND FOURTH ISSUES OF _ROBOTNIK_.

I’m having such a hard time writing this lead article and about
_Robotnik_. You have no idea. My head is simply dried up.

Stay healthy and write more often. Your R.

[P.S.] Where should I send the things?

TO LEO JOGICHES

[Paris, March 19, 1895]
Tuesday night

My dear! I’m sending you the lead article for the January issue.⁵³ I’m
sending it so that you will reply as to whether you will be too upset if
it is printed. It is weak. I know that. And I know everything you’ll say
to me, but in no case can I write another one. If I don’t put this one
in, I won’t put anything in, and I’ll fill [the issue] up with
something, without a lead article. I am completely incapable of writing
[more]. Adolf [Warski] is writing nothing. He just can’t do it, as he
says. In general, I regret that I’ve taken on so much. If it hadn’t been
for the writings by the workers, I would have stopped with the January
issue at the latest. I can’t do it. You must understand that I can’t.
I’m not a machine. Nothing more is coming out of my head, and besides
I’m not feeling especially well (already I’m out of my skin [_ze skóry
mi ju_ż _zeszlo_]). Reiff is going to print the May issue tomorrow.
Except for the most necessary things, I’ve made no improvements in the
article about the social patriots.⁵⁴ That’s because (1) I’ve already
rewritten this article six times, though I don’t know why; and (2)
because the wise Adolf is having the issue set _en pages_.⁵⁵ And so [for
any changes] the typesetter has to break open and redo the whole article
and the whole issue, and meanwhile the pages already had to be broken
open previously. Reiff is typesetting very slowly, and whenever I get
into a row with him about it he cites a whole series of facts; he says
we’re always making a fuss [telling him to hurry], and then it takes us
four weeks. And he’s right. I think that even now everything remains
unsold and is still lying there, because there is no more news about
sales. Is it still true that absolutely nothing has come from there??

I have a room already, for 30 [francs]; with room-cleaning service, 35.
It is very pretty, and quite large, with polished floors, in a private
home, furnished and clean, in the same house where Wojnarowska is.
Unfortunately, from all directions there are Poles and Russians writing
that they want to meet me, and that they’ll be coming to Adolf
[Warski]’s. Actually I do have the time and the inclination for meeting
them.

Be well. Write about what sort of news you have there. I don’t know if
I’ll be in a position to write about the _Robotnik_.

Send the article and the corrections back IMMEDIATELY, because I’m
waiting for them.

TO LEO JOGICHES

[Paris, March 21, 1895]
Thursday evening

My dearest, only, beloved Dziodzio!

Finally I’m taking a break. I’m terribly exhausted both physically and
spiritually. For the first time since my arrival I’m finally alone. At
this moment I have my own place to live and I’ve moved in. I have a
charming room, it’s almost like a small salon, and my dream is that
you’ll come here and we can both be here together. (You could get a room
in the same house.)

It’s near the Adolfs [Warskis] and very far from the library, but over
there one can’t even think of getting a room for less than 50 to 75
francs. For that reason it’s better to travel back and forth once a day
on the streetcar. I make the trip early. I have lunch there not far
[from the library] at a private home (of some Poles, Social Democrats!),
Adolf [Warski] only eats there. Then I go back to the library, and in
the evening travel home. The library’s open now from 9 to 5. But never
mind about these particulars of daily life.

My golden one, my only one, in my thoughts I embrace you and rest my
head on your chest, with my eyes closed, to get some rest. I am so
exhausted! And what about you way off there, poor thing, no sooner were
you free of us than you had to start work on your pamphlet. How little
time you have! Or is the work going well for you?

You little monkey, I know you. Now you’ll answer me the same way, with
an intimate letter, and as soon as I start writing dryly, you’ll be sure
to do likewise. You little monkey, you have to imitate me in everything.
You never have a mood of your own (except when you’re furiously raging
and [then you’re] unbearable). But are you in my situation? Are your
impressions [and perceptions] the same as mine? What do you imitate me
for? Sometimes it really seems to me that you’re [like] a piece of wood.
It was said once, or it actually happened, that you loved me, and now
you’re trying to act as if that were so, that you love me. But from
within yourself, you never feel an active impulse in this direction [_A
sam ze siebie nigdy nie czujesz czego_ś _aktywnego w tym kierunku_]. Oh,
you’re horrible, and I don’t like you.

You know, if you were here, you’d really be happy. Here for the first
time one can get a sense of the importance of _Sprawa Robotnicza_. Adolf
tells me that recently it’s made more of an impression than it ever has
before. The social patriots are constantly feeling under pressure
because of it, and they wait with trepidation for the appearance of each
new issue (those were Adolf’s words). Why is that? I asked him, in order
to find out more. Well, they’re afraid of such articles as “Na
Kongress”⁵⁶ and “Pod bat.”⁵⁷

The interest [in our journal] is enormous. People are constantly asking
for the latest issues and actually scrambling to get hold of the
“Independent Poland.”⁵⁸ But the best is yet to come.

In the local section here of the Union of Polish Socialists Abroad⁵⁹ the
leading figure is [Kelles-]Krauz (a friend of Stasia and Janek). In
November he gave a talk to the section in which he strongly criticized
the Union Abroad and the tactics of the PPS and _Predswit_. He referred
to “Pod bat” and indicated that many of our criticisms are quite
correct, and he called for a response on the topics [we had raised].
Among other things he asked the PPS reproachfully why the _Robotnik_
“had not uttered a single word about the program.” Further, he said:
Undoubtedly the most important expression of PPS tactics was the
Kościuszko celebration.⁶⁰ But what vacillations, how much inconsistency
the PPS displayed in organizing the celebration. Why a joint celebration
with the patriots? (In some respects [this was] a reiteration of “Dwie
daty.”) [_Mniej wiecej stresczcenie “Dwóch dat.”_]⁶¹ These were all
mistakes, “which our opponents (he’s referring to us) have made use of
with such passion and such exaggeration.” To put it briefly—it’s hitting
home! Every blow of ours strikes hard at their Achilles’ heel. You ask
where I know all this from. It’s a simple matter. The Paris section
decided to print the talk by K[elles-Krauz] and—had it printed at
Reiff’s. But obviously the Londoners and Zurichers got cold feet and
prevented it from being circulated in any way. Thus the little pamphlet
did not make its appearance (it’s the one I wrote you about in the
postcard). It’s a shame, a great shame, [because] it’s a concoction that
would be of PRICELESS service to us in every respect. In it, for
example, there is an objection to German Social Democracy as an
“appalling swamp” [_Jest tam np. zarzucanie niemieckeiej sojaldemokracji
“przerazajacego zabagnienia”_]. (All the social patriots here are
“Allemanistes”⁶² and the term “Guesdiste”⁶³ is for them a dirty word.)
The argument is made—in order to dispose of us—that we are repeating
word for word the tactics and programmatic concepts of Bebel,
Liebknecht, and Guesde, while they pay homage to the “true
revolutionary, Nieuwenhuis.” Unfortunately this pamphlet can’t be used,
because that would be regarded as a theft, but it can be used, as Adolf
says, as a “weapon in reserve,” since one can at a suitable moment make
it known to the _Przedświt_ people that we possess a copy. I’ll send you
a confidential copy. Adolf got hold of it and gave it to me
confidentially without Jadzia’s knowledge, because with her moral
conceptions she considers it swinishness [to take someone else’s
pamphlet] and has forbidden him to say anything to me about it. As you
see, we are now standing exactly where we wanted to be. At all times I’m
keeping them in suspense. One minute they’re impressed by our issues
dealing with the tsar, and the next thing they know they’re getting a
hiding because of the _Robotnik_, and finally the issue with the
workers’ letters will be a sensation because it shows our ties with the
homeland.⁶⁴ In short, everything would be splendid if it were not for
this damned smuggling situation.⁶⁵ What’s wrong? What’s the problem
there? It’s definitely making me anxious about what’s going to happen.
When will we straighten it out? You remind me about the deadline and
shout for the issues to be made ready. But don’t forget that Reiff
prints VERY SLOWLY, and I can’t do anything about that. He says he can’t
go any faster, and that’s all. If we could give the job to the Goupys,
it would be done in three days, but then it would cost 105 F. instead of
85 (because it’s 5 F. for the typesetting but Reiff includes that in his
charges).

For God’s sake send the addresses so that the May and December packages
can be sent off, because I’m ashamed that after such a big row they’re
still lying there. Because of that, Reiff no longer has any regard for
the pressure I put on him. At least the packages should be lying around
over there, but not here. So I’m waiting for the addresses. It’s
impossible to put everything in one package, because waiting until the
other issues are done would take too long. Would it be better if I sent
everything to you there, so that you would pack it all up? Because it’s
very difficult for me here to get it all packaged properly, so that it’s
ready to be mailed, and we have written to Dicken⁶⁶ to tell him that he
should just tear off the outer newspaper wrapper. This [work] can’t be
done at the Adolfs, because there’s not room enough, and also, people
keep showing up there; for example, Morek [Warszawski; Adolf’s brother]
can’t just be turned away. (Besides that, moving such large packages
would immediately attract the attention of the concierge.) There can be
no question of bringing the material here to where I live. There’s a
police agent who regularly visits the concierge. (Write to me with
caution. If necessary, use a code, as with Karol [Brzezina]. Instead of
my last name, put an _x_ over an _m_.) Otherwise the concierge is ready
to make a denunciation because she’s just a simple-minded woman. After
having thought it over, I now see that DEFINITELY the first thing is to
send [the material] to you in Zurich. I can’t let Reiff’s people do the
packaging, because they would never do it THE WAY YOU DO. They would do
it sloppily, as usual. So you yourself, together with Julek
[Marchlewski], have to do it. So write IMMEDIATELY, at least a postcard,
as to whether you agree with all this and whether everything necessary
should be sent to Zurich.

See how base and vile [_podly_] you are. I already sense that every word
about the stupidest [political] business interests you twice as much,
ten times as much, a hundred times as much as when I pour my heart out
to you. The moment you read any detail about the PPS your eyes light up
immediately, quite differently from when I write you something about
myself, that I’m tired or that I have a yearning, etc.

Ah, you Gold! I have some very fearsome intentions for you, you know!
Really, while I’ve been here, I’ve been letting it run through my head a
little, the question of our relationship, and when I return I’m going to
take you in my claws so sharply that it will make you squeal, you’ll
see. I will terrorize you completely. You will HAVE TO submit
[_pokorit’sa_]. You will have to give in and bow down. That is the
condition for our living together further. I must break you, [and] grind
the sharp edges off your horns, or else I can’t continue with you. You
are a bad-tempered person, and now, within myself, I am as sure of that
as that the sun is in the sky, after having thought about your entire
spiritual physiognomy. And I’ll smother this rage and fury that you have
in yourself as sure as I’m alive. Such weeds can’t be allowed to get in
among the cabbages. I have the right to do this because I’m ten times
better than you, and I quite consciously condemn this very salient
aspect of your character. I am now going to terrorize you without any
mercy until you become gentle, and begin to feel and conduct yourself
toward other people as any ordinary good person would. At one and the
same time I feel a boundless love for you and an implacable strictness
toward the failings in your character. Therefore note well—get a hold of
yourself! Because I’m already standing here with the carpet beater in my
hand, and as soon as I arrive I’m going to start beating the dust out of
you.

Undoubtedly there’s a lot in the words above that you don’t understand,
but I’ll explain it to you after I get back. And now, as the beginning
of my reign of terror: think about it, BE GOOD! Write kind and gentle
letters, and don’t address me with the formal “you,” which is a tactless
piece of crudity on your part. Don’t pick apart my letters, be humble,
and tell me you love me without being afraid that you will be demeaning
yourself if, say, just for today, you give me three pennies more than I
give you. Don’t be afraid and don’t be ashamed to express your feelings
for me (if you still HAVE them, because I will use no force on you in
THAT regard), and don’t have any anxiety that I may not accept them with
the accustomed respect. Learn to kneel down in spirit a little, and DO
IT NOT ONLY at those moments when with open arms I call to you but also
when I’m standing with my back to you. In a word, be more generous, more
magnanimous, relate to your feelings in a more noble way. I demand it!
Unfortunately I feel certain deficiencies of character in myself from
constantly being around you, but that only spurs me on to struggle with
you more vigorously than ever. Think about it. You MUST submit, because
I will force you to through the power of love. Gold, my only one, be
well. I embrace you and kiss you many hundreds of times, Ciucia, my one
and only!…

Dearest Gold, I BEG OF YOU, SEND ME SOME MONEY [THAT I CAN USE] FOR ME!
But send it right away.

Gold, you’ve received some caviar there for me from Rostov (a present
from my brother). You’ve gone wild [over it], right? But don’t you dare
eat it up. Put off that urge until [we’re in] Weggis!!

SCOUNDREL, send me your photograph RIGHT AWAY!!!

Forward my letters WITHOUT DELAY.

My address: Avenue Reille 7, au 3-ème

TO THE DEAN OF THE FACULTY OF POLITICAL SCIENCES, ZURICH UNIVERSITY

Zurich, March 12, 1897

Highly esteemed and respected Sir!

May I permit myself, with reference to the accompanying dissertation,
_The Industrial Development of Poland_, to request that I be allowed to
take the examination for the title of Doctor of Public Law and Economic
Affairs [_Doctor juris publici et rerum cameralium_].

At the same time I most humbly request that my examination, if at all
possible, be scheduled during the second half of the month of April,
because I am compelled by family obligations to leave Zurich at the end
of April.⁶⁷

Allow me, highly esteemed Sir, to express my regards

With deepest respect and humility,

Rosa Luxemburg

TO LEO JOGICHES

[Switzerland, July 16, 1897]

No, I can’t go on working. The thought of you keeps distracting me. I
must write you a few words. Dearest, most beloved, you are not with me
now, yet my entire soul is filled with you, and it embraces you. To you
it will certainly seem monstrous, perhaps even comical, that I’m writing
you this letter when we live ten steps apart, see each other three times
a day, and besides—I’m your wife, after all—so why all this
romanticism—writing a letter at night to your own husband? Oh my golden
one, let it seem comical to the whole world—only not to you. At least
read this letter seriously and with your heart, with the same feeling
that you read my letters back then—in Geneva—when I was not yet your
wife. Because I’m writing it with the same strong feelings as then, and
my whole soul impels me toward you in exactly the same way—my eyes
overflow with tears. (At this point no doubt you smile [and quote
me]—“You know, nowadays I cry over the tiniest trifle”! [_“Ja przecież o
byle co teraz placzę”_].)

Dziodzio, my love, do you know why I’m writing you this letter instead
of saying all this to you in person? Because I don’t know how, I’m not
able to talk with you so freely about these things anymore. Right now
I’m as touchy and skittish as a hare. Your slightest gesture or
inconsequential remark makes my heart shrink and seals my mouth. I can
speak with you as openly as this only if I feel surrounded by a warm,
trusting atmosphere, and that tends to happen so rarely between us now!
As you see, today I’ve been flooded with such strange and peculiar
feelings, awakened in me by these couple of days of being alone and
reflecting. I’ve had so many thoughts to share with you. But you were
distracted, though cheerful, and you didn’t feel you wanted anything
“physical”—in other words, [you thought] that’s all I was concerned
about at that moment. That’s precisely the difficulty I’ve been obsessed
with at this moment. That hurt me so much, but you thought I was just
feeling dissatisfied because you were in a hurry to set off on your
trip. Perhaps I might not even have had the nerve to write this letter
now, but a bit of feeling [that you showed] has given me courage. At our
parting you brought up [something, and gave me] a whiff of the past,
that past in memory of which every night before going to sleep I almost
choke among the pillows from my tears. My dear, my love—no doubt your
eyes are already glancing around, impatiently searching: “What in the
world does she want?” [_czegóz ona chce_]. Do I [myself] know what I
really want? I want to love you. I want the same gentle, trusting, ideal
atmosphere to exist between us as existed back then. You, my dear, often
understand me too superficially. You think I’m always “sulking”
[“_duyus_”] because you’re going away or something like that. And you
can’t imagine that it hurts me deeply that for you our relationship is
something totally external. Oh don’t say, my love, that I don’t
understand, that it’s not just an outward formality the way I think it
is. I know, I understand what it means. I understand it because—I feel.
Earlier when you spoke with me about this, to me it was empty sound,
sound without meaning, but now it is—a hard reality. Oh, I have a very
good sense of what this outward formality really is. —I feel it when I
see how gloomy you are, and without speaking you busy yourself with
something, any other concerns or even with unpleasant things, and your
look tells me—“It’s none of your affair; go mind your own business”
[“_Ne tvoyo delo, smotri sebe svoi_ dela”]; I feel it when I see how
you, when we have quarrels on a bigger scale, take these impressions to
heart and mull them over, and you think about our relationship and you
arrive at one or another conclusion and you quickly make some decision
or other, and in some way, in spite of everything, I am left behind, and
I can only ponder over it with my poor brain, wondering what and how you
are thinking; I feel it after every time we are together, when you shove
me aside afterwards, and close yourself off in your work; I feel it, in
conclusion, if in my thoughts I review my whole past life, and my whole
future, in which I envision myself as a mannequin activated by some
internal mechanism. My dear one, my love, I am not complaining, I am not
asking for anything, all I want is that you not interpret any weeping on
my part as “just the scenes that women put on.” Do I know what the
situation is, after all? I am certainly very much to blame for it,
perhaps the most to blame, for the fact that no warm and well-balanced
relationship prevails between us. But what can I do? —I don’t know, I
don’t know how to behave, I can’t get control over the way I am in our
relationship. I don’t know how to do it. I’m not capable of taking firm
hold of the situation. I’m not capable of drawing [certain] conclusions,
I’m not capable of taking a particular firm position in relation to
you—at any moment I behave the way inspiration or impulse dictates, so
much love and suffering have accumulated in my soul that I throw myself
at you, throw my arms around your neck, and your coldness pains me—it
tears at my soul, and I hate you for it—and I feel I could kill you. My
golden one, after all, you are capable of reasoning and comprehending.
You have always done that [reasoned and comprehended], both for you and
for me, in our relationship! Why is it that now you don’t want to do it
together with me? Why do you leave me all by myself? Oh my God, I’m
turning to you and appealing to you so much that maybe, as a result,
it’s become true, what more and more often seems to me to be so, that
perhaps—you don’t love me so much anymore, do you? Truly, truly—I feel
that so often.

You now find everything about me so bad and hateful. You scarcely feel
the need to spend time with me! Incidentally, do I even know WHAT it is
that drives me to these thoughts? I know only, if I let my thoughts
wander this way, if I imagine everything, taken all together, then
something tells me that you would be far happier now if this didn’t
exist, that you would prefer to run off somewhere and be rid of the
whole business. Oh my love, I understand that completely. I see how
little brightness there is for you in this relationship, how I wear on
your nerves with these scenes, these tears, these trifles, even this
lack of belief in your love. I know it, my golden one, and if I think
about it, then maybe I would prefer to be somewhere else—with the
devil—or best of all, not to exist. There’s a thought that pains me so:
that into your pure, proud, solitary life I have come crowding in with
my old wives’ tales, with my unbalanced self, and my disor-derliness,
and for what, for what, for the devil? Oh my God, what’s the use of
talking about it—it’s pointless. And again, my dear, you will ask, what
is it, after all, that I want? I want nothing, nothing, my precious,
only that you should know that I, even with the personality I have, am
not tormenting you so blindly and unfeelingly, I want you to know that I
weep often and bitterly because of this, and once again—I don’t
understand it, I don’t know how to behave or what I should do to help
myself. Sometimes I think it would be best to see you as seldom as
possible. At other times I pop up, in good spirits again, and would like
to forget it all and throw myself in your arms and cry my heart out, but
then this cursed thought comes again and whispers to me—leave him in
peace; he puts up with all of it only out of politeness, from wanting to
be tactful—then two or three small things immediately [seem to] confirm
this thought, and hatred wells up in me, and I’d like to torment you, to
bite you, to show you that I don’t need your love, that I too would be
ready to do without you, then again I torment myself and grieve all
alone, and so it goes endlessly, in a vicious circle.

“How much drama!” Right? “It’s boring! The same thing over and over.”
But to me it’s as though I haven’t said even one-tenth of what I wanted
to say. [_“Skol’ko dram!” Pravda? “Skuchno! Vechno odno i to zhe.” A mne
tak, kak budto ya i desyatoi doli togo ne skazala, chto khotela_.]

If the tongue were true to the voice,
And the voice to the thought,
How then could the word ever hold within bounds
The lightning of thought?⁶⁸

Well, goodbye. It’s as though I’m already regretting that I wrote
[this]. Maybe you’ll get angry? Maybe you’ll laugh? Oh no, don’t laugh!
[_Nu, proshchai. Ya uzhe kak budto zhaleyu, chto napisala. Mozhet
budesh’ zlit’sya? Mozhet budesh’ smeyat’sya? O net, ne smeisya!_].

Only you, my beloved, can offer “welcome to the ghost”⁶⁹ AS YOU ONCE
DID!

Dziodzio, Dziodzio!

[A scene from long ago —] With ardent longing
I reach out my arms to you
In my soul I behold the loveliest image
And give it the sweetest names.

Tenderly, deeply moved, also smiling,
I tear from my heart the resentment that makes me ill.
I find a joy in the echo of your voice,
Myself the echo of your words.

Yet when you come, I stand paralyzed,
Instead of plunging into your arms.
My heart’s constricted, waiting with fear,
To see what welcome will greet me.

My eyes search to see what you will bring,
What look you will have on your face when you come,
Waiting to see if you’ll deign an embrace,
I weigh every movement, every word.

And I don’t know what power drives
My thoughts, my words, ever faster.
The thoughts are not true to the feelings,
The words are not true to the thoughts.

You sit stiffly, I stand beside you.
Each one hurts the other

With words and also with silence.
And so we remain, close-lipped and frightened.
What has happened? What _is_ it that’s happened?
We loved each other so much!
Time never even touched us
When we were together.

We were good and we were bad
Meeting and parting were full of trust
We harkened to the voice of love
Free of any second thoughts

Today you leave, disgusted by quarrels
I want to call out: Stay, beloved! Don’t go!
“Goodnight”—that’s what the cold lips whisper,
And I turn back, dissolved in tears.

TO LEO JOGICHES

[Berlin, May 17, 1898] Tuesday evening

My dearest Dziodzio!

I now have the first more or less peaceful moment in which I am alone
and can write you in more detail, because all day yesterday and today
I’ve been running around with the “little cousin” in search of a place
to live. You have no inkling what it means, in Berlin, to search for a
place to live. I’ve been searching “only” in three parts of the
city—Charlottenburg, the West, and the Northwest—because living in other
parts of the city in the summer is unbearable. But the dimensions of
things here are such that you spend hours on a couple of streets,
especially because you have to run way up, many storeys high, one
building after another, depending on what’s said on the notice on the
front door—and it’s mostly all in vain. The rooms are generally
dreadfully expensive everywhere. Here in Charlottenburg the cheapest
room that would be at all acceptable to me costs 28 marks [per month].
There’s no sense in dreaming, not even for a moment, of having a
separate bedroom. What we generally run into is a single room that
doubles as a bedroom—though [_allerdings_] one that is splendidly
furnished. Nevertheless it will cost … 80 marks! Temporarily I have a
room for one mark per day, and I have arranged things so that I sleep on
the sofa bed [_Schlafdiwan_] and at other times I have a sofa. It just
wouldn’t work otherwise. Incidentally, we have to admit that my place in
Zurich is a white raven [i.e., a rare find]. All the same, don’t be
concerned. I never take the first as best, and I’m terribly picky, and
the “little cousin,” enraptured by the place in Zurich, is also
searching with that ideal in mind. Tomorrow I will finally decide,
although the choice is so difficult that a person could get anxious
about it, because while one place makes the stomach retch [_zhivot
noyet_], one can’t help noticing that in another place a soldier was
here [_soldat byl_]. The dimensions are so completely incomparable [to
Zurich] that I feel like my head’s going to burst before I decide on
something. As for a soldier [_soldat_] he actually was and is [_byl i
yest’_] everywhere around here. Officers are literally the dominant
caste hereabouts. They also live in furnished rooms, and everywhere I
either run into a room vacated by an officer or find an officer as a
neighbor. In view of the danger that might threaten you from that
quarter and your long-standing fear lest your wife run off with an
officer [_ne udrala s ofitserom_], of course I avoid any such neighbor
like the plague. But just imagine: the drawings by Thöny are by no means
caricatures. They are simply photographic likenesses taken from nature—a
million of them running around on the streets here. —

Of the people I’ve seen, there’s only the mother of Shmuilova (seen
fleetingly), her son-in-law—subeditor at the _Neue Welt_ (Kühl)—and
Shmuilov himself. The latter has not yet arranged to introduce me to
Gradn[auer], and I find that quite satisfactory by the way. I learn from
him only that at present Parvus is regarded in the party as a _persona
comica_ and that everyone has turned away from him (Gradn[auer], [Clara]
Zetkin, Auer, et al.), that is to say [_es heisst_] he has lost
everything that up to now he had gained. That means the two of us have
very good noses [to scent things out], but in the last analysis it’s
very sad. As for Juleczek [Marchlewski], people supposedly have the
opinion that he is insignificant [_unbedeutend_] and that his writing is
“flat” [_“fad”_], which means he writes in a weak, insipid manner, at
least that is what Shmu[ilov] and Gradnauer say. From Adolf [Warski] I
know that Juleczek has been trying for a long time in Munich to obtain a
foreign visitor’s passport, to go to Silesia to do some agitating, but
nothing has come of it. Bebel and Auer are here. I have not yet written
to B[ebel], because when I meet him, I’d like to already have a room and
to have the appearance of being a little bit human. Incidentally, I’m
making a very big impression here—at least on my landlady—and what is
most astonishing, everyone sees me as being extraordinarily young, and
they’re amazed that I’m already so mature. That is for your reassurance.
As for the Jadzios [the Warskis], they found me “enchanting” in my black
dress and new hat. All of that has to do with my outer appearance. My
inner appearance is somewhat less “enchanting,” though it is equally
black, for which the depressing dimensions of Berlin are to blame. I
feel as though I have arrived here as a complete stranger and all alone,
to “conquer Berlin,” and having laid eyes on it, I now feel anxious in
the face of its cold power, completely indifferent to me. At the same
time I console myself with the thought that the whole of Berlin will
arouse my interest [_z calego Berlina obchodzi mnie_]⁷⁰…

I’ve borrowed another sheet of paper from the landlady, because I can’t
take leave of you now. I could keep writing all night, but I’m afraid
you’ll give me a [verbal] thrashing again for putting too much paper in
the envelope. Let me go back to the subject. I said that I feel
black-and-blue places, bruises everywhere on my soul. I’m explaining it
to you exactly the way I feel it. Yesterday evening, when I was already
in bed, in a strange house, in the middle of a strange city, I felt a
little despondent, and this is what I thought in the deepest recesses of
my soul: wouldn’t it be a happier thing if, instead of such an
adventurous life, we were to live quietly and harmoniously, just the two
of us, somewhere in Switzerland, to enjoy our youth and make each other
happy? But when I turned my thoughts back for a moment to review what I
had left behind, what I saw was—an empty space. And it became clear to
me at once that it was all a delusion. We neither lived together nor did
we find joy in one another, and in fact there was nothing very happy
(I’m saying all this only about our personal relationship, abstracting
from the difficulties encountered in our work for the cause, because
those things cannot in fact prevent people from living together warmly
and lovingly [_żyć ze sobą serdecznie_]). On the contrary, looking back
over the last half year and not even looking farther back, I felt such a
completely bewildering sense of disharmony, something incomprehensible
to me, tormenting and dark, that I got shooting pains in my temples, and
then I had exactly the physical sensation of black-and-blue places,
painful bruises on my soul, so that I could turn neither right nor left
as I lay there. The most tormenting thing in all this is the feeling of
something incomprehensible, as if there were a dull thudding or roaring
in my head, and at that point I don’t know why everything has happened,
what for, to what purpose …

And just imagine, it was precisely those bruises on my soul that at the
next moment gave me the courage for a new life. It became clear to me
that I had not given up anything good, that things would not be one iota
better even if we lived together, that in the same way I would
constantly be surrounded by an atmosphere that I would strive in vain,
and amidst agonies, to comprehend, while being surrounded by constant
disharmony. What I had longed for momentarily was only my fantasy, and I
felt myself to be exactly like that tomcat in Weggis—do you remember?—a
dog had trapped it between the cliffside and the lake. Imagine the dog
to be the life that drives me on; the hillside to be your “stony heart,”
as constant and reliable as a cliff, but also just as hard and
inaccessible; and finally imagine the lake to be the waves of the life
into which I am now plunging in Berlin. The choice between “two forms of
punishment” [_“zwei Trachten Prügel”_] is at least not hard to make. And
the only thing I need to be concerned about is that with the passage of
time I won’t go down among the Berlin waves like the cat …

Because I am always deeply touched when I talk about myself [_ça me
touche toujours quand je parle de moi-même_]—because of that on this
occasion I have a desire to howl, but my well-trained ear at the same
moment hears your impatient voice [saying in Russian]: “Come on now,
stop that crying; you’ll end up looking like the devil only knows what.”
And obediently I put down my handkerchief so that in the morning I won’t
look like “the devil only knows what.”⁷¹

Give the devil his due, and the pope his too, isn’t that so? In spite of
everything, I keep on doing what you said to me before I left, singing
the old song of the demand for personal comfort. That is exactly right.
I have the accursed desire to be happy, and would be ready, day after
day, to haggle for my little portion of happiness [_Portiönchen Glück_]
with the foolish obstinacy of a pigeon. But that is just a leftover
remnant. This desire grows ever weaker within me in the face of how the
sun makes clear, or rather the night darkly underlines, the
impossibility of being happy. No happiness without joy [_Kein Glück ohne
Freude_], but maybe that’s just the way life is, i.e., our relationship.
(For me, after all, they are identical: _vous savez, les femmes …_)⁷²
Maybe it is just a joyless, gloomy thing [_freudeloses, düsteres Ding_].
I am actually beginning to understand that life can grab hold of a
person and not let go [_tashchit i ne puskat_]. And there’s no good
advice to be had about it. I’m actually beginning to grow accustomed to
the thought that my only task now is to think about the elections.⁷³ And
after that, to think about what will come after the elections. Since our
combined ages already add up to sixty, mind you, I have a feeling
similar to that which a forty-year-old woman certainly has, when the
physical symptoms of sex life stop showing up.

Naturally after you have read through the above oration, you will think:
What disgusting egoism, to think only about one’s own “happiness” in the
face of the losses you [Leo Jogiches] have suffered, which are a hundred
times greater than the loss of a loved one’s embrace.

You will think that … and you will be wrong. I do not forget for a
single moment YOUR inner bookkeeping, which now shows nothing but
“debits.” Always running around expressing my feelings is not the only
thing I do. Actually, in addition to the reproaches made above, I have
one more reproach to make, that you don’t allow me to take part in your
bookkeeping and the only thing you allow me is—to keep quiet. You are
like the [mountain peak] Rigi, but I am not the [mountain peak]
Jungfrau,⁷⁴ which with its snowcapped peak manages to gaze down
majestically from the high heavens. I am really just an ordinary cat,
who would like to be petted and to pet others, who purrs when things are
going well and meows when they’re not, and wants nothing more than
self-expression. And since you don’t allow me to meow, I can only write
about myself and about these uninteresting personal matters. If,
nevertheless, you bring up this charge of egoism against me, then your
blow will miss its mark [_wirst fehlschlagen_].

I wish to hell an end would come to this problem of a place to live, so
that I could settle down to work and be able to send you the first
sounds of battle [_pervye boyevye zvuki_]. I’d be proud if I already had
something like that to cheer you up with. Unfortunately I don’t have
anything at hand that I could write about, and that’s why this has
become such a boring letter.

Do you have any conception of how much I love you?

About 12 midnight, outside Berlin, my train ran over someone. Because of
this we were standing still for about a quarter of an hour, and waking
from my sleep, all at once I heard shouting. It was a farmer who in the
dark was driving his oxen across the railroad track. When I asked if he
was still alive, the answer they gave me was: Still alive, a little bit
[_Lebt noch a bissele_].

Not a good omen.

I’ll close soon, my one and only. When you can, please write as much as
possible ABOUT YOURSELF. Of all the things you’ve written me up to now
what made me the happiest was your promise that you will look after
yourself better. Write to me about that IN DETAIL. Are you drinking
cocoa at four o’clock? Are you drinking milk DAILY? Please write about
EVERYTHING.

My dear, don’t be upset that the paper is thick and that the letter will
be heavy. I don’t have any other paper here.

Be well, and write to the address: 55 Kant Street, but without my last
name, only my first name and the “Ilyinichna,”⁷⁵ because they’re keeping
up a lot of surveillance here. Yours

[P.S.] Do you know anything yet about Anna [Gordon]?

[Notes in margins]

For the time being I have a room for one mark per day.

What’s going on with the dressmaker? My conscience is constantly
bothering me that I’ve made too much of a fuss about the dress, and the
only thing that’s come of it for you is the added expense, and for the
dressmaker, so much unpleasantness. I feel terribly sorry for her. As
for the hat, Jadzia [Warska] admits that it’s perfect.

Today I’m writing home [to Warsaw] to ask for a loan.

Did you visit Herkner [professor at Zurich University]? Have you begun
to look for lectures to attend? You haven’t the slightest inkling how
much I would like it if you were through with all that. The cross weighs
on me with painful heaviness when I think about you and the university.

Just imagine, Frau [Anita] Augspurg is forty years old. She now lives in
Munich; she has gotten to know Shmuilov. It seems that she is a person
with a rather eventful past [_mit einer bewegten Vergangenheit_], and in
general the literary-artistic Bohemia there in Munich seems to be quite
a heap of trash. Helene Dönniges is there as well, with her [current]
husband, that fellow Schewitsch at _Simplicissimus_.

Shmuilov was astonished that my work will be published by D[uncker] and
H[umblot]. He maintained that they definitely must have someone who
knows the current literature and that’s how they heard about me. [He
says] it’s a _Verlag_ [publishing company] that everyone who intends to
“make a career” in this field is chasing after.

Daszynski’s wife has run off with another man. Even before this she
apparently had the reputation of being a “loose woman.” For his part he
married her, it seems, because “the results were already obvious.” They
say that in the party in Galicia he’s not very well liked, because he’s
a skirt-chaser, corrupt and depraved, and prefers to live like a feudal
lord.

TO LEO JOGICHES

[Berlin,] May 20, 1898

Dearest Ciuciu!

I just read your letter written on Wednesday. With satisfaction I draw
the conclusion from it that all your suggestions and advice about what
is to be done are the same as the ones I’ve already noted down. I
haven’t forgotten the slightest thing. I’m starting on all this today
and tomorrow, because as long as I had no place to live I couldn’t think
about anything else. I’ve been living the whole time in a furnished
private room for one mark a day, and from the very first moment my time
has been spent energetically searching for a place. I have a strong
desire to plunge into the stream of struggle [_bor’by_], but don’t
worry, I’ll keep a cool head. Today I finally rented a place to live,
after I had looked at 75 different rooms in various parts of the city,
and as a result I already know these districts of Berlin (the West, the
Northwest, and Charlottenburg) like the back of my hand. I’ve taken a
room at No. 2 Cuxhaven Street, Garden House 1, bordering directly on the
Tiergarten [the large park containing the Berlin Zoo] in the most
aristocratic district, as you will see. Your next letter should still be
sent to the address of K[rauz] (though WITHOUT my name; my initials are
enough). The room has to be cleaned, and I don’t know exactly when I can
move in.

The room corresponds more or less to all my requirements. It’s on the
first floor, is elegantly furnished, with a piano, sunny, with a small
balcony overgrown with greenery, with a writing desk, a rocking chair
[_Schaukelstuhl_], a mirror covering the whole length of the wall, the
balcony and the window opening onto the garden, and all around one sees
nothing but greenery. The landlady is friendly and talkative, but … I’m
almost afraid to write this … it’s 33 marks! Believe me, Dziodziu, I
would not have taken it if there had been even the SLIGHTEST possibility
of taking a different one … But in the end this is what I had to choose
from: a room for 25 marks, but in Charlottenburg, in a section of the
apartment building to the rear of the courtyard, with a guesthouse
underneath, and the courtyard having a large entranceway; another room,
in the West, but with a dirty-looking landlady a la Lüthi,⁷⁶ and in the
evening the stairs are swarming with couples, a man in the king’s
uniform [_im Rock des Königs_] with a lady on his arm; the third choice
was in the West as well, for 30 marks, but on the ground floor, dark
without any sun, in a house owned by philistines who surely would have
fainted if the police asked about me (they’ve never seen a “Frau Doktor”
before), and with a doorman at the entrance (which is closed all day) to
whom all visitors must tell who they are coming to see. I’m sure you
yourself would have chosen what I chose and that reassures me. Here the
main door is always open and there is no doorman. If it hadn’t been for
worries and scruples—because we’ve gone 3 marks over budget—I would have
taken this room right away, because we looked at it the very first day,
but my conscience would not let me do that without first making a
thorough search of half the city and seeing that no other choice was
left. To make up for it, I will be able to eat lunch well and cheaply
with this landlady, and in general I will keep track of every penny just
as I have been doing. I had to hurry up and solve this housing problem
because a person has to pay a ransom for storing luggage at the railroad
station, and I could not have my trunk moved from one place to another
because that too costs a fortune—the district where I now have my room
is charming and quiet, there’s no street traffic here, all around
there’s nothing but luxuriant greenery, and the air quality is
excellent. Write me immediately, if you’re going to reprimand me greatly
for going 3 marks over the budget. But everyone maintains that—in this
district for such a room, and with a balcony besides—the price is
fabulously cheap. The lady actually wanted 40 but I talked her down. As
for the library, it turns out they let you take books home, so that I
won’t have to be traveling there so often. By the way, a big issue here
is travel time, and as far as money goes, it amounts to the same thing.
There is an arrangement here by which for 3 marks you can buy a month’s
pass on the urban railroad system [_Stadtbahn_], which goes everywhere.
For example, you can travel all day long to any stop you want. Everyone
here has one of these indispensable monthly tickets, and I too bought
one as soon as I arrived. I definitely would have spent 2 marks already
if I had paid separately for each trip. —Now for the first time I can
write to Bebel, and I’ll do it today or tomorrow. (I’d like to be
looking somewhat better, because my stomach’s been bothering me and I
look like a tea rose after the rain.) I’ll let myself borrow _Gazeta
Robotnicza_ from “little cousin.” As for the _Volkswacht_, I’ll either
get hold of it the same way or subscribe to it. At the Claassens, I hope
to obtain the _Handbuch_.⁷⁷ I go out the whole time without any help
other than the cousin, who simply doesn’t want to let me go alone, but
for the most part I do go everywhere alone. At the Claassens’ place,
after the first visit to Shm[uilov] for two minutes, I haven’t once
stuck my nose in there, which has got them worried, and so yesterday and
today they came to my place and invited me to visit them. One can see
that they’re accustomed to having new arrivals come pestering them
immediately. Poor Anna [Gordon], the crazy thing, lived with them for
several days and dragged them around with her on her errands all day
long. I, on the other hand, am extremely reserved [_zurückhaltend_] and
have merely promised them that I would stop by at their regular
get-together, their _jour fixe_, next Thursday evening. They could be
very useful to me in many respects. (I see, N.B. [_nota bene_], that
everyone takes me for a rich person, the devil knows why.) Only for the
sake of the _Handbuch_ will I call on the Cl[aassens] for a moment.
Surely they have it. I’d like to have my own copy at hand, but the damn
thing costs 4 marks. I will simply bone up on it till I know it by
heart, like a grammar book. Apropos of that, here’s a pathetically funny
little item: Shmuilov has been searching here the whole time, all sick
and suffering, searching for—[the poet] Hugo von Hofmannsthal. He had
befriended him and is taking him to visit his wife in Munich!… I greatly
fear that this amusingly good and proper husband is shortly to be the
third party in a triangle [im _Bunde—der Dritte_] … Don’t grimace, my
golden one, because I keep writing about such mundane things. It’s not
because I’ve forgotten the tasks before me, but only in order to
entertain myself a little at the moment, since I’ve managed to deal with
this place-to-live business—and because of the pains in my stomach I
can’t pull myself together to do anything. Also, most dearly beloved, AT
THE LEAST I like to talk about everything with you, [and share] all my
impressions.

And now, to turn to you, my love. It’s very good that you went to see
Herkner, but now you HAVE TO write a few words to [Professor Julius]
Wolf, after he recommended you to Herkner. Otherwise, God knows, you
would be a real pig. I’ll enclose a rough draft of such a letter. You
can fix it up for yourself to suit your taste. But don’t delay or dawdle
about it, I beg you. Do it right away, do you hear? How did you like
Herk[ner]? Write me about that in detail. And generally speaking, you
ape, write in more detail about yourself, and not two general words!
Now, advise me what to do: It’s absolutely necessary to make a trip to
Dresden, but it costs all of 7 marks for the round trip. It’s awful to
pay so much. Should I make the trip or for the time being be content
with writing a letter? I’d like best NOT to go, if it were not for the
desire to find out something about the situation, and about Julek
[Marchlewski], Winter, et al. Above all, however, we want to see what
Bebel will say, isn’t that right? I have written to Humblot,⁷⁸ and I
wrote home earlier. —I’m feeling healthy and brave, don’t worry at all.
Maybe tomorrow I’ll go to the police,⁷⁹ but, on the other hand, maybe
not until after moving into my room. Write me in detail about what
dealings you’ve had with the dressmaker. I’m meeting Wladek [Olszewski]
on Sunday.

Write quickly, and a lot. I read your letters several times over. Golden
boy, how are you feeling, my dear, my only child? Don’t you know
anything [have any news] about Anna?

Yours,

[Postscripts]

Golden one, you write so well in Polish. Write a whole letter that way,
Kukasia. Has nothing yet come of your _Gemeinde_? [The Swiss citizenship
Jogiches was applying for.] Kr. Isayev is here, and has given a prepared
talk [_referat_] on a social democratic topic in the Russian colony,
[but] reportedly his speech was nothing special.

I forgot to add: Of course I don’t have a separate bedroom. (At this
price such a thing is NOT TO BE THOUGHT OF.) But instead of a bed, I
have a huge sofa bed, and also a washbasin covered by a pretty curtain,
the same color as the room. Thus, altogether quite a salon.

Buy yourself a map of Berlin without fail, so you can see where I live.

You can send me the Beethoven within the next few days!

The various additions about Bachm[an], etc., you can just as well leave
out. I have put them in myself, and the writing doesn’t come out looking
like a schoolchild’s. Keep in mind that you are now no longer a
schoolboy, and therefore you must write IN A MORE COURTLY MANNER as a
well-educated person.

TO LEO JOGICHES

[Berlin,] Wednesday, May 25, 1898

Well, Dziodzio, yesterday I went to see Auer. It was not possible to
wait for Bebel, because no one knew when he would return, and every day
here was precious. So I went from there [Bebel’s home] to Katzbach
Street.⁸⁰ I rang the bell, and who should come out in person but—Herr
Auer (big and blond, about 40 years old, absolutely the same type [in
appearance] as some higher-ranking Russian or _pomeshchik_ [member of
the landowning nobility]. He bade me “take a seat”—to which I replied by
asking if I had the pleasure of speaking with Herr Auer, and I
introduced myself. In response to that he gave an “Ah!” and a friendly
smile. The fellow drew himself up and pressed my hand in his, at which
point we became cosier and the chitchat began. In order not to start in
the moment I came through the door, I began by saying I had just arrived
[in Germany], had seen a good bit of the Polish movement, and concluded
that there was hardly any electoral agitation going on, that everything
was slumbering, etc. Whereupon the fellow tried, with his deep bass
voice, to expostulate, just as Bebel would have at that point, “That’s
wrong” [_“Das ist falsch”_], actually things were going quite well, he
said, and rattled on in this vein for several minutes. I heard him out
like a well-brought-up person, and when he had finished I explained to
him calmly: _“You have told me nothing_ _NEW_. _I am much better
informed on this question than you are, because I have direct relations
with comrades in Poznań, Breslau, etc., and also here in Berlin.”_⁸¹ I
told him then that the reason I had come to talk with him was not to
complain to him about the Polish movement, for that would be senseless,
but I came with a completely practical goal in mind. And then I
explained: “I would like to help all of you in your work, to this end I
have obtained German citizenship, and I came [to see you] in order to
take an active part. I of course have my own action plan in this
respect, but I would prefer not to start out on my own without reaching
an understanding with the German party leadership [_Parteileitung_].” At
this point he uttered another “Ah” … The fellow was greatly impressed
that I have German citizenship—he expressed surprise and immediately
asked for my address, which he entered into the party address book, and
after that we began to discuss quite frankly, a discussion that I cannot
repeat to you word for word because it lasted for more than an hour. The
most important thing he told me is the following (but I hardly imagined
that he would be no less adamant against Polish independence than you or
I, and looking at me with a smile, he assured me that he considered that
idea an idiocy!) [Here is what he said:]⁸²

(1) _All five of us in the Party Executive_⁸³ _regard the independence
of Poland as nonsense, as fantasy. We founded the paper_⁸⁴ _and gave it
money with the explicit proviso that_ there would not be one word about
nationalism. Well, then came the influence from London⁸⁵ and at first
Mendelson wanted to be designated as protector, but they [the five
members of the SPD Executive] hold to the standpoint described above.
The protector of the PPS is [Wilhelm] Liebknecht, and then there
followed a characterization of the old man and his attitude toward the
PPS, and we [that is, Jogiches and Luxemburg] could not have given a
better description.

_“One knows where these opinions [Ansichten] of his and his Polish
patriotism came from. The little people [die Leutchen] write him letters
with congratulations, and he replies, and when he arrives somewhere, in
Paris or London, he’s greeted by ovations, in which only three people
are taking part, of which two are usually police agents (!), and
therefore he’s always thinking that the Polish insurgents are marching
across Germany to France, etc. Well, he is an old man, and one must
allow him to have this pleasure. He said the same kind of thing to us in
Hamburg.”_⁸⁶ [Auer said:] Discussing with him [Wilhelm Liebknecht] is
like throwing dried peas against a wall [i.e., no impression is made;
it’s a waste of time]. _“You have certainly experienced this
yourself”_⁸⁷ —spoken with a sweet smile at me. But I ought not to think
of him [Liebknecht] as an obstacle to be taken seriously. When it comes
to anything practical (and here he was talking about editorial posts,
about which more below), then he allows people to reason with him [_er
lässt dann mit sich reden_], (which means: they don’t give a hoot about
him [_man pfeift dann auf ihn_]). So much for [Auer’s] more or less
programmatic position.

2. As for Winter, he is completely _persona grata_ with them. At any
rate, for them the Polish movement equals Winter. They know nothing
about the PPS and are not interested in it. Apparently they don’t give a
hoot about Berlin and Poznań.⁸⁸ They only care about Upper Silesia, and
here they place all their hopes on Win[ter]. _“We are lucky that a
person has been found who is willing to work there.”_ He repeated this
to me about W[inter] several times. _“We are also giving him a small
contribution.”_ That means they’re paying him a minimal stipend! Auer
acknowledged that W[inter] had perhaps spoken incautiously,⁸⁹ _but that
is surely a minor matter_. Auer himself also holds the opinion that _one
cannot do the Polish workers a greater favor than to Germanize them, but
one may not say this publicly_ (!).

3. Of what is going on in the PPS they know nothing. Auer didn’t even
know who the editor is!⁹⁰ They make their jokes about Berfus and they
don’t like him. Moraw[ski] they consider to be the most tolerable, I was
the first to tell them about the [PPS’s] flyer [_Flugblatt_] and
pamphlet.⁹¹ They’ve had it up to here with the whole Polish movement.
_“I’ll send you all of Polish-dom together with the Polish Social
Democracy, and you can have them.”_ —Against that I immediately made a
sharp objection, so that the fellow began to explain himself more
carefully: _“These people only cost us money, and we get nothing out of
it. The whole history was piled on our necks_ [_auf den Hals gelade_]
_by August in Halle.”_⁹² “You know, with his prophetic ways
[_Prophetentum_] he always has to come up with something like that [_er
muss immer so etwas erfinden_].” They regard the present moment—that is
to say, actually, the activity of Winter—as “_a last attempt to achieve
something_” (imagine that).

4. They had contact with Julek [Marchlewski] by way of Parvus; Auer can
never, even once, remember his (Julek’s) name, he only knows it’s
something starting with M, and otherwise he knows nothing about him. The
contacts were of the following kind: Julek requested of them, through
Parvus, to have a Polish-language election brochure written, to which
they replied in the negative. After that Julek, the blockhead, proposed
to them that “The Social Democrats Are Coming” be translated into
Polish, in which connection it came out that this pamphlet had already
been translated long before.⁹³ As a result Julek simply made a fool of
himself. After these two attempts Julek—according to Auer—felt offended
and didn’t write to them any more. He merely asked Winter if he could
translate a flyer from German for him, and he did that, about which more
later. Finally Winter wrote—to Auer—that he had taken on someone named
“M” for agitation work in Silesia. Whether it was Julek or perhaps Ocik
[Marchlewski] or someone else Auer couldn’t recall and asked me about
it.

5. In conclusion, in regard to myself—no doubt you’re bursting to find
out—matters took shape as follows: Auer wants to send me to Upper
Silesia immediately. He doesn’t want to know anything about
Westphalia.⁹⁴ He insists that I concentrate my efforts on Upper Silesia.
For this purpose he wanted, as early as yesterday, to write to Winter
about my arrival, and said I should wait for instructions, either
directly from Win[ter] or from Auer. At a suitable moment I turned the
conversation to the question of the editorial board.⁹⁵ We talked about
that a lot, but the essence of the matter in practical terms is this:
It’s pointless to try to make changes now, before the elections,⁹⁶ and
after the elections, if I remain in Berlin, they can see about it then.
They would be very happy, [Auer said] but all of that will of course
have to be looked into. Here he added that I should not fear any
difficulties on the part of [Wilhelm] Liebknecht, and that’s when he
said what I wrote above on this matter.

Those were probably the most important points. As for me personally, as
far as I can judge, I made quite a good impression on him. In saying
goodbye he assured me he was very happy to have made my acquaintance,
which means quite a lot, coming from such a Bavarian bumpkin. He praised
me, saying it was a very fine thing that I wanted to agitate in Upper
Silesia. This praise I rejected [_otklonila_] with a gesture indicating
coldness, and gave him to understand that I didn’t need his praise. He
gave me the _Handbuch_.⁹⁷ When I started to pay him for it, he refused
to take payment and handed it to me with a charming smile, _“For your
political agitation in Upper Silesia.”_ But, dammit, there’s another
important matter I forgot about: Winter has written a flier
[_Flugblatt_] for Upper Silesia, six yards long, and Julek has
translated it into Polish.⁹⁸ Auer gave me both [the German and the
Polish], and supposedly they’ve already distributed 120,000 copies of
it.

Write your thoughts about this audience [with Auer], or wait, I’ll write
you mine tomorrow.

And now, quickly, about business: As far as Wladek [Olszewski] is
concerned, of course Gutt lied, it was he who wrote this proposal for
W[ladek] and not the other way around. I couldn’t force W[ladek] to put
this in writing (I saw him in person), it didn’t work out. Tell him from
me that he is a filthy liar and that I’m staying on the Executive⁹⁹ and
by no means am I thinking of stepping down. Tell him that. Otherwise
I’ll write him myself, and that will be worse.

I handed in my application [_Antrag_] to the police. Tomorrow I’m
supposed to go there again. The whole affair will take from ten to
fourteen days. If only that doesn’t put a crimp in my plans!

I move into the place tomorrow, because the fellow didn’t move out until
today. And so you can write to me at 2 Cuxhavener Street, 1st garden
house, NW.

To Dresden I’ll have to travel on Whitsunday (on the second [of June]),
because there’s a train for 7 marks on that day. Otherwise it costs
twice as much! But I definitely don’t have enough money, because I have
to pay IN ADVANCE for the place where I’m going to live, that’s how it’s
done here, and on top of that I’ve already paid out a lot, even though
I’m living as frugally as I possibly can. Today I’m going to the first
gathering, at Auer’s. Tomorrow I’ll be at the Claassens’ JOUR FIXE and
will get to know quite a diverse _société_.

About personal questions, tomorrow. God, how much work I have here with
this _Handbuch_ and the _Vorwärts!_ And half the day gets spent on
running around the city.

I did receive your big, long letter, and later the short one. The way
this correspondence is getting dragged out, it’s terrible!

Yours

[P.S.] Dziudzi, I kiss you on the nose.

TO LEO JOGICHES

[Berlin,] Saturday, May 28, 1898

Dziodzio, yesterday I wrote you that I had almost decided about going to
Upper Silesia. I have thought the situation over once more, and again I
see no other way out.

The following are things I don’t like:

(1) I would rather, at the beginning, “operate” on the larger, more
universal stage—in Berlin, not some hole in the wall in Upper Silesia.

(2) I’d much rather eventually make an appearance in Dortmund. There at
least there are public gatherings from time to time.

(3) Since there exists no possibility of holding public rallies in Upper
Silesia, as Winter writes, the work will go on silently and in the dark,
so that not even a dog will hear anything about it.

(4) I go to Upper Silesia, to serve against my will under Winter’s
command, and even if I hold myself back from acting as if I were the
governor-general, that’s what I will be _DE FACTO_, because I don’t know
either how to relate to him or how to conduct myself so as not to be
superior to him.

(5) It is by no means the _éclat_ [the dramatic entrance] that we wished
for. _However_:

(1) In Berlin there is no work, because on the one hand the good Poles
have ABSOLUTELY no significance when it comes to “ordaining” me to do
German agitation here in Berlin, and on the other hand, to leave the
Polish work to Moraw[ski] and Winter is stupid nonsense [Mumpitz].
Finally and conclusively, the Germans don’t need me here at all [in
Berlin], and for me not to participate in the POLISH work before the
elections is to rob myself of the possibility of eventually having a say
on this question at the party congress. Polish agitation—for the Germans
that means Upper Silesia. Auer said so explicitly. _Sapienti sat_.¹⁰⁰

(2) In Dortmund the Poles are not “dangerous” because they’re under the
dominant influence of the Germans. Besides, Auer is right, FROM HIS
POINT OF VIEW, that forces must be concentrated in Upper Silesia. They
won’t give me any means for traveling to Dortmund, anyway.

(3) Not to go to Upper Silesia now would be not to accept the only
Polish electoral work that they are offering me, which would mean to
spoil relations with the SPD Executive, to appear before them as a hero
of empty words [_Maulheld_]. Secondly, it would be to ruin relations
with Winter, who can later establish himself as the only person
representing the [SPD’s] Polish work.

(4) If I have the intention, at least later on, of presenting an
independent point of view on the Polish work, I must establish direct
connections with Upper Silesia, and the local elections offer the only
opportunity for that. The same thing is important in regard to the party
congress [_Parteitag_], if we are thinking about a mandate [i.e., being
elected as a delegate to the congress].

(5) To operate on my own and to thumb my nose at Auer and Winter would
be most tempting for me—but where would I operate? There’s no place that
one can hook on to: Berlin is unpromising, Poznań likewise, and in Upper
Silesia on my own I would accomplish nothing.

(6) With regard to editorial posts,¹⁰¹ good relations with the SPD
Executive and with Winter are essential.

In short, there is nothing left but to pack my suitcase and go. Where
to? I’m waiting for a letter from Winter on that very subject—most
likely to Bytom [German name, Beuthen]. I will write you again in detail
before leaving.

I will tell Auer in advance that in regard to the impossibility of
public meetings, I can’t promise too much, and that if the region proves
to be unproductive, I will repay them for the travel money. In the best
of cases, it’s better not to promise too much in advance.

For the trip I will take 50 marks in addition to the travel money from
Auer. —I will borrow the 50 marks from “the cousin” for a week. I can’t
wait any longer for the money from you. Please be so good as to send
that amount TO HER; just send it to her address without a letter, if you
can. Only don’t give your name as the sender. You should have more than
just this 50 marks ready FOR ME, so anyway send it to HER address, with
the notation that it is for me. Again, in general, send all letters to
her address [for now], because when I go away I won’t be able to receive
letters otherwise. I can’t give my landlady the Upper Silesia address.
Besides, I don’t trust her that much. I’ll make arrangements about other
letters.

I should receive the certificate of citizenship [_Heimatschein_] from
the police today, for which I must give the police official [_Assessor_]
a tip [_Schmiergeld_] of about 3 marks (because he went to the trouble
of getting it for me in four days instead of fourteen!).

I’m enclosing my accounts. After I pay 2 marks for the _Heimatschein_
plus the 3 marks tip I won’t have a single penny left, for the first
time. Forgive me, Gold, that it has added up to so much. This is only
the first month [after all], and I won’t pay out a single _Pfennig_
more, aside from regular mailing expenses. Write back immediately as to
whether I can count on you to give “the cousin” 50 marks.

Be quick about writing, and write about everything. R.

TO ROBERT AND MATHILDE SEIDEL

[Berlin,] May 30, 1898

Dear friends!

I don’t know where Mathilde is now, and so I’m writing to both of you,
together. You’re probably quite angry with me, that you have heard
nothing from me for so long. But until now I have been in a transitional
state in every respect, and that’s why. I didn’t want to write until I
could report something definite.

First, it’s been several days now that I have had a room of my own:
that’s how long I had to search. My address is: NW, 2 Cuxhavener Street,
1st Garden House. Make use of it soon!

As for my further “plans and assignments,” even now I am being sent by
the SPD Executive to Upper Silesia for election campaigning. It’s a
difficult bit of work; public meetings are not allowed there, and the
police can come down on us at any moment. Well, we’ll see.

I have had no difficulties with the police here; they found my papers IN
ORDER [_in Ordnung_] and issued me a certificate of citizenship right
away. —In general, Berlin makes a most unfavorable impression on me:
cold, massive, and lacking in taste—a true and proper barracks; and the
dear Prussians with their arrogant demeanor, as if each one had
swallowed the stick previously used for beating him!…

Everywhere I turn, I miss the hospitable friendliness [_Gemütlichkeit_]
and the culture of the Swiss. And also the cleanliness! I don’t know
where the fairy tale about the super-clean German housewife came from,
because I haven’t seen a single one of them here.

It’s terrible how much time one wastes here. You can picture it roughly
this way: I’m living in the middle of the city, or more exactly in its
western part, and in one day I have to make three trips, or rather,
three railroad trips: first, around noon to Charlottenburg (half an hour
to the west), then to the SPD Executive on Katzbach Street (three
quarters of an hour to the south), and one more trip, to the police
headquarters on Alexanderplatz (again three quarters of an hour to the
east). In this way the whole day is as good as gone, and when an evening
gathering comes up that I would like to attend, I don’t get to bed,
after a day spent traveling around so productively, before 2 a.m.

This will absolutely have to be done differently in the future. I will
stick my nose out of the house only once a day, and since it’s quite
long enough, I will hopefully have seen enough of Berlin by sticking it
out just once. Currently, however, the thing is to go to Upper
Silesia—even farther away from culture! I will remain there AT THE MOST
until the runoff elections [it seems quite certain], because we
certainly won’t come out on top in the first round.¹⁰² When I find some
time I’ll write you both from Upper Silesia.

Keep healthy and be happy, and write to me! Mail will be forwarded.
Yours, Ruscha¹⁰³

TO LEO JOGICHES

Kr[ólewska] Huta, Thursday, June 9, 1898

My Dearest! Yesterday evening I came back to Königshütte [German name of
Królewska Huta] and discovered your three letters (only the last one
with Wint[er]’s address), then today the one you sent Monday. You can
imagine how happy I am that the gathering pleased you so much. —As far
as my work here is concerned, we spent the whole beloved day from eight
in the morning till eight at night going through Wolny’s election
district¹⁰⁴ distributing voting cards and copies of our appeal to
voters. To you this work will seem demeaning, which means you have now
arrived at the conception with which I began in Berlin and because of
which I was so uncomfortable about the trip to Upper Silesia. Here,
however, I have reached the opposite view entirely. This work is the one
and only thing that will stand me in good stead with Winter, Bruhns, and
the [SPD] Executive, and it is the one and only thing that can give me a
good name with everyone, and that’s precisely because I am, at the same
time, making my appearance as an outstanding public speaker
[_vortreffliche Rednerin_] (see the enclosed letter from Br[uhns] to
Winter, which arrived today),¹⁰⁵ that is to say, while I am also capable
of better things, I do not shy away from marching “with the rank and
file” [“_in Reih und Glied_”]. By the way, Winter does the same thing
EVERY DAY. This very day and for the next several days he is going to be
among the workers, and I will be sitting in the election office
[_Wahlbüro_], i.e., his home, to receive the workers who keep arriving
at every moment, whether to obtain advice or to offer their services for
agitation or for distributing our election statement [_Aufruf_], and at
the same time I have to finish writing some short pieces. W[inter] is
very grouchy about Br[uhns] dragging me off to Liegnitz [Polish name,
Legnica] for some public meetings, he wanted me to sit here the whole
time, but for me it’s more beneficial to speak in public as often as
possible before the elections, because people hear about the public
meetings from the newspapers, but about my virtuous activities here
[they would learn] only through private channels, so it’s necessary to
combine the one with the other. —You advise me, no matter what, not to
speak in Breslau, and yet I never even dreamed of doing that, because
this much is clear to me already, that it’s not worth it for me to write
a second stump speech [_Referat_] as long as this one is available for
use elsewhere. That’s exactly why I agreed to go to Liegnitz. —I don’t
know yet whether I will write to Auer. For the runoff election, the
“stump speech” still needs to be sharpened up, or so it seems to me, to
make it a little different, but I don’t know yet exactly how. —My
current “stump speech” is perfect. The news account in the _Volkswacht_
is far more pallid than the meeting actually was (an ordinary worker
wrote it, Br[uhns] being in Liegnitz at the time).¹⁰⁶ You can detect
that from the cheers [_Hoch_] recorded for me and from the Germans
saying that I leave nothing to be desired in comparison with
Sch[oenlank]. —Apropos of that, Br[uhns] is a close friend of
Sch[oenlank’s]. The latter spoke in Breslau on Sunday and is definitely
going to stay there until the 16th, so perhaps I’ll meet him on my way
through to Liegnitz. —I was at [Professor Julius] Wolf’s house for one
and a half hours. He was either so stupid or so petty that after I left
his place I almost passed out. Our conversation consisted of all
possible professor’s chatter [_Professorenklatsch_], so it’s not worth
repeating. He asked about you. —Dziodzio, my golden one, what the hell
are you doing there with Gutt?… Gold, let him bluster. Or better yet,
throw him out on his first visit. What can he do, you knucklehead? Julek
[Marchlewski] doesn’t want to hear about him at all and hasn’t even
answered him with a letter. Wl[adyslaw Olszewski] and Chl[osta] have
absolutely nothing in mind with [regard to] the Union.¹⁰⁷ For both of
them it’s just theatrics. He [Gutt] can do nothing, purely and
absolutely nothing. Otherwise, I’ll take on Wl[adyslaw] and Chl[osta]
myself. God knows, it amazes me that you are still constantly
exaggerating trifles. Send him off, just give him a kick, and don’t have
anything more to do with him, and you’ll see that within a week he’ll
come crawling of his own accord, because there’s nothing he can do, even
together with Koczan. LISTEN TO ME, AND ACT ACCORDINGLY! —Earlier I of
course wrote immediately to my parents and to Józio [Luxemburg]; I
simply told them why I needed the money, and I proposed that it would be
covered by the payment from Humblot as soon as that came.¹⁰⁸ As far as
the dissertation is concerned, I’ve decided that if H[umblot] doesn’t
agree to keep the words _Materialen_, etc. in the title—and that’s an
open question—I will change a word: from _The Industrial Development of
Poland_ to _The Capitalist Development of Poland_. That has quite a
different ring to it, doesn’t it? Write me back right away [about that],
and also write me to let me know if you find a lot to be changed or
improved.¹⁰⁹ You’ve written nothing about it. My Gold has such a tedious
job there to do for me.

About personal matters, there’s so much I could write (just think!—so
many new impressions!) that I don’t know where I should begin, and most
important, I don’t have a moment’s peace. The surroundings here have
made the strongest and most emphatic impression: cornfields, meadows,
woods, broad expanses, and Polish speech and Polish peasants all around.
You have no idea how happy it all makes me. I feel as though I’ve been
born anew, as though I have the ground under my feet again. I can’t get
enough of listening to them speak, and I can’t breathe in enough of the
air here! Yesterday I had to wait for about an hour for the last train
to Leschnitz [Polish name, Lesnica]. I crept around there in the fields
of grain a little, and picked cornflowers and poppies. For my complete
happiness there was lacking only “one.” I’ve already decided that for
our “vacation” I won’t travel to Switzerland, but you’ll come here (it’s
the same amount of money), and we’ll rent a place in some Silesian
village, because I’m firmly convinced that you too should live here a
while, and you’ll feel the same pleasure [I do] when you catch sight of
the vast cornfields as far as the eye can see. (The cornstalks are
already higher than I am!) Meadows with cows, being watched over by a
five-year-old barefoot child, and our [favorite]—pine forests! And our
peasants, emaciated, unwashed, but a magnificent race! In Kandrzin I saw
three families, two peasant families and one Jewish family, who were
going to America! What poverty! It almost brought me to tears, but at
the same time I was so happy to see them I couldn’t keep my eyes off
them. What an impression all this would make on you! Perhaps even
stronger than it makes on me, though that seems hardly possible. What I
say is that for my complete happiness here I’m lacking only
“one”—although of course that’s a very big “only.”

All in all, I feel quite tranquil as far as the work is concerned, and I
haven’t the slightest doubt that I’m doing good work. Your letters
strengthen me in that conviction, because almost always in the
suggestions you make, you’re mentioning something I’ve already done or
had the intention of doing. You also ask me about some personal
“gossip.” Perhaps that refers to the fact that toward me Bruhns has
shown … it’s unpleasant for me to put it into words. Because he behaves
himself in an absolutely blameless manner, [and] he himself is a
thoroughly fine fellow (not like Schoen[lank]), besides which he’s not
at all well, and on top of that I must maintain good relations with
people and therefore I have maintained a friendship [_eine
Freundschaft_], whose limits he has not once tried to overstep. He says
he wishes he had been “met” [i.e., made Luxemburg’s acquaintance] five
years earlier in Zurich (how amusing!?); naturally he’s just making that
up. But that’s the smallest thing so far. I was afraid he might confide
his “bad luck” to his friend Schoen[lank]!…

Winter, as it turns out, hasn’t met Julek in person, even once. Anyhow,
J[ulek Marchlewski] is sitting out these elections; he’s being a
stay-at-home; he must be furious when he hears about me. Parvus has
written nothing to me here, because there’s no reason for him to. I
promised him I’d stop by and see him on the way back.

I give you a hug, Your Ciucia

[P.S.] Write me as much as possible about YOU! Every little detail!

TO ROBERT SEIDEL

June 23, 1898

Dear friend!

What a misery this is! I feel the need to chat with you, and now I don’t
have even a small piece of letter paper. You’ll have to be satisfied
with this.

It’s late in the evening, I’m sitting in a rocking chair at my desk, on
which stands a lamp with a large red lampshade that I made myself, and
I’m reading Börne. In front of me the door to the balcony is open, and a
fresh breeze is blowing in—there’s a glaring flash of lightning from
time to time, as a storm is brewing. (God forgive me for this prose poem
of wretched quality!…) But that’s certainly the way things are at times,
when there’s loneliness!… Just think: in this huge city of Berlin, with
two and a half million inhabitants, not a single friend. At this moment
I am so content with this thought that I even have a complacent smile on
my face. I don’t know if the problem is that I’m made of such poor stuff
that I absorb too readily from the surrounding atmosphere, but I cannot
remain one day longer in the crush of humanity without my own spiritual
level declining at least one notch—but of course that’s only for the
moment. One day of solitude is all I need to find myself again, but in
that process I always have a bitter feeling of remorse, as though I had
lost a little part of myself or as though I had been demeaned. I always
have the desire at such moments to shut myself off completely from the
outside world, to board myself up.

A youngster is going down the street right now, playing a popular song
on a flute [or pennywhistle]—I feel offended by this shrill sound coming
from another human being, which intrudes forcefully on my ears and
breaks in on my tranquility.

Perhaps you’re surprised that I’m reading old Börne. I haven’t met a
German yet who would still want to read him, but he always has a
powerful effect on me and always awakens fresh thoughts and lively
feelings. Do you know what gives me no peace nowadays? I’m dissatisfied
with the form and manner in which people in the Party, for the most
part, write their articles. It’s all so conventional, so wooden, so
stereotyped. Nowadays the words of a Börne sound as though they’re
coming from another world. I know of course that the world is different
now, and different times want to hear different songs. But it is
precisely these current “songs” from our tribe of scribblers which for
the most part are no songs at all, but just a droning without color or
tone, like the sound of a cogwheel spinning in a machine. I believe that
the source of this lies in the fact that people, when they’re writing,
forget for the most part to go deeper inside themselves and experience
the full import and truth of what they’re writing. I believe that people
need to live in the subject matter fully and really experience it every
time, every day, with every article they write, and then words will be
found that are fresh, that come from the heart and go to the heart,
instead of [just repeating] the old familiar phrases. But people are so
used to one or another truth or verity that they prattle or spout about
the deepest and greatest subjects as though they were mumbling a Pater
Noster. I hereby vow never to forget when I’m writing to be inspired
again, on each occasion, about what I’m writing and to go inside myself
for that. That’s exactly why I read, from time to time, old Börne. He
reminds me faithfully of the oath I have sworn.

Poor Fredi [Seidel]!… I always had, for as long as I can remember, a
very special sympathy for people who have no talent in dealing with
practical life, earning money, etc. (perhaps because I myself haven’t
the slightest understanding of how to do these things). Such people are
always in my thoughts. I’ve always had a hunch that there’s a bit of the
artist inside them or at least a very good human being.

For YOU this is of course not very consoling. I understand that. —I look
forward to some lines from Mathilde [Seidel]. Is she still in Gugi? One
more thought from me: I cannot stand Berlin and the Prussians, and I
will never be able to tolerate them.

I warmly press your hand,

Your Rusza

TO LEO JOGICHES

[Berlin, June 24, 1898]—Friday

My Kuka has gotten himself so dreadfully worked up and has given me such
a tongue-lashing that a person becomes anxious and alarmed. And all this
because I’m an ungrateful little swine and dared to express myself so
light-mindedly about Kuka’s work on the page proofs.¹¹⁰ Therefore, out
of sheer anxiety, I have written in all of Dziodzio’s changes in the
second round of proofreading with the exception of the one at the end of
the introduction, which, stubbornly single-minded as I am, I have left
unchanged. Seriously, I consider it absolutely necessary, and I hope
you’ll grant me this one place in my entire work, so that I may let it
stay as is, to suit my taste. As for the “lashings” [_“kołotuszki”_]
that await me, I want to respond immediately that I fear them as much as
a dog fears its tail. —Duncker sends me letters twice a day. He is most
urgently demanding the fourth “signature” [_“Bogen”_] and the second
proofreading of the rest. He has sent the fifth and sixth signatures to
me here, as well as the Foreword for the second proofreading. I’ve done
it already and am sending it back to him. I checked the quotations from
Sch[ulze]-G[ävernitz] in the library today, and they were all correct.

I have also improved the passage that has to do with the new imposition
of taxes on industry in 1893; I crossed out the date and wrote: “(the
tax) was now increased” [_wird jetzt erhöht_], etc. which will be
correct no matter what. H[umblot] is convinced that the first set of
page proofs of the fourth signature was lost in the mail, because he
can’t imagine you would have held onto the proofs for so long. I’ll
leave him with that assumption and write to him that I have arranged to
have a second copy sent to him from Zurich. I hope you really have sent
it to him already. The change you made in the 1888 petition of the
Nizhgorod people is not at all to my taste.¹¹¹ You apparently didn’t
find it in _Kraj_ or you didn’t understand correctly what it was about,
whereas I already have a thorough knowledge of this case, and what I
have written remains correct. However, for the sake of peace and quiet
I’ve left the change you made. (What great generosity, no? At this point
you are undoubtedly so enraged that you’re ready to rip my ears off.)
H[umblot] is threatening that unless he receives all the corrected page
proofs right away, there can be no question of bringing the book out
this month, so that’s why I sent you a telegram.

With [Professor Julius] Wolf things have already been arranged. He sent
the proofs back by return mail. Apparently he had not read any of it at
all. —I don’t know whether Humblot will also now publish the
dissertation in book form [_Buchform_]; I wrote to him immediately in
reply to the letter forwarded to you, but he hasn’t sent any answer.
Should I perhaps make a trip to Leipzig for this purpose [i.e., to
clarify this question], and also for working out the question of
including _Materialen_ etc. in the title?¹¹² But by the time I get your
answer to that, it will be too late.

It grieves me very much that, with regard to the article for the
_Leipziger Volkszeitung_,¹¹³ you have a different opinion. Obviously
each of us evaluates the situation quite differently, which is quite
natural, by the way, since you are not familiar with many of the
circumstances. I consider this article necessary and very important:

(1) in order to link my name with the elections; otherwise I have
nothing with which to make a connection between me and them;

(2) to make use of the elections in the spirit of OUR ideas, because
otherwise there will be no similar opportunity before the party congress
[_Parteitag_];¹¹⁴ (3) and also because Winter will not make use of the
elections for our purposes; generally speaking, he has cooled off about
the fight against Mor[awski] there in Upper Silesia and has become
convinced that it would be best to “spit on it all” and go his own
way—an extremely harmful idea, from our point of view; of course I’ve
made a big effort to knock that idea out of his head, and to a large
extent I’ve succeeded, but in spite of all that, on his own initiative
he will not attack them, and they¹¹⁵ will also not attack him. Because
one must definitely make use of a good opportunity to thrash their hides
a little bit once again. Perhaps all this will not convince you, but
while I’ve been writing this to you, I’ve convinced myself even more of
the necessity for this article, and so I will write it and stick my
tongue out at you. By the way, I already have some fairly serious ideas,
and so I have subscribed to the _Katolik_, the most important
publication of the Polish elements in the center of the political
spectrum in Upper Silesia, and proceeding from that I am going to
express some general ideas about the tasks of Social Democracy in Upper
Silesia. I will send the article to you as soon as I have written it.
Dziodziuchna, don’t be angry; after all, I must write it if I’m
convinced that it’s necessary; I’m quite sure that you too will be
convinced, especially when you receive the article. Immediately after
this letter, I will get working on it today. I already have an outline.

Now tell me what I should begin with. I have so much to write to you
about that the physical tension of it gives me anxiety—that’s how
debilitated I am. You are surely very dissatisfied, or at least not very
satisfied, with my work up to now, but I on the other hand am filled
with the best of hopes. Not that I am all fired up and bursting with
enthusiasm, on the contrary, I am quite calm and look to the future with
confidence. You have no inkling of what a good effect my attempts so far
to speak at public meetings have had on me. I didn’t have the slightest
self-assurance in this respect, but had to take a chance and step out on
the ice. Now I’m sure that in half a year’s time I will be among the
best of the party’s speakers. The voice, the effortlessness, the
language—everything comes out right for me, and what’s most important, I
step onto the speaker’s stand as calmly as if I had been speaking in
public for at least twenty years, I don’t even feel the least bit of
stage fright. —In something like two or three weeks public meetings will
start up again, and then I will definitely make my entrance with éclat,
first in Dresden, then perhaps in Leipzig, and after that right here in
Berlin. Have no fear, this side of the work gives me no trouble and I
only wish that everything else would go as smoothly as the public
speeches. To my understanding, the “everything else” includes primarily
two things: (1) the article against Bernstein;¹¹⁶ and (2) the campaign
against Mor[awski] (_hazer mit a indyk!_).¹¹⁷ In regard to the first
point, you know all the difficulties yourself, but again I’m counting
most of all on your help. Apropos of that, I want to get to work on that
SOON, and for that purpose I need you to do two things for me: (1) send
me the _Neue Zeit_ regularly, including the last few weeks; and (2)
[send me] books, including, of course, Marx. —As for the second point,
i.e., the campaign against Mor[awski], the worst thing is that at the
moment it is also unclear which side to tackle it from, just as unclear
as it was in Zurich. What IS clear is that the initiative must totally
come from me. The Germans are expecting that I’ll start making some sort
of fuss [_Krach_] right away, as Winter, Schoen[lank], etc., tell me.
But what can we do? That is also unknown [_I neizvestno_]. As for the
idea of bringing the discussion in front of the _Parteitag_ [party
congress], I have already spoken with Winter about that, and he thinks
we can easily succeed in making a special point on the congress agenda
[_Tagesordnung_] out of this, but he considers it possible only in the
event that M[orawski] _et al_. lay the groundwork for it through some
new idiocy, otherwise he regards it as quite difficult. I hope in any
case to do a lot through Schoen[lank] in this respect, because he is
ready for anything (he himself loves the limelight) [er _selbst liebt
den éclat_] and is now extremely influential. We’ll see how it works
out. But I can’t just sit around like this and wait for the _Parteitag_.
So what should I do? For example, should I go to Poznań, give a speech
there, build an organization, get myself elected as a
_Vertrauensperson_¹¹⁸ or something like that, or should I go to one of
their public meetings here and begin the discussion? Devil only knows!!!
In fact, this is the one and only point at which I do get stage fright.
I’m not afraid of climbing Rigi,¹¹⁹ but I lack the courage to wade in
the mire [_Ich fürchte mich nicht vor dem Rigiaufstieg, aber mir fehlt
der Mut, im Dreck zu waten_]. I’m simply afraid of going down among
these cattle. Nevertheless, the most important thing is that a person
cannot simply go and get into a quarrel without a definite goal and
without a plan, just to see what will come of it. As for plans, I have
exactly none. What the devil is one to try and get out of Mor[awski]?¹²⁰
A unification? That is excluded and would even be disadvantageous. A
fight? But for what purpose? “That is the question.”¹²¹ Apropos of that,
with regard to Kasprz[ak], everything’s in good shape, I’m corresponding
with him. But what good does it do? With regard to Wolny too,
everything’s good, but nothing is gained from that either. The most
important thing now—is to have a plan and take some initiative, and only
I can do that. You, my poor dear, can’t help me much here, I know that.
Soon my head is going to burst. As soon as I think of something, I’ll
write you about it. The article for the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_ is the
only gleam of light [I can see] in this respect, because it will again
stir up the hornets’ nest [_ins Wespennest_] and force the _Gazeta
Robotnicza_ to attack me and Winter, i.e., exactly what we need at this
moment.

With Winter, when we parted, things were not as good as I might have
wished. He’s difficult to deal with, the fellow is hardbitten, dry, and
mistrustful; I did everything I could to smooth things over with him,
and by the middle of my stay there he was more easygoing. Nevertheless,
toward the end he again made a turn to the right, and we parted in a
rather frosty atmosphere. Why? I don’t know; I didn’t give him the
slightest reason. He will of course remain in Upper Silesia, but for now
we haven’t arrived at any harmonious basis for further collaboration.
Incidentally, nothing there has been lost, and so things can work out
entirely. We saw each other so briefly in those last few days and were
both so tired that having a conversation even once was not to be thought
of. Still, the most important thing is that I have no definite plan, and
he doesn’t either. The only thing we agreed on, as I wrote you, was
about the discussion at the _Parteitag_. He suggested to me the idea of
building an organization in Poznań following the model of the Upper
Silesian one and to work without looking to Berlin, but that doesn’t
appeal to me very much for various reasons. Above all I have no money
for a trip to Poznań! Yes, of course, if one went to Poznań, or to
Hamburg, one could give speeches there and win people over! But let’s
wait, even though in fact I will not wait long about making some more
German appearances [as a public speaker], and then perhaps something can
be done. Write what you think about all this.

I wanted to draw a balance sheet on what I’ve gained from the trip to
Upper Silesia: (1) [establishing] personal relations with Bruhns and
Schoen[lank], that is, two editors who are fully to my taste; (2)
already earning a reputation in one part of Germany as an outstanding
speaker, on which basis I will surely be invited to Breslau, and
certainly to Leipzig as well, to give prepared talks [_na referaty_];
(3) getting to know what the relationships are in Upper Silesia, which
under the circumstances even a three months’ visit would not have given
me. I will now [be able to] write with an entirely different kind of
assurance about the conditions there, and about how the situation
develops, and in any case I no longer run the risk of making a big
blunder [_lapsus_] in this regard; (4) [establishing] practical ties
with the SPD Executive, which under other circumstances I would never
have had; (5) personal acquaintance with the most important Upper
Silesian worker-agitators, which will come in handy for me at the first
opportunity.

After a break: I just received your letter and the second corrections of
the first three signatures; I read the changes you made and almost had a
fit. But I won’t talk about that any more, it doesn’t help matters
anyhow. I’ll send it all off as it is; the only thing I’ve done is
improve the wording throughout. It’s a shame, by the way, that the first
set of proofs didn’t come to me first. Humblot will have to wait
patiently, no matter what—at least for one day longer. In many places
the text, in my opinion, now has the taste of stale coffee, which makes
a person wonder why it’s still being served up.

Well, enough of that. I know that you view this business from a
different standpoint. For you it represents more than two weeks of
insanely intense labor, correcting the massive inaccuracies in the
numerical data, etc. Oh, if only such labors never come our way again! I
now hate this dissertation so much, precisely because so much effort and
energy has been spent on it that unwittingly I start to cry just
thinking about it—for this reason I want to report to you some general
conclusions I’ve arrived at here concerning methods of work. The system
that we have used up to now is in all respects idiotic, _na kontse
slozhit’ goroshinu, a s’yest’ goru dobruyu_ of our strength and
health.¹²² Efforts and exertions whose results are not evident to the
outside observer do not deserve positive evaluation but [on the
contrary] deserve to be scoffed at. One’s guiding principle must be to
achieve the greatest results with the smallest amount of effort. I am
already following this principle here. To do everything calmly and
lightly, without getting myself worked up in the slightest way, and not
to work too much on any one thing—that is my system. I wrote my campaign
speech this way, and this is the way I will write the article for the
_Leipziger Volkszeitung_. There are cases where the labor should not
become too much for one person, especially in regard to minor matters,
and the exertion of our effort ought not to become too much, as was the
case, for example, with my article “Von Stufe zu Stufe,”¹²³ and I think
the same about the article against Bernstein. But the labor is NOT lost
in these cases: one senses whether an article has been fully polished,
by its compact consistency and harmony of form. But to put in as much
work as I did at one time on the article signed “K. P.” for the
_Sächsische Arbeiter-Zeitung_¹²⁴ or to put in all this work on the
doctoral dissertation—why, it’s sheer madness. No one is able to
appreciate it or even notice it. Of course what I’m referring to here is
not incorrect numerical data, which must be corrected, but thousands of
other little gnats or fleas, which under the microscope of your literary
pedantry grow to the size of elephants. In general, when I review the
sum total of our exertions and the total results [in the recent past]—I
feel ashamed. Let there be an end to that—fresh, free, and joyful
[_frisch, froh, frei_] [that’s the slogan], to work cheerfully and with
a light touch, think everything through seriously, but BRIEFLY; what has
already been achieved does not need to be thought about any more at all;
make decisions quickly and carry them out quickly, and the journey goes
on. Up to now I have done everything that way here and I have not made a
single mistake: if I have not yet succeeded in making a public
appearance here in Berlin, it is not my fault. I was ready, and if it
had happened, I would have accomplished my task splendidly. Well, but
enough of self-praise. I wanted to write you about you and me personally
and about millions of more things.

I cannot write much about me personally. I would like to restate what I
wrote to you already, but again you won’t understand me, and it will be
unpleasant for you. “I feel cold and calm.” You took that as a statement
related to you, when I was simply complaining to you about my own state
of mind, which still persists. A kind of deadly apathy, with which I
carry out all my activities, even those that only involve thinking. I do
things like an automaton, as though someone else was doing them. What is
that? Explain it to me. You once asked me what was the matter with me.
It’s simply LIFE! I feel as though something in me had died, I
experience neither anxiety nor pain, not even loneliness, exactly like a
corpse. It is as though I am an entirely different person from the one I
was in Zurich, and I look back on myself as I was then as though I’m
looking at someone else. You write to me that you are suffering terribly
from the loss of your mother; perhaps now you will also believe me that
for me too that is a terrible pain, which does not stop and does not
leave me for even one day. I noticed in Zurich that you did not believe
me and therefore allowed yourself not to make any comment, but this
feeling of shuddering horror does not let go of me, but stays with me
here just as much as it did there. Especially when I lie down to sleep,
this fact [of my mother’s death] immediately arises again before my
eyes, and I have to groan out loud from pain. I don’t know how it is
with you but I don’t suffer mainly from longing anymore and I don’t
suffer ON MY OWN ACCOUNT, but what makes me shudder every time is this
one thought: what kind of life was that! What has this person lived
through, WHAT IS THE POINT of a life like that! I don’t know of any
thought that is so dreadful for me as this one; I feel as though it
would tear me apart if I began to think about it, and yet it comes to me
under the most surprising circumstances, at any moment. Recently I had
to go see Prof. Eulenburg on behalf of my brother [Józef Luxemburg] and
I had to wait for him for several hours, and right then and there this
thought came to me again, and I simply couldn’t hold back the tears, but
fortunately no one saw that. (By now you are certainly feeling anxiety.)
I’m writing this about myself not out of egoism, but only so that you
will know that I understand very well what such a simple three-word
phrase means which you wrote me [feeling the loss of one’s mother]. —I
don’t know any longer how that [realization] came to me all of a sudden.
—You ask about what has impressed me. The only strong impression is the
one I’ve already written to you about—the fields of grain and the Polish
landscape. Other than that absolutely nothing has made an imprint on my
soul. Somehow I don’t pay any attention to people [here], and I regard
Berlin as not real. I long to be back in Silesia, in some village, and
am already dreaming of when we will both be there. I’m all set for that.
I’m sure that the landscape there will have the same effect on you as on
me; we would both feel revived there while wandering through the fields
of grain. You haven’t answered whether this appeals to you, or don’t you
believe in the possibility of making this a reality? That reminds me of
financial matters, and so I will take them up right here and now. The
situation stands as follows: the remainder of all that I had will now
last only until the first of the month (perhaps I’ll still have a couple
of marks left over), because I have to pay a lot for milk (one liter
daily! and three eggs for each supper) and also a lot is spent for
stamps. Therefore I have nothing with which to pay back the remainder to
Gerisch. But there is no hurry, because now they are all busy [with
other things], but anyhow I will write him that I will settle up with
him around the first of the month. If I count only the cost of the train
trip, a third-class ticket at that, I have to pay him back 54 marks, but
if I count 14 marks for riding second class in one direction (I took
third class on the way back), then I need 40 marks for him. Will you be
in a position to send me that? Perhaps I’ll have something left over
from my brother’s 130 marks, because there were only six signatures.¹²⁵
That equals 120 marks, + about 25 for the proofs, which equals 145
marks, + 50 from Zurich = 195, and about 70 marks remain. Maybe I should
not have taken so much from my brother. Why should I have such a large
debt? Now you know everything about the money matters, so I’ll put an
end to this unpleasant subject.

You are mistaken when you assume that Schoenlank can come crawling to
see me at any hour. He cannot visit me without having first reached
agreement with me by mail; my room looks approximately like the one in
Zurich, but no bed or night table, the washstand is in the corner, but
almost unnoticeable, the furniture is elegant, and today I had the floor
polished the way it’s done in Switzerland, there’s a piano and a balcony
with a small table and chairs; it opens onto the garden below and has
wild grapevines twining all around it—generally speaking everything is
very good. If only the books and the Beethoven come, I will be able to
receive any guests with confidence. (Oh yes, besides that, there is a
hanging lamp and a desk.)

Now for some small news items: Prof. [Julius] Platter recommends one of
my articles as reading for his lectures (the “cousin” tells me that; she
heard it from Glasberg).

Parvus is asking me most urgently to come to Dresden. (He’s making
another “revolution” at his newspaper.) I wrote back to him that I can’t
do that now, that he should come here (that would be more useful, he
could introduce me to Ledebour, etc.).

Ganelin is living here in Berlin regularly. In Russia Abramovich has
been arrested. I’ve had enough of these trivia. Away with them. The
farther from me, and from you, the better. You know, I can’t imagine now
how you can put up with that Kohler woman there. I have so little
patience for her now that it makes me sick to even think about her. By
the way she behaves quite differently toward you, of course. What
impression has the new Russian party¹²⁶ made on you? The same as on me,
I’m sure; comical figures, but they have climbed up in the world! In the
press this has not had the echo that they undoubtedly hoped for. They
seized the moment, but it was not a favorable one. Surely this occasion
will soon be followed in the _Neue Zeit_ by one of Axelrod’s “unspoken
speeches” or “unthought thoughts.” I have subscribed to the _Vorwärts_
here. Do you still get _La Petite République_? Perhaps you could send it
to me? I never see a word of French here.

I was going to ask you what you’ve been doing all these days, but then
the damn proofreading occurred to me. Oh God, it seems like you can
never get out from under my yoke. Well, now it’s already at an end after
this set of proofs. You will at last have time for yourself. I am sure
that this has given you a reason not to even visit the university. Isn’t
that so? I’m going to begin from now on to follow a well-ordered way of
life. I’ve obtained books from the library (Kuno Fischer and others) and
I’m going to read daily on a regular basis. Don’t forget to send me,
among the books you’re sending, Gaspey and the Italian grammar book. And
you’ve also stopped eating because of this proofreading! That is
downright awful, once again you’ll be looking like death warmed over! My
only Gold, take yourself in hand. Eat regularly and eat a lot, all
right? My one and only, write me about that!! And go for walks! You
certainly know where a person can go walking there where you are, but
here where I am where can I go? Either on the stinking streets or in the
stupid Tiergarten, which is swarming with children and their nannies.
One fortunate thing is that I have very good air coming up from the
little garden. It’s already quite late, and I must get this letter off.
Answer IMMEDIATELY that you aren’t angry any more, all right? Your R.

[P.S.] Ciucia, Kukuchna!

How are things with your “community status” [_Gemeinde_]?¹²⁷ Why in the
name of a thousand devils don’t you ever answer me about that? Where did
you get the idea that “[]” should be spelled “Hugues”?¹²⁸

TO LEO JOGICHES

[Berlin,] Monday, June 27, 1898

Dziodziusiu, golden one, I just received your angry card, where you tell
me off so badly. I was consoling myself with the thought that by today
you would already have my huge long letter¹²⁹ and would see that you had
told me off unfairly, but now this card has ruined my whole mood and I
must put aside the book I was reading in order to write you again! Dear
Gold, how could you be so crass as to write me like that!? Have you gone
crazy, or what? That hurt me terribly. But it’s not important. I’ll
write to you anyhow, the way I intended to yesterday.

Do you know why it’s difficult for me to write you about my impressions,
etc.? It seems to me that the explanation I gave you in my last
letter—that it was as though I were dead—is not complete enough.
Yesterday when I was taking a short walk, it became clear to me. The
more precise reason is that after all that we have gone through and
accomplished, and after THE WAY WE have lived in recent times, it seems
that, against my will, without meaning to, I fail to attribute much
significance to my personal impressions, psychological states, etc., and
I feel a certain reluctance when I describe them or even analyze them.
But I ought to go inside myself and listen to myself. Instinctively
nowadays I place value only on actual deeds of some sort, concrete
results, etc., and it seems to me—though this may be wrong—that also for
you this is the only thing that has value now, and anything other than
what I’ve described above _is from the devil_ [_ist vom Teufel_]. It may
easily be that this condition, which first came fully to my
consciousness yesterday, is the only reason for that inner emptiness
that I complain about to you. Perhaps it is simply aversion and disdain
for all personal inner feelings [_Regungen_] and the concentration of
all attention on perceptible results from work and activity. But there
would be nothing surprising in that; in recent times we have been living
so exclusively filled with the desire for results of some kind, and on
the lookout for them, that it could have found expression within me in
this way. Besides, there is an additional circumstance—I’m living here,
as one might say, without air. —If you were here, that is, if we lived
together, my existence here would somehow be normal, and it could easily
be that then Berlin would even please me and I could take some pleasure
in walking in the Tiergarten. As it is now, strictly speaking, I derive
ABSOLUTELY NO pleasant impressions [from anything]—I don’t notice
whether it’s raining or the sun is blazing; it’s a matter of total
indifference to me—when I go through the streets I pay no attention
whatsoever to the shop windows or the people; at home I think only about
what to do next, what letters to write, and I go to bed with the same
indifference as when I get up. In the end, it seems to me there is a
very simple reason for all this—because you are not here. Because of
that I feel somehow as though I’ve been torn out of the ground, alien to
everyone and everything. And now once again in the course of this
discussion I find that I’m talking about myself when what I wanted to
talk about was YOU. Dziudziuchna, I must confess to you that your recent
changes (in the page proofs [of the dissertation]) had a very strong
impact on me, and I must humbly ask you for forgiveness for the fact
that at times I was furious over the corrections you made. It is a fact
that you found a huge number of important errors. Only it makes me so
nervous that this caused you to work so much, and on top of that without
eating or sleeping—what madness.

I have long since written my article for the _Leipziger
Volkszeitung_.¹³⁰

It came out very well, the maximum that one could write on this subject,
and very moderate in tone. I have not sent it off, because I don’t yet
have the numbers [for the election results]. I’m not going to send the
article to you (1) because copying twelve pages is a rather frightful
task; and (2) in no case would you manage to send it back to me quickly,
and I don’t want to wait too long. After all, my Reflections on the
Election Results [_Betrachtungen über die Wahlergebnisse_] ought not to
appear too long after the elections. I hope to receive the numbers
tomorrow. I have written to Winter for them. I received word from him
earlier, from Austria, where he went for a short vacation and rest.

Why do you so stubbornly refuse to answer my repeated questions about
how matters stand with your citizenship? If now you still categorically
refuse to answer— I will get nasty [_werde ich grob_]. Nowadays I have
exactly as many relations with people here as you have there, i.e., only
with my landlady. I have no close acquaintances here (I don’t like to go
to the Claassens—it’s boring, and the “cousin” is after all just a big
kid and preoccupied with herself), so I spend the whole day alone, which
by the way suits me fine. I don’t want any company other than you. You
have always maintained that on the whole the only thing I feel the lack
of is people, that I have to have someone around me. Well, you see that
I’m not lifting a finger to go see people. (I won’t even go to see Mrs.
[Emma] Ihrer, although that will be necessary at some point.) I also
think with distaste that it will be necessary to meet up with Parvus. I
have no desire either to talk with anyone or even to leave the house. As
far as Parvus goes, I’ve written to him that he should come here if he
wants to, because I can’t go there now. I have received no answer as
yet. As for Schoen[lank], he isn’t here now—apparently he did not go to
Stettin to give a talk, but the earliest that he’ll be here in Berlin on
a regular basis will be in September, when the session begins.¹³¹

In a short time my sister will be coming to visit me. I don’t know if I
wrote you about this or not, but a work by Józio [nickname of Rosa
Luxemburg’s brother, Józef] was awarded a prize in the last few days in
a competition held by the Warsaw Medical Association (300 rubles). That
made me very happy. This week he also had an article published in the
_Berlin Medical Weekly_.¹³² In this connection I have just been to see
the editor, Eulenburg.

I feel that it would be good to go to Leipzig now in order to put
pressure on Humblot (1) to find out what’s going on now with the
publication in book form. (He has not answered me about that, and it’s
not appropriate to ask again in a letter, especially because of his
continuing annoyance about the lateness of the corrections.) And (2) to
find out what the situation is concerning putting the words
_Materialen_, etc., in the title. In general I don’t have the energy for
that, nor do I have the conviction that it’s really necessary. Maybe I
will think it over and make the trip anyhow, because it’s not very
expensive. I’m especially concerned about the question of publication in
book form. It would be fatal if publication was put off until autumn,
and for that reason alone it’s urgent to make the trip, because the
fellow constantly writes only about the “dissertation.” As far as
including the words _Materialen_ … etc., I can’t even mention it now in
a letter—that would be completely pointless, but to discuss it verbally
[in person] is something else altogether. Should I pull myself together
and do this or not? I’ll wait till tomorrow to think it over, because
it’s already late. To be honest with you, I have a dreadful fear of
traveling by train even for just an hour.

In my little room I feel very well, comparatively speaking; I’ve gone
all out to fix it up, and it now has a very welcoming appearance.
Especially the small balcony. Without meaning to, I observe everything
with your eyes and take pains with every little thing to arrange it as
you would, the way that would please you, etc. When will you finally see
it?! Write soon!!! Kisses […] Your R.

[P.S.] I will send the article to you tomorrow after all.

TO LEO JOGICHES

[Berlin, between July 12 and 20, 1898]

Ciuciuchny, my only one, what are you so sad for, far away over there?
My golden little animal, my Kukuchna, why are you so out of sorts?
Kukasia is allowed to be in a good mood only, because he has a capable
little wife. She will do a lot of work, and she will earn a lot of
money, and it won’t be just for herself, but she will send every month a
little bit to her father and another little bit to her Dziodzio, and all
that without any great pains, exactly as though it was for fun.
Seriously, this idea of mine, to write small items about Poland, France,
and Belgium for Parvus is definitely something ingenious, because not
only will it take almost none of my time; it won’t cost me the slightest
intellectual effort. I will receive money to pay for the newspaper
subscriptions, but besides that I’ll also earn more. In order to write
these items, I must study the newspapers closely and regularly, so that
I’m constantly _au courant_. Besides that, Parvus is happy and thanks me
fervently. Therefore everything is in order as far as that goes. As for
my idea about the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_, I will write you about the
results in a postscript to this letter early tomorrow after receiving an
answer from Sch[oenlank]. But I still won’t say everything. I’ll only
say summarily [_summarisch_] whether the news is good or not.
—Dziodziusi must not dare to think even once about taking back his
deposit money for the citizenship application! You little dummy, that
money will be for your doctoral dissertation, and as soon as you receive
citizenship, it will be locked up in the bank until Dziodzia takes his
exams. Your own money is enough for your living expenses, and I will
have, when I count it all together, every month (if the business with
Sch[oenlank] works out) a MINIMUM of 100 marks. Moreover—and don’t
laugh, I ask you please—at the end of the month I will send you an
accounting and place it right on the table.

Ciucia has obviously been sitting there the last few days without a
penny but couldn’t write me about it earlier, isn’t that so? Enclosed
I’m sending about 10 marks immediately from my reserves. I am now
swimming in abundance here. I’m not even using the full amount that you
send me, despite the fact that up to now I’ve paid the newspaper
subscriptions out of my own pocket and even though I’ve been eating like
a horse, if you’ll pardon the expression.

Dziudzia wants to know how I spend the day. All right then, I wake up in
the morning before 8, jump into the front room, snap up the newspapers
and letters, then presto back under the feather comforter again. I read
the most important things. Then I have a cold bath (regularly, every
day), then I get dressed, drink a glass of hot milk with bread and
butter (I have home delivery of bread and milk every morning). Then I
get properly dressed and go for an hour’s walk in the Tiergarten park
(regularly, every day, whatever the weather). Then I go back home,
change clothes again, and write my short notices for Parvus, or I write
letters. I eat lunch at home at 12:30 for 30 pfennigs, in my own room.
The meal is excellent and extremely healthy. After lunch every day:
whoosh—onto the sofa for a nap! Toward 3 p.m. I get up, drink tea, and
sit down to write more news items or letters (in addition to what I
wrote before noon) or I read books. That is, from the library I have:
Bluntschle, _History of Constitutional Law_ [_Staatsrecht_], Kant’s
_Critique of Pure Reason_, and Adler’s _History of Social and Political
Movements_, but also [Marx’s] _Capital_. Around 5 or 6 I drink some
cocoa, work some more, or more often go to the post office to mail
letters and the items I’ve written (doing this is something I enjoy
tremendously). Around 8 I eat my evening meal: (don’t be shocked) three
soft-boiled eggs, bread and butter with cheese or ham, and another glass
of hot milk. Then I settle down to working on Bernstein. (Oy!…) Toward
10 p.m. I drink one more glass of milk (1 liter daily). I very much
enjoy working in the evening. I made myself a red lampshade and I sit at
my desk right next to the open balcony. The room is in rosy half-shadow
and looks charming and delightful, and fresh air from the little garden
comes up over the balcony. Around 12 midnight I set the alarm clock, and
sing something to myself. Then I prepare the tub with water for the
morning rubdown, undress and—whoosh—under the feather comforter. Is
Dziodzio satisfied? I am too. Dziodzio, golden one, leave me in peace
finally with your talk about _Frau Ihrer_ [Mrs. (Emma) Ihrer] and other
people. Primo (point number one), my sister [Anna Luxemburg] is coming
now to visit me. Two, after that you and I will meet. Three, generally
speaking, it’s “silly season” here now.¹³³ In short, until the beginning
of the Reichstag session and the time for giving public speeches, I’m
not up to meeting with people, that is, even people we can rely on. By
the way, I do maintain contact by letter with the most important people:
Br[uhns], Sch[oenlank], and Par[vus]. With them I can do everything
that’s necessary. When Sch[oenlank] comes here he will introduce me to
the best people in the land. In the meantime I enjoy holy peace, free
from all Swabians.¹³⁴ Don’t you agree? Now, about our meeting up. In no
case will I travel to Switzerland, but you must come here; both you and
I need to free ourselves from the impressions there [in Switzerland]. By
the way, I’m repeating myself, but I’m very much counting on the
cornfields for you, and in your presence I want to pick some cornflowers
for you, out of sheer contrariness. There is no question that you will
be able to stay there. The whole time I was in Upper Silesia not a
single soul asked me for papers, although I was quite openly engaged in
public political agitation. However, in spite of everything, I will find
out the exact details from Bruhns, and as a last resort, for this short
period of time, I’ll get papers made up by some Swabian; we will live in
some little village, among fields and woods, alone just like Adam and
Eve, and in one room to ourselves. But we have to wait for all this
until after my sister’s visit. Is Ciucia happy about our seeing each
other again, eh?

Now a couple of words about business. Write to me about who I should
send the dissertation to. Tomorrow I will send you some additional
galley proofs for proofreading as soon as Humblot sends them back to me.
Should I send you some of my newspapers? It makes me very happy that you
are going to the Leseverein,¹³⁵ but a person can’t read a lot there at
one time. Perhaps I should send you _Vorwärts_ the next day [after I
read it]? In that case I’ll read it through IMMEDIATELY, but as for
clippings from the paper, mostly there’s no chance of that. Or should I
send the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_? (What a splendid newspaper that is,
really!)

Now Dziodzio has to write exactly what he does all day long, when he
gets up, what he eats, and whether he goes for walks. And about the
dissertation. And Dziodziu should always be reading a serious book,
because I will not have any kind of a dumbbell for a husband! About the
work on Bernstein in the next letter.

A little kiss on your little mouth. Your wife.

[P.S.] Everything is all right with the Seidels. I received a letter
from them today. I’m sorry that you have broken off with them. I fear
that in doing this you have behaved in a petty way. With regard to them
one should not engage in petty accounting, in view of the many services
they have done for ME. They will not drive us apart, and their
“_bestseremmonost_”¹³⁶ toward you is, to a great extent, because of me.

TO ROBERT AND MATHILDE SEIDEL

[Berlin,] August 11, 1898

My dear, dear friends!

I haven’t written to you for a long time, but I have just lived through
a very difficult hour, a moral crisis, and in it—I thought of you. I
wished for your advice and support and communicated with you in spirit.
In this way I showed you more true and loyal friendship than with a
dozen letters. What and how—that can’t be put in writing, and perhaps
can’t even be spoken. One must work through the most difficult things by
oneself, isn’t that true, my dear ones? And now, _finis_. I can only
tell you that I have remained true to myself and am satisfied with
myself. I want to hope that this will be so in the future as well.
—Recently my spiritual (inner) life has been extremely intense. I had a
lot of new material to process, and with every hour I grew more than in
an entire year in Zurich, among the old, peaceful relationships. It is
sometimes very hard for me that I’m completely alone. Sometimes I can
scarcely be an adviser or counselor to myself, given my own psychology,
but in the end perhaps it’s better this way, and besides—it’s so
extraordinarily difficult, even with the closest friends, to understand
one another, down to the last, innermost, spiritual wrinkle and to see
clearly. Or one may perhaps have an excellent understanding of the
actual words, but the “lighting” [behind or around the words] (do you
understand what I mean?)—the other person doesn’t see that, and yet
sometimes that is everything. After these hieroglyphics I want to say
something clear and distinct. Your two cards, sent from the mountains,
made me very, very happy. Also, and especially, that you have made the
acquaintance of my beloved Börne. You MUST, in your first free hour, get
more closely acquainted with him, above all, with his _Briefe aus Paris_
[Letters from Paris]. You will see that he was grappling with GREAT
ISSUES. Then you will easily understand his antipathy toward Goethe. It
is the primordial, eternal opposition of a “Christian” ascetic nature
toward a “Hellenic” sybaritic one, the opposition, for example, of a
Robespierre toward a Danton, the same thing that also divided Börne from
Heine. That is where the strength, but also the weakness, of Börne lies,
a type like the Roman republican, honor and virtue itself. But the
entire laughing world of appearances, which lies beyond the boundaries
of civic duty and the forms of the state, even beyond good and evil—that
is a closed book to him.

Well now, write to me QUICKLY, about what you’re doing, how life’s
going, and I don’t want to know just the outer but also the inner.

I love you and often think of you, Robert and Mathilde.

Your Rosa

[P.S.] No one may read this letter other than THE TWO OF YOU.

TO BORIS KRICHEVSKY

Berlin, August 19, 1898

Worthy comrade! Thanks for your letter, I’m fully in agreement with you,
“such fine, upstanding people as we both are” must correspond with one
another. —What you write about present-day France reinforces the
impressions I have from the newspapers.¹³⁷ Really the only expression of
clarity against this background of confusion and of people losing their
heads is the mighty figure of Jaurès, who stands alone; even from a
distance he is truly impressive; one senses in him “_a true knight of
the Holy Grail_.” And your articles in the _Pétite République_ play a
role in shaping the opinions “_des nos compagnons allemands_” [“of our
German comrades”]! If only you wrote entire letters as frequently as
possible, like the ones in _Sächsische Arbeiter-Zeitung_, which recently
have been very vivid and interesting. Your information about Kautsky did
not surprise me, I know him already, thank God, from [dealing with him
on] Polish matters. _He is a thoroughgoing Bismarck_ [_Das ist ein
ganzer Bismarck_], or at least that’s what he imagines himself to be,
and would like to play the role of an international socialist diplomat.
Incidentally, that’s why he moved to Berlin, in order to be closer to
the helm of power and to have influence on events. Keep in mind,
however, that here “among us” in Germany as well, on some questions,
indeed on the most IMPORTANT ONES, people have well and truly lost their
heads. —

As for Plekh[anov]’s article,¹³⁸ you are probably just as surprised by
it as I am, along with most of humanity. _What was the good man trying
to do?_ [_Was wollte der gute Mann?_] [You write:] “I notice that he has
placed himself in an awkward position, but what the point of it is—no
one yet knows.” Hmm, we will see what comes of it, although he has
already met with a blockage [_Verstopfung_]. — As for me, not only have
I moved to Berlin, but have firmly established myself here and have
even—(but this must remain strictly BETWEEN YOU AND ME for now) obtained
German citizenship. Two hours after I had moved here I really had had my
fill of Berlin and the Germans, but what should we people without roofs
over our heads do? _A Johnny without a country, such as I am_, must
_make do_ even with a German Fatherland.¹³⁹ Fortunately I have my
compatriot jackasses here nearby, the ones who put out _Gazeta
Robotnicza_,¹⁴⁰ and I can scrap and tussle with them to my heart’s
content.—Write and tell me, please, whether there exists in the world a
French editorial board of the kind that would lend itself to having a
review copy of my work sent to it.¹⁴¹ You surely know that better than
I.

—I would very much like to know in more detail how life is going for you
there [in Paris], what kind of mood you’re in, who comes to visit you,
etc. Do you encounter Cezaryna [Wojnarowska] anywhere? Do you see Yefron
now and then? Or Gurevich? (Does his light still shine as brightly as
ever?) Generally speaking, how is the [Russian] colony there? Here it
seems to me beneath all criticism—although I live quite far away from
where the Russians are. Of the people you know, Ganelin is here now,
among others.

Excuse me for answering so belatedly. I had a _family visit_ for a few
weeks.¹⁴² The address of Gr[osowski], which you wanted, is: Zurich IV,
77 University Street (he has taken my former apartment for the time
being), [and] I have reminded him about your letters.

Keep healthy, I firmly clasp your hand and Fenya’s and send kisses to
the children.

Your R.

TO LEO JOGICHES

[Berlin, September 3, 1898]

Dziodziusiu, yesterday, after I wrote the letter to you, I had to go to
bed again for the whole day. Today I got up, but I feel so bad that I’ll
have to lie down again. I don’t have stomach pains any more, but I’m
dreadfully weak, have a headache, and still can’t eat anything.

What do you say about the _Neue Zeit_? What the devil is the matter with
Plekhanov and with the discussion in general?¹⁴³ I feel that Kautsky
would snap up my article like hot bread [fresh from the oven], but now
the devil has played a trick on my stomach! [i.e., delaying the work]
The articles in _Sozialistische Monatshefte_ about the discussion are
beneath all criticism [_unter jeder Kritik_]. Obviously “all of
_Germania_” is in fact waiting for our liberating word.

On Urbach’s advice I am sending Jaurès a copy of the work¹⁴⁴ naturally
without writing a note of any kind. And a copy to Lavrov! Why should I
hold off on that?

A member of the Guesdiste party is here in Berlin, Lagardelle (one of
the most influential members, according to Urb[ach]). Of course Urb[ach]
absolutely insists on introducing me to him and will write to tell him
that I am here. Supposedly Sarraute is also here, but I have no desire
to make his acquaintance.

You surely know that Parvus is demanding that the discussion over
Bernst[ein’s] tactics be on the agenda [_Tagesordnung_] of the party
congress (and [Clara] Zetkin’s _Gleichheit_ is calling for the same
thing).¹⁴⁵ The _Vorwärts_ is naturally opposed to that. One ought to do
all one can [literally, “stand on one’s head”] so as to get an article
in print BEFORE the congress, yet it seems that this is something not to
be dreamt of, at least not in the _Neue Zeit_.

Why have you written nothing for the last four days?

I can’t [write] any more.

Yours, R.

TO GEORGY PLEKHANOV¹⁴⁶

Dresden–A., October 17, 1898
22p Zwinger Street

Citizen, I am so busy right now, unfortunately, that I myself cannot
translate your article;¹⁴⁷ if your translator can take care of the
matter very quickly, you can without any worries engage him to do it,
[and] I will see to it that the language is edited carefully. For this
purpose it would also be necessary for you to send me a copy of the
Russian, so that, if necessary, I can check the translation. If you want
to, you can as well send your article to Citizen Krichevsky (Paris, 11
Avenue Reille), [and] at the same time I will write him and express the
hope that he will do it for us, even though he too is very busy.

Please accept, dear citizen, the assurance of my fullest respect.

R. Luxemburg

TO AUGUST BEBEL

Dresden–A., October 31, 1898
22p Zwinger Street

Worthy Comrade!

I am very grateful to you for the information [you provided], which
helps orient me on how things stand. That Bernstein, in the
argumentation he has made up to now, no longer bases himself on our
program was of course clear to me. However, it is also very painful that
one must entirely give up hope for him. It surprises me, though, that
you and Comrade Kautsky, since you have grasped the state of affairs IN
PRECISELY THIS WAY, did not want to use the favorable mood that was
created by the party congress for an immediate and energetic debate, but
before all else, you made an arrangement that Bernstein would bring out
a pamphlet, or booklet [restating his views], which had the effect of
delaying the discussion.¹⁴⁸ At any rate, I believe that through it all
I, among others, made use of Plekhanov’s letter¹⁴⁹ in a manner
consistent with the state of affairs as you characterized it in your
letter. If Bernstein is really lost, the party must get used to it,
however painful it is—and must regard him from now on as a Schmoller or
other [such] social reformer.

As far as the further discussion is concerned, for the moment I don’t
have the slightest idea whether I will be in a position to carry it on
in the _Sächsische Arbeiter-Zeitung_. My colleagues, on the one hand,
and Gradnauer, [on the other,] are pressing and pushing toward a
conflict in which I can easily see myself being forced to give up the
editorship.¹⁵⁰ At the [next] meeting of the Press Commission, which will
be held on Wednesday [November 2], and in which the issue will come to
some resolution, I will, for my part, demand as a condition [that I be
granted] full freedom to pursue the discussion on tactics. — The
relations on our editorial board are very unproductive and in spite of
the great pains I have taken to bring about harmony and internal
agreement, the intrigues and grumbling I have encountered are
continuing. My colleagues’ action of speaking out in the _Vorwärts_¹⁵¹
was only an expression of animosity looking for a pretext. The matter
will be settled day after tomorrow.

With best regards,

R. Luxemburg

TO AUGUST BEBEL

Dresden, November 7, 1898

Worthy Comrade!

I prefer to give a DIRECT answer to your letter, a copy of which came to
me by way of Comrade Schoenlank. I consider it beneath my dignity to go
into such things as “moral boxing of the ears,” “unbelievable
tactlessness,” etc.

On the actual issue under discussion, the following [is what I have to
say]. Wallfisch was able to inform you of some facts in “a most
objective way,” but not about the general situation on the editorial
board and the mood that prevailed within the commission.¹⁵² —Since
Parvus’s time [as editor of the _Sächsische Arbeiter-Zeitung_] relations
on the editorial board have been so unsettled and intolerable that
sooner or later a quarrel was bound to break out—all the more so because
my colleagues, as the result of the long struggle with Parvus, had
become thoroughly irritated and were determined to make use of the
change of editors to bring the paper fully into their own hands, in
which connection they found backing in the commission, which had been
intimidated by attacks on the paper because of its “poor tone.” For my
part, I considered it wrong to limit myself—as Parvus did—to merely
writing polemical articles about tactics and leaving everything else to
the whims of the gods. I saw as my primary task, along with the
discussion of tactical questions, to generally raise the level and
improve the quality of this neglected paper, and therefore I intervened
in other departments, and that became the source of further friction
between me and my colleagues, who, for example, used against me my
introduction of an economic review¹⁵³ and discussions about tactics,
claiming that these detracted from the local-news aspect of the paper.
Furthermore, my “interference” in the polemic between Gradnauer and
Mehring¹⁵⁴ was another card they played against me in the commission.
You are of the opinion that the commission gave in to us on all
essential points. In fact, it rejected all my proposals and requests. It
took its stand all along the line on the side of my editorial board
colleagues. And if I were to return to the editorship, I would
immediately have to relinquish all my freedom of movement—given the
existing relations on the editorial board and the existing attitude of
the commission. FORMALLY, it was only a matter of “getting rid of the
poor tone.” Actually, I would soon not be able to put my own articles in
the paper any more and—what is very important—not be able to put
Parvus’s articles in either. I said to myself: If THIS is the
commission’s standpoint, then as editor I have nothing to do, and for us
the position is already lost. But if the commission wants to guarantee
the necessary freedom, it can still make that known to me after my
resignation. Note well. I repeated ten times during the session [of the
commission] that I was being FORCED into resigning, that no other
recourse was left to me. —The reaction to this was a lot of smiles, and
it was regarded as an empty threat—the kind that Parvus made many times.

One more point to orient you on the situation at this moment. The
editorial board members are conducting negotiations with LEDEBOUR, who
explains that he is quite willing and ready, under any and all
conditions, to step in and become editor. As for my personal situation,
I have replied as follows to several members of the commission who
privately sought to persuade me to resume the editorship: the only way
there could be any talk of that is if (1) the right is guaranteed for me
to put articles by outsiders in the paper (in this case I am thinking
above all of Parvus, because he has made my editorship a condition for
his collaboration); and (2) full freedom [is guaranteed for me] to write
in my own name even in the event that the editorial board disagrees with
one or another article. Thus, the commission at its session tomorrow
will also have the opportunity to state FORMALLY whether it continues to
hold to the same old standpoint or not. I hope these facts show you that
you have been a little too hasty with your judgment of my way of
proceeding.

With SD [Social Democratic] greetings,

R. Luxemburg

TO LEO JOGICHES

[Berlin,] December 3 [1898]

Bobo! I was at Mehring’s yesterday and returned home with the sad
conviction that nothing more remains for me than to sit myself down and
write “a great work” [_“ein grosses Werk”_]. Just like Kautsky, Mehring
immediately asked me: “Are you working on a bigger project, or greater
work?” [_“Arbeiten Sie an einem grösseren Werk?”_]. And he said it so
earnestly that I felt I “ought to” be working on one [_daran arbeiten_].
There’s nothing to be done about it. Apparently I look like a person
whose duty it is to write _ein grosses Werk_, and nothing else remains
for me but to meet the general expectation. Do you perhaps know what I
should write this great work ABOUT? My darling golden one, wouldn’t you
free me from giving a detailed report on the visit to Bebel and Kautsky?
In exchange I’ll tell you more exactly about the conversation with
Mehring, which is more interesting.

(1) He explained to me several times that I had edited the _Sächsische
Arbeiter-Zeitung_ very well, much better than P[ar]v[us], “one could see
that the paper was really being edited,” and he said that in general
during the time when I was there the _Sächsische Arbeiter-Zeitung_ had
been edited best of all. He has also told Kautsky that.

(2) He considers Ledebour, and so do they both (and so do other old
timers, so it seems) to be only a temporary break in my editorship and
they are quite sure that I will return to Dresden and that then I can
“impose a dictatorship.” They spoke about that with such an amusing
certainty that I was absolutely astounded.

(3) When discussion turned to Bernstein he [Mehring] said to me, “You
set him back good and proper in the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_, and it
gave me great pleasure.”

(4) As for Schoen[lank], he [Mehring] does not believe in the durability
or solidity of his radicalism, just as the others do not, and they asked
me what exactly the party had left for us to take hold of in
Stuttgart.¹⁵⁵

As for Ledebour, Mehring is sure that he’ll remain in Dresden only until
the Christmas holidays, because (1) he is said to be such a notorious
lazybones that he will soon start coming to the editorial office at 10
am or even at noon, (2) he is so argumentative that he can’t get along
with anyone for more than a few weeks, and (3) theoretically he is a
complete ignoramus and is incapable of managing a newspaper. Mehring
knows him because they were on the editorial board together at the
_Volks-Blatt_ [i.e., _Volks-Zeitung_].

(5) We got around to talking about his [Mehring’s] refusal to contribute
to the _Sächsische Arbeiter-Zeitung_, whereupon I openly told him my
point of view. He then assured me that it’s literally impossible to
contribute to three different newspapers, and that’s what had obliged
him to refuse. If he had known that for me it was mainly an expression
of his solidarity with _Sächsische Arbeiter-Zeitung_ and not a question
of contributing regularly, he would have written several articles for me
immediately. He added that now, if I took over the editorship again, he
would immediately write something. That could be of the greatest
importance. —Other than that we spoke _de omnibus rebus_¹⁵⁶ in the party
and we parted on very friendly terms.

The interesting news that I promised to tell you about is that the
police have been keeping me under surveillance for the past several
weeks. For the last few days two agents have been sitting day and night
at the janitor’s place and have followed me at every step. The janitor
is a former _Genosse_ [comrade] and secretly informed me about
everything. Since this seemed to me to be too stupid, I simply went to
the police, to the _Herr Leutnant_ and put the cards on the table. I
said that if this didn’t stop, I would go to Windheim [Berlin’s top
police official] and make a scandal. The lieutenant naturally pretended
that he had no inkling that this was going on, but in fact the spooks
disappeared the day after that. Mehring advises me that if they show up
again, to put a notice in the _Vorwärts_, and then they’ll immediately
crawl back into their holes. The devil knows what the reason is, but I
have reason to suppose that a confusion of identities is involved;
either they take me for someone else or they think someone else is me.
Meanwhile, just in case, I have been cautious, I burned [some] letters,
registered myself, and looked through my papers. This is all going to go
away, probably, as though disappearing into the sand. As for Mor[awski],
I wanted to write to him myself about the addresses, as you advise. I
will answer him for the first time today, because I did not want to show
any haste.

I doubt very much that Natzi [i.e., Ignatz Auer] will encroach on the
plan [_auf den Plan_]. Of course I would like it very much. Tomorrow I
will send you my “Wirtschaftliche Rundschau”¹⁵⁷ that I sent to them
yesterday.

I received the money, 80 marks, yesterday. God grant that that will be
the last time I take from you.

I am now tackling the series energetically.¹⁵⁸ What have I been doing?
First of all I had to spend a lot of time on this “Wirtschaftliche
Rundschau” but I’ve gotten myself together and now things will go
smoothly, like buttering bread.

Physically I’m still very weak, although I’m living an orderly life, I
could sleep 20 hours a day. Write about yourself now, but write a lot.

One request, though, which you must fulfill RIGHT AWAY: Get hold of the
book by Svyatlovsky entitled Factory Hygiene [_Fabrichnaya Gigiena_], as
well as Bertenson.¹⁵⁹ Send them to the address of Mrs. Schirman:
Charlottenburg, 36 Kaiser-Friedrich Street, Quergeb. 1. She has asked
for them a lot, and I am greatly indebted to her. Don’t forget to carry
that out immediately! A thousand kisses. Your R.

[P.S.] As soon as I begin writing, I will let you know the details, so
that you can help me.

TO LEO JOGICHES

[Berlin, December 12, 1898]
Monday evening

Dear Dziodziu! After receiving your letter yesterday I sent you a card
and a small package of newspapers. Now I will write you in more detail.
And so, first of all, about the “series.”¹⁶⁰ I have come to the same
conclusion as you, that precisely the Bernstein question must be the
“great work” that I will have to write. Thank God that K. K. [Karl
Kautsky], as he explained to me categorically and even showing surprise,
HAS NO INTENTION of writing a PAMPHLET (only [something] in the _Neue
Zeit_). The only other person who has such an intention is Parvus, but I
have no apprehensions about him as a competitor. After the pamphlet by
Bernstein appears, another one opposing it will have every chance of
success. So I will present this “series” as a REPLY to Ede
[Bernstein]—that is, not NOW but immediately after his book appears.¹⁶¹
And [I say all] this for the following reasons: (1) The impression I
already had in Dresden has grown even stronger here, namely, that K. K.,
by urging Bernstein to write a pamphlet, or booklet, actually succeeded
in putting to sleep the general interest [in these issues] and deferring
everything until the appearance of that booklet. It is a fact that
everyone is now waiting for the book, and the present discussions,
insofar as they touch directly on Bernstein’s theories, are even
regarded as somewhat “tactless.” (I can no longer recall who
specifically expressed that idea to me.) At present the prevailing
atmosphere is one of weariness and waiting [_Mattigkeit und Abwartung_],
but as soon as Ede’s thing appears, everyone will expect a discussion
and will carefully weigh every word.

(2) Say what you will, but if I spout off on all these subjects now,
when there will be discussion about them one way or another later on, I
cannot imagine that I will again find something of an impressive nature
to say at that later time.

And [to present] polemical twists and turns in such a way as to block or
counter all of Bernstein’s main arguments AHEAD OF TIME—that would be
offering food that is too refined [_zu feines Fressen_] for this
audience. No one will give it any value. Here is how people understand
things: When Bernstein brings out his book, that is the time when as
much as possible we must wring its neck, and whatever was said
PREVIOUSLY disappears completely from the scene. That is why K. K. too
will step forward and speak out after the appearance of Ede’s booklet—K.
K., who, as you know, always understands how to speak after another has
spoken, but with words that are a little bit different [_mit ein
bisschen anderen Wörtern_], so that the public thinks he is the first
one to present this standpoint [_Standpunkt_]. Therefore for me it is
not at all worthwhile to use up my powder [_mein Pulver ausschiessen_]
now, and later, after K. K. has spoken, to regurgitate arguments that
have already been used and sound hackneyed. —In short, I am of the
opinion that it’s necessary to have the articles printed as a series
AFTER Ede’s booklet, but to get the series ready now, and in fact, in
such a way [und _zwar so_] that then it can immediately appear as a
booklet as well.¹⁶² If the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_ will not publish it,
Wallfisch will. That I should be silent a little bit now does not bother
me in the least and will not do me the slightest discredit, you can rest
assured of that, as long as I speak out immediately after Ede. At any
rate, one knows and will know that only on important occasions do I
speak out, but I do so with _éclat_.

So I’m working on this series now. I’ve already worked up a section
about “seeing through ENGLISH EYEGLASSES” [_Die englische Brille_] to
the best effect.¹⁶³ This is a more important topic than it seems at
first glance. At the very least I want to go into it widely and deeply!
As for the topics I’m working on simultaneously—“Blanquism” and “What Is
to Be Done in an Eventual Revolution?”—nothing has so far come quite
clearly to mind about these two topics. Perhaps something occurs to you?
Anyway I’ll surely cope with it myself, if not today, then tomorrow. I’m
also working on theory of value [_Werttheorie_]. I have already read
carefully through Ziber. He has given me little, and all in all, I’m
disappointed in him. I can use him only as a reference book when I have
to look up some economist or other. I have skimmed anew through _Zur
Kritik_¹⁶⁴ and am now reading Volgin (on “V. V. as an Economist”).¹⁶⁵ I
have already found literature on Böhm-Bawerk and the whole marginal
demand theory [_Grenznutztheorie_]¹⁶⁶ and made notes for myself. I want
to send you particular topics as I work them up.

On the other hand, you must send me your comments about my theory of
economic crises. Apropos of this, Bernstein warns me that his
“anti-critique” is aimed directly at my articles, because I wrote to him
in a letter, among other things, as follows: “I’m very nervous about
your anti-critique, although from your ‘clarification’ in _Neue Zeit_ I
was not able to understand exactly whether you would publish it in your
book or later, in _Neue Zeit_.” I wrote this intentionally because I
wanted him to experience some uneasiness. As for the tone of his
postcard, it made the same impression on me as it did on you. To go back
once more to the “English eyeglasses,” I would like there, at least in a
brief sketch, to portray the whole change of the present economic
situation of England, and for that I found some material in the
_Economist_, the _Board of Trade Journal_, and in the Russian-language
_Financial News_ [_Vestnik Finansov_]. The latter I will send back to
you, by the way, tomorrow. It would be very good if you could send me
more recent copies. — The second topic that is suitable for a “great
work,” and that would have great success, would be a fundamental
elaboration on the question of the trade unions. The only thing that
annoys me is that all the fundamental points have already been
presented, in part by myself in detail in that article [unspecified] and
in part at the Dresden congress (to the extent that we presented
supplementary material there), so that for a pamphlet or booklet the
only thing that would still be left to do would be to expand and enrich
it with factual material from German, French, and English sources. But
such a booklet would be very timely. As for the question of tariffs, I’m
collecting material on that in the meantime. I’ve already found a book
in which all the factual material is contained and will receive it in
the next few days (a new book). From the library, on the other hand,
what I will get for myself includes [Alfred] List and others. (I have to
hurry because the foreign trade data won’t be available until the new
year because of the late start of the Reichstag session.) So Bernstein
occupies first place [in my attention] now. —I’m setting Ziber aside now
and am taking up the Webbs again as basic to the work on the trade
unions.

Now another request pertaining to written works. What do you know about
Isaev and his tendency? (He is, it seems, a Marxist, but one not lacking
in peculiarity.)¹⁶⁷ I remember that I read once in some Russian journal
[_zhurnal_] a long article by him about capitalist development in which
he described some awful things, but what they were I don’t any longer
know or remember exactly, but now I would be in great need of an
assessment of his book, and it would serve for writing, without great
effort, two leading articles (worth 40 marks). That is precisely the
article I wanted to write at an earlier time for the Leipzig people in
order to earn a lot for that month, but I had to postpone it because I
wanted to make a thoroughgoing critical review and back then I lacked
the necessary information for that. I must break off here and fly to the
post office with this letter, because I have no stamps, and it’s about
to close. And so, until tomorrow, to take up Polish matters and the
rest. You haven’t yet given me any information about the Beethoven!
Until later. Hugs, your R. (Are you still furious?)

TO LEO JOGICHES

[Berlin, December 15, 1898]

Dziudziuchna! I just got your letter and am hurrying to reply, at least
with a few words. Today’s “Rundschau” will be more timely than ever, by
far, because I found some highly pertinent material. But don’t forget
that we decided to take up this whole business to provide a service and
not for the sake of gaining fame, and so there’s no need to get carried
away [_uvlekat’sa_]. Naturally everything must be done properly so that
it does not compromise or discredit us, but one ought not to spend too
much time and attention on that. As far as the plan is concerned, at
first glance it’s still firmly in place, absolutely—to be specific: (1)
current phenomena of an economic nature; (2) important new developments
in the realm of technology (e.g. in transportation and communication),
which give evidence of the general trend of capitalist development; (3)
social policy, which gives evidence of steps forward in either social
reform or class struggle. —Incidentally, my hope is to bring the
“Rundschau” to completion little by little by adding to it [now and
then] and so I don’t get worked up about it and don’t upset myself. In
any case it is better than Julek [Marchlewski]’s or even Calwer’s. —I’m
very glad you have advised me to take up Ehrenfels for discussion. I
have already written directly to Schoen[lank] about that and even have
an answer, that he will order it right away and send it to me. —I have
some important news from him. At the most recent gathering of the SPD
Reichstag group Bebel dealt with the question of Isegrim-Schippel [Big
Bad Wolf Schippel] and explained that his position must be condemned. It
was decided that a SPECIAL session of the Reichstag group will be called
for January 10 or 11, and Schippel will be invited to it! At this most
recent session Alb[ert] Schmidt (from the provinces) stated to Auer,
among others, that in the provinces people are outraged by his attacks
on me and Klara [i.e. Clara Zetkin] at the Stuttgart congress.¹⁶⁸

—My dear, write to me RIGHT AWAY. I need some especially significant
information about Stepniak (and his activities). Schoen[lank] asked me
for that for the Reichstag library, and I know nothing. In the meantime
I’ve written to him that Stepniak’s real name was Kravchinsky and he was
the one that carried out a successful attempt on the life of [tsarist
head of police] Mezentsov. Do I have that right? Parvus’s _Weltpolitik_
is at the present time simply comical.¹⁶⁹ Perhaps later on something
more substantial will come of it. But in any case he always gives off an
air of freshness and displays a “broad and expansive” way of thinking.
—I’m settling down and going through _Wage Labor and Capital_, the
_Communist Manifesto_,¹⁷⁰ etc., for material on the theory of
impoverishment. As far as I can tell, it is a rather difficult business.
—Have you read Cunow in _Neue_ Zeit?¹⁷¹

So I am assuming that things are as good as certain in regard to your
citizenship application in Zurich, am I right? I want to write a letter
to FORRER. Have you gotten together with the Seidels? Dear me, what
troubles you have there! Yours

TO LEO JOGICHES

[Berlin, December 27, 1898] Tuesday

My dear one, my beloved! On Saturday morning (the 24th) I received your
long letter, and in the evening your telegram, and yesterday (Monday)
your present with a postcard and in it a critique of my gift to you. I
send you heartfelt thanks for the Molière, even though my education—and
I say this in complete humility—does have other, bigger holes besides
classical French comedy, and although, for me, that other belated gift
and the Molière are certainly fantastic, I’m also sure that it [the
Molière] is the direct result of _Das Leben Jesu_¹⁷² —despite the fact
that, as far as the history of literature goes, such a sequence violates
chronology. That you would make fun of my Strauss WAS QUITE CLEAR TO ME
beforehand, because I know you well. I expected a longer letter with the
Molière, but I’ll just have to do without, knowing absolutely nothing
[new] about you. To be sure, I write irregularly and not exhaustively.
Nevertheless there is always news from me about what I’m doing. Your
letters, on the other hand, are always just replies about business
matters.

Your accusations in the letter I received Christmas Eve are partly
unjustifiable. I absolutely do not live here “in the Lübeck [Bohemian]
manner.” Mind you, I live an extremely regular life, eat and sleep at
the right time, go for walks regularly, take care of my health and my
clothes. All my affairs are in order. I read and clip the newspapers
scrupulously every day, and I go to the library four times a week. You
are also mistaken in saying that I don’t get around to working on my
economic supplement until just before the train leaves. I go to the
library continually from Monday on and read through ALL the reviews that
are in any way applicable (and there are quite a few of them). You could
have gathered this in particular from my article about America in the
_Leipziger Volkszeitung_.¹⁷³ But the problem is that frequently I can
extract absolutely nothing from it all, partly [because] they are so
irregular about putting the new issues out [on the library shelves], and
I end up for two weeks’ time with the same article at my fingertips.
That’s how it was just now, this last week (before the holidays),
despite my complaints. Fresh issues [of periodicals] from Saturday were
not put out until THURSDAY, but I was busy on Thursday with the
Mickiewicz.¹⁷⁴ It was not until Friday, the last day of the week, that I
finally found the material, which on top of it all was not especially
good, and I had to work right up until the train left. To make matters
worse, I did the work and rushed myself to absolutely no avail. My
“Rundschau” was NOT published in the Saturday issue, and that was, as
Led[ebour] writes me today, because of the idiotic office worker who
picked up the mail and left my manuscript lying in his briefcase and
took it out only at 12:30 pm, when it was already too late for
typesetting. (They start printing at 1 pm.) Because of that I will lose
20 marks for this month. But I’m going to write to Led[ebour] today to
say that perhaps he should publish this “Rundschau” in TOMORROW’S paper,
because it will not have gone stale.¹⁷⁵ And then on the [next] Saturday
[he can print] a fresh, new one again. I don’t want to lose the money,
because I had already calculated that this month I would earn about 143
marks (plus or minus 3 marks for the item in the _Leipziger
Volkszeitung_). But that’s pretty good money, wouldn’t you say? And all
of it quite unplanned. In the next two months I hope to earn just as
much (minimum), and I can do it easily, so that you can come here at
Easter time (or, it goes without saying, I can go to where you are, if
you prefer that). Two days before Christmas Eve I had a terrific urge to
cable you that you should come here. I was just walking around in the
Tiergarten and suddenly I wanted so badly for you to come here that I
turned into the street leading to the post office to send you a
telegram. But at the last moment there came before my eyes your stay in
Dresden and the situation with you there and [I realized] that the same
thing would be repeated here, because I now MUST sit all day long and
work on Bernstein, so in this case we would both sit all day long from
morning to night and slave away on these articles. At the very thought
of it I began to feel nauseated, and I repeated to myself my decision
from Dresden: I want to see you WITHOUT any work going on. I want to
write everything BY MYSELF and then spend my free time with you. Also by
the time of the little holidays this fuss with the Bernst[ein]
[pamphlet] will be over, and I have no plans for anything else of that
sort. So then, since your holidays begin in the first days of March,
we’ll see each other in two months. Write me immediately, and well ahead
of time, whether you want to consider Berlin. Naturally I would prefer
that, but ultimately the place is not important to me. WRITE ABOUT THAT
RIGHT AWAY.

Of the money for next month I’ve already spent a huge amount on presents
(for father’s birthday, for the Schoenlanks, for the landlady). I had to
have some sent to me from Dresden, because otherwise I would have had
nothing. In spite of that I will soon have TOO MUCH, of course, and I
don’t need anything at all from you on the first. Of what’s left over I
have to give part of it to pay for my teeth, which I finally have to
pick up. Wallfisch wasn’t here. Obviously he hasn’t come here (that
wasn’t definite, anyway). I’m having some trouble with Ledebour [editor
of the _Sächsische Arbeiter-Zeitung_ in Dresden]. He insists that I must
sign my “Rundschau,” just as I do in the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_. If I
sign there but don’t with him, he says that “people can get the idea
that you don’t want to work with us.” I don’t know what I should do.
Naturally I wrote to him immediately that I definitely will not sign the
“Rundschau,” that the only thing I will sign is an eventual lead
article. But after all, if one has promised, one must someday write the
article! What is one to do about this dilemma?

Now about that article on America in the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_.¹⁷⁶
Why did I WRITE the article? Because some interesting material fell into
my hands, and I was able to work it up in one day. Why did I SIGN it?
Because ultimately it’s a polemical jab at Bern[stein] and I absolutely
can’t do that kind of thing anonymously. And besides, the article was
really quite nice and will in no way do me discredit, so I decided to
sign it. And why did I write about Mick[iewicz]? Not because
Schoen[lank] was waving his hands, as you assume, but because it is a
POLISH topic (and for the Germans too it’s important—the whole [German
socialist] press was running big articles: _Neue Zeit_, the Vienna
_Arbeiter-Zeitung_ with Daszyński’s article, and even the bourgeois
press ran big articles). That’s why it was obligatory for ME to work up
an article. I tried to turn it in a direction that would bring grist to
our mill—to the extent that aesthetic considerations would allow—and in
order to do that, I presented him in connection with the history of
nationalism and not, as M[ax] Beer did, from the angle of his
philosophical views derived from an era of confused thinking. I know
very well that it was not WHAT WAS EXPECTED of me, and also not what I
came to Berlin for. However, I do not by any means see these things that
way, and certainly not other things either. It is clear that these are
incidental works written on opportune occasions
[_Gelegenheits-arbeiten_], and there will also be something
theoretically important apropos of Bernstein. I’m going to break off
here in order to give the woman this letter to take along and drop in
the mail. I’ll write you more tomorrow. Be good, Dziodziu, golden one,
be sure to be good! You hear? I’m begging you. I kiss you and embrace
you WITH ALL MY HEART. Your R.

TO LEO JOGICHES

[Berlin, March 2, 1899]

My precious Gold! These days your dear letters are a great source of
strength for me, because I don’t feel at all well. I’ve been SLEEPING
whole days and am incapable of doing any work, neither to think nor even
to write one letter. I wander around like some mindless head of cattle.
I myself am astonished at being so exhausted by those four articles,
which are certainly somewhat more than is permitted by the police [als
_die Polizei erlaubt_].¹⁷⁷ Even now I’m writing you with the greatest
effort, and after two words I forget what I wanted to say. You know what
occurred to me yesterday? [I wondered] whether one day I’ll die from a
mental illness, because for such a long time (actually since LAST YEAR)
I’ve been feeling very peculiar, as I have often told you and written to
you. I have the sensation of a clouding over or dulling of the mind. I
think and feel everything as though through a screen of tracing paper. I
have the sensation that my thoughts are being torn away from me and go
so far away in fact that I have to make an effort to remember exactly
what it was I was thinking about. Besides that, I am now continuing to
suffer from forgetfulness and mental lethargy. Just imagine, nowadays I
never know WHEN AND ABOUT WHAT I wrote to you last. A little while after
I’ve sent the letter off, I no longer know whether I really did drop it
in the mailbox or whether I lost it, if it had been properly addressed,
etc. That’s why I’m simply surprised that I was able to think so
energetically and quickly in writing those Schippel articles. Well, all
that is unimportant, and now down to business.

Your critical comments on my polemic (strictly speaking, the one most
important comment) made me tremendously happy, because once again I have
been convinced that I can fully rely on my own critical sense. You see,
when I SENT OFF this reply [to Schippel] I said to myself, “My dear
kitty cat, you’ve gone galloping off, and you’ve turned down the wrong
alley.”¹⁷⁸ Instead of attacking opportunism again, I let myself be
carried away with my favorite topic of economics, and went off into the
thickets of theory. I opened YOUR LETTER and read word for word the very
same thing. Now you will ask why I didn’t write better, since I was
aware of this. I tell you, I myself am amazed that, under the
conditions, I was able to write at all. Just imagine, I had to write
this reply to Schippel in a matter of four hours right in Schoenlank’s
presence.¹⁷⁹ I thought I would go mad [from the situation]! He himself
brought me Schippel’s _Zuschrift_ (addendum) and sat himself down to
wait [as I answered it]. I told him of course that I could not write
with him being there, but what can you do with [someone like] him? He
assured me that he would not disturb me at all, that he would read a
newspaper, that after all, before it was sent off, he had to look it
over for style, etc. To get rid of him I pretended that I couldn’t
recall in which volume Rodbertus had written something about economic
crises, and I sent him to the library to look it up. I thought to myself
that surely it would take about three hours. —After half an hour he was
back with a book under his arm. This nearly made me crazy. It ended up
with us having an argument and me writing the article with my hands
trembling. —As I must confess, however, in all this, aside from the
objectionable circumstances, I was partly playing a role in which I took
great pleasure, because of the powerful effect of firing back [at
Schippel] IMMEDIATELY. In fact I would have liked to write MORE, but
there was neither time enough—I was writing up to the last minute—nor
space in the limits of one article, and since this was slated for the
Sunday edition, if I didn’t do it, it would have to be postponed till
Monday or Tuesday, and I was afraid that Mäxchen [“Maxie” Schippel]
would have time, if I hesitated, to take back his addendum, which he had
written after he read my third article, and then this fortunate
opportunity to blast away at him would be lost. So I said to myself: _Da
gilt es, schnell zu agieren_ (the thing is to act quickly). At any rate
the article is nicely done, and the party, the blockheaded ox, will not
notice the fine points anyhow. It will be said simply that I “trounced”
him and therefore [everything else] will be unimportant … and that’s how
it turned out. Everyone was enthusiastic, and the only thing they were
surprised about was “how Schippel could write such stupidities!…”
Schoenlank came to visit me today to report on the “impact.” First of
all (immediately after the reply to Schippel was printed) he had spoken
with August [Bebel]. A’s [August’s] words: “_The articles are
brilliant_; _I subscribe to them word for word_; _the tone is elegant
and irreproachable. It is of course nonsense that the Reichstag group
kept its decision secret_.¹⁸⁰ _The matter must be brought before the
party congress. However_ …” About this “_however_”—which came from him,
not from me—more later. Antrick chanced to meet him [and said, in
German]: “_I haven’t read the articles myself, but people say that
Luxemburg is demanding Schippel be thrown out. I take the same position
she does_.”

Besides that, he visited Arons [who said]: _“The articles are excellent.
Does Rosa really want Sch_[_ippel_] _thrown out? She’s right. Berliners
are reading the articles very eagerly, and the issues_ [_with her
articles_] _are lying around in all the bigger gathering places where
party members go_.”

But back to Bebel. He also mentioned K[arl] K[autsky]’s articles, but
did not praise them, not a word, merely expressing the opinion that they
are too long [_zu lange_].

As an indication of the success [of my articles] it should also be
noted, “last not least,”¹⁸¹ that the bourgeois press raised a hue and
cry about them. The _free-thinkers’ paper_¹⁸² referred to the articles,
calling me “the well-known noisemaker of the party” [_“die bekannte
Krakeelerin der Partei”_], and it took a stand in support of Schippel. I
enclose the clipping from the _Kreuz-Zeitung_.¹⁸³ These are both leading
organs [of the bourgeois classes, and their statements] will be printed
by the whole “free-thinking” press as well as by the entire reactionary
press.

You have read the reprint in the _Sächsische Arbeiter-Zeitung_. It’s all
the more important because, in Schoen[lank’s] opinion, it will be easier
for the provincial party press to reprint that item, while they would
not know what to do with the three-article series. —As for your advice
to definitely write one more article, that is not feasible. It would
make a peculiar impression now if I came clumping along with one more
article as an encore. In this connection, you see things somewhat too
darkly in regard to the mistake in my reply [to Schippel]. It came so
quickly after the third article and was written so strongly that the
impression of a definitive political statement has not in any way been
blurred. I gather that from Schoen[lank’s] report [on responses to her
article]—My hopes for writing again on this question are more closely
connected with the possibility that Schippel will continue his polemic
in _Neue Zeit_, where he will surely want to justify himself, and then
he won’t hold anything back in the attempt to knock me down _en
passant_. At that point I could speak out again. —It’s rather difficult
for me to lash out against the [SPD’s central paper] _Vorwärts_. (1) Mr.
Schoen[lank] has some anxiety in this regard and is nervous about it.
(You don’t know what difficulties I had with him over the third
article!) He’s afraid to take on the _Vorwärts_, although at the very
first opportunity he would surely cut loose and start cussing like a
trooper for no good reason. (2) I myself have no desire to get on the
back of this pathetic old nag, which is on its last legs even without
that—[I mean] the _Vorwärts_—a fact that is sufficiently well known to
everyone, and no additional honor would accrue to me for trouncing it,
especially after Parvus’s unending campaign.¹⁸⁴ I cannot write on the
same subject in the _Sächsische Arbeiter-Zeitung_. One must have some
sort of system in one’s work as a whole. If I am carrying on a
discussion of party politics in the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_, I cannot
do that at the same time in the _Sächsische Arbeiter-Zeitung_, because I
just don’t have enough powder for that. It would look as though I were
trying to write the way Parvus does—a great deal and at great length,
but all quite colorless. I would always prefer to write less, but in
such a way that it grabs the reader, and I can do that only in one
publication. At present the _Sächsische Arbeiter-Zeitung_ has no
significance, and it is not my task to cauterize this wound. And don’t
think that Sch[oenlank] would just look on without doing anything. On
the contrary, as far as the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_ is concerned, at
this time I am the only representative of radicalism. —I’ve written to
you about this previously, you know—because Mehring doesn’t write there
anymore, and by the way he’s not writing at all, anywhere. Thus K. K.
[Karl Kautsky] and I are now the only defenders of the extreme left.
(Parvus has withdrawn and is stuck wallowing in his _Weltpolitik_,¹⁸⁵
and Klara [i.e., Clara Zetkin] is writing nothing.) —I wrote a short
letter to K. K. about Daszyńska.¹⁸⁶ We’ll see what his response will be.

As for my trip, you’ve given me a hard nut to crack with the proposal
that it be put off until May. Quite frankly I have a lot of anxiety
about that—do you know why? It’s because, [first] as soon as I’m aware
of you in the same room, all my initiative evaporates immediately, and I
“wait” for what you are going to say. Second, I feel that I ought to
stay here at my post to deal with things, for example, to prepare a
public talk on “Militarism and Social Democracy.” That would show that I
was conducting a campaign persistently and with consistency. Otherwise,
I would certainly like to make the trip and would do so as quick as you
could count 1-2-3, and I would dismiss all other considerations
[_Rücksichten_] with a wave of the hand. At each moment I keep changing
my mind and I can’t come to a final decision. I would like best to be
guided only by the considerations of the cause, but I myself don’t know
what would be better for the cause. I’ll sleep on it tonight and write
you tomorrow. (Apropos of that, I have also told Schoen[lank] that he
should have a speech ready on this topic, and I’ve written to Klara for
the same purpose, so that at least in one way or another a well-planned
campaign will come out of all this …)

A thousand kisses, Your R.

TO LEO JOGICHES

[Berlin, March 3, 1899]

My dearest Gold!

You see what kind of head I have on my shoulders. Yesterday I wrote you
about Bebel’s “However” and then forgot, later on, to explain what that
meant. So then: “However,” he went on: “_Vorwärts isn’t saying anything
because of the Old Man_,¹⁸⁷ _and Gradnauer is a partisan supporter of
Schippel’s. The provincial press will hold its tongue because it has no
self-confidence, and we ourselves_ (that is, the Reichstag Group—RL)
_have differing opinions on all the most important questions. When
people see all this, they themselves will get depressed and lose the
desire to struggle.”_¹⁸⁸ In a word, this whole short speech of Bebel’s
had only one meaning: that Bebel himself is on the way to being senile
and letting the reins slip from his grasp. He is happy when others put
up a fight, but he himself no longer has either the energy or the fire
to take any initiative. As for Singer, he is not a person of great
significance. And K. K. [Karl Kautsky] limits himself to theory. In
short, when you take a look around [_kak vzglyanut’ da posmotret’
krugom_] the whole party is just standing there in damn bad condition,
in a state of absolute headlessness [_bezholowie_], as the Ruthenians
say. No one is providing leadership, and no one feels responsible. And
among the few people who have courage and a point of view, Parvus—the
devil knows why—has become totally involved with that stupid
_Weltpolitik_ of his.¹⁸⁹ Instead of, as he ought to be doing, writing in
the _Sächsische Arbeiter-Zeitung_ (he apparently wants, like Seidel, to
show the party that it can’t get along without him) and that ass Mehring
has gone and left the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_ because of some
stupidity.¹⁹⁰ Only K. K. [Karl Kautsky] and I remain on the field [_na
placu zostayą_]. This is a situation in which a person with energy and
health in my place could accomplish a lot. For example, I have now felt
obliged to hold several public meetings, one after the other, on the
subject of “Militarism and a People’s Militia” [_“Militarismus und
Miliz”_] in order to shake up the masses and to give a forward push to
Bebel and the other gray heads. —But my health! —_Miserabel!_ Yesterday
a delegate from Schöneberg came to see me to ask me to give a prepared
talk, so that means I HAVE TO do two of them this month. In general, one
has had to be active and deal with things and eventually to meet with
people, although as far as the last item is concerned, I prefer to stick
to my tactic of dignified restraint and reserve [_vornehme
Zurückhaltung_]. But in any case I distinctly feel that one ought to
stay here at one’s post [_auf dem Posten_], to speak out, and be at the
ready at any moment. That’s why I’m still unable to decide: to make the
trip now or not. Oh, if only you would relieve me of this decision, so
that I could be at peace and feel that I have made a GOOD decision!… I
will sleep on it again tonight. I enclose clippings from the
_Kreuz-Zeitung_. This means that the entire bourgeois press has
reacted.¹⁹¹ Yet the _Vorwärts_ remains silent. This is evident to
people—never fear—and in Hanover they will be taken to task about
this.¹⁹² Apropos of that, our situation in Hanover will be more
difficult: I am not “editor” anymore, and Parvus won’t be there! To make
up for it, Schoen[lank] is already on our side. Only I have to
constantly keep propping him up. He is very stirred up over the impact
the articles have had. The Leipzig comrades have presented a request to
him that I should come there and give a report.

A thousand kisses, your R.

[P.S.] Obviously you haven’t read the last two issues of _Neue Zeit_.
Right there on the cover is the entire contents of Ber[nstein’s] book,
from which you can see for yourself what you have to work on. Blanquism,
for heaven’s sake! I’m ordering the book for you so that you’ll receive
it immediately, by the 14th at the latest.

TO LEO JOGICHES

[Berlin,] March 6 [1899]

My dear, beloved Dziodziuszka! I kiss you a thousand times for your most
wonderful letter and for the gift, although I have not yet received
it.¹⁹³ What’s happening this year? I’m being flooded with abundance as
though from a cornucopia. Just imagine, I received from the Schoenlanks
a fourteen-volume set of Goethe in deluxe binding [_Luxuseinband_].
Together with the books from you this will, all of a sudden, be an
entire library, and the landlady will have to give me a new bookshelf,
besides the two that I already have. You probably cannot even imagine
how happy I am over what you chose [as a gift]. Rodbertus is my FAVORITE
writer on economics, who I can read a hundred times over just for the
mental pleasure of it. But the _Handwörterbuch_¹⁹⁴ —that goes beyond my
wildest dreams. I have the impression that I have received not just a
book, but some sort of PROPERTY, something like a house or a piece of
land. You know that we will have, all together, a very fine library, and
when we start living together like regular people, we must buy a
bookcase with glass doors.

My golden one, my dear, how happy you made me with your letter. I read
it six times from beginning to end. So you’re really satisfied with me!?
You write that perhaps, deep within me, I know that somewhere there is a
man named Dziodzio who belongs to me. Don’t you realize that everything
I do is always only with the thought of you: when I write an article, my
first thought is, Will it make you happy? And when I have a day when I
doubt my strength and I can’t work, the only thought that bothers me is
what impact this will have on you, will it be disappointing for you?
When I have proof of success, for example, that letter from Kautsky, I
regard it as a moral tribute [_moralische Steuer_] to you. I GIVE YOU MY
WORD, as sure as I love my mother, Kautsky’s letter is not that
important to me; I was so happy only because when I opened that letter I
felt what great joy it would give you. I’m waiting with great impatience
for an answer from you (most likely it will come tomorrow, together with
the books, and that will be happiness twice over). There’s only one
thing lacking for me to have inner peace—the outward arrangements of
your life and our relationship. Aren’t you aware that very soon I will
have such a strong (moral) position here that we will be able to live
together quietly and openly as husband and wife!? You most likely
understand that yourself. I am happy that finally your citizenship
problem is coming to an end and that you’re energetically getting closer
to your PhD. I feel from your last letter that you are in a very good
mood for working. By the way, your letters during the Schippel campaign
were daily stimulants to my thinking, and in the last one you gave me an
entire passage, which is the finest ornament in that article (the part
about relief for the workers, which I translated directly from your
letter). Do you think that I don’t see and don’t value that when the
sounds of battle [_zvuki boyevye_] ring out, you stand by me with help
and encourage me in my work, totally forgetting about criticizing, and
overlooking my errors of omission [_upuschcheniya_]? You have no idea
what pleasure your letters bring me and with what desire I look forward
to them: I know that every one of them will bring me joy, support, and
the courage to deal with life.

But the greatest joy you gave me was when you wrote that we are still
young and will be able to organize our personal life. Oh, my golden
Dziodzio, if you could only fulfill that promise! [Imagine] our own
little apartment, our own little bits of furniture, our own library,
quiet and regular work, working together, and from time to time, the
opera, and a very small circle of acquaintances whom one can invite for
dinner, and going for a trip to the country for one month every year,
but absolutely without any work. (And maybe a very, absolutely small
little Bobo [i.e., baby].) Will this never be allowed? Never? Dziodziu,
you know, what happened to me yesterday while I was walking in the
Tiergarten? Something totally unexpected, without any exaggeration. All
of a sudden some little child (a little Bobo) three or four years old
was at my feet, wearing a pretty dress and with long blond hair, and
started to stare at me. Suddenly something came over me. I had the
desire to pick up that child and quickly run home and keep it as mine.
Oh, Dziodziu, will I never have a Bobo!?

But we will never quarrel with each other in our home, right? Our home
will have to be quiet and peaceful, like most people’s homes. But you
know what really bothers me. I am already feeling old and ugly. You will
have a not very pretty wife when you take her hand to go for a walk in
the Tiergarten. —And we’ll keep our distance from the Germans. In spite
of invitations from the Kautskys, even now I remain aloof, so that they
have to work harder and will feel that I don’t care so much to be with
them.

Dziodzio, if you (1) finish with the citizenship, (2) finish your
doctorate, (3) settle down with me openly in our own place, so that we
can start working together, that will be ideal. No other couple in the
world has such possibilities for being happy as we have. And with just a
little bit more willingness from each of us we will be, we must be
happy. Were we not happy so many times? Only if we had stayed that way a
little longer, and also if, along with that, there was work together. Do
you remember Weggis? Melide? Bougy? Blonay? Do you remember how at that
time we had no need for the world at large? As long as we were with each
other in harmony, the world was not important to us. Quite the opposite,
at such times I had great fear of any stranger barging into our lives.
Do you remember Weggis when I was writing “Step by Step” [“Von Stufe zu
Stufe”]?¹⁹⁵ (I always think with pride of what a superb piece of writing
that is.) I was sick, lying in bed and writing, and nervous about it,
and you were so good and kind, you were calming me down, giving me a
kiss, talking to me with your dear, kind voice, which I can still hear.
“Now, now, Ciućka, don’t worry, EVERYTHING WILL BE ALL RIGHT.” I will
NEVER forget that. Also, do you remember in Melide after lunch you sat
on the balcony, drinking thick, black coffee, sweating like a bull under
the horrible sun, and I was hiding down in the garden with my notebook
on theory of public administration [_Verwaltungslehre_]. Or do you
remember one time there when musicians came into the garden on a Sunday
and wouldn’t let us sit there and we had to go by foot to Maroggia, and
there the moon rose over Mount San Salvatore, and we were talking,
actually, about whether I should go to Germany, and we stood there and
hugged each other on the road in the darkness and gazed at the moon
shaped like a sickle above the mountain, do you remember? In my memory I
can still smell the fragrance of that evening. Do you remember when you
arrived at 8:20 in the evening from Lugano with groceries. I ran
downstairs with the lamp and we struggled together dragging those big
packages upstairs and later we unloaded them on the table—oranges,
cheese, salami, and a little cake in a paper wrapper. You know we
probably never had a more fabulous supper than at that time on that
little table in an empty room with the balcony door open and the sweet
aroma coming up from the garden. You were cooking eggs in the frying pan
with great skill, and from the distance in the darkness we could hear
the train to Milan going over the bridge with a tremendous clatter.

Ah, Dziodzio, Dziodzio, come quickly. We will hide away from the world,
the two of us, in two little rooms, we will work hard, we will cook, and
it will be so good, so good. (And do you remember: “_Tol’ko odni lapki
yest’, sovsem malenkiye_”?)¹⁹⁶

Dziodzio, dear, I throw my arms around your neck and kiss you a thousand
times. I want you to pick me up and carry me in your arms (but you
always have the excuse that I’m too heavy).

Today I don’t want to write anything about business. Tomorrow after I
visit K. K. [Karl Kautsky]. I’ll go there without the article,¹⁹⁷
because I’m waiting for your letter. I hug you and kiss you on the
mouth, and I absolutely insist that you carry me in your arms.

Your Róża

TO LEO JOGICHES

[Berlin,] May 1, 1899

Dziodziuchna! I thank you for your express letter of yesterday. It made
me very happy, because I had been sitting all day long in an empty
house—waiting for your [brother] Józio. And anyhow, there was no sense
going anywhere. It was raining, and I was feeling very bored.
Unexpectedly the postman rang the bell and brought me [this] news from
you, which I had been waiting for, for two days already.

Your brother is coming and not coming! I sat at home again all day today
[in vain], and I don’t understand what it means.

You ask if the speeches for the party congress have been assigned yet. I
did write to you, Dziodziu, that Bebel is going to give the report on
Bernstein and that it isn’t known yet who will speak on militarism.
Other points are of no concern to us. Your advice, at all costs, try to
get a report [_vo chto by to ni stalo, dobivatsa referata_]—God knows,
that’s childish. I’m amazed at the way you keep giving such impractical
bits of advice, and [this one] on such an important question. Do you
really think there would be even the slightest chance that an official
report [_Referat_] [at a party congress] would be entrusted to a person
who has been active in the movement for only a year and who has called
attention to her existence with a few ARTICLES, even though we may say
they were outstanding ones. A person who does not belong to an in-group
[_zur Sippschaft_], who has NO ONE’S protection, but only the use of her
own elbows, a person who, for future purposes, is feared not only by
opponents (Auer & Co.) but also, in their heart of hearts, by allies
[_Bundesgenossen_]—Bebel, K. K. [Karl Kautsky], Singer, etc., a person
they feel it would be better to keep at a distance as much as possible,
because this person could quickly grow right up over their heads [_über
den Kopf wachsen_]. Don’t you understand all that? To fight to give a
report [that would be] AGAINST all of them—there is no means of doing
that, because it is strictly their agreement they come to [_Abmachung_]
behind the scenes. But I observe all that with profound calm: I knew in
advance that everything would be like this. Likewise I knew that in one
to two years, no intrigues, fears, or envious feelings would accomplish
anything, and I would occupy one of the first places in the party. It’s
true, the situation at the present moment—Bernstein—is exceptional. But
once again you seem to think that right now that is precisely the
belly-button of the earth [_pup zemli_] and that if we don’t do it now,
then all is lost. That is foolishness. The party is now (and has been
for the past two years) marching forward into a whirlpool of ever more
difficult tasks and ever more dangerous phenomena. There will still be a
thousand and yet another thousand opportunities at every turn for the
party to show its strength and indispensability. In all this, I have no
intention whatever of limiting myself to CRITICISM. On the contrary, I
have the intention and the desire to PUSH IN A POSITIVE DIRECTION, and
not just to push individuals but the movement as a whole, to bring our
entire positive effort under review, to demonstrate new ways of doing
agitation and practical work (to the extent that such ways can be found,
and I have no doubt they can), to fight against casualness, routinism
[_Schlendrian_], etc. In a word, to be constantly giving new impetus to
the movement, that is—to do what Parvus began and did well for several
months, but only several. At any rate I now have the same unshakable
belief that P[arvus] had: namely, that with the appropriate abilities
one can accomplish a huge amount in this movement, [that] one can do it
from day to day and for years to come [_auf Jahre hinaus_]. The entire
current epoch is an extraordinarily crucial one. And that there is no
one present who is in a position to wake up the party by tapping on its
skull is shown by the question of the state assemblies
[_Landtagswahlen_],¹⁹⁸ which I unfortunately came in too late to take
up. But there will be hundreds of more such questions every year. [For
example,] the tariff question, foreign policy, and the trade unions,
[just take] those alone—and you already have three untouched areas
[_nepochatykh ugla_]. And then to put the spoken and written propaganda
on a new track, because in the old forms it has become petrified and has
almost no effect on anyone any more, and in general to bring new life to
the press, the pamphlets, and the public meetings. I’m only writing all
this in a hurry, in a disorderly way, to show you that I don’t view
what’s going on around me in an unplanned or unthinking way, and second
of all, to remind you that the world is not coming to an end with
Bernstein and Hanover.¹⁹⁹

As for the statement that it is ridiculous to be an idealist in the
German movement, I don’t agree with that. First of all, because there
are idealists here too—above all the huge number of the most ordinary
party agitators from among the mass of the workers and furthermore, EVEN
among the leaders: e.g., BEBEL. Second—all that, taken together, doesn’t
bother me. Because the _suprema ratio_ [supreme principle] with which I
have succeeded in all my Polish-German revolutionary practical work is
this: always to be myself, without any regard to the surroundings or
other people. Indeed, I am an idealist and will remain one, as much in
the German movement as in the Polish. That does not mean of course that
I intend to play the role of a virtuous donkey, doing other people’s
work for them. I certainly want to and will strive for as influential a
place in the movement as possible. But that does not in the least
conflict with idealism and does not require me to employ any means other
than my own talent, to the extent that I have any. And by the way, my
golden one, if you think they can succeed in the GIVEN case (the case of
Bernstein) with a tactic of keeping me away from the table [_von der
Tafel zu verdrängen_], you are very much mistaken. —My articles and,
still more, my booklet,²⁰⁰ have done their work and will continue to do
so, setting the seal on my contribution to the discussion. And you will
see that even Bebel in Hanover, just like Clara here, will be reciting
from my booklet. Incidentally, who will be in Hanover and what will
occur there cannot be determined beforehand. Just get the idea of a
report out of your head, because it’s ridiculous.

_Praeterea censeo:_²⁰¹ It is best, as you yourself concede, to keep
one’s DISTANCE from them.

Also, you can see in the case of Mehring that you yourself don’t know
what you want. Today you’re writing that it would be better not to bring
him into the work of the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_. Yet in a letter of
ONE WEEK AGO you shouted with all your might [that we must] get him
involved, because without him the world would come to an end: “In a
word, Mehring is necessary!” [_“Odnim slovom, nuzhen Mehring!”_] Now, a
few days later, M[ehring] is already unnecessary [_nenuzhen_]. What if I
had carried out all your “orders” instantaneously?! You incorrigible
diplomat! I have to close now, for today. I kiss you strongly, right on
the kisser.

Your Rosa

TO LEO JOGICHES

[Friedenau, December 18, 1899]

Dziudziuchna, golden one! Today I was at Katzbach Street.²⁰² We changed
the plan, and I will start the trip on the 25th and stay there until the
31st.²⁰³ Originally W[inter] particularly wanted me to give talks on the
17th, 26th, and 31st. For this pleasure I would have had to spend half a
month there and sit around doing nothing from the 17th to the 26th, nine
days! Of course I couldn’t do any writing for the _Leipziger
Volkszeitung_ there, not having newspapers and books, and so I would
have definitely gone bankrupt for this month. I didn’t go along with
this proposal and consented only to make the trip for the two public
meetings on the 26th and 31st. Under these conditions your plans having
to do with Hamburg or Munich are the only ones we can carry out, as it
now seems. This prospect of an eternal nomadic existence scares me
terribly. I’m also afraid we’ll both lose a lot of time because of this,
and besides, prices are high and we will have to live very frugally. The
way things are going I will soon have to take over payment of the living
expenses for my father and sister. To respond with indifference to this
situation, based on news I have just received from home, or to bow out
with wishes of “good luck” would be an unconscionable action on my part.
It is high time that I assume my responsibilities with full seriousness.
Here too I have run into some reversals that are enough to make me shout
out loud dementedly. (I obviously won’t be able to afford this with my
writings alone, or else my writing will go to the dogs.) God knows how
this will all work out. But the heck with all that—let me get back to
the subject. This situation really is unpleasant, damn it all. It
irritates me so much that I would rather not think about it. Just finish
your dissertation, since the deadline is coming closer—that is, the
deadline toward which we have been aiming. Then we will decide. We
already know the difficulties, and nothing new is going to crop up for
us. There is only one choice: either Berlin for the whole year or half
the year in Berlin and half in Hamburg. I lean toward that rather than
Munich. In the summer we can live by the sea for a certain length of
time, which would also be good for our health. On the other hand, [I
wonder] whether there would be more gossip [about us] in Hamburg than in
Munich, because in Munich we would exclusively be living with the Adolfs
[Warskis]. We would simply keep away from all others. In Hamburg, to the
contrary, certain party responsibilities and relationships would be on
my shoulders, so that I would have to have dealings with people.

I have to be very brief in writing you today because I received a
telegram from Leipzig to send an article about the French party
congress.²⁰⁴ They need it tomorrow and that’s a lot of work. I would
have written to you yesterday but I had to do an article in great haste,
come what may, because Sch[oenlank] is sick.

Because of the situation at home and the constant little obstacles to
getting work done (such as this trip to Upper Silesia), I’m in a very
bad mood. Kisses from the heart, Your R.

TO LUISE AND KARL KAUTSKY

semi-Asia, December 30, 1899

My dear friends!

I send you hearty greetings from the border between civilization and
barbarism. My countrymen locally are quite satisfied with my visit here,
and I am no less satisfied myself. The trip was very necessary. A word
spoken in Polish has quite a different effect than when spoken in that
“foreign” tongue, German.

Our [friend] Winter is very nice and a splendid comrade. As for his
spouse, one small detail among many is characteristic: she wrote to him
from Berlin, after she first visited me, “RL is quite human.”

The local comrades in their naïve way made the confession to me that
they had imagined me quite differently: large and fat!… We’ve had only
two public meetings, but in between them every night the comrades have
had their “beer evenings” in my honor, at one time in Katowice, another
in Zabrze, and so forth. At these beer evenings certainly none of
Ballestrem’s champagne was on tap.²⁰⁵ To make up for that, however, the
producers of surplus value mentioned so scornfully by Ballestrem were
filled with the holy spirit of Social Democracy. Seriously, such private
get-togethers among a close circle of friends have a much more
stimulating effect than the public lectures. These are people with
strong FEELINGS, like all Poles, and PERSONAL contact is very important.
Incidentally, among other things I had to tell where and what I have
studied, how old I am, how I make my living, how my family is, etc.,
etc. It is humorous and touching at the same time. The miners, some of
them came directly from work, completely black with coal dust. Tomorrow
I have the last public meeting of my speaking tour here. (I leave at 1
p.m., saying goodbye to our local party unit, which will celebrate
December 31st with us and the end of the century.)

So then, Happy New Year! Here’s wishing the best of luck to the entire
Kautsky clan, all three generations. Your totally devoted Rosa.

TO LEO JOGICHES

[Friedenau,] January [4,] 1900

Dear Dziodziuś! This morning I received your angry letter, from which I
conclude that you did not receive one of my letters from Upper Silesia!
Still, I did write you twice, as I recall, once on the 27th and the
second time, together with New Year’s greetings, on the 30th. You
mention only one letter. Write whether you received them both! I’ve
already explained to you the business about the railroad timetable.²⁰⁶

Yesterday evening I was just about to write you, but at that moment I
got a note from Lopek [Bein] asking me to get on the streetcar right
away and go to see him because he had an important matter to take up,
but could not come to my place. So I had to make the trip right away,
and it turned out he wanted to borrow 50 marks from me, which I could
naturally neither give to him nor promise him. However, as a result the
whole evening was lost to me.

Now back to the subject. To put it briefly, here’s how the trip went:
all of Monday [December 25] was spent traveling. No one met me in Bytom
because the train arrived an hour late. So I hired a horse-drawn sleigh
and headed for Winter’s place. With difficulty, after searching for half
an hour, we found the street. The building and the floor on which he
lived were deserted and so dark that one might easily have broken one’s
neck. Neither of the Winters was there. They had gone to visit their
parents in Silesia for the Christmas holidays, which by the way, I had
known about beforehand. The maidservant was waiting for me. A few days
earlier it had been arranged that, on Winter’s orders, a
_Vertrauensperson_ [SPD “trustee”] from Katowice, a man by the name of
Borys, would meet me at the train and take me to the public meeting in
Bielszowice. But no Borys showed up. Toward noon, observing that no one
was coming to meet me, I hunted up the only party office that I had an
address for in Bytom and asked for a guide to take me to Bielszowice,
because I didn’t have any inkling of where the [SPD] local was [in that
town]. They finally gave me a fellow who, as it turned out later, didn’t
know the way himself. He and I took the wrong streetcar, and we had to
get out after going some distance, and then we had to wait, right out in
the open, in snow and freezing cold, FOR AN HOUR for a different
streetcar to come along. I sent the fellow to the neighboring village to
hire a wagon or sleigh—but he found nothing. After an hour of waiting my
legs had almost fallen off from the cold. We finally got onto the right
streetcar and traveled for another hour. Then once again we had to go on
foot across country, that is, through snow, ice, and mud, where there
was no path, until we trudged our way to the [SPD] local, a shack
standing out in an open field. It was understood that we would arrive
there for this meeting at 4:30 pm (after we had left the house at 1 pm).
I had barely shown up when the [police] commissar called the meeting off
on the grounds that it was already dark and no “appropriate” lighting
was available.

The indignation of the workers was tremendous, but after all, I had lost
[this chance for] a meeting and I was furious. When the older comrades
who were there saw what had happened they cursed Winter roundly for
having assigned Borys instead of someone else, because as it turned out
to my misfortune, it was exactly at that time that Borys’s mother had
died and that was why he couldn’t come to meet me. You can imagine how I
was fuming inside myself, but one thing turned out to our advantage:
since we were forced to wait several hours for the train for the return
journey, we ended up forming a rather large circle at the station and we
had discussions and conversations and got to know each other personally.
I gathered a great deal of information about their relations with
Winter, their attitudes toward him, toward the PPS, etc. We immediately
arranged that we would have a meeting the next day with a group of
reliable people, in Katowice, then some of them accompanied me home,
where I arrived toward 10 pm, tired, frozen through, and with feet
soaking wet, and also in despair because of the failed attempt at a
meeting. It was impossible to write you that day, on the next day I did
write you briefly, but didn’t mention this failed meeting, because it
was extremely unpleasant for me. The next evening the Winters came back.
Winter had to concede that he had committed a stupidity because after
organizing a meeting and inviting me he should have stayed home and been
available and not relied on other people. —In the following days we did
have meetings, one in Katowice, then in Zabrze and Siemianowice [German
name, Laurahütte] with equally reliable people in those places, as well
as representatives of the PPS. The fellows were very happy about my
being there, poured their hearts out to me, placed great confidence in
me, and in the end brought up the question of my attitude toward the
PPS. I informed them about that briefly. They definitely wanted to bring
this matter up at the next PPS congress at Easter time. They wanted to
give me a mandate and threatened that if the people in Berlin had the
least thing to say against me, all of Upper Silesia would rise against
them. With regard to the Polish question, they take our position
completely. They also asked me to give them my address, and we are going
to correspond, and the party delegates from Upper Silesia will visit me
here [when they come to Berlin].

These confidential discussions brought to me and to our cause greater
benefit than the public meetings did, because they brought us closer
together personally, and these fellows exclaimed when we were saying
goodbye: “We love you so!” (all using ty, the familiar form of address).
(The only thing is, they say they had a different image of me
[previously]: “large and fat.”)

As has been shown, the Berlin PPS people are also in a very conciliatory
mood. Not only did they report about my public meeting in the _Gazeta
Robotnicza_ but they have also written to Winter that they are very glad
I came to Upper Silesia as an agitator. They also asked if I could urge
people to subscribe to the _Gazeta Robotnicza_ and that they hoped that
their statement in the _Gazeta Robotnicza_ “will please you [Winter] and
Rosa” (word for word!). In view of this we now must consider what tactic
we should follow toward them and what to undertake in connection with
their party congress. Think about it.

Finally my last public meeting came on Sunday. This time I pestered
Winter so much that we arrived on time at our destination. Again we
waited for the streetcar literally in vain, then we immediately hired a
carriage in Bytom that took us there in one hour and waited for us while
we were in Bielszowice. The number of people who gathered for the
meeting was larger than ever before. There were easily 150, which is a
very large number for the conditions existing there (really!), because
they have to make the trip from the whole surrounding region, from as
far as two hours away. First Winter thanked me publicly with a few words
for making my appearance there, and then I gave my talk—exactly one
hour. It went very well, and they interrupted me several times with
applause, and at the end they “thunderously” shouted bravo and burst
forth with cheers [_Hochrufe_] for me. An old mine worker came up to me
after the meeting, patted me on the face, and said, “You did that real
well.”…

There will be a report in the _Gazeta Robotnicza_, which I will send to
you. The workers were happy that they had finally gotten to hear “a word
spoken in Polish.” To be sure, Morawski had spoken there already but “he
can’t be compared with you,” they assured me. After me, Marek the SPD
trustee [_Vertrauensperson_] spoke, and he explained that it is of
course not surprising that Comrade Luxemburg knew how to speak so
beautifully, “because certainly that’s exactly what she was like at the
_gimnazjum_ [Polish for “high school”].” (Word for word [that’s what he
said].)

To sum it all up [_Summa summarum_], I am highly satisfied with this
trip because it will have a decisively positive effect on our relations
with the PPS in the entire coming period; and these relations have
finally moved off of dead center, where they have been for so long.

What’s your advice about what to do now?

Mrs. Winter was sick, and for the whole time that I remained in the
house I had to make hot compresses! Because of all that I could barely
pull myself together to write you two letters.

Have I written you about this or not? For Christmas from the Kautskys I
received a lovely basket of marzipan fruit, a little box of candy, and a
whole bag full of snacks for the trip. From the Schoenlanks I received a
beautifully bound edition of the works of Lothar Bucher. The Kautskys
are already calling me “ROSA” [i.e., are already on a first name basis].

Send this letter to Adolf [Warski] because I’m not up to giving one more
account!

The women are quite satisfied with me; they too came to the private
gatherings. They came to Bielszowice as well, but the police chased them
away.

I had to promise the workers that I would come again and that at the
latest it would be Whitsuntide (because Easter is the PPS congress). I
have to close now, for today! We’re having a “five o’clock” [written in
English] at the house of … [of all people,] Askew (the Kautskys, myself,
Paul Göhre, and a man from Holland will be there), and on Sunday there
is an evening meal at the Kautskys’ with people from Italy.

Kisses from the heart! Your R.

TO LEO JOGICHES

[Friedenau, circa January 13, 1900]

Dear Dziodziu!

You really are remarkably funny [_paradny_]! First you write me a letter
in the most abominable tone, and when I naturally reply to that briefly
and dispiritedly you call it [_du heisst es_] “your postcard [written]
in a tone that does not dispose me to write at greater length” [_tvoyo
oktrytoye pismo v tone ne raspologayushchem menya pisat bolee
podrobno_”] …

Generally speaking, you don’t notice that your entire correspondence
systematically displays a quality of being one huge unpleasant thing:
Its only content is a dreary, pedantic MENTORING, such as is more
usually associated with “letters of a teacher to his pet pupil.” I
understand that you want to let me know your critical comments and
observations, and I understand their usefulness in general, and even the
necessity for them in particular cases. But for God’s sake, with you all
this has definitely turned into a bad habit and an honest-to-goodness
ILLNESS! I can’t write to you about a single thing, not one idea, not
one fact, without receiving in reply the most boring and tasteless
perorations. Whether it be my articles, my visits to people, my stay
with the Winters—whether it be newspaper subscriptions or even clothes,
whether it be my relations with [people] “at home” [i.e., in Poland]—in
a word, there is literally not a single thing that is of concern to me
and that I write you about that you don’t reply to with lectures and
advice. It really is too boring for words! And even more so from being
so one-sided, because for your part, you neither give me material for
criticism and advice nor do I have the desire or the bad habit of
wishing to instruct you. And if once in a while I dare to give you some
advice, you don’t even think about following it. What sense was there,
for example, in your tirade in yesterday’s postcard “with regard to your
tasks in the German movement and in literary work, as well as concerning
your studies at home for yourself” [_“naschyot tvoikh zadach v nemetskom
dvizhenii i v literaturnoi deyatelnosti, a takzhe kasatelno zanyatiy
doma dlia sebya”_] _“so as not to go to the dogs, either politically or
intellectually_”?²⁰⁷ … It would be much more interesting if you would
finally write to me just once with regard to tasks [_naschyot
zadach_]²⁰⁸ that you have thought out for yourself to do, and what
reading YOU are doing there to keep yourself from going to the dogs.
Judging from the spirit and content of your letters, I’m afraid this
prospect [of going to the dogs] threatens YOU in Zurich far more than it
threatens me in Berlin. What a tasteless idea, all these last few weeks,
to be saving me from “going to the dogs”!

All that comes from your old bad habit, which became noticeable right
from the start in Zurich and which fundamentally ruined the situation
when we were living together, namely your bad habit of assuming the role
of mentor, as a result of which you felt called upon to instruct me
eternally about everything and take on the role of my private tutor.
Your advice and criticism nowadays in relation to my “activity” here
goes once again far beyond the bounds of advice and observations from a
good friend and has again turned into systematic mentoring. Therefore
really the only thing I can do each time is shrug my shoulders, and
later in my letters I avoid mentioning anything to you that is not
absolutely indispensable, so as not to provoke any tasteless instruction
giving as an answer. And besides, what value can your moralizing have in
my eyes when what you do, being on your own, customarily depends on your
whim of the moment. Here is a small sample: During the past week I
complained at one point in a letter that without wanting to, and in
fact, AGAINST my will, I have become involved in a personal friendship
with K. K. [Karl Kautsky]. To that you replied that you were VERY HAPPY
about this friendship: for my sake [_Meinetwegen_]. Then suddenly, in
your last letter, you express yourself about the evening at K. K.’s,
which I described for you, but not of course for the purpose of
obtaining your “critical assessment.” You let yourself go at great
length and width on the subject of the harmfulness and superfluousness
of initiating a friendship with K. K., etc. How can the one statement be
reconciled with the other? Quite simply, in the first instance you were
in a good mood, and on the second occasion, a bad one, so you
immediately painted everything black and therefore immediately I had to
be warned about “going to the dogs,” etc. —One more comment: in general
I am impressed only by advice and the expounding of general principles
which are followed by the advice-giver HIMSELF. So when you write your
comments to me, always be sure to compare your information with how
things stand in this respect AS FAR AS YOU’RE CONCERNED. For example,
your progress with your dissertation, your systematic intellectual work,
your subscribing to and reading “newspapers from home” [i.e., from
Poland], etc., etc.)

See what a shampooing I’ve given you. Aha! The pitcher has gone to the
well so often that finally the handle breaks; add one grain after
another, and the measuring cup is full; don’t stick your fingers between
two doors; the pot is calling the kettle black—and I could cite many
other appropriate TRULY POLISH proverbs here, only I’m afraid that this
pure Polish is precisely something you won’t understand. Therefore I
will present just one proverb, composed by Mr. Jowialski²⁰⁹: the older
the tomcat, the stiffer the tail … All the conclusions to be drawn from
the foregoing I leave to your sharp intelligence, because, as people say
among us in Poland: for a muttonhead, two words are needed [_baraniej
glowie dość dwie slowie_].²¹⁰

Now some topics for your kind consideration:

(1) Yesterday Sch[oenlank] and the three Kautskys came to have an
evening meal with me. Sch[oenlank] left around 10 p.m. (for the train
station, because he’s going off on a trip), but the K[autsky]s sat
around until quarter of one in the morning.

(2) I did send you the review about Miss Zastrabska in the first letter
from Bytom. I received it shortly before my trip, took it along, and
immediately enclosed it in my letter of the 27th, which unfortunately is
the missing letter. The review was VERY COMPLIMENTARY to her. She is a
young and highly promising force [in the world of music], who has
already appeared several times at concerts of the Leipzig Conservatory.

(3) At the same time I’m sending you the issue of _Gazeta Robotnicza_
with the report about my speech.²¹¹ It just came TODAY. Naturally I
disclaim any responsibility for this report. This foolish gibberish is
the work of the SPD trustee [_Vertrauensperson_] there, Marek. For that
reason it would be ridiculous to send complaints or objections to
_Gazeta Robotnicza_, because there are no false assertions in the
article; the only thing is that, all in all, it’s merely naïve
jabbering, as always in the reports printed by _Gazeta Robotnicza_,
which its readers know from experience.

(4) I have the intention of taking over the position held by Cunow with
K. K.²¹² He wants to leave that position. The re’s very little work and
the pay is steady. My own articles will be compensated for SEPARATELY.
It goes without saying that I would do this only because of the money,
that is, for father. I have not yet said anything to K. K. I found out
about this only yesterday. What do you have against it? Answer
immediately. Hugs from the heart! Your Rosa

TO LEO JOGICHES

[Friedenau,] April 24, 1900²¹³

My precious Dziodziuś! Your letter arrived at the right time, just when
a thought was ceaselessly tormenting me: When will this chaotic mess
between us come to an end?

In order to explain to you my state of mind and my behavior recently, I
will only say briefly that I had concluded from the whole recent period,
mostly in fact from my stay in Zurich, that you … had stopped loving me;
perhaps there is even someone else who has a claim on you, that I at any
rate have ceased to be for you the person who would be capable of making
you happy in this life—to the extent that it is at all possible.

This idea became clear to me all at once that night when I was at
[Clara] Zetkin’s, lying on her sofa, and besieged by these thoughts, I
could not go to sleep. Suddenly it all became so clear to me, and beyond
any doubt. Your hesitation about the trip to Berlin and your entire
behavior recently I have come to understand in the light of THIS fact,
that it would be easier for me—truthfully—and it would relieve the pain
in my chest, as in the case of a person who after endless riddles,
complications, confusion, and muddling finally finds a simple and clear
answer to ALL questions, even though it may be a most painful answer.

I immediately decided also to handle things in such a way as to make the
separation easier for you, that is, first of all to break off our
correspondence, so as not to initiate new connections between us through
my letters, and so as not to affect your mood. I said to myself: this
way the problem will be solved. If he loves me and wants us to live
together, he will come, and if not, breaking off the correspondence is
something he needs and his being used to me will gradually fade away,
and the relationship will “resolve” itself of its own accord.

After that I began living here in complete isolation with the thought
that I am alone and it will always be that way. I felt a certain
coldness in this but also pride. And every time I saw other people
living together, when I saw how lovely it is to be alive in the
springtime, when I thought about the fact that you probably won’t find
anyone with whom you can live as you lived with me, I began, without
wanting to, to hatch plans and nourish hopes—and every time the same
simple thought would occur: he’s already living a different life; or:
you have nothing to give TO HIM; this thought persisted and, having
chased away all my dreams, made me go back to work, completely down in
the mouth.

From your letter I somehow seem to gather that I—that I made a mistake
(I am not at all in the state of mind to state certain things
openly)—that our relationship still has some ground under its feet and
there is hope for the future. But are you yourself sure of this? Do you
really know quite well what is going on inside you? Isn’t it just a
momentary weakness? Dziodziuś!…

And if everything is all right, then don’t try to discuss anything with
me, especially not what was and how it was, not that any more, but write
when and how we are to make arrangements. There are many reasons to be
quick about this.

And now briefly to get down to business. Dziodziuchna, my precious one,
if I drove you out [_vytalkivala_] of any involvement in my affairs,
that was ONLY because I felt to blame inwardly for your present
situation, because I had gotten you so absorbed with the Polish work, I
said to myself that if I didn’t break away from that, I would always be
wasting your time and energy simply as a result of my own selfishness.
Also you should remember how often you said to me that for our personal
relationship to become normal, you would have to know that I could get
along without you! Therefore I did what I could to be my own adviser and
counselor, in order to set you free from me, and you call all of that
driving you out [_vytalkivanie_] … If you only knew how painful it is
for me here many times, that I don’t consult with anyone, that I don’t
rely on anyone, and cannot share my doubts with anyone. But I consoled
myself about all that with the thought that you should not be drawn into
it because otherwise it would wear you out. If you wanted to, how
wonderfully well we could live together and work together! There is
plenty of work here. I myself can’t even cope with one tenth of it on my
own.

Now, besides the Germans, I also have to deal with the Poles. I can tell
you about the party congress in person only; it’s impossible to write
about it.²¹⁴ The whole two days consisted solely of a struggle by the
entire party congress against me. I dominated the whole party congress
and in the end they came crawling of their own accord. The report for
_Vorwärts_ from the second day of the congress²¹⁵ was written by ME (at
the wish of the editors), and therefore I could not portray myself as I
have described; besides, we didn’t want to annoy or provoke the defeated
ones. But this was the result: victory all along the line; I even won
the most embittered opponents over to my side. Therefore great furor and
dismay [_smyatenie_] reigns in the camp of the PPS intelligentsia. They
already have to start twisting things around, evidence of which was the
article in _Gazeta Robotnicza_, which I am sending to you (send it back
IMMEDIATELY), and in the next issue my reply will appear.²¹⁶

My review of the book by Schüller will be in the _Neue Zeit_.²¹⁷ Two
honors have been accorded to me. (1) K. K. [Karl Kautsky] sent me the
French translation of his book against Bernstein.²¹⁸ In the book he
wrote the inscription: “To my dear friend Rosa Luxemburg— Karl Kautsky”
[_“Meiner lieben Freundin R … L … — K_ … _K …”]_. (2) He made the
suggestion that if I was in agreement, in the event that some
manuscripts were found in Marx’s papers [_im Nachlass von Marx_] besides
the fourth volume of _Capital_, that I should take over the editing of
those manuscripts, and naturally I agreed.²¹⁹ He is traveling to Paris
this very day to acquire the _Nachlass_ from Lafargue.²²⁰

I have not written much in the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_ because my time
was taken up by the trip to Poznań,²²¹ then my illness (I stayed in bed
for a week), and then the [PPS] party congress. I have now sent off
three articles and am finishing the fourth.²²² Thus my budget will work
out all right (together with the [earnings from] _Neue Zeit_).

Certainly during the time spent in Poznań things went splendidly: I
disrupted a Catholic gathering and spoke at three workers’ meetings:
shoemakers, tailors, and party workers. There I introduced a resolution
that you must have read in _Vorwärts_ from that time.²²³ We met with
success all around, the movement is developing splendidly, and Kasprzak
is among the most active there.

Mehring has not been writing in the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_. His place
has already been taken over by someone else.

I am meeting frequently with Trus[iewicz]. Things with him are very much
in order. He has broken with Mill. He believes in me and me alone, and I
am leading the whole movement even though I don’t belong to any
organization there. Likewise I am corresponding regularly and frequently
with Julek [Marchlewski] and Adolf [Warski]. Juleczek [a nickname for
Marchlewski] doesn’t take one step without me. He was here on his way
through to a family get-together in Torun. Lopek [Bein] and I meet on
Sundays and we go for a walk like two old pensioners. That is the only
company I have.

I seldom go to visit K. K., but he comes to visit me frequently. They
really bore me stiff nowadays. In general I am turned off by the whole
human race, and from you, you good-for-nothing rascal, I get a stab in
the heart. When will you stop hanging around there in Switzerland?!
Kisses on your kisser! Your [Rosa]

[P.S.] I have very painful news from home, but better not to talk about
it now.

TO LEO JOGICHES

[Friedenau, April 30, 1900] Monday

My precious Dziodziu!

Yesterday morning I received your express letter and this morning the
personal one and at noontime the second one. Dziodziuchna, even on
Saturday I wanted to write you a second letter immediately, without
waiting for your answer, but you will not believe how much work I
constantly have nowadays—because this Press Commission has been
“constituted,”²²⁴ and because I had to make a trip to see Janiszewski
about my articles, etc. And in all the excitement, in between those two
pieces of business, I wasn’t capable of writing to you, especially when
I didn’t yet have your answer. Now, I will always write when I feel like
doing it and when time allows.

First of all briefly about Polish matters. My dear piece of gold, since
you are at a distance and don’t see the turn of events that is taking
place here, you advise me to pursue a somewhat inappropriate tactic. To
write without specific details [_à la Marysia_], or in general to allow
myself to get into a sharp polemic over Polish independence, would mean
simply to fall into the trap which the _Przedświt_ people have laid for
me. What they are trying to do is create a division between me and the
local workers here, and therefore it follows that I should not let
things go that far. Morawski had my answer in his hands²²⁵ for the
longest time before your letter [with your advice] arrived. You could
have read it among the answers to the editors in the most recent issue.
They actually could not avoid putting it in that issue. Whether my
answer will satisfy you I don’t know. I think it was the most
appropriate tone for the situation here. —Thanks to the Press Commission
I will in fact be able to direct the _Gazeta_ and to smoke the
_Przedświt_ people out of there. Next Sunday we will have the second
session [of the Press Commission]—with Morawski—and the matter will be
decided immediately there. You are getting all worked up, and meanwhile
here it is a matter of not to let oneself be provoked [_nicht
prowozieren zu lassen_]. It’s a matter of pursuing a calm tactic, like
the one I began at the [PPS] Party Congress and to get myself firmly
seated where no one from _Przedświt_ can touch me.

I don’t want to write any more now about Polish matters. But I will add
that the tactic [suggested by Jogiches] of using the positions taken by
the Poznań and Upper Silesian organizations, as well as pressure from
the Germans, is exactly the opposite of what is necessary. What it’s all
about is that the people here find in me protection from the Germans and
not vice-versa. As far as Poznań and Upper Silesia go, it is certainly
true, as I have already written you, my dear piece of gold, several
times, one can accomplish nothing in this way. These people are stubborn
oxen, and either they do nothing or they do things in such a way that it
goes wrong. The people in Poznań did me a great disservice with their
idiotic proposal for dissolving the PPS. The only thing I can count on
is what I do myself. —

Now to private matters. You are right of course that for a long time
each of us has been leading a separate spiritual life, but by no means
did that begin in Berlin. We were already spiritually estranged for
years in Zurich, especially during the last two years of my stay in
Zurich [and], as is firmly imprinted on my memory, I felt terribly
alone. I was not at all the one who closed myself off from you, but
quite the opposite. You ask the question, Didn’t I ever ask myself what
life was like for YOU, how you felt inside? At that I can only smile
bitterly. Oh yes, I asked about that thousands of times, and I didn’t
just ask myself. I asked YOU, loudly and urgently, but what I always got
for an answer was that I didn’t understand you, that I didn’t take you
into account, that I had nothing to give you, etc. This got to the point
that I stopped asking, and I did not betray by any sign whether I was
noticing anything at all or whether I took an interest in anything. You
write: How could I think that someone else has a claim on you when,
after all, no one else could either please you or understand you. I have
always answered the question in the same way.

But have you forgotten that recently you have repeated to me a hundred
times that I too do not understand you, that you too feel completely
alone WITH ME! Then what’s the difference? At first when I began to
recall THAT, I began to believe that I no longer existed for you. [You
ask:] Didn’t I react differently in 1893 to those kinds of thoughts?
Bah! Haven’t I changed since that time? I was just a big kid then, but
today I have grown up and am a mature person, who has excellent
self-control, and who is ready, even if grinding my teeth in pain
inwardly, not to show even the slightest sign of this outwardly. Even
now you clearly do not want to believe that I have grown up and am no
longer the person I was eight years ago.

Now another thing. You keep asking: how could I have it in my thoughts
so calmly to leave our relationship? I will not speak about it here as
to whether this was done “calmly.” But how did I come to make that
decision at all? Now I will tell you the whole secret: it became
especially clear to me after my last stay in Zurich that in your eyes my
spiritual presence has completely disappeared, that for you I am simply
SUCH AND SUCH A PERSON who perhaps differs from others at the most by
the fact that she writes articles. When I go out, especially here, at
every step I see WHAT KIND OF WIVES other people live with and, God
knows, how highly they regard them, how they simply submit to their
wives’ authority, and then I remembered at every step how you treat me,
and it became clear to me that for you in regard to my spiritual being
every memory and every quantity has been lost. And the conviction that
this was true was for me the most vital—and painful—proof that inwardly
you have grown cold to me.

You ask whether I WANT TO lead a spiritual life in common with you
again, from now on? The answer is clear [i.e., yes], but don’t forget
that for this to come about depends on YOU. THE way we have lived in
recent years has not been a spiritual life IN COMMON. If you will
abandon the lack of confidence you have had until now about my ability
to understand you, the idea that allegedly I have no interest in your
inner life, etc., then an understanding between us is possible.

I would have much, much more to say to you, but I feel truly that I have
no more strength to write about all these things. As soon as you are
here, so that we can finally begin TO LIVE, we will be able to tell each
other everything. And perhaps then all kinds of talk will actually be
superfluous.

I am writing to Forrer these days. The matter is being dragged out
unbearably.²²⁶ Do you know that in thinking it over about how we should
arrange our lives I have come back again to the original proposal:
perhaps we should go down south for something like half a year? Because
here it’s impossible to openly live together, and without that it would
be a caricature that I fear more than loneliness. In fact we need PEACE
AND QUIET for living together, and how can we find it if we are hiding?
Think about it. What does one hear from Anna [Gordon]? I have not
written to her. You can imagine why. Hundreds of kisses. Your R.

TO LEO JOGICHES

[Friedenau, circa July 3, 1900]

Most precious Dziodziu! How I need you! We need each other! Truly no
other couple has such a mission in this life, as we do, mutually, for
each to make a HUMAN BEING out of the other. I feel this with every step
I take, and so I feel the pain of our separation more than ever. We both
constantly “live an inner life,” which means that we change, we grow,
and consequently an inner gap or yawning disparity keeps arising between
us, a lack of balance and harmony between the different parts of our
souls. One must constantly carry out anew an inner review, or inventory,
of oneself, in order to reestablish order and harmony. Thus one must
constantly deal with oneself in order not to lose sight, at any moment,
of the overall proportion of things, and in my opinion what this means
is the following: to accomplish what is useful in life, to bring
positive actions and CREATIVE ACTIVITY to the outside world. In short,
not to get lost in spiritual consumption and digestion. For this, some
monitoring by another human being who is close to oneself is necessary,
one who understands everything and who in addition to this exists as an
individual SELF who is also seeking harmony. I wonder whether some of
this is beyond your understanding because it’s similar to a series of
algebraic symbols.

Nevertheless that is the one-hundredth component in a chain of thoughts
and feelings that was aroused in me by a very painful experience
yesterday. The honorable editors of the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_ sent
back an article to me (the contents is of no importance: it was about
the war in China) with a polite addendum, which in effect puts an end to
my collaboration.

I knew ahead of time that this would happen sooner or later, ever since
the moment when we broke off personal relations and because I know
Sch[oenlank] very well. The last straw was undoubtedly the long break in
my work, although I explained that it was because of illness. But it was
already clear to me beforehand that relations with the editors under
these circumstances would not be of long duration. I would never have
succeeded in bringing up something that was such a clear expression of a
whole TENDENCY. Let’s take for example that article about
obstruction,²²⁷ which I sent to the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_ and which
was milder and more colorless by half than my original conception.
Nevertheless the final, completed action hurt me very much. You can
evaluate it for yourself, although you will of course interpret it even
more pessimistically. Aside from the political question, the material
problem arises for me of how and where to earn money?! But we will not
lose our heads or our cool self-possession. There are greater unhappy
occurrences in life and in political work. I kiss you hundreds of times.
Your R.

TO CEZARYNA WOJNAROWSKA²²⁸

[Friedenau, March 1901]²²⁹

Dear Cezarynka!

Put on your hat, go see Guesde, and tell him: My last article about
French socialism has now appeared in _Neue Zeit_.²³⁰ It [the article]
deals directly with party relations and is politically of the greatest
importance. For Kautsky, for me, and [for] others here it would be
highly desirable to induce Jaurès to join in the discussion, [because]
that would arouse great interest here in Germany. For this there is only
one recourse: that Guesde write a brief leading article in _Le Petit
Sou_ referring to this last article of mine in _Neue Zeit_. If Guesde
gives a summary of our article in _Le Socialiste_, Jaurès will not feel
obliged to respond, because he knows that _Le Socialiste_ is read mainly
by the circles around the Parti Ouvrier itself,²³¹ but on the contrary,
[if an article appears in] _Le Petit Sou_, a daily paper and a paper of
the boulevards, it is impossible to pass over it in silence. To a
leading article in _Le Petit Sou_ Jaurès must give some reply, and we
would immediately translate it here for _Neue Zeit_ (and thus give him a
rap on the knuckles). Do persuade Guesde without fail to publish
something in _Le Petit Sou_! This requires diplomacy, because he must
not feel offended about his beloved _Le Socialiste_, but you certainly
know how little it is read, and if the thing were in _Petit_ Sou, it
would reach a much wider audience. That’s why I am not writing to Guesde
myself, but ask you very urgently to manage this diplomatic task as
skillfully as possible.

Tell him also that I intend to suggest to Kautsky that we introduce a
regular column in _Neue Zeit_ for news from France, which would be
directed by me along the appropriate lines, so as to provide a correct
understanding to public opinion, which has been misguided by
Krichevsky.²³² But if we are to succeed in interesting German public
opinion in a discussion with Jaurès, Guesde must lend a hand in order to
get Kautsky to agree even more. How strongly Kautsky already leans in
favor of this discussion is shown by the fact that he has written a
letter to Jaurès proposing that he answer my articles directly in _Neue
Zeit_. But Jaurès of course prefers to remain silent as long as he is
not feeling pressure in France.

In addition, please give Guesde a thorough scolding over the fact that
they have not sent me the _Bulletin Mensuel de la Fédération des Élus_,
of which I received only a few issues in November; as for _Le
Socialiste_, I only get it irregularly—I haven’t received the latest
issues at all. Carry this out IMMEDIATELY, my dearest, and write me
about the results. Stay healthy for me, and give us a little kiss.

Your R.

[P.S.] I’m sending along the latest issue of _Neue Zeit_ for you.

TO CLARA ZETKIN²³³

[Friedenau,] March 5, 1901

My beloved Clarisse!

Today is my birthday, and I am celebrating it by writing you a letter.
How glad I am that I have finished my series about the crisis in
France.²³⁴

That was quite a lot of work, and I would not want to do it again. But
in the end I think it will be of some use. Next week I’m having a
conference here in Berlin on the same subject.

What do you say now about our friend Fendrich and his friend
Dreesbach!²³⁵ This is a new edition of the incident involving Vollmar in
1894!²³⁶ _O jerum, o quae mutatio rerum_²³⁷ At that time August [Bebel]
went after the Bavarians like a raging Roland and stirred up a real
mutiny in Berlin and elsewhere. Today the good August wraps himself in
the deepest silence. He’s like a sardine in a can, and my dear “Charles”
[Kautsky] tries to convince me that this incident is not at all as
important as I think.

At any case I don’t want to keep silent. I am only waiting for the
documents that I’m having sent to me from there [i.e., from Baden].

And Mehring sees only the difficulties that would be involved in
becoming members of the presidium of the state legislature!… However
that may be, we must take up this question at Lübeck,²³⁸ isn’t that so?
Once the debate is opened I hope that the matter will not go well for
the Baden people, since the congress will take place in the north. And
August himself will not be able to keep silent once we’ve begun the
discussion. It will be the way it was in Stuttgart.²³⁹ What’s your
opinion about that?

I have some news, but discretion [is called for]: I have found out that
in Breslau the opportunist clique of the _Volkswacht_ has adopted the
aim of getting rid of Sch[oenlank] from the parliament and of replacing
him with—Bernstein. As a pretext they are using that ugly and annoying
business about the printers in Leipzig²⁴⁰ against Bruno [Schoenlank],
who naturally can do nothing about it and doesn’t even know about it.

This has certainly got to be the purest form of opportunist
demonstration. At any rate I have warned August, so that he’ll pay
attention. The best means of making short work of the “possibilist”
intrigues, as they get their butterfly nets ready in Breslau, would be
to replace Bruhns, who is leaving, with a suitable editor such as
Ledebour, for example. If you would write to August along these lines,
to spur him on, to undertake something rather energetic in this
business, that would be very good. Think about it. Bernstein in Breslau
would be the first “possibilist” member of parliament in the NORTH,
which until now has remained relatively true to principle.

Another interesting bit of news. Recently the bourgeois publisher
Philips (producer of the late lamented _Neuland_ [New Land, a bourgeois
periodical published in Berlin in 1897–98], as you already know) visited
Wolfgang Heine (in order to talk with him about the case of Leuss).²⁴¹
Philips said to Heine: “Oh, these damned defenders of Leuss and this
whole radical gang. One must put an end to it all with these people;
we’re just waiting for Bebel and some of the other old timers to go away
in order to have a thorough housecleaning!”… Therefore, Claire, pack
your suitcases in expectation of this great cleansing of the Augean
stables!

And yet Bebel receives Heine as a good comrade and visits him in
return!… These interesting words have already been brought to his
attention, and we’ll see what the result will be—

Be well, and write soon!

Many heartfelt greetings, yours completely, Rosa

TO JULES GUESDE²⁴²

Berlin-Friedenau, April 17, 1901

Dear citizen and friend!

I have learned from our mutual friend Cezaryna Wojnarowska that you are
ready to give us some effective support by providing information and
helping to correct the mistaken conception German socialists have about
the truth in France, the “whole truth,” and especially the “truth on the
march.”²⁴³ Our friend Kautsky has therefore commissioned me to request
that you write an article for _Neue Zeit_, which I surely hope you will
be kind enough to do as soon as your various party tasks allow.

Please inform us in any case if you accept our invitation and when the
article might be delivered.²⁴⁴

Heartfelt and friendly best wishes!
Your Rosa Luxemburg

Berlin-Friedenau, 23 Wieland Street

Your little reply to my dear compatriots [of the PPS] was excellent.²⁴⁵

TO CEZARYNA WOJNAROWSKA²⁴⁶

Berlin-Friedenau, May 17, 1901

Dear Cezarynka!

I read your detailed letter from yesterday and am sending it to
Z[alewski]. For this reason I want to write you about a few things.
First, it seems to me that you have a mistaken opinion about my role in
your organization,²⁴⁷ since you evidently assume that I belong to
everything along with Z and you and concern myself with everything. This
wrong opinion is definitely encouraged in you by this good fellow, Z,
who does not want in any way to accept that I neither belong to your
organization nor do I participate in your work. I’m sure you will not
think badly of me for having made such a decision immediately at the
time of origin of this “Julianish” Social Democracy.²⁴⁸ You know and you
have seen what pleasantries await me from my own “comrades” the moment I
come together with them.²⁴⁹ Well now, I really do have enough other
work—German and German-Polish—on my back not to have to expose myself to
such “pleasantries.” Besides, I think it’s far better for our movement
if I am not identified with it openly in view of all the gossip and
chatter, which you are never in a position to root out, about my
ambition, despotism, and other sins. I can truly serve your movement by
not belonging to it; my relations among the Germans and also the French
make this even more advantageous, and furthermore I have never refused
to give advice to Z[alewski], and I give it to him as a person
experienced in foreign affairs, all the more so because, despite all his
respectability, he is ready at every turn to commit a huge number of
stupidities—solely out of enthusiasm for the cause, of course. But it is
very difficult to keep this fellow within bounds, and he tires me out
completely with his efforts to draw me into every little thing that he
undertakes together with you. It was for this purpose that the scoundrel
thought up that scheme of reviving the _Sprawa Robotnicza_
organization.²⁵⁰ And he didn’t want to let anyone knock this idea out of
his head. Fortunately you, as an intelligent person, in your last
letter, demonstrated to him all the disadvantages of such a _coup
d’état_ (which by the way I had already pointed out to him a hundred
times), and thanks to this letter of yours, perhaps it will come about
that he will finally be dissuaded from this disastrous idea, and the
peace and quiet that I deserve will be restored to my soul and mind.
Keep supporting me along these lines and write him once more that it is
a senseless proposal. From you, however, I expect a solemn promise that
neither in public conversation nor in letters will you at any time refer
to me as a member of your organization or participant in your work.
Naturally I don’t think in terms of openly announcing that I have
nothing in common with this or that movement, because that would only
give rise to a lot of false assumptions and speculations and could do
harm to the party. But we ourselves need [to be careful] not to
encourage the erroneous opinion that I supposedly belong in general to
the party or in particular to the “holy trinity.”²⁵¹ We should
especially not encourage this opinion among the Russians, Germans, and
French. It especially concerns me [_liegt mir daran_] that Plekhanov and
Zasulich won’t let go of this illusion, nor will the Wladkos [Wladyslaw
Olszewski] and the Juleks [Julian Marchlewski].

And now some pieces of my advice about the stupidities committed by
Z[alewski], although certainly done in good faith. It is precisely the
letter you wrote that gives me the opportunity to pass on some good
advice to you: In any dealings you may have, do not let yourself be
drawn into accepting a loan from the German [SPD] Executive: (1) Don’t
get caught up in a swindle involving Germans bearing “loans” and tell
them right off: “We know what’s involved with such loans,” and say
simply that you would like them [instead] to simply give you
such-and-such an amount. (2) From the beginning I have held to the
viewpoint that international begging is unworthy of a serious workers’
party and that a movement that does not have its own resources, but must
live by begging, is not standing on the necessary firm ground that it
should and is a house built on sand. That is also why I have already
told Z[alewski] several times that he absolutely must obtain resources
from the movement itself (inside our country and abroad), and if he
doesn’t have them, he should not “push for them,” because in the
political movement (as elsewhere) one must adjust expenditure to
income.²⁵² That the Russians and the Jews (of the “Bund”) systematically
beg from the International is no reason for us to follow in their
tracks. We should proceed in keeping with our own moral principles. I
very much hope that you agree with my opinion on this. And from this
instance you can also be convinced how useful it is for you to keep me
informed about Z’s projects, because when I shoot down something of his,
he always turns confidentially to you, since he has already “had a
scene” with me about it. You understand that I don’t want to sow
distrust between you and Z, I only want to warn you that he is terribly
zealous, even stubborn, but he lacks experience, especially in foreign
matters.

Now for the second piece of business. It is stupid on the part of this
good man Z not to have warned you sufficiently about the Jewish
“Bundists.” Well now, to put it briefly, this entire “Bund,” and
especially this “Alexander”²⁵³ and this “John”²⁵⁴ and all their
sidekicks—because of their political behavior in relation to our party
as well as their general methods of operation—what they deserve AT THE
LEAST is to have any upstanding, respectable person throw them down the
stairs the minute they open the door (and for this purpose it is best to
live on the fourth floor). For years I’ve known both “John” and
“Alexander” personally; they are individuals who are made up of two
elements: stupidity and cunning. They ARE INCAPABLE OF speaking two
words to ANYONE without having the concealed intention of robbing them
(in a moral sense). The entire policy of the “Bund” is based on this
system. By the way they have written briefly in _Neue Zeit_ that for
them the question of reestablishing an independent Poland is “not yet
decided,” and that at their coming party congress they will begin to
discuss the Polish question with their donkey heads.²⁵⁵ As you see, in
some respects relations between our party and these people are utterly
impossible. Especially impossible is that mutual assistance pact
proposed between you and them (to have articles about us in their
_Bulletin_ in exchange for us placing articles about them in the French
press). That’s because our movement needs to be advertised in their
_Bulletin_ the way a dog needs a fifth leg, but for them it’s very
important to be advertised in the French press. Thus our “little uncle”
[Zalewski] has traded an ax for a wooden stick. I advise you to give
these people a kick in the place they sit on and to break off all
relations with them, because they will get you entangled in a situation
that you will bitterly regret. As for the all-Russian-Polish federation
that Zal[ewski] advocates,²⁵⁶ I have already told him that would create
conditions equivalent to building a “castle on ice,” because such a
fragmentation of forces prevails in Russia that to bring them together
in one heap is just as impossible as it is in France today.²⁵⁷ This
fellow [Zalewski] really does have a weakness for fantastical projects
on a large scale instead of steadily developing party work in a calm and
quiet way. Keep healthy for me and write to me quickly. Finally I’ve
talked myself out.

I embrace you,

your R

TO KARL KAUTSKY

[Friedenau,] October 3, 1901

Dear Karl!

Naturally I will forgo publication of my declaration in the _Neue
Zeit_.²⁵⁸ Allow me now to add a few words of explanation.

If I were one of those who defend their own rights and interests
ruthlessly with no consideration for others—and in our party the number
of such people is legion, or rather: everyone in the party is like
that—I would naturally insist on publication, because you yourself
concede that as editor you have an obligation toward me in this case.
However, since at the same time that you acknowledge this obligation of
yours to me, you put a pistol to my chest, with the most friendly
warnings and pleadings that I should not make use of this obligation of
yours or this right of mine, and it makes me sick to the stomach to
employ my rights when someone will only provide those rights with great
groaning and gnashing of teeth, and at the same time with every word I
say in my defense that person falls on my arms and tries to tie me up,
stating that I should “defend myself” but trying in every way to talk me
out of it and move me toward renouncing my rights. You have accomplished
what you wanted—I release you in this case from your obligation toward
me. But in doing this you are to all appearances making a mistake,
claiming in all seriousness that you believe you have dealt with me in
this case only out of friendship and in MY interest. Permit me to
destroy this self-deception of yours. As a FRIEND you would have had to
say something approximately like the following: “I advise you
unconditionally and at all costs to protect your honor as a writer,
because greater writers and men with reputations solidly established for
decades, such as Marx and Engels, wrote entire booklets, waged entire
wars of the pen, when anyone dared to accuse them of the slightest
‘falsification.’ All the more should you in such a case seek to obtain
complete satisfaction, because you are a young writer with a lot of
enemies.” As a FRIEND that is certainly how you would have had to speak.

The friend, however, allowed the editor of _Neue Zeit_ to take over, and
since the party congress that editor has wanted only one thing: he wants
to have PEACE. He wants to show that the _Neue Zeit_ has become well
behaved after the drubbing it received²⁵⁹ and is now holding its tongue.
And therefore the proper rights of a contributor to _Neue Zeit_ to
defend her most important interest, her right to defend against public
slander, may be SACRIFICED. Thus it is that someone who works for the
_Neue Zeit_—not in the least important position and not the worst
contributor—will have to swallow a public accusation of FALSIFICATION,
because only in that way will peace reign “in all the treetops.”²⁶⁰

That is the way things stand my friend! And now I send you cordial
greetings, Your Rosa

[P.S.] I am up to my ears in work, and therefore I must write [rather
than speak in person], and have only been able to do so for the first
time at this moment.

TO ROBERT SEIDEL

[Friedenau, after January 3, 1903]

Dear friend!

Thank you for the kind lines you wrote me, as well as for the
pamphlet²⁶¹ and the history about Forrer, which I found most
interesting. This affair has made me do some thinking. I have no doubt
that in this case you acted nobly and courageously as a FRIEND, but on
the other hand I also understand that in the political struggle a
certain ruthlessness, such as was directed at you by your opponents in
this case, is to be expected. In this I see merely the conflict between
the personal-human point of view and the party-political one, which I
have often observed and from which I draw a conclusion that to you, my
friend, will perhaps sound disturbing. My conclusion goes like this: For
a political person and a fighter, friendship with leaders of opposing
parties is an extremely difficult thing, bound around with dangers and
rocky obstacles. On our side, the luxury of [such] a friendship can in
general be allowed only in a few cases, and even in those few cases it
can have a firm and reliable basis only in a commonality of world views
and—a position of struggle held in common. Don’t you feel that, too, in
the depths of your soul?…

As far as our Forrer is concerned in particular, I don’t know. I feel a
bit of mistrust about his character. He has a bit of a bad odor about
him. I’m afraid he belongs to those who are “capable of anything”.

I’d like to give your pamphlet on the tariff question to the _Vorwärts_
for review, because the _Neue Zeit_ does not review such things. Write
me if you or the publishers have already sent it to the _Vorwärts_, and
if not, I’ll take care of it. As for the book about arts and crafts
instruction,²⁶² I have now found a suitable person, or so I believe, to
review it, one who will also understand and appreciate it. I should be
speaking with him tomorrow, right away.

You are still a great optimist if you think that someone might bring out
the truth about Greulich in a party newspaper! Are you not familiar yet
with our officialdom? Here one may not even write the full truth about
OUR OWN affairs, and you want something from a foreign country to be
printed! Yes, if I had a newspaper in my hands completely, as was the
case for a long time with the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_, then certainly!
But for the time being I do not have that.

You don’t write much about Mathilde’s health. I want to hope that things
are going well for her.

Now I have one more request. I am enclosing a letter and a power of
attorney form. “My” Gustav [Lübeck] has to sign them (both), after which
you must send them off AT ONCE because we have a deadline on the 20th.
For this purpose, please be so kind as to get hold of Gustav
immediately. I cannot entrust these important papers to HIM. His address
is: Alte Beckenhofstr. 12^(III) c/o H. Baumann. I don’t have any Swiss
stamps here. Please ask Gustav to pay for them, and I will settle up
with him later.

Grossi and I send you our heartfelt greetings. Write again soon! I am so
delighted every time [I hear from you]! Your R. L.

N.B.: Gustav must also include in the letter to the attorney his
COMPLAINT, which he obtained from the court here!!

I will soon send you a photograph of me.

TO CLARA ZETKIN

[Friedenau, after January 23, 1903]

Dearest Klärchen!

I knew that as soon as you were home you would shake off your
disgruntled mood, and the lines you wrote me have gratifyingly confirmed
that. As for me, I still have a lot of work to do on the Polish article,
which has grown to the impressive size of a pamphlet and will appear as
such.

I have already been to _A Night’s Lodging_²⁶³ twice, and I’ll keep going
as often as my finances will to any extent allow. This play is a
powerful moral statement and a blow of the fist _en pleine visage_²⁶⁴ to
our “well-mannered and right-thinking” society. I observe with great
pleasure and malicious glee [_Schadenfreude_] how the dear
loge-occupying public feels its ears being boxed at every moment, yet
with doglike humility they have to let the ear-boxing go on.

When are you going to write me that BIG LETTER about the women’s
movement? In fact I beg you for even one little letter!

So much for now and kisses from the heart for you and best wishes for
the men. Your R.

TO FELIX DZIERŻYŃSKI²⁶⁵

Berlin-Friedenau [March 1903] 58 Cranach Street

Dear comrade!

I’ve been meaning to write you a letter for a very long time, but a huge
amount of work took up every free minute I had, so that I put it off day
after day.

I assume that you yourself have definitely arrived at the conviction
that those circumstances that you felt compelled to write me about in
Munich are slowly being resolved in a satisfactory way. At that time you
were disturbed about the lampoon of me in Prawda,²⁶⁶ and you wanted me,
with a popularly written pamphlet about socialism, to refute the
slanders that were intended to do damage to me and to our party. I am of
the opinion that we can much more surely achieve this purpose by the
continued publication of _Przegląd_²⁶⁷ [_Socjaldemokratyyczny_] with my
help, more surely than by the effect any column in _Prawda_ might have,
since it is aimed at the intellectuals and not at the workers. Last of
all, a publication like our _Przegląd_, which has the aim of
enlightening the minds of the Polish intelligentsia, will have a much
more lasting effect than a one-time popular-style pamphlet for the
proletariat. Besides, it seems to me you are overestimating by far the
significance of this attack by _Prawda_. For me personally, slanders in
a bourgeois newspaper under the auspices of the Russian censorship are
worth nothing more than to be smiled at pityingly, and this is also true
above all because my position in the German and international movement
protects me completely, surely you understand this. And since this also
has to do with our PARTY, one must have a low evaluation indeed of those
socialist intellectuals who might be influenced by the attacks of a
BOURGEOIS newspaper!… From a certain point of view the attacks by
_Prawda_ (including the most recent, which I have just found out
about)—these attacks on our party are highly instructive, especially if
the sources from which they come are fully exposed. These are simply the
impotent convulsions of social patriotism, which has recently received a
good solid thumping in Germany and everywhere abroad. It is these
people, spraying saliva and poison, who because they are not able to
accomplish anything abroad among socialists have crawled under the wing
of bourgeois publications and the tsarist censorship. The fact is—and
this very fresh piece of news I can report to you—the career of the
social patriots in Germany has gone all wrong for them. THE AGREEMENT OF
THE GERMAN PARTY WITH THE PPS HAS BEEN SMASHED TO PIECES and all
relations have been broken off.²⁶⁸ But we are not going to make anything
public about this until after the elections,²⁶⁹ so as not to give the
bourgeois newspapers any material to gabble about. This fact will become
official at the German Party Congress after the elections,²⁷⁰ so be
careful not to inadvertently say anything PUBLICLY about this fact. With
this, the PPS is completely OUT OF Social Democracy, and the German
party has renounced its solidarity with the PPS. The significance of
this fact for the fate of social patriotism in general you can judge for
yourself. _Gazeta Ludowa_ remains our organ. The letter of the SPD
Executive on the program of the PPS, which was published in our
_Przegląd_, has surely made you happy, as it should.²⁷¹

As for the movement in our country, I am beginning to nourish great
hopes. The _Przegląd_ [_Socjaldemokratyyczny_] and the [_Czerwony_]
_Sztandar_ certainly need improvement, but Kraków was not built in a
day, and I hope that from one issue to the next these publications will
get better. The main thing is that the work must continue uninterrupted,
that the tasks that arise from time to time must be carried out with
CORRECT AND REGULAR RHYTHM in order to gather the workers around us and
organize them. Despite the enormous amount of work in Germany and in
Poznań, I am helping Adolf [Warski] with the _Przegląd_ as well as I
can; you should also help him further with the _Czerwony Sztandar_,
because he really has a huge amount of work and we have at our disposal
too few forces to do the writing.

I would be happy to hear something from you about how things are in
Kraków. What’s going on with the social patriots in Galicia? I think
there’s merely a lot of chatter about Daszyński and his cohorts, but I
would like to know whether the _Przedświt_ group, which surely has its
full complement in Kraków, has any local ties and influence.²⁷² Apropos
of that, I have a request for you. Just imagine, I’m not able to get
hold of _Przedświt_ anywhere around here, and you will understand that
if one writes about them and constantly has to deal with them, one at
least has to know WHAT they are thinking and writing. Subscribing to
_Przedświt_ is not permitted in Germany, so please do me the favor of
sending me all the issues from January on, in a plain envelope. If you
agree to do that, please write me how much I owe you. At the same time I
ask you to buy a complete set of _Przedświt_ for the second half of 1902
and send it to me as “printed matter,” because I have not received the
publication since then [i.e., since June 1902]. N.B.: An ordinary letter
from Austria to Germany costs ten cents but a double-sized letter (up to
250 grams) is—twenty cents (probably 10 heller [an Austrian bronze
coin]).

I must confess that our dealings with the Russians are of no minor
significance, because there too the social patriots must be separated
from the united Social Democracy.²⁷³ I also hope that the news about an
end to the agreement between the SPD and PPS in Germany will not fail to
influence the Russians (and the news will quite definitely reach them
through private channels). Probably you noticed the lead article in
_Iskra_, no. 34, which has already taken our position on the Polish
question.

I would like to request one more favor of you. Cezaryna [Wojnarowska]
has complained to me several times that she remains without news from
our people. As you know, I take no part in the practical planning, so
that I cannot keep her informed. Adolf [Warski] has a huge amount of
work, as it is. So do write to the noble soul [i.e., Cezaryna] from time
to time about what’s going on in our country, [because] after all you
certainly know how very devoted she is to our cause.

If you meet with the comrades who put out the _Proletariat_,²⁷⁴ do ask
them please to send me each and every issue. Up until now I’ve received
only one issue, the one with the criticism of my article. Or have no
further issues appeared?

I hope for and wish for an honest report that things are going better
with your health. You will probably be fortified by the fact that our
work is now going along more successfully, that we’re slowly winning
over the intelligentsia, creating a body of literature, etc. I must
confess that things here have never been so favorable for our movement
abroad. I have no doubt about the workers in our country and the ease
with which we can reach them, what we always lacked was people,
resources, and literature; now, in this respect also, we are slowly
getting there. The only thing is, our people ought not to let their
energy and enthusiasm flag, but must persevere in the future as well!

From this point of view I have great hopes that you will give them a
jolt, because of course not everyone has an equally well-developed
temperament.

Do you by chance know a certain Salome Perlmutter? A Russian woman
comrade praised her highly to me as an internationally oriented
socialist.

Keep healthy! I warmly clasp your hand —

R. Luxemburg

TO LUISE AND KARL KAUTSKY

Chemnitz [June 6, 1903] Hotel Carola

My dears!

I have chosen Chemnitz as a _pied-à-terre_ and every day I go out from
here to [speak at] the public meetings.²⁷⁵ In Hohenstein the meeting
hall was filled to capacity. An opponent spoke up [from the audience],
luckily for me. It was great fun. After the meeting an older worker gave
me a gift—one mark! In Lichtenstein yesterday I spoke at an outdoor
meeting of two thousand people, in a garden with brightly colored
lanterns. It was very romantic. Here in Chemnitz I have seen Mäxchen
[“Little Max,” or “Maxie,” a nickname for Max Schippel], and I even
attended a session of the election campaign committee. Mäxchen would
prefer to have no public meetings, no leaflets, no debates with
opponents. He said he was afraid opponents would rub his nose in the
fact that Bebel had called him a Lumpen. That was of course a dig at me.
—I have word from Warsz[awski] that he is utterly delighted by your
article, Carolus [jocular name for Karl Kautsky].²⁷⁶ He says that you
have stated exactly what is necessary for the “_Parkhes_” to hear.²⁷⁷
Therefore, for my part, I also thank you!

Heartfelt greetings to you all. Rosa

TO LEO JOGICHES

Glauchau, June 9 [1903]

My precious!

I received your letter and the printed materials here today. You wrongly
reproach me for not writing every day. From the enclosed postcard you
can see that I did write you from Glauchau right after the meeting, but
not one more instant remained before the train left (I had to take the
last train to Chemnitz at 12:30 am), and so I left it to an SPD trustee
[_Vertrauensmann_] to write the address, and you see how wisely the fool
dealt with that.

Yesterday in Meerane I also did not succeed in writing you after the
meeting, because a droshky was waiting right in front of the meeting
hall to take me to the railroad station, so that I could return here to
Glauchau for the night. After the meeting Knauf immediately wrote a card
to Auer [saying]: _The meeting with Frau Doktor Luxemburg has just
ended. Her visit was magnificent, and enthusiasm is running high_.²⁷⁸
Yesterday Knauf handed me a package of newspapers and your letter with
Gog[owski]’s letter inside. From the card you will see that everything
has been settled with Lerda’s manuscript. I had a lot of running around
and upset on account of it, because at first they didn’t want to
recognize the certificate of citizenship [_Heimatschein_]²⁷⁹ as
sufficiently legitimate. —

Now I’m going to remain here in Glauchau until the end and will travel
out from here to all the other places. As for the meeting in Mülsen,
which was—don’t have any concern about that, it was not my fault, the
Herr Assessor (some official) found it uncomfortable to sit out in the
open under the pouring rain and therefore he bestirred himself to have
the meeting “cut short.” Incidentally, you do not need to give me
warnings, because you see that I’m not having difficulties anywhere.

I already have five meetings behind me and seven still to go. I don’t
know if I wrote this to you, but Gerisch “by a ruling of the party
Executive” forbade me to travel to Spandau on the 12th, and I was not
greatly upset about that. To make up for it the scoundrels gave me a
different meeting for the 12th, so that I haven’t had a single day for
rest and recuperation. Everything’s in order with my neck, but on the
whole I have very little strength. The time is going by terribly slowly
because every day has to be taken by storm with a public meeting.

I have settled everything with Gogowski, Schulz, and Winter. In general,
I settle everything that you write to me about right away.

You definitely have the right to be afraid about the current number of
_Gazeta Ludowa_—that I will do it poorly; if only your fears could be of
some help to me! Today I’m going to Oberlungwitz and tomorrow to
Gersdorf, and then I’ll be finished with Auer’s electoral district. I
assume that he will have me to thank for a significant increase in votes
(in the year 1898 there was a LOSS of a thousand, seven hundred
votes).²⁸⁰ Now two more meetings for Hofmann and three for Gerisch. Oh
dear Jesus!…

Stay healthy and from now on write to me at Glauchau. Your R.

[P.S.] From Chemnitz they are forwarding everything to me (in case you
wrote to the Hotel Carola there); I left the forwarding address there.

Address me directly here at: HOTEL STADT DRESDEN, TO MY ATTENTION.

TO LEO JOGICHES

Plauen i V., June 13, 1903, 8 in the evening

My precious!

This was the first time, at this moment, that it was possible for me to
write you a few words. As for yesterday’s meeting in Markneukirchen (my
speaking tour schedule was changed somewhat)—it was SPLENDID, but it
stretched out so long that I had to go right to bed. I had to be up at 8
this morning to travel here to Plauen, and here I was met at the
railroad station with great honors by Gerisch himself,²⁸¹ along with a
_Vertrauensmann_ and two women, and until this moment they haven’t left
me alone. In half an hour I’m going to speak here at a meeting.
G[erisch] is speaking somewhere else in the region, but will come back
here after the meeting. I’m feeling very well. In two days I’ll be back!

Hugs. Your R.

[P.S.] Tomorrow I speak in Adorf, day after tomorrow—the last time—in
Oelnitz. The money did not reach me—I had to borrow [_pumpen_] 30 marks
here; if you can, send it here to Plauen, to the address of Langenstein.

TO ADOLF WARSKI AND JAKUB HANECKI²⁸²[telegram]

[no later than August 6, 1903]

Make no concessions on Article 7.²⁸³ Avoid any open defeat. In such a
case you must move toward a split, solely on organizational grounds.

TO ADOLF WARSKI AND JAKUB HANECKI²⁸⁴[telegram]

[probably August 6,] 1903

_The following resolution would be satisfactory_:

The Party Congress, which considers the struggle against the national
oppression of the Poles to be imperative, as is the struggle against any
form of oppression, and which considers it possible for the autonomy of
Poland to be guaranteed in Article 7, within the framework of its
overall political program, at the same time calls attention to the fact
that the struggle for a restoration of a Polish [capitalist] class state
represents the negation of any successful struggle against the [tsarist]
autocracy, and that the inclusion of this demand in the program and
agitation [of the RSDRP] can only keep the Polish working class farther
away from the realization of its goals—its most immediate ones as well
as its ultimate goal.

TO JULIUS BRUHNS

[Friedenau, October 15, 1903]

Dear friend!

At last, detailed news about you has been received. It makes me very
happy to hear from your letter that you came through your time in the
cooler so well²⁸⁵ and that you are setting out with renewed vigor to
“clear the forest”!²⁸⁶ I am convinced that after a little while even
this tough and challenging work will give you inner satisfaction. Just
don’t forget also to keep our party press informed about conditions in
Upper Silesia, as [August] Winter did so industriously in the beginning,
but unfortunately in recent years he has neglected this completely. And
if you have a nice, comprehensive article you don’t necessarily need to
send it to the [_Sozialistische_] _Monatshefte_, toward which your
opportunist heart perhaps would incline. The _Neue Zeit_, to the extent
that I know Kautsky, will happily accept all instructive articles,
including ones about purely practical problems of agitation.
Incidentally, our esteemed newspaper _Vorwärts_ more than anything lacks
regular reporting from Upper Silesia, and you must, in my opinion,
undertake this IMMEDIATELY.

I would be very happy to travel to Upper Silesia in the near future to
visit you and have some conversations once more with our comrades, my
old acquaintances. Perhaps I will come at the same time as one of the
party elders. Just now we were in Poznań. Order has been restored there
and the discord that our dear brothers from the PPS brought into our
ranks has been straightened out. Gogowski will be the party secretary
and has been released from his duties with the trade unions, bakery
workers, etc., and he is also under the supervision of the comrades
there. A most urgent task that lies before us is the expansion of the
Polish party press.²⁸⁷

With regard to this, dear friend, you must ENERGETICALLY organize
matters in Upper Silesia and get things moving. We are only covering, at
the most, half of what’s going on in Upper Silesia, and in the view of
the SPD Executive, the paper should by no means be just a local Poznań
sheet [i.e., serving Lower Silesia], but above all should also serve to
enlighten (in the sense that we mean it) the Polish workers of UPPER
SILESIA. Here too Winter made a good beginning at one time, but toward
the end, with the general undermining of his health, he also let this
slide. The coal miners of Upper Silesia are good hard-working folks, but
they must be constantly watched over and monitored so that everything
goes smoothly and regularly.²⁸⁸ You will be able to do this splendidly
with your calm and quiet tenacity. Comrade Pfannkuch was getting ready
to write to you about this himself. For my part, I ask you to do
everything possible. In Upper Silesia in a short time we can easily gain
several hundred subscribers, and in Poznań also the circulation of the
paper has been placed on a firm foundation. All you need to do is beat
the drum, summon the coal miners together, and organize sales [of the
paper]. The names of the appropriate people will be given to you by
Comrade Scholtysek, who seems to me the calmest and most levelheaded of
them all. Given the absence of meeting halls, the press is just about
the only means for us to have an educational influence on the masses;
therefore, the Polish paper can be a big help to you in your tasks,
particularly if from time to time you keep me informed of the most
important things, so that we can also report in the newspaper about
party life in Upper Silesia.

You write from Katowice, but I think you’ll establish your residence in
Bytom, is that right? To your wife Selma I want to send respects from
Winter’s wife to be forwarded to the women she knows there, in the event
that your wife wants to continue the work [Mrs. Winter was doing] there,
as I assume she will. Winter and his wife recently visited me; he is
going to a sanatorium in Silesia, but for now they are staying here in
Berlin with her parents. I must say that the impression he gives is
quite normal and he looks quite well. The poor fellow! Watch out that
this doesn’t happen to you, that PPS worm doesn’t play havoc with your
nerves; I am counting on your good humor and your superior qualities of
firmness, which Winter did not possess.

Dear friend, don’t place too much hope that “the rains will come” for
revisionism! I think rather that thunder and lightning will come for the
likes of you, or much more likely—I don’t want to put you in bad
company, with Braun, Heine, et al. May God not permit THAT! Your Breslau
“expert,” Ede [Bernstein], at any rate presents quite a wretched picture
nowadays! —I have no end of praise for the role that you play. But
enough for now. Please write soon!

Heartfelt greetings to you and Selma. Your Rosa Lu.

TO ALEKSANDR N. POTRESOV²⁸⁹

[Friedenau,] July 3, 1904

Worthy comrade!

Forgive me for making you wait until now for the article, but in the
interim I’ve had so many other things to do and annoyances
[_Scherereien_] to deal with (there has been a constant arrival of
foreign comrades in Berlin just now), so that I absolutely could not get
down to work earlier. It goes without saying that I wrote the article in
German because, after all, I don’t have such a sound knowledge of
Russian. Kautsky feels it would be very useful to have this article
published in _Neue Zeit_, though there would be a note along with it,
saying that the article was written for _Iskra_ and at its request and
that it was taken, so to speak, from _Iskra_. I don’t think you and your
comrades would have any objection to that.²⁹⁰

To make the translation easier for you, we will immediately give the
article to Dietz for typesetting with the request that they send on the
galleys to you as quickly as possible.²⁹¹

Of course galleys are better for reading purposes than the manuscript
would be (especially because I never, ever copy articles over, but send
them off [marked up] with the changes). You will probably manage to
publish it before _Neue Zeit_ does, because it [the journal] probably
won’t come out for approximately another two weeks. I don’t know to what
extent my article will be of use to you, but at any rate I have made the
effort to set forth _my humble opinion_ [_meine unmassgebliche
Meinung_].²⁹² The article has become fairly long—about 14 pages in _Neue
Zeit_. Incidentally, I request that you add a note, if you consider it
appropriate, explaining that I wrote it for you in German, because I
would not like people to attribute to me undeservedly such a knowledge
of Russian as the translation in _Iskra_ would suggest.

Please pass on my heartfelt best wishes to Vera Ivanovna [Zasulich] as
well as to Comrade Gurvich [Fyodor Dan]. I firmly clasp your hand,

Your R. L.

TO LUISE KAUTSKY

[Hessenwinkel (in the March of Brandenburg), end of July 1904]

Carissima Luigina!²⁹³

Above all we want to congratulate ourselves about Königsberg.²⁹⁴ It is
truly an occasion for joyous celebration and a feast of victory, at
least that’s how I perceive it here, and hopefully you do too there [in
St. Gilgen, Austria] in spite of the heat and the beauty of nature. Good
heavens, such a judgment of blood against Russia and Prussia is lovelier
by far than all the high-peaked mountains and smiling valleys!

Here, by the way, I am enjoying only the latter, more modest aspect of
the beauties of nature—but to make up for it, [I have valleys] in
unlimited quantity as much as one might want [_à discretion_]. “The
Great Sandbox of the blessed Holy Roman Empire of the German Nation,” as
the good old March of Brandenburg used to be called—being here has led
me to a deeply philosophical question. How come when there is a
MOUNTAIN, a valley also invariably lies hidden, so that one can enjoy
both, but when there is only VALLEY, as for example here in
Hessenwinkel, there is exactly that—ONLY valley, and that’s all. Can you
solve this geological puzzle for me? (But please, don’t make any
malicious play on the ingeniousness of the question by calling it a
“PSYCHOLOGICAL” rather than a geological puzzle!) Seriously, by the way,
it is wonderful here: woods going on for hours and lakes everywhere you
can spit (pardon me, it wasn’t meant that way) and idyllic PEACE AND
QUIET. The merits of these surroundings have only gradually penetrated
to reach my soul. At the beginning, I was still so mentally tense that
between my senses and the blossoming “object” an invisible tissue paper
barrier was hanging suspended from heaven to earth, and the beauties
that hovered before my eyes and ears were not PERCEIVED and taken in by
me but simply NOTED as though with the cool indifference of a Baedeker.
Every day I go for an expedition lasting for hours (I get up at 6 am;
Karl, don’t fall off the chair), and while doing this I enjoy the
company of a four-footed creature, sheared like a lion, whose name is
“Rascal” [“_Lump_”]; good spirits find one another [_les beaux esprits
se rencontrent_]. He greets me every morning with yelps of pleasure when
it’s time for “us” to go for a walk. Everyone observes and is amazed
that his intelligence is visibly increasing since his intellectual
exchanges with me have begun, and in the process I am making use
frequently, as a means of enlightenment—of the lead articles in
_Vorwärts_, just as I have done with my most blessed cat Mimi. Think of
me here, in general, as being in a kind of Paradise like Adam before he
was driven out “with family.”²⁹⁵ At every turn I encounter all sorts of
animals that I have only seen before at the zoo behind bars. Not to
mention rabbits, my path is crossed every day by the following: deer
[_Rehe_]—and not the one that married Liebknecht²⁹⁶ —SQUIRRELS, and so
on. I am expecting next to see a few leopards, rhinos, and bison.

Apropos of that, I recently encountered—during a harmless walk—while I
was absorbed with the blue mysteries of the heavens and the green ones
of the woods—wandering miles away from any shadow of class
consciousness—encountered a genuine comrade, a living and breathing one
from Berlin. Unfortunately, he was also an even closer comrade in the
sense of the faith of our forefathers, and of course he was so happy
about the encounter that he regaled me with a mass of class-conscious
bits of news and promised without fail to visit me in the near future
with several more comrades. (In such cases our forefathers’ custom would
have been to utter a brief _mazel_ tov.²⁹⁷) But in the end he somewhat
made up for the pleasures he had enjoyed, and had in prospect for the
future, by telling me the latest joke from Berlin. In Berlin the
newspaper _Montagsblatt_ has been renamed and since the beginning of
summer vacation is being called _Öde am Montag_.²⁹⁸ Nice joke, no?

Now, as compensation for delivering that fine joke, give me a kiss, and
for the time being I must say adieu. “Lump” is calling, and I the female
“Rascal” [_Lumpin_] am always willing—to go for a walk.

Apropos of that, Luigina, how are things with our trip together?²⁹⁹ The
Bureau is “sitting” before the congress on the morning of the 13th. I
must be there on the 12th, leaving Berlin on the 11th. Can you do that?
Another kiss.

Pardon me, another thing: Klara [i.e., Clara Zetkin] has just written to
me that the case against her in Breslau has been dropped!³⁰⁰ This is the
first fruit of the Königsberg victory! But for Klara it goes very much
against the grain. She was looking forward with such pleasure to being
on trial together with comrades Schiller and Fichte! Their shades must
surely be in a foul mood up in heaven because the chance to be in this
“divine comedy” has gotten away from them.

And now, in all seriousness, a kiss. Your R.

Karl can have one too, if he wants. And the boys.

TO ALEKSANDR N. POTRESOV³⁰¹

August 7, 1904³⁰²

Worthy comrade!

Today I received an invitation from your party’s Council,³⁰³ in which
the Polish Social Democracy is asked to take part in a conference with
the Bund³⁰⁴ and other organizations for the promotion of an EVENTUAL
general party congress of all active revolutionaries in Russia. I am
answering officially to the extent that I can from my own standpoint,
because I do not belong to the Foreign Committee of the SDKPiL. At the
same time, however, I would like to have a private exchange with you,
worthy comrade, about some thoughts that have occurred to me in
connection with this invitation.

Allow me to be quite candid with you: Your party’s statement in the
present instance surprised and puzzled me to some extent. In my opinion,
it is plainly evident [_liegt klar auf der Hand_] that all the attempts
by the PPS, the Bund, and the like to convene party conferences and
congresses, which are supposed to appeal for some sort of “action”
against the autocracy, are simply the expression of the FEDERATIVE
policies which those organizations would like to raise to the level of a
principle in relations among socialist groups. It is not only that such
a tactic does not represent any kind of step forward on the road to the
UNIFICATION of Social Democrats in Russia; it actually means the
opposite, the CANONIZATION of the federative principle, which we reject.
For the Bund, the PPS _P_[_roletariat_], etc., congresses of this kind
have only one purpose, to demonstrate to themselves that one can get
along wonderfully well without unity of organization and program, and
also that one can organize joint actions on an ad hoc basis on important
occasions, and without any [specific] agreements. This mode of operation
of the federalist nationalists goes together very logically with their
eclectic views on the tasks [of Social Democracy] in general and on the
methods of struggle against the autocracy, but these [views] do not go
together very well, in my opinion, with the comprehensive political
world outlook of Social Democracy.

And you see that no “actions” have come out of all these conferences and
congresses, because it is also not possible for highly disparate
organizations that are divided among themselves to artificially call
forth some joint action.

But from this, in my opinion, the prestige of RUSSIAN Social Democracy
will no doubt suffer serious injury. Called upon to be the party of the
Russian proletariat, it will turn out to be just one among many groups
and grouplets, and instead of drawing others TOGETHER around itself, it
will officially be putting up with fragmentation—for the sake of the
phantom of some joint action in which, under the given circumstances,
the only result will be some joint proclamations with a dozen signatures
on them. I’m afraid that in this case it could happen that for _Iskra_
the triumph of a broad and charitable attitude toward theoretical views
would turn into rather too much of a soft and yielding policy in
practice. I have already detected such a tone in _Iskra_, e.g., in
relation to the Bund. What was so valuable about _Iskra_ before the
party congress [of 1903] was precisely its unyielding attitude IN
PRACTICE and its intransigence toward all non-Marxist and non-Social
Democratic _counsels of confusion_, that unshakable straightforwardness
and directness with which the consciousness of its own strength and
significance was expressed in Russian Social Democracy. It was exactly
this strict unyieldingness in practice that caught the attention of
everyone, [including] the Guesdistes and German Social Democracy, and
during the year or two before the party congress [of 1903] it led to an
unparalleled level of prestige for your party. But now, unfortunately,
this tone seems to be growing softer and softer. I understand entirely
and completely that the internal discord in your ranks has undermined
the stability of your party, [affecting it] externally as well, but I
think that may only be a passing evil. It would be regrettable if
firmness and unyieldingness IN PRACTICE necessarily had to be combined
with a Lenin-style narrow-mindedness of theoretical views, rather than
being combined with broadness and flexibility of thought.

Pardon me for writing so candidly, but you know how dear to my heart
your cause is, and besides, I am not generally accustomed to mincing my
words. Incidentally, if I should take part in the conference planned by
your Council, I will speak out most emphatically against this kind of
development [_Vorgehen_]. The Social Democracy of Russia could, in reply
to the Bund, simply disregard its invitation, and do so calmly, together
with all its co-thinkers. Any party congress of these groups without the
Russian party would be merely a laughable curiosity, and one could let
them go their own way _confidently_ [_getrost_], even if there would
also be quite an indignant uproar [_Gequake_]. My Polish comrades wanted
to simply decline the invitation they received from the “Bund,” but now,
in view of your party’s tactic, one must of course take part, at least
in the planned conference, in order to present and defend our negative
attitude toward making alliances with any Tom, Dick, and Harry [_mit
Krethi und Plethi_].

I hope to see you in Amsterdam.

A firm clasp of the hand to you,

Your R. Luxemburg

[P.S.] Many thanks for accepting my notice.³⁰⁵

TO KARL [AND LUISE] KAUTSKY

[Zwickau, September 9, 1904³⁰⁶]

Dear Karolus!

Thank you for your news.³⁰⁷ I too had not expected much from the Press
Commission. For the time being I will abstain from trying to get the
article published, because I see very well that a press polemic doesn’t
lend itself to being waged from prison. I must urgently request that you
do one thing: Write a few words to Plekhanov (his address, if needed, is
at my place) to explain to him the fate of the article, because he is
waiting for it to be published. Will you do that? Thanks in advance!
Reassure him that later, when I am out of here, we will find an
opportunity to reopen the question and to say the right thing in our
press. (Tell him also that the SPD Executive is ON OUR SIDE.)

And so now you have other battles to fight. That makes me very happy,
because it shows that those little people feel hard hit by our victory
in Amsterdam.³⁰⁸ As I assess the situation, their wish will be to take
revenge at Bremen.³⁰⁹ Plenty of salt should be poured to spoil that for
them! Therefore it troubles me that you say you envy my being in a cell!
I have no doubt that you will give Kurt [Eisner], Georg [Gradnauer], and
Co. a good knocking on their so-called heads, but you must do it with
joy and relish, not as a burdensome interruption, because the public
always senses the mood of the combatants, and if you take pleasure in
the fight, it lends a brighter tone to the polemic and gives you a moral
advantage. You are definitely all alone now, as I can see; August
[Bebel] will certainly keep laboring in the vineyard of the Lord right
up to the end, and as you put it, Arthur-Leben and Paulie-Leben are
“elegiac.”³¹⁰ If they can be “elegiac” after such a congress [the
International Socialist Congress], may thunder and lightning drive them
seven fathoms deep into the ground—between two battles, one should be
full of the joy of life! Karl, the “scuffle” or “brawl” that is going on
now is not a skirmish that we are forced to fight in a drab atmosphere
in which no one is interested, of the kind that you have had to fight so
many times in the last few years, the interest of the masses has now
been revived, I feel it here through the walls [of the prison], and
don’t forget that the INTERNATIONAL is also watching us tensely, or I
should say is watching you tensely, because the point of departure for
the polemic was indeed Amsterdam. I’m writing all this to you not in
order to “whip you up,” I am not so lacking in taste, but to make you
feel joyful about your polemic, or at least to transmit MY joy, since I
can’t get anything much started with that commodity [my joy] here in
cell No. 7.

You know, I have given a lot of thought to Amsterdam. And to the general
situation of the international movement and the prospects for [our
understanding of] Marxism in the International. I have so much to talk
with you about, but it will have to wait. For me the moral of this story
is: that we have an incredible amount TO DO and above all an incredible
amount TO STUDY, by which I mean the movement in the various countries.
I have the feeling that we (the “Germans”) by merely GETTING TO KNOW the
actual movement in the other countries will gain an advantage and win
influence, and on the other hand I have the feeling that simply by
coming closer together with the International our position (in the
narrow sense, ours) will grow stronger and stronger inside the GERMAN
movement. In a word, I am enjoying life immensely. Send me your articles
enclosed with letters, but send them AS CLIPPINGS. I am sure that KLARA
[i.e., Clara Zetkin] is not “elegiac,” but will be found to be in
agreement with you and me. The two of you should have fiery days in
Bremen. Come to an understanding with her in good time, she can be
relied on. I would so much like to have a letter from HER. Apropos of
the “fourth volume”³¹¹ when it actually appears I would particularly
like to review it, because I have a number of ideas about this material
in my head.

Now to you, dearest Luise, or rather only to you at this point, because
the entire letter is of course for you as well, you understand my mood
often better and more quickly (when there’s something to be
“understood”). I so much wanted to write you and now I have to cut it so
short! Let me just say this much, that your letters put me in the
sunniest frame of mind; thank you a thousand times for every word. You
give me such a lively picture of your surroundings! Send my most
heartfelt greetings to Holland. Write me often, but only when you have
the DESIRE, don’t force yourself. I kiss you all, and the boys as well.
Greetings to Granny. Your Rosa

[P.S.] Luise, write to Troelstra that at the first opportunity I will
make a trip to visit Mrs. Sjoukje when we go there [to Amsterdam]. You
can send photographs here without any worry. Write me a few words from
Bremen about how things go there.

TO LUISE KAUTSKY

[Zwickau, September 1904]

Dearest!

Many thanks for the photo of Karl with the lovely dedication! The
picture is marvelous, the first really good picture of him that I’ve
seen. The eyes, the expression on the face—it’s all superb. (Only the
necktie, teeming with little white bean shapes, which really catch the
eye!—Such a tie is grounds for divorce. Yes, yes, I know—women—even in
the presence of the loftiest spirit, the first thing they notice is the
necktie …) [But seriously] The picture gives me great joy! Yesterday the
letter from Grandma [Minna Kautsky] arrived. She writes endearingly, to
try to cheer me up, but she isn’t good at concealing her own depression.
Give her my heartfelt greetings. Hopefully things are going well for her
again. Here at least the loveliest weather is prevailing. —It seems,
however, that as soon as I’m away, the world goes to pieces. Is it true,
what I read in the [_Berliner_] _Tageblatt_, that Franziskus [Franz
Mehring] has resigned?³¹² But that would be a debacle—a triumph for the
whole Fifth Estate!³¹³ Couldn’t he be restrained from taking this step?
It really shook me, and it’s got me down. And meanwhile, you write me
nothing further about it, you awful thing! —

Now it is evening, and a soft breeze is blowing from above through my
dormer window into the cell causing my green lampshade to stir slightly,
and gently blowing the pages of the Schiller volume that lies open
before me. Outdoors a horse is being led slowly past the prison on its
way home and in the nocturnal stillness the clopping of its hoofs on the
pavement resounds in an oddly peaceful way. From the distance, barely
audible, come the sentimental strains of a harmonica, on which some rank
beginner, who is strolling past, is “huffing and puffing” a waltz. Some
lines of poetry that I read somewhere recently keep humming in my head:

Bedded down among the treetops
Lies your little quiet garden
Where the roses and carnations
Long have waited for your darling

[Eingebettet zwischen Wipfeln
Liegt dein kleiner stiller Garten
Wo die Rosen und die Nelken
Lang schon auf dein Liebchen warten]

I don’t understand the meaning of these words at all. I don’t even know
if they have a meaning, but together with the breath of air that touches
my hair as though caressingly, they put me in a strange mood. Life plays
an eternal game of tag with me. It seems to me always that it’s not
inside me, not here where I am, but somewhere far off. Back then, at
home [in my childhood], I used to sneak across to the window—it was
strictly forbidden to get up before Father was up—I would open it
quietly and peek out at the big courtyard. There was certainly not much
to see there. Everything was still asleep, a cat crept by on its soft
paws across the courtyard, a pair of sparrows were having a fight with a
lot of cheeky chirping, and long, tall Antoni in his short sheepskin
jacket, which he wore summer and winter, stood by the pump with both
hands and chin resting on the handle of his broom, deep reflection
etched on his sleepy, unwashed face. This Antoni, by the way, was a man
of higher aspirations. Every evening after lockup he sat on his sleeping
bench on the ground floor and sounded out letter by letter, by the
lantern’s feeble light, the official “Police Notes,” and his reading
could be heard throughout the house as a kind of muffled litany. In this
he was guided purely by an interest in arts and letters, because he
didn’t understand a word, but merely loved to sound out the letters; he
loved the letters in and for themselves. Despite that, he was not easy
to satisfy. Once, at his request, I gave him something to read—Lubbock’s
_The Origin of Civilization_.³¹⁴ I had just gone through this book,
reading it with ardent zeal as the first “serious” book I had ever read,
but he returned it to me after two days with the explanation that the
book was “worth nothing.” As for me, several years later I came
belatedly to the realization of how right Antoni was. —And so Antoni
would always stand for some time sunk deep in thought, but he would come
out of it all at once with a shuddering, crashing, widely reverberating
yawn, and this liberating yawn invariably meant: time to get to work.
Even now I can still hear the slurping, slapping sound with which Antoni
dragged his wet, crooked, little broken-down broom over the paving and
in the process always aesthetically and painstakingly formed elegant and
uniform little circles around the edges, which could be taken for the
finest Brussels lace trimming. His sweeping of the courtyard was a
veritable poem. And that was actually the loveliest moment, before the
dreary, noisy, pounding, and hammering life of the big apartment
building woke up. The solemn stillness of the morning hour spread above
the triviality of the courtyard’s paved surface; the window panes
glittered with the early morning gold of the young sun, and way up high
swam sweet-smelling clouds with a touch of pink, before dissolving into
the gray sky over the metropolis. Back then I firmly believed that
“life,” that is, “real life,” was somewhere far away, off beyond the
rooftops. Ever since then I’ve been chasing after it. But it is still
hiding behind some rooftop or other. In the end was it all some kind of
wanton playing or frivolous toying with me? And has real life actually
remained right there in that courtyard where Antoni and I read _The
Origins of Civilization_ for the first time?

I embrace you with all my heart, Rosetta

[P.S.] The “comedy” in Basel—I had a lot of fun over that.³¹⁵ There was
Wullschleger, who had eked out a blessing from Rome, and next to him Son
Excellence Millerand, who sang songs of praise to Berlin … It’s like
they used to say in the old monastery song:

_Et pro rege et pro papa_
_Bibunt vinum sine aqua_³¹⁶

_Holdrio!_ (Hello, out there!) Things are getting prettier and prettier
in the world.

TO HENRIETTE ROLAND HOLST³¹⁷

Berlin-Friedenau, October 27, 1904
58 Cranach Street

My dear Henriette!

Now we must switch roles, and I hasten to send my most heartfelt best
wishes to you on your bed of pain. Day before yesterday I was suddenly,
and for me quite unexpectedly, released from prison, or much more
accurately, I was thrown out, because I made some difficulties about
accepting the blessings of amnesty from the Kingdom of Saxony (on the
occasion of the accession to the throne of the frontrunner on the
gyron).³¹⁸ But it didn’t help [to protest], and I returned to royal
Prussian freedom in Friedenau just exactly one month ahead of time.³¹⁹
Yesterday we chatted all day with the Kautskys, and today is my first
“deed” —to express my thanks to you for your dear letter—which was a
true lifesaver [_Labsal_] for me in Cell No. 7—as well as my warmest
sympathies regarding your unfortunate fall [from a bicycle]. I was
already informed about that by Herman [Gorter] and was greatly concerned
about how you were getting along, but unfortunately I was not at all in
a position to write an inquiry to you or Kautsky—because, you see, only
once a month was I allowed to correspond with the outside world. —Just
then your communication arrived and reassured me to some extent. I am
now doubly incensed about abominable bicycles—even before this I
couldn’t stand to see women riding bicycles, because it is seldom
aesthetically pleasing. I am terribly old-fashioned, as you see, and
even “philistinesque” [_“philiströs”_]. Hopefully, your good humor still
persists and your convalescence is progressing well.

As for me, I’m feeling terrific, evil tongues will even claim I’ve put
on weight (though for two months I nearly starved because the food was
so abominable!). I gave thanks from the fullness of my heart for the
peace and solitude in which I was once again able to patch up my inner
self. Actually I always have a feeling of being torn inwardly when
interacting with people, each new impression tugs me in a different
direction, and I am entirely the slave of the moment. In solitude I find
myself again, and bring the “Polish economy” [or “shambles”] of my
spiritual life into a fairly well ordered state of affairs. I worked and
read wonderfully well for the whole two months. Outside of my own
field—economics—I also dabbled somewhat in literature and philosophy.
The announcement of the amnesty tore me from the loveliest excursion
into Leibniz’s mountainous regions. By the way, I’d like to know if that
grand old Huygens with whom Leibniz corresponded about mathematics was a
forefather of our Cornélie Huygens. It would be interesting to find that
out and it’s not at all impossible. —My impressions from Amsterdam (I
mean the congress)³²⁰ gave me a lot to think about, and the final result
[of that thinking] is that it would be highly useful to encourage a
closer coming-together and above all a getting-to-know-one-another among
the individual parties. I do see the strengthening of international
feeling to be, in and of itself, a means of fighting against bigotry and
ignorance, on which such a goodly part of opportunism rests, and I find
that our press, including _Neue Zeit_, for example, is not free of its
share of the blame in this respect; I’ve frequently said and written
this to Kautsky; obviously by himself he can’t do much. But a
personality like you, my blonde Madonna, could have a great effect. If
you don’t have the time yourself to inform Germany now and then about
your movement, you would at least have to arrange this matter, organize
it—and direct it. Because, after all, it’s not a matter of merely
reporting dry facts, which, for example, _Vorwärts_ does with a notable
absence of inspiration, but it’s a matter of conveying the living spirit
of the movement. What you wrote me about the demonstration by young
sailors gladdened my heart and refreshed my spirit; it was necessary for
the Kautskys to learn about this for the first time from me—from Zwickau
prison! There was not one word about it in our press! For my part I
intend to study the Dutch movement diligently and will make use of my
next visit to you for that purpose, [and] I hope to find in you a good
and kind Cicero [as a guide]. Naturally, for this, I will quickly learn
Dutch. In the prison cell I unfortunately had no instructional aids. I
tried to read Dutch, but understood only every fifth or sixth word; to
make up for it, I read a lot of Italian, because that movement too has
aroused my interest. Which language would be best for getting to know
the Scandinavians better? The triumvirate of Denmark, Norway, and Sweden
is quite unattractive to me, and when I see the good man Knudsen, I can
easily believe that Denmark does a big herring business, but I find it
difficult to imagine that Prince Hamlet was born in that country. But
one must certainly become better acquainted with these three dreadful
parties because, as was shown again at Amsterdam, they do play a role in
the International, even if not a gratifying one. — What I have found out
here about party matters is also not very gratifying to me; I mean the
endless controversies at the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_,³²¹ in the course
of which several juicy stupidities on the part of Mehring’s colleagues
(probably without his having a hand in the matter) were committed and
which sank to such a low and petty level that I have to force myself to
read about them. On the other hand, in France it seems to me the
rumbling about unity is in practice actually pointless, however it may
be intended to unmask Jaurès’s hypocrisy. He, who for several years was
riding the idea of unity right into the ground, today has to turn around
and squirm to try to avoid it! —A scene worthy of the gods. The only
thing is, it’s too bad that our Bebel, not being acquainted with the
individuals, the Renaudels, Longuets, & Co., takes them quite seriously
as authoritative promoters of unity; I’m afraid that at the next meeting
of the International [Socialist] Bureau we may experience quite a bit of
unpleasant back and forth as a result of this. _Nota bene_, Bebel
wants—as I have just found out—to know if this meeting of the Bureau can
be moved to Paris, and Kautsky had to write to Servy along these
lines—supposedly in the interest of French unity. This is quite a wrong
idea, and even Kautsky personally is not enthusiastic about it. I will
also write an energetic protest to Servy against moving the meeting
(especially because all that is most beautiful for me—after Amsterdam—is
connected with Brussels!). It would be good if your delegates as well
(Troelstra and van Kol) would submit a statement to that effect to the
Bureau. It is precisely in Paris that the whole matter would most easily
get all muddled up, in a milieu of constant passionate strife.³²²

And now adieu for the time being and as for you, Sir Knight³²³ (and I
always call you that in my thoughts because of the powerful and
resilient figure you present and because you have such flashing
steel-gray eyes), you promised to send “a long letter” to me in Zwickau.
Even in Friedenau, like Shylock, I insist on what is due me: either a
letter or one pound of heart flesh!… I send you heartfelt kisses,
beautiful Henriette, I wish you a speedy recovery and much pleasant
rest, and I clasp both your hands with all my strength. Write me soon!

Yours completely, Rosa L.

TO HENRIETTE ROLAND HOLST

[Friedenau,] December 17, 1904

Beloved Henriette!

How good that both of you exist! Sometimes when things get dark and
dreary for my soul from all sorts of garbage in life, particularly party
life, I remember Amsterdam and things brighten up again. You say that I
see Holland too much through “rose-colored glasses.” Oh, but let me have
this illusion—at least in relation to a pair of good people. It’s so
fine to have a pure and fragrant memory, kept in stock.

But why the devil am I moaning to you in such a melancholy way! Don’t
believe it, don’t believe me in general, I’m different at every moment,
and life is made up only of moments.

I didn’t write you until now because I kept hoping to receive definite
word of your arrival. It was the Kautskys who advised me of your
intention to come here soon, although you mentioned not one syllable
about that in your letter! Now we are waiting for news of WHEN you are
coming, and we specifically ask that, without fail, you BRING ALONG the
Knight of the Golden Fleece.³²⁴ After all, the Golden Fleece should not
travel alone, since it has proven to be such a fragile thing, hard to
take care of, and we want to have BOTH of you here, so that joy will be
unbounded. Luise K[autsky] is energetically intriguing away so that
Herman Gorter and his better half will come [too], and then we will
really have a Little Amsterdam here, hurrah! And so, WHEN?

With regard to your wish for a quotation regarding strikes, you are
probably not thinking about CLASSICAL economics, but about BOURGEOIS
economics in general. The classical authors (Locke, Petty, Smith,
Ricardo, etc.) do not yet have anything directly about strikes. It was
not until the ’20s of the nineteenth century³²⁵ that economists began to
deal with them, after the big conflicts in England. And so what you need
is first to be found, as I recall, in Thornton (_On Labor_)³²⁶ and
perhaps in Sismondi.³²⁷ I don’t own these books, unfortunately, and I
have commissioned a friend who has access to the Royal Library to search
for the quotation. If something appropriate turns up, you will get it
promptly. (I think you need this for your pamphlet on the general
strike.)³²⁸

Many thanks for your poem! But for the time being you are causing me the
torments of Tantalus. I have taken up Knight Roland’s lead article from
_Nieuwe Tijd_,³²⁹ because I found the title enticing and the first few
sentences were easy, but then it began to go up hill and down dale, and
soon my head began to crack from all these _matschapelijken_ and
_Kracht_. I’m annoyed because I would very much like to read the
article.

I don’t want to talk with you solely about the “race problem” in Social
Democracy, but would much rather talk about our general situation at
present. In particular I am by no means delighted by the role so-called
orthodox “radicalism” has played up to now. Tracking down instances of
opportunist stupidity and repeating, parrot-like, our criticisms of them
is for me not a satisfying form of labor; but rather, I am so thoroughly
fed up with this duty that I prefer to remain silent in such cases. I am
amazed at the certainty with which many of our radical friends contend
that the only thing necessary is to constantly bring the sheep that has
gone astray—the party—back home to its safe stall, “firmness of
principle,” and in this connection I feel that with this purely negative
activity we are not making any steps forward. And for a revolutionary
movement not to go forward means—to fall back. The only means of
fighting opportunism in a radical way is to keep going forward oneself,
to DEVELOP tactics further, to INTENSIFY the revolutionary aspects of
the movement. Generally speaking, opportunism is a plant that grows in
swamps, spreading quickly and luxuriantly in the stagnant water of the
movement; when the current flows swiftly and strongly it [opportunism]
dies away by itself. It is precisely here in Germany that there is an
urgent, burning need for the movement to go forward! And [only] the
smallest number of us are aware of that. Some get bogged down in petty
squabbles with the opportunists, and others, indeed, believe that the
automatic, mechanical growth of our numbers (in elections and in our
organizations) in and of itself means “moving forward”! They forget that
quantity must be transformed into quality, that a party of three million
cannot keep carrying out the same automatic operations performed by a
party of a million and a half. I don’t need to tell YOU that I am not
thinking about any sudden “going into the streets” or any kind of
artificial adventurism. But our entire work must be given a different,
deeper tone, consciousness of our own strength must be raised, and … and
we’ll talk all this over sometime, otherwise I’ll be turning this letter
into a lead article. Do you also think along these lines sometimes? This
is not at all just a German problem, but an international one. The
Amsterdam Congress made me very clearly aware of that. But German Social
Democracy must give the signal and point the direction.

And now, in closing and to say farewell, some beautiful words from a
poet. Do you know Conrad Ferdinand Meyer and his _Huttens letzte Tage_
[Hutten’s Last Days]? If so, the following verses will come to you as a
familiar greeting. If not, they should tell you what is resounding
rhythmically in my soul at this moment as an accompaniment to my
thoughts. Of course there is no LOGICAL connection to be found here, but
perhaps a PSYCHOLOGICAL one.

THE CONFESSION

Here now I step across a grave, my own —
Now, Hutten, won’t you your confession make?
It’s a Christian custom. I’ll beat my breast.
What person has no consciousness of guilt?
How I regret my late-come sense of duty!
Regret my heart did not burn hot enough!
Regret I did not enter into battle
With sharper blows and with far greater zeal!
Regret the hour when I no armor wore!
Regret the day I struck no wounding blow!
Regret—and ashes on my head I strew—
That my belief in winning wasn’t stronger!
Regret that only one time I was banished!
Regret that often I knew human fears!
And, overcome now with remorse, regret
I was not always true to being Hutten!³³⁰

Is this not written with brazen hammer blows? I clasp your hand firmly
and with all my heart,

Your Rosa

[P.S.] Give my heartfelt greetings to our friend [Herman] Gorter, to
whom I owe many thanks for the dear and mischievous letter he sent to me
[in prison] in Zwickau. I haven’t written him a letter because I had the
feeling he didn’t need one and because I hope to see him here soon. For
now, many best wishes to him and his wife!

Enclosed is a photo for Gorter from [André] Morizet, who also sent one
to Bebel and to me as the “_Mitgetroffenen_” [those who appear together
in the photo].³³¹ Don’t be frightened by my profile!

TO HENRIETTE ROLAND HOLST

July 3, 1905

Dear Henriette!

I’m hurrying to answer your questions. Such an interpretation of the
party congress decision as the one you specify is something unknown to
me from the history of the [Social Democratic] party movement.³³² But
the entire practice of German Social Democracy shows the opposite: if a
decision is made, for example, to support liberal candidates, this means
_eo ipso_ [in and of itself] that support for other candidates is
FORBIDDEN.

In general it seems to me that the notion of individual freedom for
party members when it comes to supporting opponent candidates is
monstrous and incompatible with the Social Democratic conception of
organization.³³³ To be sure it does happen that the German party gives a
free hand to individual ELECTION DISTRICTS, as was done, for example, in
Württemberg in relation to the People’s Party, which is too shabby to be
given support generally, but is perhaps to be preferred in some election
districts over the other reactionary parties. But the decision in such
cases is not left to the discretion of individuals, but to the party
organization in the election district.

Giving carte blanche to individual party members is, on the other hand,
a well-known method of BOURGEOIS parties, and indeed it is nothing but a
familiar designation for cowardly betrayal. In particular such a laissez
faire policy is used by the German “freethinkers’ party” every time it
wants to support reaction against Social Democracy. It seldom has the
courage to recommend to its supporters an open policy of support to
reaction, but does so in the disguised form of “leaving it up to
individuals to act at their own discretion.” Invariably that means free
rein to passively or actively support the opponents of Social Democracy.

As for my trip to the beautiful Icarus land³³⁴ of Holland, you have
guessed correctly that nothing will come of it. I cannot now leave my
post, but I feel splendid in doing this work, because the revolution [in
Russia] is developing according to all the rules, and it is a great joy
to be able to observe this, understand it, and contribute to it. The
“hopes and fears” of which you speak can only be felt by someone who
remains merely an observer, like the _Vorwärts_ people, for example, or
the Russian liberals. People like us take an active part with good
cheer, and the MENTAL WORK (the analysis of the revolution’s progress)
is perhaps an even greater pleasure than the practical involvement.
Among the masses in our country a truly voracious appetite has developed
for light, for class consciousness, and I count myself lucky that I can
contribute at least a small kernel toward appeasing this hunger for
enlightenment. Only it’s a pity that all of you are not directly
involved and cannot write for the workers in Poland and Russia. Language
still confronts the International as an accursed barrier. My ideal would
be that all the fresh spirits of every country would now be working with
united energies for the Russian revolution and would send a cloudburst
of good pamphlets there. Then the cause would quickly come to fruition!
And yet you have to waste your precious energies on idiotic
parliamentary elections and the like. How awful!

I will have to share my humble opinion about your book³³⁵ in the _Neue
Zeit_.³³⁶ Unfortunately I have not been able to do that until now
because of my work on behalf of the Russian and Polish proletariat.

Many heartfelt greetings and kisses,
from your Rosa

[Karl Kautsky added the following P.S.:] Dear friend, I can only
subscribe to what Rosa says. Even in run-off elections we have always
acted only as a party, not as individuals. Where one leaves election
tactics up to the individual, that is only the result of cowardice,
which would like to pursue a tactic that one does not have the courage
to recommend openly. By giving free choice to individuals the
responsibility of the party and its leadership is taken away and shoved
off onto anonymous members. —In regard to Russia I am also entirely of
Rosa’s opinion. Things are going forward magnificently, and I feel
thoroughly refreshed by that. The Bernstein business made me old and
tired before my time. The Russian revolution has made me ten years
younger. I have never worked so lightly and easily as now. Vive la
Revolution! Best greetings to you and Uncle Rick from us both. Yours, K.
Kautsky

TO LEO JOGICHES

[Friedenau,] the 29th [of September, 1905]

Precious! I’m writing you with uncertainty about whether this letter
will still reach you tomorrow in Kraków, but I’m incapable of writing to
Warsaw because I feel restricted by the address from Kuba, and for me
that is fatal. I can’t bring myself to write a single word. —I just got
back yesterday evening from a runoff election [_Stichwahl_] in Essen.
There I had six public meetings in the course of three days, three of
them mass rallies [_Grossveranstaltungen_] (with 2,000–3,000 at each),
three on behalf of Bebel, who was ill, and three in my own name. Things
went splendidly, but you can imagine how much I was on the go [_in der
Mühle_] the whole time, and you can understand why I didn’t write you
during that time. When I went to [the SPD Congress at] Jena, I already
felt like a corpse, and while there I was on my feet the entire time,
without having a moment to sit down, I gave three speeches at the
congress (and spoke once on a point of personal privilege).³³⁷ Then I
went directly to Berlin, spent all of Sunday “resting up,” actually I
wrote only seven letters that were absolutely necessary and changed my
clothes, and on Monday, at 8 in the morning, I left for Essen (a
nine-hour train trip) and spoke that evening at two different meetings
(getting from the one to the other by droshky; by the way, at the
railroad station and all over the city posters had been stuck up, one of
which I’m enclosing here), and then the same schedule on Tuesday and
Wednesday, then on Thursday getting up at 7 in the morning and making
another nine-hour trip to Berlin. In spite of that I dealt my blows
valiantly and have returned feeling ten times fresher than when I left
for Jena. (N.B., this agitational work has put me in very good favor
with the old-timers [i.e., the SPD leaders], and so forth. But just
imagine this racing around [_gonka_]. I never knew during the whole time
which world I was in, and when I thought about you every day I was
incapable of picturing WHERE you actually were. I am waiting with the
greatest longing for the first news from you, from Kraków, to finally
have some calm and peace again and to resume regular correspondence. My
precious, poor Dziodziuś, how you must have felt there during this time,
in such a pickle [_w tych tarapatach_] and without any letters from me!
But surely you were able to realize why, since you knew that I had gone
to Essen and that it would be IMPOSSIBLE for me to write letters [from
there]. If only something would come from you, from Kraków, tomorrow!

How many fresh ideas and plans I have brought back with me, how much
eager desire to work. I’ll write about all that in my next letter, as
soon as I know that you’re in Kraków. For now, just this much about me:
I had barely returned from Essen when a torrent [_Sturzbach_] of
unpleasant news “from home” [i.e., from Poland], like suffocating
vapors, poured down [_khlynul_]. First, a telegram from Kraków that has
been lying here since the 25th, having to do with the “distribution
commission.”³³⁸ Why this question was not worked out with Dalski, I
don’t understand. You need to take the appropriate steps about that.
(Today I sent a telegram to Dalski as well as to Moszoro, but I’m afraid
that this business is all over by now.) Further, a packet of letters
from the last four days was brought to me today, and in it, again from
Kraków, were some foul clippings from _Naprzód_.³³⁹ Farther on, there
was an idiotic letter from Julek [Marchlewski], which I am enclosing (I
will answer him tomorrow), and all this has depressed me. Of course the
most painful for me were your postcards from Riga about waiting in vain
for a letter. How I yearn for all this to come to some peaceful
resolution, so that at last you will feel calm and cheerful [_bodro_]! I
found our living space here in the same stupid mess [_in dem gleichen
tollen Durcheinander_]. I had to get hold of a cleaning woman right
away, and today everything has already been cleaned up, and at least I
can write a letter on a clean desk surface. Within the week I’m
definitely getting a maid. A heap of (German) work is waiting for me.
Among other things, Bebel is asking that I regularly write an article
for the _Vorwärts_ (two a month or two a week). Tomorrow I will try to
send you the article about Kasprz[ak].³⁴⁰ Oh, I’m waiting so impatiently
for a word from you from Kraków that I’m ready to send you a telegram,
but I don’t know what or where to write. My precious, be calm and stay
in a good mood, be good and write immediately. I embrace you with all my
heart. Your R

TO HENRIETTE ROLAND HOLST

Friedenau, October 2, 1905

My dear Henriette,

I’m hurrying to answer your questions, all the more so because I welcome
with joy the second edition of your book.³⁴¹ I completely agree with you
that Bebel’s resolution conceived of the question very one-sidedly and
superficially.³⁴² When it [Bebel’s resolution] became known to us at
Jena some of us intended to wage an all-out struggle against it in the
discussion so as to bring out the fact that the mass strike is not a
mechanical recipe for being on the political defensive but is an
elementary form of revolutionary struggle. However, Bebel’s speech in
and of itself shifted the matter in a different direction and that was
even more true as a result of the actions of the opportunists (Heine,
etc.). As has often happened before we, the “extreme lefts,” saw
ourselves forced, despite important differences with Bebel, to fight not
against him but together with him against the opportunists. At Jena, in
the middle of the discussion, to come out directly against Bebel’s
resolution would have been a tactical mistake on our part. It was much
more appropriate to give the resolution a revolutionary coloration,
while solidarizing with Bebel, and this tactic surely was successful,
even if the newspaper report gives only a weak indication of that.
Actually in the discussion the mass strike was treated as a form of
revolutionary mass struggle, including by Bebel, perhaps without himself
fully realizing that, and the specter of revolution clearly dominated
over the whole debate at the Party Congress. This fact was actually
emphasized by the opportunists themselves as they cried out with their
Cassandra calls against the inevitable consequences of the new tactic:
against [alleged] bloody revolution. We can be completely satisfied with
this result TACTICALLY. Party congress resolutions in general never have
the aim of clarifying theoretical questions in an exhaustive way, but
they merely have the aim of injecting a POLITICAL SLOGAN into the life
of our party. This was done by the Bebel resolution and the debate, and
now the slogan must develop according to its own logic naturally, a
process that should be served by further discussion in the press. This
is the “esoteric” aspect of the question. As far as “things esoteric”
are concerned: the question of whether you should talk about this in the
second edition, I do not see, at least from my point of view, why you
should not do that. To the contrary, that would even make me happy,
because—to be frank about it—the only objection I could make about your
otherwise excellent book is that you discuss the mass strike much too
formalistically as a means of defense and in that connection you put too
much emphasis on the aspect of organization and discipline and much too
little on the HISTORICAL process of the sharpening of class
contradictions and you haven’t spelled it out enough that from this
context the mass strike emerges as an elementary phenomenon. At any rate
I intend to write about the Jena debate and the congress resolution
quite candidly when the opportunity arises.³⁴³ —Finally, as far as the
review in _Vorwärts_ is concerned,³⁴⁴ I would advise you NOT to get into
it, despite Wallfisch’s urging you to do so. The party’s central organ
[that is, _Vorwärts_] truly does not deserve to be eternalized that way,
even if only in the second edition of your book. Readers would also grow
weary of such skirmishing over an insignificant review in _Vorwärts_.
—In general we can be very satisfied with Jena. The main thing is this:
the entire mass of the party is in excellent fighting mood, and that is
all one can hope to accomplish in a political off-season. Everything
else will be brought along when a revolutionary situation develops,
which cannot fail to occur sooner or later. Write back right away, and
stay fresh and cheerful, as we are. Heartfelt greetings to you and your
husband, as well as to Herman [Gorter], Pannekoek, and Mendels.

TO LEO JOGICHES

[Friedenau] the 6th [of October, 1905]

Precious! Today at last I want to write you in more detail and send the
letter off in good time, so as not to be running into the city at night.

Yesterday I received a letter from Bebel with the following salutation:
Dorogoi Rakovsky!³⁴⁵ (I’ll have to copy out [the German text of the
letter] for you, unfortunately, because you definitely won’t be able to
decipher it.)³⁴⁶

“I am writing to inquire of you whether you would be inclined to write
regularly for the _Vorwärts_, something like two lead articles per week,
if the relevant bodies should ask you for such collaboration.

“I herewith express the opinion that you would be not be bound either to
a particular day or to a particular subject. The articles, depending on
the circumstances, would take up economic or political topics. Either
you would choose the topic or the editorial board would express its wish
for you to provide an article on such-and-such a topic. The editorial
board would have to accept the article as long as there were no
overriding considerations relating to the press laws. If it [the
editorial board] should have reservations with regard to the content, it
would IMMEDIATELY have to inform the Executive and the Press Commission.
The articles [two each week] would have to be accepted as editorials in
the event that you yourself preferred not to sign one or the other with
your cipher [i.e., name or initials].

“It goes without saying that there would be an appropriate honorarium
for the articles. Where possible, an article would not be longer than
two columns, but by way of exception on important subjects a system of
Article, pt. I, and Article, pt. II, will be used. I would like to ask
you to let me know your opinion [regarding this proposal] AS SOON AS
POSSIBLE.”

As you see, a marriage proposal in full form [_Heiratsantrag in aller
Form_]. The terms [being offered] in and of themselves are outstanding:
_special protection by the Executive_, the editorial board must accept
the articles, a special honorarium (as K. K. [Karl Kautsky] told me, 25
marks [per article]), and a special, privileged status. There’s a story
behind this whole business: Aside from my becoming a regular contributor
[_Mitarbeit_], the “reform” [of the _Vorwärts_] will consist of the
ousting of two little people and bringing in two new editors, so that a
firm majority of left-minded people [_eine feste Majorität der Linken_]
would be established.

Of course this letter has placed me in a very difficult position. I am
perfectly well aware of everything that speaks AGAINST it, and we don’t
need to repeat that. But on the other hand, the following situation
exists: After the whole squabble [_Zank_] over the _Vorwärts_³⁴⁷ to a
certain extent this is a turn toward us on the left with an offer of
forming a cabinet [_Kabinnetsbildung_]. And although I personally have
had absolutely no part in the squabble, nevertheless since Jena I have
figured once again as the guiding spirit of the Left [_Spiritus rector
der Linken_], and a point-blank refusal on my part would be interpreted
as follows: _There you have it! These people only have a big mouth for
grumbling and complaining, but when it’s a question of doing the job
better, they make themselves scarce_. In addition to that, [my refusal]
would be a particularly severe blow and a _casus belli_ for August
[Bebel]. He of course is the one who is now carrying out this whole
reform. He is burning with a hot desire to restructure the _Vorwärts_,
to reshape it on our shoemaker’s last, and he has it fixed in his mind
that I can do this! To refuse would mean to draw a line through the
whole plan he has worked out, and it would mean _to leave the field
undisputed_ [_unstreitig das Feld überlassen_] to Eisner & Co. In short,
it is a situation “worse than one faced by the governor of a Russian
province.”³⁴⁸ I have to give my answer by today (because this afternoon
a session of the Executive with the Press Commission on the matter of
“the great reform” will take place), and therefore yesterday evening I
went to see K. K. [Karl Kautsky] to get his advice. He is now (for
certain reasons) more furious at the _Vorwärts_ and at August [Bebel]
than ever before, but in spite of that he responded immediately, “to
refuse is absolutely impossible.” And so we worked out the following
plan: to come to an agreement immediately with Cunow and in advance to
conclude a defensive alliance [_Schutz-und-Trutz-Bündnis_] with him and
Ströbel (and eventually with all those on the left [on the editorial
board]), with reciprocal commitments that if a squabble with the
editorial board or with the Executive occurred because of my articles,
then not I alone but the entire left would resign in solidarity from the
_Vorwärts_, and in that case the editorial board would be blown apart,
then Eisner & Co. would definitely be kicked out, because without Cunow
the _Vorwärts_ could not function.

This morning we both went to see Cunow, who agreed to this with pleasure
and is already waiting eagerly for the opportunity of such a conflict.
“You must know” that in recent times this fellow has become so furious
at Eisner & Co. that already, in all seriousness, he wanted to leave the
_Vorwärts_ of his own accord, but if he left together with me that would
have an entirely different meaning of course. (N.B.: Before Jena [the
SPD Party Congress in 1905], at the last session of the Press Commission
with the _Vorwärts_ editorial board, C[unow] and E[isner] actually came
to blows. C[unow] rushed at E[isner], grabbed him by the collar, shoved
him against the wall, and was about to hit him in the face with his fist
when the others pulled him away. N.B.: In spite of that, he [Eisner] is
now constantly trying to butter up to C[unow], seeking to have
discussions with him!…)

On the strength of this I wrote a letter to Bebel in which I explained
in advance that I did not believe in the effectiveness of such an
artificial reform, that as long as E[isner] and G[radnauer] and
W[etzker] remained on the job nothing would change, but that IN ORDER TO
SHOW GOODWILL on the part of the left I would agree to B[ebel]’s
proposal ON THE CONDITION that a permanent majority of the left on the
editorial board would first be assured.

That’s the way I have arranged this matter, and although you are
certainly making a sour face, you will nevertheless, when you think it
over, concede that I could do nothing else. (N.B.: This job will give me
a very influential political position directly in the center of the
party, especially in view of August’s special favor [toward me] in
recent times.) As far as the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_ is concerned,
M[ehring] will of course remain there for the time being. With a lot of
pleading he allowed himself to be persuaded. The people in Leipzig
explained nevertheless that they were going to let him go. They wanted
him merely to stay in his present position—until January or February.
_Before then the above-mentioned clash at_ Vorwärts _will most likely
have taken place_.³⁴⁹

As far as the writing goes, I have a great desire to do it and I feel
that _the iron disposition of my soul is rolled up into a fist_.³⁵⁰ I
will make an effort to write in such a way that the author can be
recognized ten paces away. Cunow is rubbing his hands in glee when he
thinks what kind of faces the “right-wingers” will make when they see
such articles in the “central organ” [i.e., the _Vorwärts_].

Now a bit about personal matters. You are wrong, dear Gold, that in my
thinking I continue to be fixated on the Polish work. [In German:]
_Unfortunately, it is exactly the opposite_. In this respect Jena [i.e.,
the SPD Party Congress] has already turned me completely upside-down
again. So much so that now and then I’m even afraid whether someone
might try to make something of the fact that I constantly feel so cut
off from everything [in Poland]. However, despite the fact that in my
thoughts I am totally involved in the German work, I would like at least
to be _au courant_ in the most important matters of OUR work, and I ask
you not to be so childish and not to screen me off from the Polish work
_forcibly_ the way you do, not wanting to inform me about anything
anymore. My Gold—don’t ever send me any more “drastic cure suggestions”
[“_Pferdekuren_”], all right? If I assure you that a few bits of
information orienting me about the status of the [Polish] work will do
no harm, and that on the contrary I feel the need for them, you can rest
assured that it is so.

The maid is constantly absent. She was supposed to come yesterday but it
seems she won’t come until Sunday. I would like it, on the one hand,
that you not come here from Kraków before everything is organized “on a
new basis”³⁵¹ and, on the other hand, not before I have brought
everything into order, the maid, the housekeeping, and my work, so that
you will find everything already straightened out. For example, it is
with _the greatest calmness of spirit_ [_mit grösster Seelenruhe_] that
I put up with the disorder and the absence of the maid. I feel quite
well even physically (with the exception of [not sleeping during] the
night and the feeling of being unable to breathe), but you would surely
be in agonies [over that], and because of that I too would be in agonies
if you were here. —As for your suspicious analysis of my letters, you
are wrong to do that. In general, dear Gold, let go of me completely,
laissez faire, because even you have to be a little bit subtle. By the
way, if you were here and saw me, you would calm down, because I am just
like always. And regarding the above mention of “analysis,” I now have
an even greater aversion to it than before. _I am living simply the life
of a plant and people must let me be as I am_. I had a card from Andzia
[Luxemburg’s sister], but it was from before your visit and it seems
that she is going to remain in the countryside. Annie [Luxemburg’s
niece] visited me and brought me an enchanting light blue blouse. I’m
terribly happy about it. Listen, if [the work at the] _Vorwärts_ brings
in 200 marks, we’ll be in a splendid position! I’ll buy a frightfully
large amount of underwear. That is my greatest wish.

I embrace you, R.

[P.S.] Just at this moment I received a card from Bebel that my maid
will be arriving tomorrow (the Jewish Sabbath) at seven in the evening
and their maid (the Bebels’) will meet her at the station and bring her
to my place. In short, _straight from the hands of the Party Executive_.

In the [publication] _Jugend_ again there is a whole slew of jokes at my
expense. I will send it to you tomorrow. You will laugh, although you
will definitely get angry about the “portrait.”

TO LEO JOGICHES

[Friedenau, October 10, 1905]

Precious! Today I received your letter, in which after lengthy
introductory remarks [_nach grosser Vorrede_]—you didn’t write anything.
And with your criticism about Sunday you have only compromised yourself
in my eyes. How is it that I should have had nothing to do on Sunday?
Have you forgotten that the Donna [maid] just arrived on Saturday, so
that Sunday was the first day I could “train” her how to clean and tidy
up one room after another, then how to do the cooking, then how to set
the table, then how to wash the dishes, then making coffee
[_Kaffeekochen_], then the evening meal, then getting the bed ready for
the night—and so on until it was time to go to sleep. So there, I’ve
given you this whole long and interesting litany as punishment. Are you
going to learn anytime soon that I don’t “talk my way out” of things?!

Nota bene, my cares and concerns as a housewife [_Hausfrauensorgen_]
don’t end there. This maid has been wailing at me that she suffers from
headaches, that she can’t climb stairs, that she can’t lift anything. I
definitely won’t be able to put up with her for even a month, if that. I
already have my eye on “something” as a replacement and am not making a
big fuss about all this. To make up for it, I enjoy watching the painter
at work on the stucco figures on the ceiling.

I feel poisoned when I have any kind of difficulty with my writing.
Dammit, I absolutely am not a real writer when every blessed little
article makes me tear my hair out and I have to force myself to write
it. Only in exceptional cases, when I’m strongly aroused (as, for
example, at the beginning of [my work on] the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_
or this year, by the revolution in February [i.e., the aftermath of
“Bloody Sunday” in Russia]). Then my pen flies along “with lightning
speed” of its own accord, as with Mr. Zołzikiewicz.³⁵² But as soon as
I’m in a situation where I’m squeezing an article out of myself I get
into a bad mood [_missmutig_] and am incapable even of writing an
ordinary letter. I feel as though I can’t look anyone in the eye or be
seen by anyone. Do you know what my bedtime reading is now? Benvenuto
Cellini, the autobiography in Goethe’s translation. A highly original
work, interesting as a picture of the life and customs [_Sittenbild_] of
fifteenth-century France and Italy. This is the gradual way in which I
at least would like to get to know my own classics. By the way,
generally speaking, Goethe has an unusually calming effect—he’s a true
“Olympian,” and I feel such close kinship with his view of the world.
Unfortunately, I lack the iron CAPACITY FOR WORK [_Arbeitsamkeit_] that
Goethe had, in spite of his world outlook (not to mention, of course,
his genius). It’s rather strange, really, what universal intellectual
interests this man had! And he was a “Swabian.” Someone needs to explain
this to me [Das _soll mir einer erklären_]. And so, when we read
together in the evening, we will have to read something serious, not
_belles lettres. Life is too short and we are too ignorant to permit
such luxury_.³⁵³ Agreed? But [to change the subject,] today I received a
card from Andzia [i.e., Anna Luxemburg, her sister] with the news that
she has returned and is feeling very well. She found the lilies of the
valley, still fresh, and she thanks you profoundly, but was terribly
sorry that she didn’t see you and she PLACES YOU UNDER AN OBLIGATION to
visit her next time. Write her a card, to Zlota Street.

Hugs. R.

May one know who this interesting young man is who I am recommending
warmly [_chaleureusement_] to [Comrade] Sigg [in Switzerland]? Keep in
mind that I don’t want to get into a situation like Clemenceau with his
“son.”…

TO LEO JOGICHES

[Friedenau, October 13, 1905]

Precious Dziodziuś! Yesterday I received no letter from you, and today
you’ll receive none from me. But that’s not out of revenge. There has
been no end of “visits” all day today. Right after lunch that lady (“the
Social Democrat”) was here, the one that Antoni bequeathed to us—quite a
pleasant girl, who at first glance [seems] a capable, competent, and
enthusiastic Social Democrat. Let our people there know that she was
well treated here. Then Luise [Kautsky] came, and after her the boys,
until it was 8 pm already and I no longer had the strength to take the
streetcar and felt quite upset. It seems to me that I have already
written you that Ryazanov was here one evening recently. I’m yearning to
“pass him on” to you, as soon as you are here, because I don’t know why
I should be the only one to HAVE THE PLEASURE OF HIS COMPANY. N.B., he
too “was confused” [_putal_] a bit on the Duma question and only in my
presence did he become a little stronger. He was still sitting at my
place when around 9 pm Karl [Kautsky] and Luise came charging in with a
comrade [_Genosse_] from Friedenau, wanting to take me along with them.
Imagine, Karl had agreed to the request of this Friedenau comrade to
give a talk on … Marx’s economic theory—and guess where?—in that obscure
tavern on the corner of Menzel and Becker Streets, where the two
attractive [statues of] dogs are sitting, looking like tigers, a place
which, as it turns out, is a kind of stronghold [_Hochburg_] for the
local Social Democrats. Naturally I went along, and [soon] we entered a
smoke-filled, tiny room in which there were sitting about twenty-five
_Mann_ [men], highly concentrated and closely crowded together. Karolus
cleared his throat and began to lecture on the subject of value and
exchange value [_Wert und Tauschwert_]—N.B., in such an unpopularized
way that I was absolutely amazed. And so it went for about an hour. The
poor things struggled desperately against yawning and falling asleep.
Then a discussion began, I intervened, and immediately everything became
quite lively. The people kept repeating that I ought to come there
often. It was very friendly and sociable [_gemütlich_], and all in all,
we had some very good conversations. Karolus’s eyes kept rolling around
in amazement. He was obviously thinking: _Where do you know all these
facts from_ (various practical details about tariff agreements, etc.)
_and how do you know how to get along so well with these people?_³⁵⁴ And
so on.

Today I had two pleasant moments in the midst of moments that were
otherwise not very pleasant at all. The package from you that came in
the morning with the publication _Die Kunst. The_ second was your letter
that came in the afternoon with _Z pola walki_ [From the Field of
Battle]. I thank you very much for _Die Kunst_. “_How well you know
me_.” —I sat right down on the bed with _Die Kunst_ and leafed through
it, turning every page. The reproductions are marvelous, and I have
promised myself still more pleasure from reading the text. Perhaps I
will finally find out something about Lenbach. I will also bring it
along to K[arl] K[autsky]’s and we’ll page through it together there. _Z
pola walki_ turned out very well. The photo on the front page has
immediately become legendary. The whole thing is very impressive, but if
only I wasn’t grieved by the thought that in a month it will be
outdated, and that because of me! Oh well, perhaps our people in Warsaw
won’t be so choosy and it will still be of some use to them! Now the
next issues of _Z pola walki_ and _Czerwony Sztandar_ must be brought
out “with lightning speed.” I promise an improvement, and in proof of
that I have already begun work today on _Czego chcemy_ [What We
Want].³⁵⁵ I have added something about “self-administration” and am
enclosing it.³⁵⁶ I wanted to do the rest immediately and send it off,
but I held it back in order TO RECEIVE YOUR COMMENTS. Send them right
away! And write me what I should do in addition for _Przegląd
Robotniczy_, so that you can take it off the machine [i.e., have it
printed] in about a week. In that way we would improve our record a
little bit, at least in the eyes of public opinion. N.B., I am tormented
again by the thought of what will happen with the publications if you
are not there: you yourself wrote that _Z pola walki_ was still causing
so many difficulties technically that you had to stay at the print shop
the whole day, even though the entire issue had already gone through
your hands! What would it be like if you were here? Constant fury about
instances of carelessness and technical matters! The only person who, at
least this is how it seems to me, has sufficient punctiliousness and
perseverance [_nastoichivost_] in these matters would be Witold, if you
would initiate him into these capitalistic trade secrets. But not Julek
[Marchlewski] or Ad[olf Warski].

This damn painting job here [in the apartment] is now finished, but it
will take until morning to “dry,” and then begins the job of putting the
junk back in the kitchen and giving the rooms a real cleaning. You won’t
recognize the kitchen any more. It puts the other rooms to shame and
will surely be our “salon.” How do you like the fiasco of the PPS in
Katowice?³⁵⁷ _Definitely something of a crushing blow!_ This will serve
splendidly as an illustration of what the PPS tactics lead to. Don’t
forget to mention this in _Czerwony Sztandar_. However, here’s something
more that’s deplorable: what’s the problem there with the pamphlet about
Kasp[rzak]? We absolutely cannot delay any longer with that!!

Write and tell me where things stand with that, when it will be
published, and what I should write in addition.

You will be sad again that I am writing about obvious “external”
business matters, but you will be mistaken. It is really true that all
THESE business matters at present represent my “inner world”
[“_vnutrennii mir_”] because this kind of thing incessantly plagues and
depresses me. You have no notion how these party-related errors (for
example, the pamphlet about the PPS³⁵⁸ and the one on autonomy³⁵⁹)
poison my life. Because of these things I am not capable of thinking
about anything freely and easily. And to think that I created all this!
And soon it will all be too late. I swear by every devil! [_Zu allen
Teufeln!_]

Karolus suddenly received a letter from Singer [complaining] that the
latter was being harassed by a certain Nathan (a Jewish member of the
party, one of the Bernstein crowd), who wanted him [Singer], Karl, and
August [Bebel] to make an effort to exert “influence” on the Russians so
that there would be no “split” in connection with the elections to the
Duma, because it looked very likely that the “radicals” would be
successful in the election, etc., etc. Naturally “Pauli” [Singer] fell
for this and passed the assignment on to Karl. Karolus sent a very cold
answer to them about that, saying that he would never dream of exerting
“influence” in this direction, quite the opposite, in fact [_dazhe
sovsem naoborot_]. The only thing interesting about this story is the
question of who stands behind Nathan, because such a request could only
come from the _Iskra_ people.³⁶⁰

However, I do thank you for the Russian newspapers (_Osvobozhdenie_,
etc.). I will read through them, even though I had previously skimmed
through both _Proletary_ and _Iskra_.

Here is an amusing scandal: Luise [Kautsky] came to see me yesterday
doubled up with laughter, asking that if possible I come to see them
that evening. What happened was that a letter had come from
_Victor-Leben_,³⁶¹ giving notice that he would be visiting them
yesterday evening, obviously with an unstated, yearning wish not to meet
me again [at their house]. He was coming for the special purpose of
having a heart-to-heart talk with Karl [Kautsky] about Karl’s letter to
Hilferding, in which Karl had called Adler a “traitor to Marxism,” and
the latter [Hilferding] had taken the liberty of showing the letter to
the former [Adler]. Karolus had been angered by a nasty article of
Adler’s in the Vienna _Arbeiter Zeitung_—entitled “On the Jena Party
Congress”—a vicious polemic against the general strike, entirely in the
spirit of Eisner and Gradnauer.

The weather here is dreadful. The rain is pelting down almost
incessantly, it’s cold and dark, a person could go crazy from it. I
still haven’t put the heat on anyhow and I’m running around in front of
the open window with a summer blouse on—I’m enjoying myself as long as
you’re not here to declare war against “fresh air” (do you get it?…).

Today I’m asking Pfannk[uch] by letter what’s going on there with the
money. They already have more than 110,000 marks and so that ought to
mean about 60,000 in cash. Maybe on Sunday I’ll be in a better mood. If
only the work would move forward!! I embrace you. Rest up a little bit
after all this _gonka!!_³⁶² Yours

[P.S.] When you’re here you’ll have to read Benvenuto Cellini, and I
will gladly read it again together with you. A magnificent thing, it
makes an impression something on the order of _Jürg Jenatsch_.³⁶³ The
only thing that irritates me is that usually we read in such tiny
portions, at a snail’s pace!

The photo of Gurcman is incredibly appealing. He must be a very handsome
youth.

Read through the postscript to _Czego chcemy_ before you give it to the
printer.

TO LEO JOGICHES

[Friedenau, October 14, 1905]

Precious! Today I received your quite short and sad letter. In the
meantime you already know why I’ve written you nothing recently and
today you must have received my detailed letter. I’ve already written to
you about _Z pola walki_. Imagine, I dreamed all night last night that
Kasp[rzak] was here and had spoken with you on party questions while I
was listening. When I awoke and realized that everything is _over_, and
forever, I fell into a terrible mood and had no desire to get up. In
general, I think about him very often and simply cannot come to terms
with this fact.

Today I went for a walk for the first time [in a long time]. But
actually this was the first day without rain, but to make up for it,
there is a cold wind that nearly blows a person over. In spite of that I
felt very refreshed from the walk through the field, you know which one,
and where. The only thing that cast a cloud over the impressive scene
was that damn racetrack with the incessant roar of automobile engines.
Just listen to what an amusing combination of circumstances occurred: on
the same day you sent me _Die Kunst_ I had planned to send you something
“from the same opera” [i.e., of the same sort]. I changed my mind,
though, and am keeping it until you come: when you get right down to it,
it’s just an insignificant trifle.

As far as the treasury goes, an additional observation: I’m asking you,
for the sake of keeping things in order, to make out a receipt for 700
marks (instead of for 680), and I’ll add 6 marks out of my pocket
(because you write that you have taken an additional 14). All right?

K. K. [Karl Kautsky] has done me a favor, may a horse tread on him.
After a big consultation together with me at Jena³⁶⁴ he promised the
Hamburg people [that he would give] a public speech about the mass
strike in November. Now he obviously has no desire any more to do that
and is talking his way out of it with the excuse that he has fears about
the police and about speaking out openly too often, and he wrote to them
[the Hamburg people], without my knowledge, that I would take his place,
which is actually a gain for them. Naturally the Hamburg people agreed,
and now nothing is left for me but to agree as well, because I can’t
after all make a mockery of K[autsky].

Tomorrow is already the 15th, so please write when you’re coming so that
I can deal with all petty little matters appropriately.

Yesterday I received a postcard from someone from Munich intended for
Parvus at my address. That means that today or tomorrow he’ll come
through the door. I confess to you that this time it doesn’t thrill me
at all, and I have the feeling that he too will not be inspired by the
reception he gets. Undoubtedly you will be indignant, but his idiotic
tactic toward the Duma has really put me off.³⁶⁵ _I have had enough of
these “radical” leaps to one side or another_.³⁶⁶ Furthermore, the
letter he sent me to Jena has made me a bit uneasy: it was loud-mouthed
and boastful [_grossmäulig und prahlerisch_] as usual. I know that these
are childish things, but I have grown somewhat weary of such behavior by
now. (I expect that you will tell me off for this in your next letter.)

My dearest Gold, _my cartels won’t let me sleep_. And I simply cannot
shake myself loose from these little ongoing pieces of work here.
Someday I could certainly enjoy to the fullest the experience of how a
person lives who has no (writer’s) obligations on their conscience and
deals with everything right on time. But I definitely will die without
ever having that experience, as the well-known woman in Dickens who died
without seeing the end of her tasks. Maybe it would have an effect on me
if you [were here and we] were working regularly. What do you think?

In this issue of _Die Kunst_, after the beautiful pieces by Lenbach, did
you see the “modern” monstrosity by Kolb of Magdeburg? Yesterday around
9 in the morning I ran over to the Kautskys for a short time, and we
looked at it together and split our sides laughing. Karl especially made
amusing marginal comments about it all.

Victor-Leben³⁶⁷ is furious at me because of Jena. He actually hisses
when he speaks of me, _which makes me very happy_. As for Heller, he has
already left the _Schwäbische Tagwacht_. (He was driven out among other
things by the intrigues of Klara [i.e., Clara Zetkin].) Since he could
find no place in the party, he went to Vienna and simply set up a
business dealing in books and art! Man overboard! But as it turns out,
Krichevsky [also] gave up being a correspondent, because that man
Alekseyev has tempted him with orders for legal publications, and the
ass [Krichevsky] is staking his whole existence on this. N.B.: He has
offhandedly “sold” to him [Alekseyev] all his translations, which you
had already bought from Krichevsky and published [back in the 1890s],
such as the Erfurt Program [of the SPD] and Marx’s _Eighteenth
Brumaire_.³⁶⁸ Incidentally, I regret very much that you won’t be here
when Parvus comes because you could talk with him seriously and
influence him, so that he would become more of a regular person, but I
couldn’t do it and I have no desire to.

Dearest Gold, have a good day on Sunday. I will spend tomorrow as usual,
all day long, alone. I want to make an effort to get some work done.
When you come we’ll go to the theater, because I can get cheap tickets
through Annie [Luxemburg]. All right?

Hugs! Your R.

TO LEO JOGICHES

[Friedenau, October 20, 1905]

Precious! I’m writing you in a hurry, because I had barely received your
letter with comments on _Czego chcemy_ when I got right to work, in
order to send it back to you in the next mail, so that you will be
relieved of this plague. —I have taken into account ALL your corrections
with the exception of two.

(l) As far as the details are concerned, such as _a bicameral
legislature, ministerial responsibility_, etc., I find it hard to see
clearly for myself whether there really is a place for them and which
place they would fit in. At any rate, they can be held over for the
pamphlet. Until then we will be in agreement.

(2) As far as the “Duma” is concerned, you are completely on the wrong
track [auf _dem Holzweg_] if you think we have to mention it here.
You’re crazy, my dear Gold. This is, after all, a COMMENTARY ON THE
PROGRAM, OF GENERAL AND LASTING significance, [stating] our POSITIVE
demands, not an article or agitational pamphlet geared for a few weeks
or months. Everything that has to be said about the Duma should appear
in Julek [Marchlewski]’s pamphlet, and I don’t think much of it being
mentioned here. —If you send further comments, I will attend to them as
well.

Yesterday evening by a noteworthy coincidence I pulled out the box with
the last letters from Mama and Papa and the letters from Andzia
[Luxemburg’s sister] and Józio [her brother] from that same time. I read
through them all, and had to cry so hard that my eyes got completely
swollen and I went to sleep with a huge wish never to wake up again.
What became _especially_ hateful for me was the entire business of
“politics” [_die ganze “Politik”_], for the sake of which (scribbling
out the article “Step by Step”) I put off answering letters from Mama
and Papa for weeks. I never had time for them because of these
_world-shaking tasks_ (and that continues to this very day), and you
became hateful to me as the one who always kept me welded to this
accursed politics. (I remember that as the result of your persuasion I
put Mrs. Lübeck off from coming to visit us at Weggis, so that I
wouldn’t be interrupted from finishing that _epoch-making article_ for
_Sozialistische Monatshefte_.³⁶⁹ But she, she was coming to see me—with
the news of my mother’s death!) You see how open-heartedly I write all
this to you. Today I took a stroll in the sunshine, and I’m feeling
somewhat better. Yesterday I was very close to deciding, at once, to let
it all go fly and _thumb my nose at the whole world_—this whole
_goddamned politics_, or rather this bloody parody of “a political life”
that we are leading. It’s such an idiotic form of _Baal worship_, and
nothing else, in which one’s entire human existence is offered as a
sacrifice to one’s own ruin, a kind of illness of swollen mental glands.
If I believed in God, I’d be convinced that God would punish us harshly
for [choosing] this _torment_ [_Qual_].

I embrace you. Your R.

[P.S.] Apropos of that, a small dramatic occurrence: The well-known
sailor Feldman from the _Potemkin_,³⁷⁰ a 19-year-old youth (who has
actually now reached sanctuary outside Russia), had an 18-year-old
fiancée, in Geneva. When she heard a FALSE report of his arrest, before
he had reached safety abroad, she threw herself from a window and was
found dead on the spot.

TO LEO JOGICHES

[Friedenau, October 24–5, 1905] Tuesday

Precious Dziodziuś! Early this morning, first thing, I sent you a letter
with corrections because last night I was so exhausted I wasn’t capable
of making the trip to [the post office at] Friedrich Street, and I told
myself that YOU would definitely be against my doing that. There was no
letter from you yesterday, and this morning your letter of Sunday
came—so sad and full of doubts that I was amazed. What? Why? It’s
probably just depression after extraordinary exertion and exhaustion
from your work that makes you have bad dreams and forebodings. And all
the while here I am fussing around to clean up your room with all my
might and looking in there several times a day, [including] right after
I get up, without fail, and I was sitting right in your room as I was
reading that stupid letter. I hope by now that this bad mood has passed.

As you will see from today’s _Vorwärts_ (on the last page), the palace
revolution is moving ahead. The resignation of the “right-wingers” will
be accepted, and as of November 1, with moaning and groaning, the new
editorial board will be put in place.³⁷¹ At this moment I have received
a letter from Bebel with the question whether he can count on me to
provide a lead article for the November 1 issue. (!) It goes without
saying that I must promise to do this and prepare something elegant. As
you see, we have to take into account the fact that, after November 1, I
will have those two lead articles on my neck [every week], but in fact
far more than that, because K. K. [Karl Kautsky] is asking, for example,
that I be in charge of the Russian department, if only in order to write
brief notices about the events there, and so I’ll have quite a large
amount of work. Never fear, I won’t let myself be buried completely with
scribbling for the _Vorwärts_, but I will have to produce the two lead
articles [weekly], and this is also a very important position to
maintain—but then too, there’s the loot! In financial respects we are
finally coming back to life, freeing ourselves from debts, and gradually
we’ll be able to get some absolutely essential things for ourselves. As
far as the position goes, it will be my duty, in view of the fact that
the editorial board will, of necessity, consist of wretched pen-pushers
(although they are all “kosher”)—it will be my duty to “set the tone”³⁷²
and _de facto_ I will have to play first violin. Don’t forget that at
the same time: _This is the first experiment since the world began with
the formation of a thoroughly radical cabinet at_ _VORWÄRTS__, and it
will be necessary to show that the left is capable of governing_.³⁷³ If
they offer me the editorship (which is not excluded, because August
[Bebel] has me down on his list), I have decided to DECLINE. Why would I
need the hassle [_Kram_] and the responsibility for technical aspects of
a newspaper plus the night work? I would feel MOST COMFORTABLE with
writing the lead articles at home, and in this way I would still have an
influential position. What do you think about all this? Write
immediately!

Today I went to see Ger[isch] and received 10,000, which I’ve already
taken to the bank. The total amount to be distributed [among the various
Polish and Russian groups, etc.] came to 116,000, according to the
accounting given in the _Vorwärts_.³⁷⁴ They are holding 6,000 of this in
reserve for any minor requirements, and that makes 110,000 available. Of
this, the amount allotted to us is 22,000. In August and September we
already received 2,000 + 5,000 = 7,000. Add to this the 10,000 that I
have now received, and it comes to 17,000. Another 5,000 remain for us
in the treasury of the SPD Executive, which we can request and obtain at
any time. After the deposit of today’s 10,000, we have in the bank, free
and clear, approximately 22,400 (plus Ger[isch] has another 5,000). As
you see, our situation is not bad at all.

N.B.: An important matter. As I learned at Essen and later at the
_Vorwärts_, the [German] Mine Workers’ Union a little while ago (in June
or July, for certain) spent 5,000 marks _for the support of striking
mine workers in the Russo-Polish mining district_. I detect a bad smell
here, and I suspect that this is some swindle of the PPS, because our
people certainly have not received anything. And since this money was
given expressly for MINE WORKERS without distinction as to party, the
PPS could be forced by the Mine Workers’ Union to give us half.
Consequently, we need to find out above all whether our people in the
coal-mining district know anything about the 5,000 marks. Further, a
formal inquiry should be addressed to the General Commission [of the
German trade unions] asking what address the 5,000 marks was sent to.
And in the event of trickery by the PPS, payment of half [to us] should
be demanded.

But I would prefer that this be dealt with WITHOUT ME and that our
committee abroad AS SUCH not come forward, but SOMEHOW our organization
in the coal-mining district [should do this], and in case of need it can
undertake all tasks related to unmasking the so-called strike committee
to which the money was given, its party affiliation, and the limits of
its influence. It will be necessary for your conference to clear up this
matter. I assume that it might be appropriate if because of this
question some competent person from among our people were to come here
to Berlin from Dąbrowa.

Now I have to complain to you some more: I am now receiving, every time
the mail arrives, two or three invitations to give a public talk in the
most varied places, often with _express reference to the “outstanding
speech in Jena.”_ (For example, I received one from Dortmund today.)
This really is a plague because it gives me no pleasure at all to send
back the standard impersonal refusal notice. But I have to do it.

Now I’m devoting myself to improving the piece about
“self-administration.” Damn it, I myself don’t know how I am to work my
way through this. You really are slick, leaving all these questions to
me to sort out. But how the hell am I supposed to know what to do? Well,
I’ll do the best I can. But all this has to be put off once again! I’m
hurrying off to work. Hugs. R.

TO LEO JOGICHES

[October 26–7, 1905] Thursday

My precious Dziodziuś!

Today, in connection with the wrangles and rows [_awantury_] at the
_Vorwärts_ (the lead article),³⁷⁵ the Kautskys again took my time before
the [morning] mail. They came running over to share the news and discuss
the situation. I enclose an item for you from the _Berliner Tageblatt_.
It looks like I won’t avoid the pleasure, beginning on November 1, of
scribbling [_bazgrać_] for the _Vorwärts_, and one must seriously take
this into account.

Today I received from you a few words written in pencil. I would be fine
with the shortness [of your note], because I know how much work you have
now, but even in those few words I hear the sound of a downcast mood
[_gedrückte Stimmung_], which strikes me unpleasantly. Or maybe that’s
just the impression I get? However, I think you ought to be able to
definitely set the day of your arrival [in Berlin] because it looks like
there will be no conference because of the railroad strike!³⁷⁶ And the
_Przegląd_ is already finished, as you yourself wrote [to me].

Today with great interest I was browsing through [_czytala się_]
_Osvobozhdenie_, No. 77, and saw two things that you must take a stand
on in the next issue of _Czerwony Sztandar_. (1) The proceedings of the
congress of peasant unions in Russia; and (2) a report on negotiations
by the Bureau of the most recent gathering of zemstvo assemblies with
representatives of our National Democrats [ND] and Progressive Democrats
[PD], along with a PROJECT OF AUTONOMY for Poland, which these gentlemen
presented (“privately”). We MUST place that last point under a
magnifying glass, and do it immediately! Most likely _Naprzód,
Przedświt_, etc., have already taken it up. Generally speaking the
entire abnormality of the manner and way in which my Polish work is done
struck me very vividly today. I get an order: “Write a lead article
about autonomy (or about the Constituent Assembly).” Fine! But hell!
It’s necessary to follow the Polish and Russian newspapers, to be _au
courant_ with what is happening in society, to have a feeling
[_Fühlung_] for the issues facing the party. Otherwise what will come
from my pen will be a kind of repetition of tiresome formulas. I can’t
just fire blindly [_ins Schwarze treffen_]. And now the time has passed
when it was possible to set forth [_izlagat_] the positive views of the
party in agitational form. Now every issue is an object of PARTISAN
STRUGGLE. And to limit this struggle now, out of old habit, to the PPS
alone is a big anachronism. To write an article about autonomy now, it
is necessary to take into account not only the PPS but also the ND and
PD, as well as the conciliators [ugodowcy].³⁷⁷ Every move [of all these
groups] has to be taken into account. And how can I do that without
seeing with my own eyes the Polish publications, not only the legal ones
but also those from abroad, _Naprzód, Przedświt_, etc., and furthermore,
_PRAWDA_, among others. Some time ago in the summer, from time to time,
I was getting large quantities of clippings on one or another question.
But now for two to three months I haven’t seen any Polish publications.
And now is when the most important things are happening. How am I, in
such a situation, supposed to write an article about this accursed
question of autonomy? It was only BY ACCIDENT that I found out about the
[autonomy] project of the ND and PD, from the issue of _Osvobozhdenie_
that you sent me, but you sent it because of an entirely different
article (about the Duma). But can one rely on that? On what’s in their
publications?

FRIDAY. I just got to that point yesterday evening when Karl and Luise
Kautsky came rushing in, to take me with them to August’s [Bebel’s]. The
latter had written to him [Kautsky] again that I should guarantee a lead
article for Tuesday (the first issue under the new leadership) and Karl
should guarantee one for Wednesday. August also wrote to Julek
[Marchlewski] in regard to his becoming a contributor, because Cunow
would like to shift the _Wirtschaftliches_ [economics writing] over onto
Julek, so that Cunow can devote himself to writing on politics. To tell
the truth, there was no real reason for going to see August, but I
didn’t want to turn Karl down or disappoint him, and in general it is
useful [ist _es nützlich_] [i.e., to visit Bebel]. We sat around and
chatted, or rather, listened, because as always he [August] did the
talking “all by himself” till 11 pm. As it turned out, the ENTIRE
bourgeois press had sunk its teeth [_poch-wycila na zęby_] into this
roast beef [den _Braten_]; there was even a lead article in _Vossin!_
Everywhere this same “r-r-revolutionary Rosa” is presented as a
terrifying monster [_Schreckgespenst_]; a bugaboo [to frighten the
children]. August remains as solid as iron [_Aujust ist fest wie
Eisen_].³⁷⁸ As for your advice about the honorariums, or fees, that I
will get for my writing, forgive me, but I will do things a little
differently, according to my own instincts and nature, not being
interested in personal gain—not by any means, far from it!
[_bynajmniej_]. No, I will not START OFF by reading out some conditions
or haggling [_targowac_]. At this moment there is only one thing of
importance, to get rid of those pestilences, “to clean the garbage out
of the house.” What has now been created is by nature a provisional
situation [_ein Provisorium_]. Therefore now the most important thing is
to show what one can do [_was man kann_]; to show oneself as petty and
calculating [_sich kleinlich und berechnend zeigen_] now would be
extremely inappropriate. Besides, I don’t have the slightest concern
about that, because in relation to the SPD Executive I have no reason to
complain, thank God! (And the same goes for the editorial board of the
_Vorwärts_—remember the honoraria for my Marx articles.)³⁷⁹ In
short—_everything will soon fall into place_; _the main thing is: to
remain cool, calm, and collected, behave with complete correctness, and
give a solid performance at the first shot_.³⁸⁰ Don’t misunderstand me
[_Missverstehe mich nicht_], when I talk about a provisional situation,
I have in mind, not MONTHS, but at the most a few weeks.

Today I will energetically get down to starting the lead article for
_Czerwony Sztandar_, even though, as I have written above, it really is
difficult for me to wander around in the fog, thrashing blindly with a
stick [_mit der Stange im Nebel herum(zu)fahren_]. As far as our little
German paper³⁸¹ is concerned, write immediately and unhesitatingly to
say what you need from me. It’s nothing. It can be written in three
seconds [_v tri miga_] without much thinking. So don’t delay. I trust
that you received the postscript on autonomy yesterday. And so I’m
waiting for the _Przegląd Robotniczy_ [to arrive] within a few days. You
must write me about whether anything will come of your conference in
view of the situation on the railroads. If not, do you have any reason
to stay there after finishing _Przegląd Robotniczy?_

In today’s brand-new issue of _Proletary_, aside from the excerpt from
_Czerwony Sztandar_ (which, N.B., even in translation stands out, with
its talent and form, in favorable contrast to the entire awkward and
boorish _Proletary_), be sure to take note of the correspondence from
Wilno about us (on the last page). Wouldn’t it be possible to eliminate
once and for all that “committee” of ours in Wilno, so that those clowns
would cease to embarrass us with their stubborn presence? Because,
evidently, no work will ever be [accomplished] there. I am enclosing
correspondence from Częstochowa. N.B.: In _Iskra_, there did not appear
the little article of which Parvus gave me the corrected galley proof.
I’m enclosing it for you. It may be [that it didn’t appear] because of
lack of space. But their _chutzpah_³⁸² and their criticism of the
conference³⁸³ are indeed funny. They don’t irritate me; they just make
me laugh. I’m surprised that you take such a tragic view of them. N.B.,
yesterday I already started the article for _Neue Zeit_, but in view of
the events,³⁸⁴ how should I write about the nonsensical tactical
disagreements [_takticheskie raznoglasiya_] now when the situation and
MY position would require something more like the articles I wrote in
February and March,³⁸⁵ conceived broadly and on a large scale, not
polemical, but educational [_breit angelegt, grosszügig, und nicht
polemisch, sondern belehrend_]. At any rate, my second lead article for
the _Vorwärts_ must be about Russia. I’m hurrying off for the MORNING
MAIL, and so I send you hugs! Today, most likely, I will write you once
more, if they don’t interrupt me again.

Your Rosa

[P.S.] When you are here all quirky, capricious thoughts [_alle
Marotten_] will go flying out of your head in an instant!

TO LEO JOGICHES

[Friedenau, November 1, 1905]

Precious! In haste, just a few words: I’ve been particularly busy at the
_Vorwärts_ all day, and from 4 in the afternoon at that. This proves
it—the carriage is stuck in the mud [_der Karren steckt im Dreck_], and
I must energetically lend a helping hand. Yesterday right there on the
spot I wrote the lead article,³⁸⁶ and I worked up all the news
dispatches about Russia. Again today I’m going in to write the lead
article³⁸⁷ and about Russia. Therefore, briefly:³⁸⁸

As far as the tactic in regard to the tsar’s Manifesto I share your
opinion entirely, and I go even farther in distrust [_im Misstrauen_].
Our slogan must be: _Jusqu’à outrance!_³⁸⁹ _This_ is the sense in which
I wrote yesterday’s lead article, and today the same. N.B., you can take
these two lead articles from the _Vorwärts_ word for word or rework them
as you wish for printing in the _Czerwony Sztandar_ or as a pamphlet.
Yesterday I received from Sosnowiec a gigantic news dispatch
[_Riesentelegramm_], which they will print in the _Vorwärts_ today.³⁹⁰

On the whole, I remain as cool as the nose on a dog [_ich bleibe kalt
wie eine Hundeschnauze_].

Your plans regarding Warsaw are excellent. As far as my work goes, you
can be at peace in your mind, but my peace of mind depends on your
activity [_ist bedingt durch Deine Rührigkeit_]. At least for this week
you must get along without me. Summon Julek [Marchlewski] to Kraków by
telegram, so that he can do the writing according to your dictation. He
wrote me just today that he is free and is getting ready to travel.
Parv[us] likewise. My article pleased everyone today. August [Bebel],
poor thing, runs around in the editorial offices every evening, all
worked up and dissatisfied with our oxen. I must help out as much as I
can. And so I’m flying off now to the _Vorwärts_.

Hugs!

Write about everything.

R.

TO LEO JOGICHES

[Friedenau, November 3, 1905]

Precious! I’ve received all the telegrams and at this very moment your
(duplicated) express letter.

You ask why I don’t write and what I’m doing. Well, “Why should I tell
you a whole lot, Mr. Cohn?” [_“Was soll ich Ihnen viel sagen, Herr
Cohn?”_]—I feel sick as a dog. The _Vorwärts_ is going downhill, as you
correctly note, quickly sinking to the level of the _Sächsische
Arbeiter-Zeitung_, and the worst thing about it is that I’m the only one
who understands this, and in part, K. K. [Karl Kautsky].

The editorial board consists of oxen, and arrogant ones at that. Not a
single real _journalist_. Meanwhile, Eisner & Co., together with the
whole mob [_Meute_] of revisionists, are carrying on an embittered
polemic against us in the press, and they are answered either by August
[Bebel] (!) or Cunow or the like (!!). And the only thing I’m allowed to
do is Russia [_Russland_], to write an editorial here and there [_hie
und da_], and to give good advice and undertake initiatives that, in
their implementation, turn out to be so awful that I have to hold my
head. A small example. Right after “our” first issue (November 1) I
commented to Ströbel that the item he had written against Calwer was
wretched, as though Eisner had written it, that we had not come on board
at the _Vorwärts_ in order to _vilyat’_³⁹¹ like cowardly dogs, that one
must write sharply and clearly [_scharf und_ _klar schreiben_]. Here’s
what he said to me about this the other day: _“Well, I will do better
now, so that you will feel satisfied with me.”_³⁹² And now what I find
in today’s issue is frightful empty chatter, such as “revolutionary heat
lightning” [_“Revolutionäres Wetterleuchten”_]—a series of meaningless
phrases, “radical” terminology, and ON TOP OF IT ALL this occurs in the
Political Overview section [_Politische Übersicht_]. Isn’t it enough to
make you howl? [_Ist das nicht zum Heulen?_] And if you were to have
even a little look at the STYLE in which they all write! It makes me
want to crawl out of my skin! [_Aus der Haut fahren möchte ich!_] What’s
frightening of course is the disgrace that awaits us (the radicals). And
I see no way out, because the PERSONNEL are lacking. Besides all this,
keep in mind that I’m as TIRED as a dog and am barely dragging myself
around. This daily traveling to the editorial offices at 4 pm and
returning toward 9 pm, plus the chatter that goes on there with this
crew—it’s causing me indescribable torment. Meanwhile (since the
housemaid has been here) I get up every morning promptly at 8, and I go
around sleep-deprived the whole time, because I can’t get to sleep at
night from hangover of the psyche [_vor Katzenjammer_]. To put it
briefly—everything’s fine [_es ist schön_].

I’m terribly happy about what our people are doing at home [i.e., in
Poland]. Unfortunately, I’m not able to put very much [about it] in the
_Vorwärts_, because of lack of space. If you’ve read carefully, [you’ve
seen that] I’ve been praising, not the RUSSIAN Social Democrats, but
those of the whole country, and that means OUR tactic toward the Duma.

Hugs. R.

TO LUISE AND KARL KAUTSKY

[Ilowo, December 29, 1905]
Friday, 12 noon

My dearest ones!

I am sitting here, not being a “molder of men,” but eating schnitzel
with potatoes. I spent the whole night rumbling along on the slow train
between Alexandrowo and Torun [German name, Thorn] and I’m as tired as a
dog.³⁹³ Here I am waiting for the train to Mlawa. What will happen after
that—is still unclear. There’s no hope of [choosing the option of] a
horse and carriage until Sunday, because of Shabbos!³⁹⁴ To make up for
that, there is still a train supposedly going to Warsaw today—under
military escort! The tragicomedy of the situation, in that event, you
can picture for yourself. The whole train would be occupied by the
military, and among them—probably as the only passenger—would be
me … This joke played by history can, however, easily turn serious, in
the event of an encounter with striking railroad workers along the way.
Hopefully, in Warsaw I won’t be met with Brownings!

Many kisses! R.

[P.S.] Give my greetings to [Paul] Singer and explain to him why I
couldn’t say goodbye to him. At Alexandrowo everything went quite
smoothly.³⁹⁵

TO LUISE AND KARL KAUTSKY

[Warsaw, December 30, 1905]
Saturday

My dearest ones!

Yesterday at 9 in the evening I arrived safely in a train that was
unheated, had its lights out, and was escorted by the military; it crept
along at “Granny’s pace” for fear of surprises. The city is like a place
of the dead, [there’s a] general strike, soldiers everywhere you turn.
The work is going well, [and] today I start in.

Many heartfelt greetings. Your Rosa

TO LUISE AND KARL KAUTSKY

[Warsaw,] January 2, 1906

My dearest ones!

I’m writing briefly, because I have very little time. Up to now I have
been trying to orient myself on the status of our work and the general
situation, [and] now I am plunging into the work. Here’s how I would
characterize it in just a few words (but ONLY FOR YOU TWO): the general
strike seems to have MISFIRED, mostly in St. Petersburg, where the
railroad workers made no attempt to carry it out at all. (Thus,
Deutsch’s information was hot air of dubious value.) In general, there’s
a vacillating, wait-and-see attitude. The reason for all this is the
simple circumstance that the GENERAL STRIKE BY ITSELF, PLAIN AND SIMPLE,
has played out its role. Only direct, universal fighting in the street
can now bring a resolution [to the situation], but for that there must
be more preparation for the right moment. And so this wait-and-see
attitude may continue for a while. It could be then that some
“accident,” a new manifesto [by the tsar] or something similar, could
set off a sudden, spontaneous outbreak. In general the work is going
quite well and the mood is very good. One need only explain to the
masses WHY the present strike seems outwardly to have gone by “without
results.” —The organization is growing strongly everywhere, but at the
same time it’s having trouble, because everything is in flux. The worst
thing is the chaos in St. Petersburg. Moscow is doing much better, and
the fighting in Moscow [where there was an armed uprising] has raised
the general tactics to a new level. —There can be no talk of leadership
from St. Petersburg; the people [there] localize their outlook to a
laughable degree. (By the way, this was also expressed in the arguments
that were made, with D[eutsch] asking for material aid ONLY for St.
Petersburg. Even from their own point of view this was extremely unwise,
as I observed to myself afterward. The revolution can never be
victorious in St. Petersburg alone; it can now be victorious only in the
Russian empire as a whole.)

Now here I come with some urgent requests, as follows: (1) please send
me the article by Mehring immediately by registered letter, addressed to
Dr. J. Goldenberg, Wierzbowa 9 (with an inner envelope addressed to me),
to be sent directly to Warsaw WITHOUT going through Torun. (2) Luise,
speak with Freythaler at _Vorwärts_ right away and ask him to begin
sending on the same day TWO COPIES of _Vorwärts_ daily in a newspaper
wrapper addressed as follows: to the Editors of the Scientific Library
[_Redaktion der Biblioteka Naukowa_], Warsaw, Nowy Świąt 37. I think he
has already sent some issues, but because of the postal strike only one
number arrived, and besides, I now need TWO COPIES, both in ONE
newspaper wrapper. (3) Be so good as to inform MEHRING of the same
address with the same request for two copies in one newspaper wrapper,
so that I can receive the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_. (4) Send to me also,
at the same address, every week in a single newspaper wrapper the
newsletter of the General Commission [of the German trade unions],
together with [the publication] _Soziale Praxis_. We need that for the
trade union publication that is now going to appear [here]. I’m waiting
for that to come RIGHT AWAY. Send the most recent issues if you can
still find them. (5) Be so kind, dear Luise, to get from my desk a kind
of paper bag with blue stars on it, right at the front of the desk
drawer; it contains various printed materials. Send it to me as a
sealed, registered letter to the above address (Nowy Świąt) urgently,
ADDRESSED TO ME. (6) ABOVE the desk next to the bust of Voltaire in a
file of papers there is a large paper bag with my Russian manuscript in
it, something like 116 numbered and typed pages. If it’s not there, it’s
lying up above the marble bust or perhaps it’s inside the drawer. If you
find it, send it also as a sealed, registered letter to the Nowy Świąt
address, to me. In case the weight is too much, make two letters out of
it.

Now again I’ve overloaded you with requests, but I know that you’ll do
it all willingly. My dearest, it’s very lovely here. Every day two or
three persons are bayoneted by the soldiers in the city. Arrests are
increasing daily, but other than that everything is quite cheerful.
Despite the martial law we’re bringing out our [newspaper _Czerwony_]
_Sztandar_ EVERY DAY, and it’s being sold on the street. As soon as
martial law is lifted, our legal daily will appear again—_Trybuna_
[_Ludowa_]. Nowadays we have to force them every day to print the
_Sztandar_ with revolver in hand at bourgeois print shops. Public
meetings will also begin right away as soon as martial law is over [and]
then you should be hearing from me. Fierce cold weather prevails here,
and people travel only by sleigh.

I have to close. Many kisses to both of you and to the boys, heartfelt
greetings to Granny, Hans [Kautsky], Mehring and Singer, and my
colleagues [at _Vorwärts_]. Write me IMMEDIATELY about how you are doing
and what’s going on in general, how things are with the _Vorwärts_, and
whether August [Bebel] hasn’t been cursing and scolding. Address
ordinary letters to Goldenb[erg], with an envelope inside for me.

Greetings from the heart, Your R.

TO LUISE AND KARL KAUTSKY

[Warsaw,] January 11 [1906]

My dearest ones!

Heartfelt thanks for your two (unfortunately so short) letters, which I
had been waiting for with great longing. I did not send you a telegram
because M[archlewski] was just about to go to Berlin; but his trip, as
so often happens, was postponed for a few days. Hopefully, he has passed
on to you my greetings and has asked you to send me some things as
BUSINESS PAPERS by registered mail. Then everything will fit comfortably
in two envelopes. We have received the _Vorwärts_ here only ONCE (the
“red” issue), with two copies of same, but since then—nothing! Why that
is, maybe the gods and the Cossacks know. With the greatest impatience
I’m waiting for Mehring’s article, [whose absence] is holding us up with
the publication of the one by Karl [Kautsky]. Is the problem that
M[ehring] hasn’t written it at all? I’m writing to him at this time, but
you remind him too, dear Luise. In the last few days there was a man
here from the OK (the minority).³⁹⁶ I pumped him for all possible
information about the situation and want to write it up as an article
for the _Vorwärts_. By the way, while I’m here I have the lofty
intention of writing regularly for the _Neue Zeit_ so as to shed more
light there on the events, because the _Vorwärts_ is not geared to that.
If only one had a bit more time!

From the _Moskal_³⁹⁷ I have also learned, by the way, that Parvus
resigned from the chairmanship and from his seat in the Soviet of
Workers’ Delegates, after he ended up in a minority on the question of
the course that was taken by the most recent general strike. The
question had to do with how the strike, which had lost steam, could be
invigorated. P[arvus] proposed that an armed uprising be proclaimed,
following the model of Moscow, in order to save the situation. Everyone
agreed with the idea, but the majority of them were convinced that it
could not be carried out at that time. P[arvus] explained that he
understood that he had overestimated his knowledge of the conditions, he
wanted above all to keep on learning, and was stepping down in order to
devote himself to his newspaper, which is having colossal success. At
present, by the way, not a single newspaper of Social Democracy is being
published in all of Russia. Also, all democratic papers are banned,
[including] colorless ones, and even reactionary rags! (That our
[_Czerwony_] _Sztandar_ appears daily in spite of that and is sold in
the city you probably already know from M[archlewski].) At the moment
the state of affairs is this: on the one hand, one feels generally that
the coming phase of the struggle will be that of an armed encounter. I
have learned a lot about [what happened in] Moscow and it is most
gratifying. (As soon as I have exact and reliable reports I will write
you.) For the time being there’s only this much, that in Moscow a
victory rather than a defeat should be recorded. The regular infantry
remained inactive, even the Cossacks! Only the cavalry and artillery are
still “battle worthy.” The losses on the side of the revolutionaries are
minimal. It was the citizenry as a whole who suffered terribly, that is,
people who were totally uninvolved bystanders, because the soldiers
simply fired blindly and destroyed people’s homes. The result: the
entire citizenry is furious and in revolt! Money for the arming of the
workers is given by them now on a massive scale— almost no one among the
leading revolutionaries in Moscow was killed. Only the Social
Revolutionaries fell completely into a government trap when they were
attending a large “closed” conference, and that was right at the
beginning. The entire struggle was led by the Social Democrats. On the
other hand, the Duma and the elections have appeared on the scene. You
know about the mean and shabby election law.³⁹⁸ It turns out that
martial law will NOT be lifted at the time of the elections!! It should
seem that under such circumstances PARTICIPATION in the elections should
be ruled out even more than with the Bulygin Duma.

Well, get this: the Social Democrats in St. Petersburg have decided TO
TAKE PART IN THE ELECTIONS, and to do so with some crazy, artificial
plan [as follows]: people are supposed to take part in the elections at
all levels, or stages. (In the province the elections are going to be in
FOUR stages!!) But [they decided to do this] on the basis of—an election
law providing universal suffrage (which does not exist). Furthermore,
those who are elected up to the highest level will merely be delegates;
they are not supposed to be deputies in the Duma … but are supposed to
[somehow] constitute themselves as the governmental authority in the
province. The devil only knows, it’s more than I can bear just to repeat
this nonsense—this is [the result of] the victory of the _Iskra_
people³⁹⁹ over the Lenin people, and they are very proud of it.
Unfortunately, I could not travel to St. Petersburg at the right time;
otherwise, I would have poured a little salt on this “victory.” Now we
have become “different nations” in a very stupid situation. IN FACT even
this elaborate and artistic plan will naturally fall apart in practice,
because the first time election rallies are attacked general chaos will
ensue, with the entire election campaign developing into open fighting.
However, out of considerations of solidarity with St. Petersburg, it
would not be fitting [for us] to put forward a different slogan,
separately, and yet we cannot go along with the craziness. Well,
probably we’ll stick with an open, simple, and clear REJECTION of any
elections based on a four-class election law and held under martial law.

I will go to St. Petersburg in a few weeks. At the beginning of February
the two factions will be holding the first joint, constituent party
congress.⁴⁰⁰ Naturally I want to go there. In this connection it occurs
to me that it would be appropriate, in order to help the German party
link up more with the revolution, for the German Social Democracy to be
represented at this party congress. That would also have a beneficial
effect on the factions and the possible friction between them. But since
no one from Germany under the given conditions will be traveling to St.
Petersburg and no one can speak Russian, perhaps the SPD Executive could
entrust the representation of Germany to me. I am after all on the
scene, so that there would be no additional cost for the Executive. Dear
Karl, if you consider this correct, speak with the “patriarchs” [that
is, the party leaders] about it, because I cannot do so myself; they
should not think that I have some personal stake in this. But you must
undertake it very SOON, because the date of the party congress has not
yet been fixed and could easily be expedited [that is, come sooner
rather than later].

I have written a pamphlet about the general situation and the tasks here
[in Russia], which is at the printer.⁴⁰¹ Besides that, a GERMAN-LANGUAGE
weekly for the city of łódż and a TRADE-UNION weekly are supposed to
begin this week. I am therefore waiting with great longing for the
newsletter [of the German trade-union commission] and other trade-union
publications (the Austrian ones!).

Personally things are not going quite as I would like. Physically I am
feeling somewhat under the weather, but that will soon be better. I see
my sisters once a week. They complain bitterly about that, but—“We can’t
do anything about it” [non _possumus_]! What are you doing, my dearest
ones, all of you? What are you writing now, Karolus? How is it going
with Würmchen [Emanuel Wurm]? How are things with the _Vorwärts_? Has
[Hans] Block been hired? Is he being involved in the work? What is
Granny doing and what about the boys? In the midst of this hurly-burly I
am constantly thinking about all of you, [especially] my Lulu. Write me
again, but soon. With a thousand kisses and best wishes to all, Your R.

TO LUISE AND KARL KAUTSKY

[Warsaw,] February 5 [1906]

My dearest, most favorite people!

I haven’t let you hear from me for a long time, and you’re probably
feeling resentful, and rightly so. But I have as justification for
myself the unending hurly-burly and the “insecurity of existence” that
one constantly suffers from here. I can’t very well describe the details
now, but the main things are: enormous difficulties with getting things
printed, arrests every day, and threats of the firing squad for those
who have been arrested. Two of our comrades had this Damocles sword
hanging over their heads for days, but it seems that the danger has
passed. In spite of everything, work is proceeding cheerfully, big
factory meetings are taking place, new leaflets are written and printed
almost every day, and our newspaper, though with moaning and groaning,
comes out almost every day. A small conference has just taken place in
Finland, in which all parties participated. This was a new edition of
the old idea of a “bloc” [with the liberals] and of course was a
washout. In this connection, one at least had the opportunity to get a
closer look at things in St. Petersburg. Unfortunately, the scene
presented there is a real mockery of the latest news reports from St.
Petersburg in the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_! Indescribable chaos in the
organization, factional collapse despite all the [talk of] unification,
and general depression. (Let’s keep this just between us.) And by the
way, don’t take it too tragically. As soon as a fresh wave of events
comes, the people there will also move forward more strongly and
briskly. The ONLY unfortunate thing is that they are always so
vacillating and so little capable of standing on their own feet. The
family gathering will take place somewhat later than was originally
intended.⁴⁰² At any rate, many thanks for the greeting from the
“elders,” which I will deliver when the time comes.

Right now the Achilles’ heel of the movement in St. Petersburg, as it is
with us [in Poland], is the colossal unemployment, which is spreading
like a terrible plague … I actually wanted to write just a few lines by
way of introduction to the situation, in order to get on to that which
interests me most of all at this moment, but I see that in this letter
also “events” are threatening to overwhelm me again, and so I will take
an audacious step backward and finally show up as a “human being” with
the question: How are you, dearest Lulu?! Carolus, you know, wrote me in
a manner deserving many thanks, calming me down several times;
nevertheless worry constantly nags me in the midst of all the
hurly-burly here, even when I can’t get around to writing. What is it
that went wrong with you so suddenly? To this day I still don’t know! It
must be something terrible if it has had such a prolonged effect. Are
you able to go out yet? Are you in a weakened condition? Look here, all
the years when I was there with you, you were always fresh and bright;
and hardly do I go off into the world—when suddenly you become seriously
ill! How many times I’ve thought to myself here in the midst of the
work: if only I was there; every day I would like to sit with you for
several hours and tend to you with such love! Well, hopefully, you don’t
need anyone to tend to you any more. If it is possible for you, write me
a few lines as a sign; it will be a great joy for me! I hope things are
going well for everyone else. That the youngsters have not yet written
to me is a source of no little annoyance for me. We do not receive the
_Vorwärts_ at all, and the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_ very irregularly. As
for me, in the next few days it will be decided whether I will travel
from here to St. Petersburg for a short time or whether instead of that
I will go for two months _ad penates_⁴⁰³ —to see you. The only thing
that attracts me personally of course is you, because otherwise, to tell
the truth, the thought of the same old treadmill [in Germany] and the
arguments and debates with Pëus and Rexhäuser are a sheer horror to me
now!

But to pick up the threads again: unemployment, _voilà la plaie de la
révolution_.⁴⁰⁴ There is no means of controlling it! At the same time a
silent heroism and a feeling of class solidarity among the masses is
developing, which I would like to show [as an example] to the dear
Germans. Everywhere the workers are making certain arrangements ON THEIR
OWN INITIATIVE so that, for example, the employed workers regularly take
up a weekly collection for the unemployed. Or where employment has been
reduced to four days a week, they arrange things so that no one is left
out, but everyone works at least a few hours a day. All this is done so
smoothly and self-reliantly that it was only incidentally that
information about it was given to the party. In fact the feeling of
solidarity and even of brotherhood with the RUSSIAN workers has
developed so strongly that one is involuntarily amazed, even though we
ourselves have worked toward that goal. —So then, here is an interesting
experience from the revolution: in all the factories “on their own
initiative” committees have been formed by the workers that make
decisions about all conditions of work, the hiring and firing of
workers, etc. The employer has literally ceased to be “master in his own
home.” Here’s an odd little sample: recently factory management wanted
to punish some workers because of extreme lateness, but the factory
committee prevented that; the factory owner appealed to the committee of
the Social Democratic Party, complaining that this matter “had not been
dealt with according to basic Social Democratic principles,” since,
after all, Social Democracy was supposed to stand for firm and honorable
fulfillment of obligations! And it’s like that at every turn! Of course
all this, after the revolution and the return to “normal conditions,”
will probably become quite different. But these conditions won’t
disappear without a trace. For the time being the work accomplished by
the revolution, of deepening class contradictions and sharpening and
clarifying relationships, has been enormous. And from outside the
country one cannot see all this at all! People think that the struggle
is over when in fact it has gone down into the depths. And at the same
time the ORGANIZATION is making forward steps tirelessly. In spite of
martial law the trade unions of Social Democracy have been built
solidly—with all the formalities: printed membership booklets, stamps,
by-laws, regular meetings, etc. The work is being carried out completely
as though political freedom already existed. And naturally the police
are powerless against this mass movement. In łódż, for example, we
already have 6,000 members signed up in the Social Democratic trade
union for textile workers! Here in Warsaw we have 700 bricklayers, 600
bakers, etc. In St. Petersburg the work has reportedly returned entirely
to “underground conditions.” And for that reason it has also come to a
stop. They are absolutely incapable there of publishing even a flyer or
a leaflet or a newspaper, absolutely. I would like to be there to get to
the bottom of all that. Unfortunately, I have to close already, and I
have one more request: Dear Carolus, please send 1,600 marks from the
main account⁴⁰⁵ in the form of a check made out to: Otto Engelmann, and
send it by registered mail to the address I previously gave you. It’s
urgent! As for that letter from Wilna, everything’s in order.

A thousand kisses and best wishes to all of you, particularly to you,
dearest Lulu. Write me very soon!!! Your R.

TO LUISE AND KARL KAUTSKY

[March 13, 1906]

My dearest, most favorite people!

On Sunday evening, the 4th [of March], fate caught up with me: I was
arrested. My passport had already been stamped for my return journey,
and I was on the verge of leaving. Well, that’s the way it goes.
Hopefully, you won’t take the matter too much to heart. Long live the Re
…! [i.e., the Revolution] and everything that comes with it. To a
certain extent, so to speak, I would much rather be sitting here
than … debating with Pëus. I was found in a rather awkward situation,
but let’s pass over that in silence. I’m sitting here in the City Hall
[prison], where “politicals,” common criminals, and the mentally ill are
all crammed together. My cell, which is a jewel in this setting (an
ordinary single cell that in normal times holds one person), now holds
fourteen guests, fortunately all politicals. Next door to us are two
large double-cells, each with about thirty persons, all in a state of
confusion. But these conditions, I am told, are like paradise. Earlier
there were sixty people in a cell, and at night they slept in shifts for
a couple of hours each while the others were walking. Now we all sleep
like kings, lying across wooden benches and packed next to one another
like sardines, and everything’s going quite well—as long as no extra
music is brought in, as happened yesterday, for example, when we
received a new colleague, a raving mad Jewish woman, who for twenty-four
hours straight kept [everyone in] all the cells holding their breath
because of her screaming and running around, and she brought quite a few
of the politicals to tears. Today at last we are rid of her and have
only three quiet crazy people [_meshugginah_] with us. No one here has
any notion about going for walks in the courtyard. To make up for it,
the cells are left open during the day, and one may walk in the corridor
all day long, thus being able to rub elbows with the prostitutes and
hear their beautiful songs and sayings, and to enjoy the sweet aromas
from the OO [toilet], which is likewise always open. All this is merely
to describe the [external] relations of things, not my [inner] mood,
which is, as always, superb. Currently I am veiled from sight, but it
probably won’t last long. They don’t trust me. On the whole the case is
a serious one, because, after all, we are living in turbulent times,
when “all that exists deserves to perish.”⁴⁰⁶

Therefore, I don’t believe at all in any long-term money changing and
promissory notes. So be of good cheer and thumb your nose at everything.
On the whole, for us here, during my lifetime things have gone SUPERBLY.
I am proud of that. This was the only oasis in all of Russia where, in
spite of storm and stress, the work and the struggle went forward as
boldly and merrily as it did, and progress was made, as at the time of
the “freest constitution in the world.” Among other things, our work is
an obstruction that will be a model for later times in all of Russia.
Healthwise, things are going quite well for me. I will soon be
transferred to another prison, because the case is a serious one. I will
send you word about that soon. How are things with you, my dearest ones?
What are you up to? And the boys? And Granny? And Hans? Give our friend
Franziskus [Mehring] heartfelt greetings from me. Hopefully, things are
going well again at the _Vorwärts_ thanks to the firm [Hans] Block.⁴⁰⁷

Now some requests to you, Luise: (1) Please pay my rent; I will
reimburse you promptly with many thanks. (2) Please send immediately,
with my authorization, a money order for 2,000 Austrian krone, to Mr.
Alexander Ripper at Teodorczuk’s print shop in Kraków, Ulica Zielona No.
7, and designate Mr. Adam Pendzichowski as sender. Leave all FURTHER
demands of any kind from that quarter UNANSWERED. (3) Likewise, 500
marks to Janiszewski, at his print shop in Berlin, Elisabeth-ufer 29,
with ADAM as the sender. (4) Other than that, don’t give out any money
without a request FROM ME, at the most paying from the special account,
never from the main account. The only eventuality would be in response
to a request from KARSKI; otherwise, no. And also, not from the account
that Hans has. (5) Ask for our share from the oldtimers and from
Huysmans and deposit that in the main account. (6) Karl, dear, for the
time being you will have to undertake representation of the Social
Democracy of Poland and Lithuania at the [International Socialist]
Bureau,⁴⁰⁸ informing them officially, and you will be repaid for any
necessary travel expenses to attend the sessions. (7) My imprisonment
should not be publicized, until such time as a definitive unveiling
occurs … THEN, however—and I will let you know—make a lot of noise, so
that the people here will get a scare.

I have to close. A thousand kisses and best wishes. Write directly to my
address: Mrs. Anna Matschke, City Hall Prison, Warsaw. I am, after all,
a staff member of _Neue Zeit_. But of course write respectably. Once
again, best wishes. The cell doors are being closed. I hug you both with
all my heart. Your Anna

TO LUISE AND KARL KAUTSKY

August 11, 1906

My dearest ones!

I am writing directly to Friedenau in the hope that you are back home by
now. Today is your birthday, Lulu, but I’m not capable of writing you a
proper kind of long letter from the heart! My nerves have gone kaput,
utterly, as a result of four weeks in Warsaw, the ceaseless running
around to government offices, the endless uncertainty as to when and
where I could travel [from Warsaw], and so on.⁴⁰⁹ I have been here since
yesterday—under close [police] surveillance, to be sure, from the
railroad station on, but out of their range of fire, or so I hope. I
have seen and spoken with our friends in St. Petersburg, and I will see
them more often here (one hour from St. Petersburg).⁴¹⁰ Pavel [Akselrod]
is also here, nearby. The general impression of disarray and
disorganization, but above all, confusion in concepts and in tactics,
has completely disgusted me.

By God, the revolution is great and strong, if the Social Democrats
don’t foul it up! I have already notified Wurm of my address by telegram
and have asked that the _Neue Zeit_ be sent to me (since New Year’s)
[i.e., all the issues for 1906]. I am busily getting myself ready to do
some writing. Wurm wanted me also to intervene in the discussion about
the general strike. I would like to do it, but for this purpose I must
obtain the most important material that has been written up to now (I
mean the MOST RECENT discussion). Could you send that to me, dearest
Karolus? Further, I am waiting to finally receive clear and definite
news on whether and when I may go back to Berlin. From the latest letter
of Arthur [Stadthagen] (four days ago) I see that his fears are not
based on anything definite, but only on general and vague considerations
in favor of caution; but I can’t keep waiting like this for a long time.
Can no one simply inquire and find out whether a hunt [for me] with
“wanted” posters is in the offing and whether an immediate arrest is to
be expected? The only thing that has persuaded me not to go home
immediately was some information received at the last moment with the
following content: a VERY highly placed R[ussian] official, who was in
immediate charge of the case, let it be known to his personal friends
that the governor-general, in connection with R[osa’s] case, has had an
agreement with the Prussian authorities the whole time, when R[osa] was
still in prison, to abide by the wishes of the other side that R[osa] be
set free and immediately conveyed to the border BEFORE THE BEGINNING OF
THE NEXT REICHSTAG SESSION. THE last item makes the business sound
suspiciously likely. Dearest Karolus, inform August [Bebel] about this
matter, but keeping it under strictest confidence, and ask whether this
rumor should be taken seriously or not. I am getting terribly impatient
and have an urge to simply set off on my own. I definitely want at least
to be at Mannheim⁴¹¹ and, for that purpose, would like to return home
ten days ahead of time, in order to visit Posen and Bromberg. Dearest,
please undertake this task energetically and let me know at last whether
and when I can come back, if there are not some monsters that I need to
avoid. I wait with longing for a clear and definite answer. If there is
a need for some sort of proxy statement, or power of attorney, from me,
I will sign it as soon as I have the proper form. Arthur has also
mentioned something like that, but didn’t send me anything, and time is
passing.

One thing further, the very thought of which embitters my life, is my
apartment and the burden I’ve put on you with regard to it. Since I did
NOT receive your letters in Warsaw, dearest Lulu, I knew nothing about
what you have written me. I would like to hold onto the place (because
where else could I go with my belongings? I also wish and hope to be
able once again to sit and work in Friedenau). The money you have spent
I will repay with a thousand thanks. I’m starting to work right away,
partly to earn money for that.

I will soon have to ask you for the money from the bank.⁴¹² The greater
part of it has already been spent. To put it bluntly, my friends, out of
pure “piety,” and “for my sake,” but without my knowledge, did not want
to draw on the funds in Berlin and helped themselves out with funds
borrowed privately. Now of course I will have to pay off those debts,
which will require about 25 thousand. For that, however, I am waiting
for a better address than I have available at present. I will write you
again, separately, about this matter.

I wait with the greatest longing for a detailed letter from you! Our
correspondence has essentially been broken off since mid-April. I have a
thousand things to tell you and ask you. Above all: What are you doing?
Dearest Lulu, how are you? How is your leg? Are you now fully able to
get around? How did you spend your vacation? What is Granny doing, and
Hans [Kautsky], and the boys? I’m eager to hear about everything and
anything. Write, my dearest ones! As soon as I’m buried in my work, I’ll
be in a good mood again. Apropos of that, I will see Fatty tomorrow.⁴¹³
He has been cooped up since January and should be sent off quite soon
for a rest cure [i.e., to Siberia], the poor thing! I want to visit him,
cost what it may [_coûte que coûte_], and am very happy at the prospect.
Tanya [Helphand] was recently in Warsaw, but I was unable to see her,
because that very same day I had to leave Warsaw posthaste and seek a
more peacefully situated nest. Karski’s wife told me she had to flee
Odessa before the pogrom and became a refugee, and she is now in great
need; where she is at the moment I don’t know exactly. The “other woman”
is here too, but I haven’t seen her. I have to close for today, having
imagined that I would only write three lines! Just one more thing, Lulu,
dearest, a thousand silent hugs on your birthday, and many kisses from
the heart for EVERYONE in the Kautsky clan. Your R.

[P.S.] Address: Finland, Kuokkala, by way of Helsingfors [i.e.,
Helsinki], Pestchanaja Doroga, Datscha Tschernigo No. 4, for Felicia
Budilowitsch (nothing more).

TO FRANZ MEHRING

August 12, 1906

Dear esteemed friend!

I have been feeling the need, for the longest time, to send you and your
dear wife my heartfelt greetings and also, again, to request a few lines
from you. This is the first time in a week, however, that I have been
sufficiently “in order” to send my address and pull myself together to
write a letter. For an entire month after my release I was hanging by a
thread that was held by the authorities, those dear and well-loved
people, and they took pleasure in letting me wriggle on it. Then, in St.
Petersburg, during my first get-together with Russian friends, I very
nearly fell into the hands of the police again, and even here, in
Kuokkala, “figures of the Basserman type” have accompanied me, beginning
at the railroad station and continuing during my entire search for a
place to live. However, I am, after all, on Finnish soil here, in a
so-called constitutional state, and I think I can thumb my nose at
guardian angels of this sort. Nowadays I have been up to my ears in
work. You can imagine how much I have to catch up on: in Russian, the
entire Duma period (pamphlets, newspapers, [official] reports); and in
German, our latest “party crisis,” the _Vorwärts, Neue Zeit_, etc.
(Unfortunately, I don’t have the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_. Only in
Warsaw, where it has many admirers, did I see several issues.) Thanks to
Wurm I received and read the report about the trade-union kangaroo
court.⁴¹⁴ When reading it, a person has to breathe deeply to keep from
being suffocated by the foul air of narrow-minded bigotry. But the
“crisis” seems like quite a healthy one to me if good use can be made of
it at Mannheim⁴¹⁵ to clear the air in a thoroughgoing way. You probably
know already from the K[autsky]s that I visited our [friend] Parvus in
prison. He’s just like always: brisk and enterprising. We chatted for a
long time, and he sends hearty greetings to all [our] friends in
Germany. We hope he’ll have the good luck to be back soon. —I have
gotten so used to the revolutionary milieu here that it makes me anxious
when I think of myself back on the quiet and peaceful German treadmill.
I’m afraid I won’t be able to stand it there for long … So maybe you’ll
go for a quick spin with me to Warsaw, eh?

Would you perhaps write me a few lines about your proceeds from America?

With heartfelt greetings to you and your esteemed spouse, Your R. L.

Kuokkala, Finland (via STOCKHOLM)

Sandgat, Tschernigo No. 4

[address mail] to F. Budilowitsch (nothing more!)

TO CLARA ZETKIN

[after December 16, 1906]⁴¹⁶

Dear Klärchen!

I read your most recent letter to Kostya and feel the need to write you
while I’m in the mood.

The appeal by the Party Executive⁴¹⁷ had the same effect on me as it did
on you—that tells you everything. In this respect—since my return from
Russia—I feel rather isolated. I have become abruptly and painfully
aware, as never before, of the timidity and pettiness of our party’s
entire way of being. Only Parvus has a similar perception, but he has
cut himself loose from German party life too much to feel all the
bitterness of it, as I do. But I certainly don’t get as upset over these
things as you do, because I have come to realize with frightening
clarity that these things and these people will not change until the
whole situation becomes quite different. And even then—I have already
told myself this after cool reflection and sorting it out for myself—we
will have to expect the inevitable RESISTANCE of these people when we
try to lead the masses forward.

The situation is simply this: August [Bebel], and the others even more
so, have given themselves over entirely to parliamentarism and FOR
parliamentarism. They will totally renounce any turn of events that goes
beyond the limits of parliamentarism; indeed, they will go further,
seeking to push and twist everything back into the parliamentary mold.
Thus, they will fight furiously—as if against an “enemy of the
people”—against everything and everyone wishing to go beyond that. The
masses, and still more the great mass of [party] COMRADES, in their
heart of hearts have had their fill of parliamentarism. That’s the
feeling I get. They would welcome joyously any breath of fresh air in
party tactics. But the older authorities still weigh down heavily on
them, and even more so, the upper stratum of opportunist editors,
elected officials, and trade union leaders. OUR task now is simply to
counteract these authorities, who have become all rusted over, with
protests that will be as rough and brusque as possible. And in doing
this—such is the nature of the situation—we will be opposed not so much
by the opportunists as by the Executive and by Bebel. As long as it was
a matter of a defensive struggle, against Bernstein & Co., Bebel and the
Executive were glad to have our companionship and assistance—because
they themselves, more than anyone, were shaking in their boots.⁴¹⁸ But
when it comes to an OFFENSIVE against opportunism, then the oldtimers
stand with Ede [Bernstein], Vollmar, and David against us. That is the
situation as I see it, and the main thing for now is this: KEEP HEALTHY
and don’t get worked up! These are tasks that are going to take many
long years! Be well, and I kiss you with all my heart.

TO MATHILDE AND ROBERT SEIDEL

Berlin-Friedenau, January 12, 1907
58 Cranach Street

My dear friends!

Many thanks for your New Year’s greeting! I’ve been wanting to write you
at length for a long time, but my time was very much taken up by the
many events of my young life. As you probably know, I was arrested,
together with Grossi, in Warsaw on March 4th of last year. It was not
until the beginning of July that I was released on bail and in September
went to Germany. He, however, was still held in prison, and day before
yesterday was for the first time brought before a military tribunal,
which sentenced him to eight years at hard labor in Siberia. You can
imagine, dear friends, what kind of mood I’m in and that I cannot write
much now. But I did want to send you this news, since you had just sent
New Year’s greetings for him as well as me. By the way, I passed your
greetings on to him in a letter. Otherwise, things are going as usual
for me. Day after tomorrow I’m going on a speaking tour for a week and a
half (election time).

How are things with you? What are you doing? How is your health, dear
Mathilde? What are the youngsters up to?

Write very soon to the one who sends you heartfelt greetings, Rosa L.

TO KOSTYA ZETKIN

[May 13, 1907] This is Letter No. 3
[from London]
Monday evening

I’m sitting in the middle of the famous Whitechapel district.⁴¹⁹ I’m
sitting alone in a restaurant and have been waiting for an hour (it’s
after 10 pm). The actual business [of the RSDRP Congress] gets under way
for the first time tomorrow. Until now, there has been only a
preliminary scuffle, at which the presence of _my gracious Majesty_⁴²⁰
was not desired. I haven’t seen anyone yet, but I was given orders to
sit here. In a foul mood I traveled through the endless stations of the
dark Underground and emerged both depressed and lost in a strange and
wild part of the city. It’s dark and dirty here. A dim streetlight is
flickering and is reflected in puddles and pools. (It’s been raining the
whole day.) To the left and right in the darkness the brightly colored
restaurants and bars give off an eerie glow. Groups of drunken people
stagger with wild noise and shouting down the middle of the street,
newspaper boys are also shouting, flower girls on the street corners,
looking frightfully ugly and even depraved, as though they had been
drawn by Pascin, are screeching and squealing. Countless numbers of
omnibuses creak past and [coachmen] crack their whips. It is chaos and
also wild and strange. I couldn’t find the damn hotel for the longest
time, and I felt my heart shrink painfully within me. Why? Why in this
life must I suffer these loud, piercing, slashing impressions when
inside me, eternally, a longing for peace and harmony is crying? Why am
I plunging again into dangers and frightening new situations in which I
am sure to be lost, because nothing can be done to overcome the
onrushing external world? Finally I found [the hotel—] “The Three Nuns.”
Why, the very name is suspicious as hell. A brightly lit dining room,
but empty. I breathed a sigh of relief when I saw two women sitting at a
little table. Unfortunately I then saw that all the guests were familiar
with these women and without any formality [_sans façon_], and still
wearing their hats, were sitting down at the table to join them. On the
other side of the wall some people are obviously putting on a variety
show of an unambiguous sort. I can hear all the couplets being recited,
and after each one comes a raucous round of applause with stamping of
the feet as though a wild horde was loose. Besides that, there’s a
ceaseless coming and going here, quite a noteworthy picture on the
whole. But suddenly inside me now some gypsy blood has been awakened.
The shrill chords of night in the big city, with its demonic magic, have
touched certain strings in the soul of the children of the great city.
Somewhere in the depths an indistinct desire is coming to light, a
desire to plunge into this whirlpool … What will the young man with the
thick head and the deep dark eyes say about this? The young man whose
face breathes of calm and stability, in whose soul the gray mist of
morning is nevertheless beginning to stir and surge up at the sight of a
marvelous mountain landscape at sunrise. This is all nonsense, dear boy,
go get some sleep or take a walk. Adieu, R. L.

Aha! My address is London NW, Finchley Road, 66 Goldhurst Terrace. It is
safe to write.

In the event that it is morning [when you get this], here is a poem from
the year 1619? [or] 1649?⁴²¹

Pack clouds away, and welcome day,
With night we banish sorrow;
Sweet airs, blow soft, mount, larks, aloft,
To give my Love good-morrow.
Wings from the wind to please his* mind,
To give my Love good-morrow,
Bird, prime thy wing,
Nightingale sing,
To give my Love good-morrow.

[RL’s note:] (*In the original, of course, it says “her.”)

TO KOSTYA ZETKIN⁴²²

[Kilburn, England, May 23, 1907]

Beloved, I already wrote you that your letter was intercepted by L[eo
Jogiches]. Yesterday things came to a brief and soft-spoken, but
frightening confrontation—during a trip on an omnibus.⁴²³ Without any
mention of the letter, we were talking about my intention of leaving
tomorrow. L[eo] won’t let me go and declares that he would sooner kill
me; [he says] I’ll be staying here even if in a hospital … We went
directly [from the bus] into an elegant restaurant, where my brother was
expecting me for dinner. A fine orchestra was playing, in the gallery,
music from the last scene of _Carmen_, and while they were playing L[eo]
softly whispered to me: I would sooner strike you dead.

Bubi,⁴²⁴ I don’t know what’s going to happen with me in the days ahead,
or with my departure, or in general what will become of me. I feel a
strange calm, and this quiet conflict, which perhaps will be the death
of me; it makes my pulse beat in a lively way, almost joyfully. As
stated, I know nothing. Only one thing I do know. I’ve become dreadfully
anxious about you. Beloved little Bubi, be on your guard. You still have
your whole life ahead of you. I would like it best if I knew you were in
Sillenbuch,⁴²⁵ in the large, shadowy forest, which would enfold you
protectively and caressingly. This evening L[eo] wants to go from here
to my brother’s, in order to have better control over me, and it is
therefore possible that I won’t manage to drop you another line before
my departure. So be calm, beloved, be calm, do you hear little Bubi? You
must be calm and cheerful. Go frequently in the days ahead to see
Gertrud [Zlottko] because I will at any rate notify her by telegram of
my arrival. But DON’T come to the station, unless I telegraph you
directly, because otherwise I won’t be coming alone.

I kiss you many thousand times.

TO CLARA ZETKIN

[Friedenau,] June 4, 1907

Dear Klärchen!

I want to write you before I go “in the hole.”⁴²⁶ I just got back from
London,⁴²⁷ dog-tired and down with a cold. The impression made by the
party congress was thoroughly depressing. Plekhanov is finished. He has
bitterly disillusioned even his most devoted supporters. He is now
capable only of telling jokes, and very old ones at that, which we
already heard from him twenty years ago. Bernstein and Jaurès would take
great delight in him, if they could understand his Russian politics. I
did some real brawling and made myself a mass of new enemies. Plekhanov
and Axelrod (and with them, Gurvich, Martov, et. al.) are the most
pathetic things the Russian revolution has to offer. As for positive
results, the party congress accomplished an extremely small amount, but
it has undoubtedly contributed to clarification. The majority, having a
sense of principled politics, consisted of: half the Russians (the
so-called Bolsheviks), the Poles, and the Latvians. The Jews from the
Bund revealed themselves as the shabbiest of political horsetraders
[_Schacherpolitiker_]. They constantly, after many tricks and dodges
[_Winkelzüge_] and radical phrases, ended up holding the banner of
Plekhanov’s opportunism. For that I nailed them hard with remarks that
cut like whips and got them into a white-hot fury. By the end I was so
tired, and had such a hangover mood of depression, that thoughts of
suicide came to me. —You know that state of mind from your own
experience. Now prison stands before me, or rather, I stand before it.
Just think, I’ll be sitting in prison in BERLIN, the women’s prison at
10 Barnim Street—note down the address—I’m very happy about it. It will
do me good. I’ll have my friends and acquaintances right nearby. I don’t
know yet what day I have to go to prison. At any rate it’s in something
like a week. Write to me now and then while I’m “in the hole,” so that
I’ll be _au courant_. I especially want to know everything about you and
how your health is. I very much enjoyed your Balabanova, only she’s far
too weepy for my taste. She implored me that you have to take care of
yourself and get cured. You certainly are not doing anything! Won’t you,
before all else, let yourself be examined by a specialist to find out
whether Salm[anoff]’s diagnosis is correct? We probably won’t see each
other until the International Congress,⁴²⁸ during which I’ll stay at
your place. Until then, write to me, and know that you are kissed a
thousand times by your R.

TO KOSTYA ZETKIN

[Berlin women’s prison, Barnim Street]⁴²⁹ the 24th [of June, 1907]

Little Bub [meaning “boy child”],

Today I experienced a great joy, a double joy. First thing in the
morning I received your letter and then I also have the hope of
answering it right away making use of an opportunity [per
_Gelegenheit_].⁴³⁰ What is my little darling doing, the little darling
who I think about so incessantly? While eating I think with concern that
he will be neglected, that no one will take care of him, and that the
poor darling will spend the day half hungry. Most of all I’m tormented
by the thought that in the morning, when he has such a fine appetite,
he’ll be given a meager meal. I’m sure you’ll be quite annoyed that I’m
thinking about such insignificant things as eating. But for me in this
relationship NOTHING is insignificant, and then [I realized] that it
would be better to write THAT, rather than the other [thing I already
wrote]. My good spirits don’t always hold up against my yearning,
sometimes I have to lie down on the bed, do nothing, and dream
of … calmness, nothing but peace and quiet like that time on the sofa
before I left. I can’t imagine any greater blessing than to be
undisturbed this way and to have this sweet, satiated calmness.
Sometimes my rebellious thoughts want to search for a solid point of
reference in the near future, when I would once again find such a moment
of blessed peace and quiet, and for the time being they can find no such
thing, and therefore they are driven to distraction and become all
confused … But then I quickly call myself “to order”—it will indeed
happen, I tell myself, just don’t have this unworthy despondency and
cowardice about facing the future! —And then the image of the automobile
beckons to me … How many lovely scenes I have already painted for myself
around this automobile trip! In the evening in the shadowy,
sweet-smelling coolness of the forest we zoom uphill with the speed of
an arrow—three of us pressed closely together, baby in the middle, not a
word is spoken, the speed at which we’re traveling takes our breath
away, but how magnificent is this silence! And then the mornings in the
golden sunlight, when the grass is still damply gleaming with dew, and
to go back down the same way in the fresh air … Luise [Kautsky] told me
that you come to see them every day; at first for a moment I was
jealous, then I berated myself for that and rejoiced with all my heart
that you are seeing something of other people. The two older boys [in
the Kautsky family] left me with a very dear impression of that evening
with its mysteriously important air of secrecy. I would like it if you
visited them frequently; after all, the children are always better than
the grown-ups.

Little boy child, be cheerful and get a lot of work done. I embrace and
kiss my darling, my baby [in English], many, many times.

Yours

[P.S.] It’s not possible here to receive letters often, and so don’t
write again for a week or a week and a half. My sister-in-law⁴³¹ has
been at my apartment since yesterday. Tell Gertrud Zlottko that, along
with the shoes, she should bring me some flowers and my SOAP. Soap will
be the sign that you received this.

In case your mother applies to visit me on Sunday, have my sister-in-law
advise her through Luise that she should postpone HER visit until just
before she leaves Berlin, otherwise there would be too many visits one
after the other and the people here [the authorities] would become
uncooperative.

TO KOSTYA ZETKIN

the 24th [of September, 1907]

Sweet little beloved, I received your dear, long letter on December 21,
and today the short one. You have obviously not yet received mine, in
which I answered your worried letter of the 18th. My darling, your
concern about my health is groundless; your mother probably heard it
from Karl [Kautsky] and he, from Luise [Kautsky], who, from a shortage
of other topics, complains to various people about my imaginary sorrows.
At any rate I did feel quite ill because I had not been alone [i.e., had
time for myself], but that was purely mental depression and tiredness.
Just think, aside from the short week with you, I haven’t had one bit of
vacation [for rest and recuperation] after the [stressful] times in
London, in Moabit [in prison], and in Stuttgart, and after all that I’ve
been through.⁴³² But all of that is now giving way to a calm, regular
life and diligent work. Finally I am back in line with [the work I want
to do on] economics. I had gotten completely out of the habit of
[systematic or intensive] thinking, and that depressed me greatly. Now,
however, new upheavals are threatening me. “Rudolf” as well as the
astronomer—THIS IS IN THE STRICTEST CONFIDENCE—have been forbidden to
give lectures at the school.⁴³³ School is supposed to begin on the 1st
[of October], and there are not enough teachers. I am now being yanked
by the ear. I’m supposed to take over teaching on economics. Early this
morning Karl [Kautsky] informed me of this proposal, and I have to give
a definitive answer early tomorrow. I was undecided and I still feel
very much undecided. My first thought and my feeling was to say no. My
interest in the school as a whole is lukewarm, and I was not born to be
a schoolteacher. Even the honor of filling in for that fine fellow
Rudolf is no big thing. Other considerations, however, speak in favor
[of taking the assignment], specifically, it suddenly occurred to me
that this could finally be a basis for material existence for me. A
person earns 3,000 marks for a half-year course (October–March), with
four lectures per week. These are actually rather glittering prospects,
and in half a year I would regularly be earning more than I usually earn
in an entire year, and on top of that I would always have the afternoon
free, and half the year entirely to myself. Perhaps those considerations
were the most rational; otherwise, with my irregular way of working I
would constantly be living from hand to mouth, depending on chance for
my existence. Also, I would have peace and quiet as well as leisure to
do my scholarly work. Entirely by chance it happens that for me I am
quite prepared to teach this Berlin course, and I could use the existing
teaching plan, only in more detail. What a shame that you are not here
so that we could consult together about this, but I have the feeling
that you would make the same arguments for and against and would in fact
decide IN FAVOR. My time would be committed, then, four times a week
from 10 in the morning until noon, up until March, and the rest of the
time I would be quite free. The course for the Berliners, which I had
been so happy about and which I considered ten times more important—I
will naturally have to drop that. Actually this whole effort has not
been lost, to the extent that I had written up my lectures as pamphlets.
Now I only have to work for two more weeks and then they’ll be
finished.⁴³⁴ I believe that you too will have something useful to
contribute—tomorrow, after this business has been finally worked out,
I’ll write you a few more lines about it.

The se days we are having wonderful weather again, and every morning at
8 am I go for a walk. I think about you a lot while I’m doing that.
Yesterday I was preoccupied with thoughts of Maderno and the splendid
dark blue waters of Lake Garda. (I had been stirred up by a biography of
[the Italian painter] Segantini, who was born in Arco, on the shores of
Lake Garda.) It is my dream to go there again for a few weeks, but I
would like to take you with me, little darling, and wander along the
shores of the lake with you. I think that my resources will soon allow
us to do that.

I have also been thinking about your work on the subject of the
colonies. Currently I have been rereading the relevant chapters in
_Capital_, vol. 1.⁴³⁵ The debates at Essen⁴³⁶ have again stimulated my
thinking [on that subject] and it shows how necessary such a work would
be.

I am very happy that you are captivated by Ferdinand [Lassalle]. I am
mad about him too, and I don’t let anybody or anything spoil that for
me. He still has an effect on me [in that he’s] always spurring me on to
work and serious study, to labor and science. He had such a lively and
ingenious way of being. To be sure, Marx is more powerful and more
deeply grounded, but far from being so brilliant and colorful as the
former.

Luise told me yesterday that Mara will soon be coming here (I believe on
October 1) and for the time being (until the New Year) will have her
living quarters at August [Bebel]’s. And so you will have company. Today
I had a dream that you had gotten yourself together and had come to tell
me that … Luise reported also that Maxim [Zetkin] would soon be coming
here. He had told Karl that himself. I don’t believe it after what
M[axim] said to me. —Annie [Luxemburg] is also here; she has been here
since September 1. She’s coming rather often.

The tomcat Mischa has gone to the land of shadows! And our foster child
Mutik has come into his inheritance. _Le roi est mort, vive le roi_.⁴³⁷
Such is the way of the world. An inevitable corollary of that,
unfortunately, is: _La reine est mort, vive la reine_.⁴³⁸ Today in my
dream, or so it seems to me, I replied to you with the latter remark,
with bitter irony.

Little darling, I am much more lonely here now than you are there. I
don’t go anywhere and I don’t see anyone. Actually, yesterday evening
there was a comrade from Poland after an eleven-month imprisonment in a
common cell with masses of other people—he came here. He was a lively
and cheerful youngster, a boisterous child really. —That’s what he used
to be—he has come back to us as a bloated neurasthenic with trembling
hands. He is “on leave” so that he can recover somewhat before he starts
to work again. Also, Ryazanov (I think you know him)—the
broad-shouldered, sturdy man with the big beard—he has also come here
from prison. He has a boil on his hand from being in jail, and his
entire little finger was amputated. My heart constricted at the sight of
seeing him so trampled upon, and he himself is depressed.

These are the kind of fine figures who come out of that whirlpool over
there. I was so stirred up yesterday that I couldn’t sleep for half the
night and I had bad dreams … Sweet beloved, I kiss you.

TO KARL KAUTSKY

[Friedenau, beginning of December 1907]

Dear Karolus!

I read your letter with great satisfaction, particularly your protest
against printing in a bourgeois paper.⁴³⁹

For my part, I would only like to ask: Who is this “Dr. Mikhailov”? I
know all the more prominent leaders of BOTH Russian tendencies fairly
well, but this person is completely unknown to me, and for me it would
be rather painful if YOUR statement, which for the Russians is sure to
be of great significance, should come to light via some obscure figure.
For me it is particularly suspicious that this person does not want to
publish your letter in a PARTY PUBLICATION, which any real party comrade
would regard as the means closest to hand for honoring his party.

And then, [there’s] another argument AGAINST contributing to the
bourgeois press in RUSSIA TODAY. Right now we’re living through an epoch
in which the workers’ party in every respect—political, intellectual,
literary—is winning through to independence and self-reliance and taking
a LEADING ROLE in public life. The output of the Russian Social Democrat
press is even now enjoying—in spite of its underground character—the
greatest attention from all the political parties. Even [Social
Democratic] leaflets are often reprinted in the bourgeois newspapers.
Therefore the statement by your Mikhailov (as well as Plekhanov’s) is
simply UNTRUE. These people are talking about the party press as though
it was still in the PREREVOLUTIONARY period. Here, as in all things,
they don’t take into account the complete change that has come about.
And a particularly important circumstance is relevant here—one that is
the guiding idea in present-day party development: the struggle of
Social Democracy against LIBERALISM for political hegemony in the
present revolution. The independence of the press is a part of this
[struggle for] hegemony. And it is precisely the LIBERAL press, the
press of our immediate POLITICAL rivals, from whom one should clearly
and cleanly distinguish oneself—it is in their antechambers that
Plekhanov and Co. are waiting, and by their contributions to the
bourgeois democratic papers they are enabling the bourgeois liberals to
wear the pretty little mantle of “nonpartisanship” and “classless
socialism.”

The se are very important defining points, as I see it. And with that,
many good wishes to you, and kisses for Luise. R.

TO KOSTYA ZETKIN

[Clarens, Switzerland,] April 14 [1908]⁴⁴⁰
2 in the aftern[oon]

Beloved Diudiu, having just arrived here, I am taking the first
opportunity to write you at length. You probably received my letter from
Frankfurt on the Main, one from Basel, and a telegram from Basel. At
this moment I am calmer, I was frightfully upset when I wrote from there
[that is, from Frankfurt and Basel]. The problem is this. I was wavering
with great uncertainty even in Berlin about whether I should travel with
K[autsky] and when I should travel, and then all of a sudden L[eo
Jogiches] rushed into the apartment and into my room and cried out that
he had learned I was going to travel with K, but that a stop must be put
to that, or else I would remain there on the spot, dead. An icy calm
came over me, as always, while that was going on, I remained in my seat
and said not one word in reply. That made him even more rabid, and he
rushed off to try to find you, having demanded I give him your address
(I answered nothing of course) and he made Gertrud [Zlottko] give him
both keys. When I saw that, I went to K[arl] K[autsky]’s and remained
there overnight. I cannot describe to you the way I felt, that night was
frightening. On the next morning I went with the boys⁴⁴¹ to my apartment
to see about the letters, met him on the street, of course he didn’t
look at me, and I went upstairs. Up there my letters were lying around,
having been opened, and when I went back down he was again in front of
the house and began walking alongside me. He had been at your place.
Mrs. Grossmann⁴⁴² [he said] had given him “all the
information”—obviously about visits—“The bird has flown,” [he said,] but
he would certainly catch up with him; furthermore, I must not take one
step out of Berlin, I must promise that, or else he would kill me right
there and then. And he took hold of something in his pocket. I remained
calm and icy, not once did I turn my head, and at that point he left.
Inwardly, however, I was so frightfully upset and disturbed by this
abuse and felt so unhappy that I had to go back to the K[autsky]
house—with all its noise and the banality [of everyday life]—and I
didn’t dare go home (for me my house had become a horror since he had
taken the keys), so that I immediately sent a letter to Hannes
[Diefenbach] by _Rohrpost_ [a pneumatic dispatch system], asking him to
come call for me at the K[autsky]s’. He came right away at 3 p.m. and
took me away, we drove to his house, but I knew that I would not be able
to say a single word to him and would not want to, he simply saw that I
was frightfully upset, we read and chatted a little, and then he came
back with me to the K[autsky] house. I felt so lonely, not knowing what
to do, seeing no way out, worse than I had ever felt before. Above all,
I absolutely could not make up my mind: Should I make the trip or not? I
thought to myself that you would definitely be in favor of my making the
trip, and with Hannes’s help I quickly grabbed a few of my things again
in the evening, came back to the K[autsky]s’ at 11 p.m., and on the next
morning started off on the trip. Outwardly the whole time I was calm and
merry (for the sake of the K[autsky]s), but inwardly I was horribly
upset and disturbed. In Frankfurt during the night I fell into such a
disturbed state that I distinctly felt an outbreak of insanity coming
on, thoughts and perceptions were chasing one after the other at such a
furious pace that I was just about to get up and send a telegram to you
or to Hannes. WHAT exactly [I would say in the telegram] I don’t know. I
only wanted to hold onto somebody. However, you must not think of coming
here, in no case whatsoever, because L is going to come—that became
clear to me that very night in Frankfurt—and will be here soon. He will
certainly break into a fury when he finds out that I have left, and then
he will shove everything aside and come here to revenge himself. He has
gone so far in the threats he has made that he can’t allow anyone to
mock or challenge his threats, I know him. What will come of it all I
don’t know. At this moment I am calm, I even slept well in Laus[anne],
tiredness blunted my disturbed inner state, and here the sun is so mild
and so beautiful.

In Clarens I have not yet asked for letters. Write to me here at the
pension using my own name, merely disguise your handwriting a little
bit, just in case, because of K. You have the address on the envelope. I
enclose some flowers that I just picked for you myself. Write to me
soon, my sweet, my dear treasure.

Your Niunia

Be calm and cheerful, Bubi, I was glad to know all this time that you
were far from Berlin, far from all this gruesome upset and out of the
way of danger. Diudiu my sweet

TO KOSTYA ZETKIN

[Baugy sur Clarens,] the 15th [of April, 1908]⁴⁴³

My heart, my beloved! I just had a letter from you handed over to me
finally in Clarens, I will ask after that other one and will have it
sent to me here. I wrote you yesterday from here and am waiting
longingly for a few calmer lines from you, above all something kind and
endearing, [because] I myself am feeling so very depressed! Outwardly of
course one sees nothing at all of this from me, I go for walks with
K[autsky], lie in the sun, etc., but I have such uneasiness within me
that I would like best to go traveling again immediately or at least to
go hiking a lot, to climb, to go on camping trips. Unfortunately K.
doesn’t want to do any of those things, doesn’t want to climb or hike
anywhere, doesn’t want to see anything, just wants to sit around on the
balcony or on the grass. Oh, Niuniu, if only you were here! What
wouldn’t we see together and where wouldn’t we go wandering together!
It’s wonderful here and the weather is magnificent. But I feel like a
leaf that has been torn off and blown by the wind. There’s so much I
would like to write you about, everything that I’m thinking and feeling,
but I’m not up to it. I only want to talk with you. At night I
constantly dream awful things, and actually they’re always about you:
you’re soon going to start berating me, soon you’re going to be untrue
to me. That shows you in what an upset state of nerves I go to sleep and
wake up. But that will subside, don’t worry. Although I’ve no idea what
solution will be found to the present knotty problems of our situation,
somehow things must definitely come to an end. And if no catastrophe
intervenes, I will certainly be with you in two weeks, because K. and I
want to stop off and visit all of you on our return trip. However, he’s
talking about only one day, and it’s not fitting for me to insist on
more, therefore see to it that your mother invites him for SEVERAL days,
then he himself will break out of here earlier. We’ll write a postcard
to all of you asking your approval, then she can answer yes. Dear heart,
write to me here often, I have such a craving for a dear word from you!
I kiss you a thousand times.

Your Niunia

TO KOSTYA ZETKIN

[Chailly sur Clarens,] the 16th [of April, 1908]

My dear treasure, I sent you a letter early today and now I’m writing
you again, although I have nothing special to say and nothing has
happened.

I feel quite alone here. Yesterday evening and also this morning I went
for a walk all by myself, because K[autsky] has no need for that and
won’t stir one inch. I had no inkling that he already needed his rest so
much. I thought he was much younger than that. Therefore I shudder a bit
at the thought of the ten days that he wants to spend here, without
going for a single excursion. Meanwhile, the mountains all around are so
tempting one can scarcely resist them. Early this morning I was sitting
up high and looking at the lake below and the snow-capped peaks across
the lake. I let myself be roasted by the sun and listened to the humming
of the bumblebees; somewhere in the village a hen was cackling
persistently, and from behind me came the steady clunking of the spades,
with which the farmers everywhere around here are now digging up their
vineyards. So much peace had poured over the whole place that I could no
longer imagine the wild, death-dealing passion that is pursuing and
threatening me. At the same time, somewhere in the depths of my mind I
had the thought: Just don’t let yourself be lulled to sleep by the
peacefulness around here. The specter is lurking behind your back and is
only waiting for you to forget that it exists …

Diudiu, my beloved little one, how fine it would be if you were sitting
next to me here at the edge of the vineyard. When I do go for a walk
with K[autsky] he perceives everything differently from me. Cold,
pedantic, and doctrinaire, which destroys my illusions. I wrote [to you]
at Cully and perhaps I’ll get a letter back from you as soon as today.
And there perhaps I’ll find a few loving words; in yesterday’s letter
there was only anxiety and reserve; I understand very well why. But in
my present state of mind I will easily make mistakes about anything and
everything, including you, my sweet Niuniu. I would like these ten days
to be over already, to see you, and to talk about everything with you.
Diudiuku, love of my heart, I kiss you on your sweet little mouth many
times. Don’t worry and be of good cheer, let yourself play _Figaro_ and
sing [the work] of the great master. Yagugu

TO KOSTYA ZETKIN

[Friedenau,] May 8 [1908]

Sweet love, Niuniuku, today I received your third letter (number them,
beloved, so we can keep track of them). Hopefully you’ve also received
my second one today.

Since yesterday I’ve been feeling well, the migraine is almost gone, I’m
making an effort to work, and went out for a walk early today. I sat on
our bench behind the statue of Bismarck, a whole school of little kids
was playing on the grass with a lot of loud noise and shrill voices, and
farther down the bigger youngsters were playing tennis. In my heart I
felt such melancholy that I sat there like a dead person. […] Niuniu,
love of my heart, I would like so much to talk with you about everything
I’m reading, but I can’t write [about it]— scholarly letters seem so
unnatural to me. What you write me about Mignet, I know very well. But,
dearest, it’s that way with every book, because by itself every book is
something terribly unapproachable. What always torments me also, when
I’m reading, is the need to get to the root of things. There’s the
feeling that only a little tip or tidbit has been provided and that the
correct and important part remains hidden. But the only way that can be
remedied is through [the reading of] MANY books and with the passage of
time, during which knowledge gradually accumulates.

I am now reading one of the books that I’ve scraped together for you.
It’s about Cabet, a hefty, new book in French. It’s written so
thoroughly and honestly, and at the same time its form is so clear and
simple, that it’s a pleasure to read. Hopefully you will also enjoy it.
In order to keep in close touch with you, what I would like most of all
now is to be reading the same books as you. With a tender loving feeling
I’ve been paging through Becker (on the Commune of 1793) and through [a
book about] Fourier, among others, because these are some books that you
will soon have in your hands. Gugu, I am now sending you seven books:

  ---------------- --------------------------
                   1. Krichevsky
                   2. Becker
                   3. Greulich (on Fourier)
                   4. Liebknecht (on Owen)
  from K. K.       5. Lor.[enz] Stein
  [Karl Kautsky]   6. Thomas (on Babeuf)
                   7. Janet (on St.-Simon)
  ---------------- --------------------------

With regard to Babeuf, you must also get from the library the best and
most thorough book: V. ADVIELLE, _Histoire de Gracchus Babeuf et du
babouvisme d’après de nombreux documents inédits_,⁴⁴⁴ Paris, 1884, 2
vols. —Send the books back to me quickly, particularly those from K. K.
In reading them, you must therefore take notes on them right away,
because I don’t want him to know I sent them to you. Above all, read
everything about the [French] Revolution, and write down the chapter
headings immediately. […]

TO KOSTYA ZETKIN

[Friedenau, May 9, 1908]

Sweet beloved!

I’ve just come from the post office—today there was nothing from you. I
don’t know if I’ll get anything tomorrow, because it’s Sunday, but I’ll
go and inquire. Diudiu, my sweet, you won’t receive these lines until
early Monday.

I’m feeling somewhat better, and today the work proceeded fairly well.
This morning I also wrote about ten letters that I was behind on; they
were weighing on me terribly. Among them to the Russians in Siberia.

It’s so silent now in the place where we’re staying. Your mother is
visiting with women all day long, Gertrud [Zlottko] has gone downtown,
and I’m all alone; from outside, over the balcony, comes the noise of
the street, children playing, carts and carriages rolling by, the loud
chirping of birds—all so merry and joyful because it’s warm out today.
The little almond trees are blooming down there on our street in front
of almost every house, and they have quite the look of brides about
them, with their tender pink blossoms. ([Heinrich] Schulz, the twit, was
talking about them today: he called them “blackthorns.” A fine pedagogue
he is!) —He came to pick up your mother. But there’s no warmth or
sparkle in anything for me, because with you not here I will not
surrender my soul to the springtime. I go around cold and quiet. But if
only I could work good and hard!

Diudiu, today I laid a little groundwork for our plan about the school,
in a conversation with Schulz—naturally without the slightest mention of
you, although he, like your mother, definitely wanted to know: Who do I
have in mind?⁴⁴⁵

But, Niuniu, you still have to do a few things toward this goal. In
particular, I strongly advise you to give some lectures in the youth
organization there [in Stuttgart] about various stages in the history of
socialism, to the extent that you make progress with writing out your
lectures. For example, one about Babeuf, then one about St.-Simon, etc.
Believe me that will (1) be very good preparation for a spoken lecture
and (2) also for the written composition. I saw this here with my
economics essays, how much more clearly and graphically I grasped the
subject AFTER the spoken lecture. Do it, beloved! Write me what you
think about this.

I am reading further in the book by Cabet with great pleasure: the
historical evolution, the events of the July monarchy, the part played
by the traditions of the Great Revolution, all this is utterly
fascinating and gripping. History is the most interesting thing there
is, and I have the secret hope that even if you scorn economics you will
find your own field in history, and through it, and for its sake, you
will also finally grasp and appreciate economics […]

TO KOSTYA ZETKIN

[Friedenau,] May 19 [1908]

Beloved, yesterday was a sad day: no letter from Niuniu. To make up for
it, this morning there came letter No. 10.

Diudiu, I’m so glad that you are really reading so much now about
history. Even if you feel constantly annoyed, that proves how much the
subject is now always on your mind. But don’t lose yourself too deeply
in the Great Revolution, Niuniu. Don’t forget that what you need [to
watch for] there is the action of the working class and therefore Marat,
the Convention,⁴⁴⁶ and Babeuf.

You bring up an important question: whether there actually existed a
working class worthy of the name at that time in France. That is exactly
what is important, for example, with respect to those who hold views
like Bebel’s, that [supposedly] in Russia nothing special can be
accomplished because the urban working class makes up such a small
percentage of the population! In France at the time of the Great
Revolution a factory proletariat was as good as nonexistent; what
workers there were, were mostly artisans, manual workers, journeymen in
the workshops and the few manufacturing establishments of Paris and its
suburbs. And yet it was precisely this very small proletariat in Paris
that was the driving force behind the Mountain⁴⁴⁷ and the basis for the
Convention! At any rate, one has to add to that the numerous _petits
bourgeois_ of Paris: mechanics, workmen, shopkeepers, etc., keeping in
mind that class divisions were not yet fully developed there, and it was
precisely this circumstance that characterized the social reforms and
the entire policy of the Convention (the distribution of land ownership,
etc.). By the way, read the writings of K. K. on this subject once
again.⁴⁴⁸ As far as I can remember he [wrote] something about that. But
I will send you a few more books that discuss the social situation
further. Above all: LEVASSEUR, _Histoire des classes ouvrières en
France_.⁴⁴⁹ (I’m quoting from memory and so the title could be a little
different.) Also ESPINAS, _La Philosophie sociale du XVIII siècle et la
Révolution_.⁴⁵⁰ You only need to browse through the latter, and I think
you’ll find something there.

Once again: don’t lose yourself, Niuniuk, keep in mind the limits of the
work and what comes further on!

Gugu, today I worked out a new plan: I figured out a way in which we can
be together during the summer vacation. It wouldn’t work if I came
alone, but what would you say if I brought Luise K[autsky] and the two
older [Kautsky] boys to Switzerland, and you would go along, and we
would go for excursions there the whole time. I know Switzerland well
and I’ve thought out the entire route. Karl and Bendel are going
somewhere else. We would have the opportunity certainly to be alone now
and then, and above all we would be together all the time—in magnificent
Switzerland—on hikes!! Diudiu, do you want to do it? I will soon have
earned enough money for both of us, but perhaps I would then have to
forego making a trip to see you at Whitsuntide so as to save some money.
Dear heart, write me whether you want to do this, because then I will
wangle it somehow. But your people have to keep their mouths shut in
front of those like Berta [Thalheimer], etc. My sweet, I’m yearning for
my Niuniu, oh how much!…

TO KOSTYA ZETKIN

[Friedenau, May 28, 1908]⁴⁵¹

Thursday (Ascension Day)

My sweet treasure, today I got your short letter beautifully written in
ink. But the first one, scribbled in pencil, also made me very happy—it
was, after all, the first news [from you] after a pause! Dudu, beloved,
I am so happy that you still love me! I have such longing to be near
you, I miss you everywhere and in everything; even when you are only
sitting near me silently, everything acquires meaning and vitality.
Gugu, our moon has gone away, but just think, recently I had Hannes
[Diefenbach] read to me aloud from the _West-östlicher_ [_Diwan_],⁴⁵²
and there I found the following lines in the part by Suleika Nameh, No.
44, “Vollmondnacht” (Full Moon Night):

“Your beloved, far away, is tasting the bittersweet just as you are,
Feeling an unhappy happiness.
The two of you vowed faithfully to greet each other by the full moon.
This is the moment.”

Generally speaking, I have found marvelous things in the _Diwan_. I
would like to read it together with you.

Dudu, it’s raining lightly, the air is dull, I’m sitting by myself in
the empty apartment. Gertrud [Zlottko] has gone out, all powdered and
painted, I’ve kept Hannes [Diefenbach] and all the others at a distance
from me today, and I ought to be working. My work is lying in front of
me on the desk, but I’m looking distractedly out onto the open balcony
and listening to the sultry and indecisive twittering of the birds. If
only my young man were here, I do not want anything more than that he
should simply be in the room and fill it up with his silent magic.

Gugu, how much I’m looking forward to traveling and hiking with you! I
dream of it day and night.

TO KOSTYA ZETKIN

[Friedenau, June 5, 1908]
Friday, 8 in the evening

I’m feeling awful. I feel such pressure on my throat, from depression,
that I’m suffocating. Oh, to see a human being now—but there’s no one.
Oh, to have wings and fly to Niuniu—but I have no wings. If I had just a
couple of days off for myself, I’d get on the night train tonight and be
with you early in the morning. But nothing like that is possible. Oh,
this frightful pressure on my forehead and the palpitations of my heart!
I know what I’ll do—I’ll sit myself down and write to my beloved, to my
dear friend who was always there for me with his love whenever trouble
had me in its claws. Dudu, dear heart, you sweet consolation, I have
experienced so many terrible things since yesterday. In the morning
there came to my house, specially sent from Warsaw, a very important
lawyer working on the current political trials. He and his colleagues
are appealing to me to summon “all of Europe” to its feet against the
horror and atrocity prevailing there in the military tribunals, in the
prisons, and in the torture chambers. He gave his accounts and I noted
down the material from 10 in the morning to 7 in the evening, until he
had to leave because early today he has to be in court again. We both
wept as we worked. It’s ghastly. Every day there are several executions.
Things are happening in the prisons that make your hair stand on end.
You can imagine how it was for me. A little relief and brightening came
from the following: he told me about various prisoners he was supposed
to defend and among others mentioned my young fellow⁴⁵³ (without
suspecting that it was [someone I knew]). I asked: How is it going for
him? —Oh, he said, things are very bad for him. —How so? —Well I visited
him just before I came to see you. The gendarme himself summoned me,
saying it was “ABSOLUTELY” necessary for me to see him; and
literally—when I saw him I was horrified, he was yellow, his chest caved
in, he can barely sit, and he speaks so softly that I had to put my ear
next to his mouth. I believe he has consumption, and I went to see his
mother to tell her that. —Niuniu, can you imagine what that was like for
me? Then came the writing and the running around in order to get this
news to various newspapers by telegram, in order to rouse people to
their feet. I didn’t sleep the whole night and today I’ve been running
around all day. I feel completely broken now. Oh, my dear friend, if I
could only see you now.

I’m not going for the trip on Sunday, perhaps on Tuesday. So keep
writing to me, don’t leave me without letters. Today your sweet letter
was such a consolation.

But please, Diudiu, don’t be sad, be cheerful, my little love, maybe I
should have kept quiet about all this with you, but I can’t stop myself.

The moon is still there in the sky and the evening star. Through them I
send you my best wishes, my precious [.]

TO KOSTYA ZETKIN

[Friedenau, July 14, 1908]⁴⁵⁴ Tuesday

My sweet, beloved heart, I didn’t write you yesterday because I didn’t
feel well, and even today I’m very weak and listless. Yesterday L[eo
Jogiches] was [here], and this much is clear, that he wants to accompany
me on my trip, in order to, in the event that I meet you, shoot you and
himself. Can I make the trip under such circumstances? I can’t get away
from him here, but also everything in me rebels against sneaking away
like some sort of slave. The state of mind he’s in is no joke any
longer, his inner self is shattered, he’s become abnormal, and he lives
only with this idea fixed in his sight. And so once again I’m beside
myself. Even if I were to sneak away by some luck, he would surely come
to where you are immediately, and don’t imagine that anyone could
persuade him not to carry out his plan. Ought I to place your life at
risk? You would not demand that of me, Duduk. But I absolutely want to
see you, we have to see each other and talk everything over. Therefore I
would like to make a trip to where you are for several days. But up
there at your family’s home it is much too dangerous, and besides I’m
feeling too exhausted to try and appear normal and cheerful to some
extent in front of your mother and “the Poet” [Friedrich Zundel]. The
thought of sitting around a table with people is dreadful to me in this
frame of mind. Could we perhaps meet somewhere else, where we could be
free together for the whole time? Do you perhaps know of something [like
that]? I think we could simply meet at some railroad station and then
decide whether we would stay there the two days or go elsewhere. The
nearer to me we meet, the longer we could be together, because I would
have a shorter trip alone to meet you. On the other hand, of course, the
thought of a hotel terrifies me. In the end you can decide. Could we
perhaps meet at some small station outside of Stuttg[art]? I will
telegraph you what day and on what train I can make the trip, but you
must telegraph me after you receive this letter: saying “Agreed,” if you
agree with this plan in general.

If I telegraph you that you should travel in my direction I will also
send you money by telegram, because otherwise a letter with money in it
would probably take too long.

I will think it over some more today about how we can arrange our
get-together. I am now still waiting for news from H. K. [Hans Kautsky],
of whom I requested some money (2,000),⁴⁵⁵ and I’m waiting for another
bit of news.

I am writing to you in a very disorderly way, but my head feels so
chaotic from these shocks that I sometimes think I’m ready for the cold
water treatment [i.e., to be institutionalized]. My darling I kiss you,
I would like to hold you in my arms at last.

One more thing! In the event that I send you a telegram and you should
travel in my direction, do NOT say that you are making a trip to see me,
in case L. comes to where you all live. Otherwise your mother might
unsuspectingly tell him.

TO KOSTYA ZETKIN

[Friedenau, August 21, 1908]

Niuniu, love of my heart,

Your letter of yesterday about the little picture I painted has made me
so happy and put me in such good spirits that I immediately started a
new painting yesterday. It’s so demanding on me and takes up so much of
my time that I can barely eat, I’m so impatient to be able to send it to
you. But it will have to take perhaps another four or five days! Dudu,
dearest, if I’m still painting at all, it’s your fault, because only you
give me the courage for this foolhardiness. Duduk, dear heart, I’ve had
no letter from you today. I’m going to the post office right now.

A big kiss!

TO KOSTYA ZETKIN

[Friedenau,] the 22nd [of August, 1908] Saturday

Dudu, beloved, today for the first time I went out to paint directly
from nature. I went to the Schlachtensee [a lake in Berlin] and was
burning with impatience, but my God, what difficulties! I could only
take a sketchbook with me, and so I was simply painting on the flat
paper out in the open, because it just didn’t work to take the easel
along! And so I had to hold the sketchbook and the palette in one hand
and the brush in the other. Besides, I had to BE SITTING (on a bench),
and so I couldn’t constantly step back to see how it was coming out. I
was also forced to paint within a very small space, or format, but I
have the need to make really large paintings; otherwise the brush has no
sweep to it, no power, and to top it all off I could only paint for an
hour, because some people came, and that drove me away. All together it
was enough to make me despair, and in addition to that, the water kept
changing every moment and so did the sky (today a storm was constantly
building up). I was on the verge of tears when I headed home. But again
I’ve learned something. Only I have no idea how I’m going to overcome
these external difficulties—how to bring the easel with me and at least
some larger-sized cardboard. Oh, Dudu, if I only had two years to do
nothing but paint—it would absorb me completely. I wouldn’t go to any
painter for lessons or instructions, nor would I ask anyone about
anything, but just learn on my own by painting, and asking you! But
those are crazy dreams. I can’t let myself do it, because there isn’t
even a dog that needs my wretched paintings. However, people do need the
articles I write—tomorrow I’ll send you today’s little painting. I think
it will be dry soon. And this time I’m so afraid it’s going to
disappoint you! But you must be strict and honest with yourself and with
me; otherwise, it would be no good, because I am definitely listening
only to you!

Dudu, I’m going to the post office now and hope to get something [from
you].

Niuniu, I simply cannot write everything that I experience and that I
would like to experience with you. My nerves are very strained now, and
at night I only sleep a few hours from being so worked up, and during
the day moods, hope and discouragement, chase through me one after
another like clouds in the sky.

Dudu!

Kiss the sweet little kitty on the head and on the back. I am not
jealous. I love it too, the innocent little thing. The carnation from
yesterday is splendid. I put it in some water.

TO KOSTYA ZETKIN

[Friedenau, August 25, 1908] Tuesday

Dudu, love of my heart, I probably will not send you yesterday’s
“painting” because it came out poorly. It was done on paper, and now all
the color has sunk into the paper and the thing has become quite dull
and dreadful. But the main thing is this: I am messing everything up for
myself through impatience and lack of time. Instead of going out for a
few days in a row and working on the same subject, I absolutely want
everything finished in one hour, and therefore after making a good
beginning to some extent, I kind of smear the rest hastily off the top
of my head and make rubbish out of it. Oh, Dudu, nothing’s going to come
of it all: where will I find the time? Now it means saying adieu for
half a year, and then I won’t want to start in again from the beginning,
after not having made any progress for half a year.

Unlucky me—I have to go to the party congress after all.⁴⁵⁶ August
[Bebel] has written twice already, with great urgency, and the elders
are giving me a mandate, so I can’t talk my way out of it. Therefore I
now have to work at top speed in order to get the new issue of our
Polish review finished by the 22nd.⁴⁵⁷ And I myself will have to fill at
least two entire signatures of that issue! Oh my poor little book that
I’m trying to write on economics!⁴⁵⁸ I shudder to think of Nuremberg!
Perhaps you will go there? But no, there can’t be any question of that.
You would do much better if you went to the Tyrol while there’s time.
That I should come to Stuttgart in September is an impossible idea.
Dudu! When am I supposed to find the time for that? And it will come
just before the visit by Dichter, Mietze, etc., and that inhibits me.
Also, I have to prepare myself a little for the party school.

Today I’m sending you Advielle.⁴⁵⁹ I hope you’ll read him with interest.
It’s due back on the 12th, but I can renew it then. The other volume is
still here, the one that deals with Babeuf’s defense at his trial. I
will not send that one to you for the time being. It’s not absolutely
necessary for you to read it, only if you have some desire to do so.

Now I’m waiting for further news about you from the doctor. Dudu,
beloved, everything is not all right with your dear heart. Am I supposed
to be happy about that because it gives you a deferment from military
service? That’s a very poor consolation for me. See here, darling, I
told you that you mustn’t strain your heart! I’m worried, by the way,
about your mountain climbing in the Tyrol … I kiss you, dear heart.

Yagugu

TO CLARA ZETKIN

[Friedenau, August 30, 1908]

Dearest Klara!

I just got back from Świebodzin [German name, Schwiebus], found what you
sent me, and am sending it back after careful and attentive study.
(Coincidentally, Karl [Kautsky] is bringing me his envelope, and I’ll
pack my material in with his.) The guiding principles and the
resolution⁴⁶⁰ are excellent: conceived on a large scale, thorough,
sharp, lively and full of spirit. Since you wish for criticism, and
since I am a pedant, I have crossed out some things and added some
comments where the text did not seem clear enough to me or seemed open
to misinterpretation. You can throw the comments in the wastepaper
basket without a care.

I give you a hug.

See you soon, Yours

[P.S.] I’m coming on Sunday the 13th,⁴⁶¹ about 5 pm, I think. Let me
know where to find you and where we’re going to stay.

TO KOSTYA ZETKIN

[Friedenau,] September 2 [1908] Wednesday

Dudu, beloved, finally I can write you, because last night I received
your address from Munich. Darling, I am very glad that you undertook
this whole trip and I hope for good results. Meanwhile I had to try to
master the greatest impatience, because I was finished with a painting
right on the 29th and was dying of impatience to send it to you just
when I got your telegram saying that I shouldn’t write to you. Now the
painting is waiting patiently until you are back or even longer: until I
come to visit you. The fact is unfortunately that I must go to
Nuremburg,⁴⁶² but from there I will go for 2–3 days to visit you and
bring the picture along. I hope to bring you a lot of joy with it. Here
I find no comprehension whatsoever, only from you do I get the feeling
of certainty that I can accomplish something, as well as some
encouragement. My little Dudu, how I long to go where you are and for a
calm and peaceful life with you! My heart can scarcely endure this
absence of peace and calm any more, the doctor has discovered something
wrong with a heart valve and has prescribed strophanthin [a heart
stimulant] for me, he’s coming again tomorrow. I’m already dreading the
party school.⁴⁶³ All this hard work for six long months, and during that
time you will no longer wait for me in the room, sitting in the red easy
chair, so that when I come home I can see your dear image in the mirror
[even before I enter] and be cheered up by that!… But don’t be sad,
Niuniu, we must both be brave, isn’t that right? Everything will
definitely be all right if we have courage and perseverance, and I
certainly will be able to paint now and then if the days are bright.
Niuniu, I will see you soon, soon we will have each other again—in three
weeks, if only for a short time. Oh my sweet, may you have peace! People
make me sick. Be cheerful for me and write to me even if just a couple
of words, so that I see a little something from you. Dearest!—

TO KOSTYA ZETKIN

[Friedenau,] September 8 [1908]

Niuniu, sweet darling, your letters make me so happy. I am now living in
such a mad rush that I can scarcely come to my senses, and it will
probably continue until it’s time to leave for the Party Congress.⁴⁶⁴
I’m happy that you’re having such beautiful hiking trips and that you
have the hardest part behind you. Darling, do avoid risks! Just think
[how you would feel] if you knew I was constantly hovering over abysses.
My sweet, in ten days probably we’ll have each other again, I am also
not thinking of sitting around in Nuremburg until the end, but I don’t
know how the congress agenda will go. I’ll bring the painting along.
Dear heart, I still have so much to live through and work to do until I
fight my way through to you! And I long so for peace and quiet. That’s
what I find with you.

Heart of mine, I kiss you, my sweet.

TO KOSTYA ZETKIN

[Friedenau, September 27, 1908]
Sunday, 10 a.m.

I go to the P.O. at noon

Sweet, beloved heart of mine, my darling, yesterday I received your two
letters from Thursday and Friday, but actually I couldn’t go to the post
office again on Friday evening, because Hannes [Diefenbach] came. Oh
Dudu, what longing overcame me when I read them! I was considering just
not writing you, but I’ve been reproaching myself fiercely, since I
arrived here, for not staying a few more days with you. I was such a
wretched coward, but here everything, for me, is such a mess, and I
bitterly regret that I made you and me poorer by two or three days of
happiness. Niuniu, my sweet, how dull and drab everything is to me
without you.

Yesterday Hannes came right at 5 [p.m.], he wanted to do something,
telephoned H. K. [Hans Kautsky], who came to get us with his car,
because it was raining, so we drove over to his house and he played
_Figaro_ for us [on the piano]. But for me the ride in the car as well
as the music itself were drab and colorless, I feel at my best if I’m
working all by myself, the “distractions” [interrupting the work] are
dreadful. The only point of light was that, looking out from the corner
where I was sitting on the sofa, I made a sketch on a scrap of paper of
the two Hanses together with the piano and a bit of the room.

I was already looking forward to sending you the picture, but Hannes
insists on having it as a gift for his father. By the way, to my taste
the picture lacks beauty and has nothing noble about it, but as far as
my real paintings are concerned, I actually feel that only a painting of
you would have high quality, otherwise these are patches [of color] that
go together only passably.

I want to do a painting of myself for you, but then I must wear a blouse
for a half-length portrait, because a [full-length] painting of a woman
in a dress is stupid—a lumpy bunch of rags. On the other hand, in your
clothes you look fine and noble in any pose. —

Hans K. gives the impression of a deeply unhappy man, but he keeps quiet
[about it]. He took me home in his car and we didn’t speak a single
word. It’s very nice of him, but I already have a dread of his visits,
because Hans [Diefenbach] is going away.

H. [Hans Diefenbach] has ALREADY CERTIFIED your booklets?

How do things stand with the police?

I already wrote to Wurm about a library card in order to borrow Advielle
for you.

Niuniu, when we’re together it so much doesn’t matter what we’re doing
or what’s going on around us, the main thing, after all, is that we’re
together, isn’t that right? And the sight of you gives me such aesthetic
pleasure. But Duduk shouldn’t think that I love him only for his body,
[because] I cannot by any means separate that [the physical] from the
spiritual, to me they are one.

Niuniu, I kiss you.

R.

[P.S.] Niuniu, send me YOUR SKETCH OF THE FIELD WITH THE TREE! I forgot
to take it. Please!

Hannes’s idea of doing some advertising or promotion for me is in very
poor taste. Of course I don’t say anything.

TO KOSTYA ZETKIN

[Friedenau, October 9, 1908] Friday

Darling, I just received the lines you wrote from Freudenstadt.
Meanwhile, I wrote to you at Sillenbuch.

I’m so glad you feel refreshed. The lines you wrote breathe of mountain
air, the heat of the sun, and the freshness of the forest. I feel so
happy about that.

Things are going well for me. I get up early, work, go for a stroll, and
have conversations with Mimi. Yesterday evening this is what she did: I
was searching all the rooms for her, but she wasn’t there. I was getting
worried, and then I discovered her in my bed, but she was lying so that
the cover was tucked up prettily right under her chin with her head on
the pillow exactly the way I lie, and she looked at me calmly and
roguishly.

It’s sunny here today, with a cool breeze. I thought to myself: it would
be wonderful to go off wandering and stay up high [in the mountains] as
long as possible.

We both send you greetings many times over.

TO KOSTYA ZETKIN

[Friedenau, after January 3, 1909] Thursday

Sweet beloved, your dear letters are a great joy for me. Today I was
free the whole day. [Kurt] Rosenfeld took over my lessons.⁴⁶⁵ In the
forenoon I did a little bit of walking—in your neighborhood. Other than
that I spent the whole day reading, so that my head is now a wild
chaotic mess. I definitely don’t want to see people, and I’m glad no
one’s coming to see me. I was reading about the history of the big
reform of the judicial system in Russia in 1864⁴⁶⁶ (I came across this
subject through my work on autonomy).⁴⁶⁷ The subject interests me very
much. One circumstance among many is especially interesting: the heart
and soul of this judicial reform, the person who is particularly
regarded as the creator of trial by jury in Russia and who worked on
these reforms for twenty-five years—was by profession an astronomer and
had absolutely no legal education! (Incidentally, his name was Zarudny,
the father of the St. Petersburg woman painter,⁴⁶⁸ whose portrait of me
is on the bookcase at Karl Kautsky’s!) Besides that, I have given myself
a bit of an orientation on this subject in Western Europe. Trial by jury
has existed in England since 1264, so it is a thoroughly medieval
institution, and in France, since the Great Revolution (Robespierre and
Barrère), in Germany, in some states, since 1848; and in the Reich
[i.e., in the Prussian-dominated German empire], for the past seventy
years. Now a backward revision must certainly take place. I will have to
look that up in Heinemann in _Neue Zeit_.⁴⁶⁹ What does the book by
Hildebrand say about form?⁴⁷⁰

It’s very stormy today, but at the same time warm, and quite wet, what
is called _Tauwetter_ (a thaw), and yet the storm and the clouds chasing
by do me good. Now I will go for a bit of a walk in the evening after
supper, I have such hunger for fresh air.

And longing for Niuniu.

Niuniuta, I found the glove, but I really did leave three small-fringed
napkins at your place. They were in that little bag with my eating
utensils. Gertrud [Zlottko] is shouting for them. Gugu, bring them with
you for me.

TO N. S. SESYULINSKY⁴⁷¹

[Friedenau, March 1909?]⁴⁷²

Dear N. S. I received your greetings and am very glad, although your sad
mood also distressed us. That you are reading Pushkin does not surprise
me at all. When I was in a situation similar to yours I submerged myself
in Krasiński, a Polish poet who you probably do not know. His verses, in
their content, are the most trivial rubbish made up of Catholic
mysticism, but in their sound they are the purest music, and I was
enraptured by them. I read them mostly for their tone and color.
Nowadays, on the other hand, I’m enraptured mostly by Mozart—the
_Marriage of Figaro_ and _Don Giovanni_—that is my real “faith,” and in
addition to that, Rembrandt. It’s a shame that those things aren’t
available to you! But I believe that day will also come!

Other than that, things are not so good. I will pass on your greeting to
the Old Man. He is sightseeing with his family in Paris, but [he writes]
“as soon as they sit down, things don’t go along very well”—that was in
reference to some concert.

I firmly clasp your hand,

Your R.

[P.S.] People here are asking whether or not there will be war.

We of course would prefer that “the cleansing storm” come [instead].

Your sketches have arrived! I am very happy about them.

TO LUISE KAUTSKY

[Sillenbuch, near Stuttgart,] May 1 [1909]

Dearest Lulu!

I’m writing you today for the first time, because since my arrival here
I’ve been living as though in prison; that is, I promised myself to
finish my work (for our Polish review)⁴⁷³ before ever lifting my head
from the writing desk. And I’ve actually been working for the entire two
and a half weeks, up in my room all alone, not even spending time in the
garden, where one can become quite distracted. I’ve been getting up at
6:30 in the morning, and not stopping work until suppertime, around 7,
going downstairs only for meals. The work has been going along superbly
for me, and I have spread ink over two and a half signatures. Today I’m
sending off the manuscript, and thus I feel as though I’ve been released
from prison, and I’m now writing letters that I’ve neglected the whole
time. Tomorrow I’m moving on—going to Zurich next. I have such longing
for the sun and for warmth! It’s been cold and rainy here the whole
time, and today it’s even snowing. In spite of that, the garden and the
woods are splendid, everything is blooming, and the rest and fresh air
have been very good for me. I have recuperated a lot, despite the
rigorous way of life.

Now I’ll be going elsewhere, and you ask, “Where to?” Well, actually, I
myself don’t know at this moment. I promised myself firmly to finish my
historical work on Poland and get it ready for publication (the work
that our friend Franz [Mehring] so uninhibitedly plagiarized and
rewrote).⁴⁷⁴ For this purpose I need a lot of material from Polish
history, and I will find it at the Polish library in Rapperswil, near
Zurich. But now a question arises, Might the people there possibly let
me take the books to Italy with me, or will I be forced to use them on
site? That would mean sitting in Zurich and traveling to Rapperswil to
do my work. This question won’t be decided until I get to Zurich, and
therefore, at the moment, I can’t say any more than that. I am just
hoping I’ll manage to persuade the library administration, so that I can
go to Italy [with the books]. I will write you then about my future
fate.

I have not yet heard from Klara [i.e., Clara Zetkin] how things went for
her in Berlin.⁴⁷⁵ She’s coming back tomorrow from London [to
Stuttgart].⁴⁷⁶

Even now I’m waiting for her to arrive. Otherwise, I would have been
gone from here today.

So what are you up to? And what are all of you doing? How have the
senior and the juniors recovered? In the next few days I will also be
sending to Karl [Kautsky] an article for _Neue Zeit_ on Russian matters.

Hannes [Diefenbach] is here; he suddenly popped up yesterday; but I
haven’t heard much from him about you; he seems to be totally buried in
his medicine and to have been living “like a monk.” —It made me very
happy that Klara took a few lovely days for you. Without her here there
is a void that one feels very much.

Keeping me company here in my room there’s an entire family of cats:
Mimi [Luxemburg’s cat] is here along with two charming kittens, who
force me to go to bed and get up with great punctuality. What their
upbringing will be like after these fine beginnings, after I have gone
on from here—the heart bleeds to think of it …

I kiss you with all my heart and embrace all of you. If you write
immediately, use the address: poste restante, Zurich. If not, I’ll have
to send you my address later on when I’ve established one. Once again, a
kiss with truest love. Your R.

TO HANS KAUTSKY

Degerloch [near Stuttgart] May 1, 1909

Dear Hans!

Today I hear by a letter from Luise [Kautsky] that you are still in
Berlin! What light-mindedness, what a crime against your health! Here
we’ve been having what’s called _Sauwetter_ [filthy, swinish weather],
with storms, rain, and cold all the time, and today it’s snowing on the
occasion of May 1. It wouldn’t be much different up where you are, but
still you’re not in any hurry to go south! Unheard of! The reason I’ve
been sitting here so long is that I had some written work to finish.⁴⁷⁷
Today that’s been accomplished, and tomorrow I’m heading for
Switzerland. I have to stay over in Zurich for a while to look for
material in the Polish library there, to be used for some further work
[on the same topic]. I don’t know if I’ll get anything there or how long
it will detain me. At any rate, from there I’ll head south. I hope to
find out an address for you later on from Luise, so I can give you some
sign of life from me.

In the meantime, hearty greetings from your RL.

TO LUISE KAUTSKY

Genoa, May 14, 1909

Dearest Lulu!

For the last few days I’ve been in _Genova superba_, as it calls itself,
whereas the Tuscans have a different opinion of it and say that here
there is _mare senza pesce, montagne senza alberi, uomini senza fede, e
donne senza vergogna_.⁴⁷⁸ I lean toward the view of the Tuscans, but
with one difference, that the _uomini_ are also _senza vergogna_.⁴⁷⁹ At
least that’s so in the stores, where they constantly cheat me on the
price of things, and on top of that they manage to pawn off a few
counterfeit coins on me. Otherwise it’s a lovely little city, splendidly
laid out, like an amphitheater on a narrow coastal strip around a large
bay, protected from behind by beautiful hills, each crowned with a
fortress and standing out in sharp contrast against the heavens—Italian
heavens of course. In the harbor below there is the usual harbor chaos
of ships, barges, grain elevators, dirt, smoke, crowded conditions, and
hustle and bustle. The streets are narrow, and the houses scrape the sky
and for their own part are mostly scraped up, each being two or four
windows in width, and all hung with brightly colored laundry from top to
bottom, so that with every zephyr’s breath shirts, _Gatjen_ [underwear],
stockings and socks with holes in them, and similar springtime items
flutter and flap. In order to reach the streets situated higher up,
every few steps there are charming _vicoli_ or _scalite_, that is,
little alleyways, which are quite dark, have a rich smell to them, and
are exactly so wide, all in all, that passage through them can be
blocked by one slightly swaying citizen [_cittadino_], who has turned
slightly away from public view and is performing his silent devotions,
seeing to it that the alley is regularly moistened so that the air does
not become too dry. In the somewhat wider lanes, however, one must go
caroming between two-wheeled carts—here I have seen no other kind—to
which two mules and a horse are harnessed lengthwise (that is, one in
front of the other) and which have a preference for traveling on the
left side, not the right, so that a well-disciplined and cultured person
from the German Reich, more often than not, suddenly becomes aware,
behind one’s head or above it, of the loving breath of a damp muzzle or
the cracking end of a whip, because anything like a sidewalk for
pedestrians separated from the flow of traffic is scornfully regarded
here as undemocratic, and so it’s left to each and every creature to
buffet its way through life and through the alley with its elbows.

Three favorite occupations I have observed among the Genoese: [one]
standing around with hands in trousers’ pockets and a pipe in the mouth
to watch some busy fellow man, e.g., a dock worker or someone digging in
the ground, with quiet sympathy for hours at a time; another,
expectorating every quarter of an hour, but not in such a simple and
formless way as among us, but artistically, with a long, thin stream out
of the corner of the mouth without moving the head and with a small
hissing sound; and lastly, getting a shave, and by no means in the
morning, but in the evening from 7 to 10 or 11 pm, on every street, left
and right, one must admire the open shops of the barbers
[_parruchieri_]; (every third Genoese is a _parruchiere_, the other two
being swindlers of indefinite profession) and the seated figures covered
with white barber’s cloths, with their noses tilted philosophically
upward, so that they seem to be observing the dirty ceiling while
black-eyed youths bend over them with razors as their not quite spotless
fingers dance over the faces [of the customers]. Among the other
curiosities to be noted is that, thanks to the state monopoly on salt,
the latter is a luxury item, and as a result the bread is completely
unsalted and without yeast and it tastes approximately like the mixture
which one of us Northerners uses to seal the windows for the winter.
Also, the price of sugar—for some reason about which I have no further
information—is 85 centesimos per pound, and the “pound” in Italy, as I
have finally concluded after lengthy and trying experience, contains
only 350 grams, and as a result the waiter [_cameriere_] when serving
tea, consistently forgets to bring the sugar bowl, and by the time one
has the chance to bring this trifle to his attention, the tea is cold.
Finally, the trains come and go with a normal delay of one to two hours,
and when a naïve Indo-German from Northern Europe, bathed in sweat,
leaps into the compartment at the last moment, according to the hour
listed on the _orario_ [the railroad schedule], he then has plenty of
time to cool off and calm down; for it is only after half an hour that
the conductor calls out in a sonorous voice “All aboard!”
[_“Partenza!”_] and then he disappears with the locomotive driver into
the buffet. After another half hour the two of them reappear on the
station platform, visibly refreshed and in good spirits, and then the
train gradually but actually gets under way. (I experienced this
yesterday, when I went on an excursion out to the Riviera Levante,⁴⁸⁰
and as a result of delays didn’t get home until 2:30 in the morning.)
Above all this of course stands a blue sky, eternally smiling, and now I
know very well why it’s smiling. But of course it only smiles when it’s
not raining.

There [you have] a brief outline [_Ecco una breva machietta_] of my
impressions. As for myself, I received favorable news in Zurich. I was
allowed to obtain all the books here, but only by going through a local
city or government library. This again keeps me tied down to Genoa to
some extent. But in spite of the fact that I have found a pretty room in
a good location (high above the city), I think that very soon I’ll have
had my fill of life here, and perhaps I’ll be able to go to the seashore
somewhere. But this is, unfortunately, not as easy to do as one might
imagine; I found this out yesterday on my first serious look around.
There are either true resorts like Nervi, which to me are simply a
horror, or there are hot and dirty little towns, where on top of
everything you can only find entire suites [rather than a single
room]—but without cleaning service or meals. Besides, there is no real
beach there, because the shore is very steep and rocky. Nevertheless,
something probably will soon be found. On the whole, life and nature
here please me very much, but the main thing is the sea, which is
magnificent. I can see it from my room all day long and can’t get my
fill of looking at it.

Well, how are things with you and all your family? No doubt you are
going to Klara [i.e., Clara Zetkin]’s lectures.⁴⁸¹ Write me all the
details about that too. Since I don’t know where Klara is staying, I’m
enclosing a letter for her. —By the way, while doing my work here, I’ve
had an idea for you, a topic for an article that would stand on its
own—a minor study that would be good for the _Gleichheit_ or _Neue Zeit_
and in which you could put to good use your knowledge of English, also
one that would not overtax your modest self-esteem. Generally speaking,
it annoys me that you let people pile one dreary translation job after
another on you. What do you get from that? What do you learn from this
mechanical labor fit for a beast of burden? Really it’s a waste of your
time and energy. We will talk or write about my proposal as soon as
you’re finished with that muck and are again disposed for some work. —A
few more requests in connection with _my_ work: Gertrud [Zlottko] has
probably let you have my keys, so be a dear and send the following from
my library (left side of the large bookcase):

(1) Bücher’s _Entstehung der Volkswirtschaft_ [Origin of Economics]. (2)
Ingram’s _Geschichte der Volkswirtschaftslehre_ [History of Economic
Theory]. (3) The Webbs’ _History of Trade Unions_. Besides that, be so
kind as to write out the following excerpts: (1) From ROSCHER (have Karl
give you [Roscher’s] _Nationalökonomie_ [Political Economy]), his
DEFINITION of: what is economics (or economic theory), probably at the
beginning of his course of lectures. I need only a few sentences, but
quoted word for word and the exact title of the book. (2) From the
_Handwörterbuch der Staatswissenschaften_, SCHMOLLER’S article on
economic theory. You must find the passage where the idiot says that
economics arose as a result of the financial and bureaucratic needs of
the modern state in the eighteenth century. That passage is all I need.
I know that you will be willing to help me, and it really will be a
great help, because the library here is no good (it’s a _Saubibliothek_
[fit only for cows]) and such books are not to be found in it. Also, one
more request: Could you copy down for me what Germany’s exports and
imports were for some recent year, but with items listed individually,
so that a person can see what kind of commodities go where and what kind
come from where. (Only the type of commodity, the country, and the total
value OR total weight.) But if this should cause you difficulties, the
hell with it. I’ll get by all the same.

Write me now about all of you, and what the boys are doing.⁴⁸² Pardon
me, the ex-mules⁴⁸³ (what are they called now_—asini_?). And the little
Schnips?⁴⁸⁴ What is Karolus Magnus [Karl Kautsky] doing? Write me at
poste restante (si _ferma in posta_), but BY REGISTERED MAIL, otherwise
it’s uncertain. The books in particular should be registered. I send
heartfelt kisses to all of you. Your R.

[P.S.] What is Granny doing, and where is she? I send her best wishes.

TO LUISE KAUTSKY

[Levanto,] the 13th [of June,] 1909

Dearest Lulu!

Today I received both your cards: from the 9th and the 11th— together!
Meanwhile, you already know that the package arrived, and thus you’ve
been reassured. I myself haven’t written for a long time, because in the
interim I’ve had to keep slaving away, and also every day I had one or
several business letters to write, and so no real leisure time remained
for me to write you the way I wanted to. Also, waiting for the books
made me impatient and “grumpy,” as Franz [Mehring] would say, and you
know that I don’t like to show myself when bad weather is “with me.”
Today there’s sunshine again—inside me and around me. Actually we had a
whole week of rainy weather, storms, cold winds, and a turbulent sea.
Today there’s suddenly an azure blue sky, beaming sun, and dark blue sea
with foamy white-caps that glitter in the sunlight like snow. On the
whole it’s much cooler here than I thought and as one would normally
imagine. A friend writes me from Switzerland: I don’t understand how you
can bear it now on the [Italian] Riviera! I had to laugh, because to
judge by the news from [other] acquaintances, it is now much hotter in
Switzerland than here. Levanto is a tiny little nest, two hours from
Genoa, and I didn’t know at first whether I would be able to stay
here—the conditions were certainly quite unfamiliar to me—that’s why I
didn’t send you an address right away, nor did I send one to the
Friedenau post office [for forwarding mail], because Levanto is not
known to the world at large—thank God!—and letters might have wandered
astray to anywhere possible, including the Orient. But now I have
remained here, after all, and am even receiving my mail, although with
the most beastly lack of punctuality.

Now as to your plans (“your” singular and plural) and my plans. I am
almost certainly going to Switzerland in July, and so I hope it can be
arranged that we will meet. Naturally I will inform you immediately
where my travels will take me as soon as I know that myself. At the
moment I cannot make up my mind, but in the end it will probably be my
beloved Lake of Lucerne. The only thing is, I’m afraid, from previous
experience, that I will get roasted [sunburned] much more there than
here in Italy. Where are you and Karl [Kautsky] thinking of spending
your three weeks in Switzerland? Write me about that right away if you
have something definite in mind. That will also perhaps make my
conjectures easier. Then write me exactly when Karl and Bendel are
coming to Genoa—or are they going directly from Marseille to
Switzerland? Also what ship will they be on? (Is it really a freighter?
If so, the trip really could last forever.) When we all finally meet in
Switzerland, that will be an occasion for lots of fun and chitchat!!

My nest here is charmingly situated above a little bay, but fortunately
without a harbor, so that no fishing vessels and sailboats ruin the
view, as they do in Sestri Levante (where Gerhart Hauptmann is “working
in lucid and fragrant tranquility,” as I have learned from _Il
Secolo_).⁴⁸⁵ Also this little nest is not located on the tourist road,
as are the Ponente and Levante districts [of the Italian Riviera] as far
as Sestri, with the cars roaring past and befouling the air. This little
town is set in the middle of the soft Appenine Hills, covered with olive
trees and pines, offering greenery of every shading. It’s completely
quiet here, only the tragic rasping croak of a mule’s voice makes itself
heard now and then along with the vehement cries of the mule drivers.
Other than that a few sleepy figures stand by the entrances to the few
stores on “Main Street,” and children play in the sand, or red and white
cats slink across the street from one garden fence to another. The town
center consists of the four-cornered Piazza Municipale, which is
surrounded by the main buildings of the town, all furnished with
galleries. In these buildings is found everything that represents
authority, rank, and power: the post office, the garrison (probably six
soldiers with two officers), the _podestà_ [mayor’s office], the customs
house, and alongside all this of course is a marble memorial tablet with
two protruding borders around it. Some passerby is always standing at
this plaque with his back to the piazza, while other than that only the
sun floods across the empty square, in the middle of which stands a
statue dedicated to Cavour, “the greatest dummy of the nineteenth
century,” as the inscription wittily explains (_al più grande
statisto_).⁴⁸⁶ Other than that one sees only, at a narrow brook beneath
three large cedars, the washerwomen [_lavandaie_], meanwhile the men
like best to chat with one another in front of my _albergo_ [hotel], for
example, two or three citizens are usually standing or sitting on some
ledge or wall protruding from the building and they feel quite contented
to be chatting for hours, meanwhile inside I am fuming because this
unceasing pitter-patter of voices outside distracts me completely from
my thoughts, and I am tempted to just shove my work aside, and best of
all I would like to plunk myself down and sit around in the sun. In the
cool of the evening, every living thing goes out onto “Main Street” to
walk up and down, countless dark little children run around playing, and
the “iceman” at his little cart does a thriving business. Every evening
I also buy ice from him for 10 centesimos in a small wafer cone if I can
manage to break through the crowd of children besieging him.
Intellectually there are apparently two individuals who dominate society
here: the postman, a heavy-set, round, darkly gleaming young man, who in
his white shoes and Garibaldi hat, set at a jaunty angle, functions
during his hours off duty as the chieftain and idol of the local
_jeunesse dorée_; in the evenings, surrounded by friends, he tosses off
witticisms that I don’t understand and promotes good cheer all around
him, along with—I’m afraid to say—a bit of free-thinking and cynicism.
The owner of the drugstore is quite a different sort, indeed he is also
in his prime, but pale and grim-looking, and he always has a few equally
serious gentlemen present in his store along with the local priest, and
they sit there, wearing their hats and discussing politics. They even do
that, by the way, if the drugstore owner is absent, during which time
they keep a good conversation going even without him, while reading the
newspapers in his store. Twice already I wanted to buy tooth powder from
him, and each time he had to be fetched by one of the politicking
gentlemen of the clerical party. Every Sunday there is a procession in
which women, children, and old men dressed in black participate, but the
procession moves along lazily, the singing keeps breaking off at every
moment, and the spectators laugh; “Signor Gesù” [Lord Jesus], who is
being carried aloft on a lengthy beam of wood, has a strained look on
his face, because he’s being blinded by the glaring sun and his nose is
itching. But this business is not always as innocent as it looks. Do you
know where the storm and rain last week came from? Today I read the
following in the _Secolo:_ In Porto Maurizio in the Ponente district a
religious procession was organized to conjure away the drought [_per
scongiurare la siccita_]. In view of that should one not believe in the
mercifulness [_misericordia_] of God? The drugstore owner was of course
triumphant and with a cold smile on his face looked over at the
postman’s party. But at the same time on every street corner giant
posters of the Social Democracy are now hanging resplendently, calling
people to come out for May Day. No one is upset about this—perhaps even
on May Day no one will be upset about it, that I don’t know. Oh! The
world is so imperfect. Everything would be so beautiful, except
for—except for … First of all: the frogs. As soon as the sun goes down
the frog concerts begin on every side, the like of which I have not
heard in any country. I already encountered this surprise in Genoa, but
I expected it least of all on the Riviera. Frogs—I can put up with them.
But SUCH frogs, such a far-reaching, rasping, self-satisfied, blown-up
croaking, as if the frog was the number one and absolutely most
important being!… Second: the bells. I appreciate and love church bells.
But this ringing every quarter of an hour, and such a light-minded,
silly, childish ding-dong-ding—ding-ding-dong, which can make a person
quite idiotic. First thing every Sunday, and especially on the feast of
Corpus Christi, these stupid bells have been rolling and rumbling with
joy like so many piglets who just couldn’t get enough of it. Third of
all—third— Karl, if you go to Italy, don’t forget to take along a box of
insect powder. Other than all that, it’s wonderful here.

Karolus, in closing, I have something else relating to business.
Attached is the title of a new book by Lenin (Ilyin is his pseudonym).
He would like it if the book could be mentioned in the “Books Received”
section.⁴⁸⁷ As far as a review of the book is concerned, don’t assign it
to anyone, I will perhaps be able to suggest someone, otherwise you
might unintentionally offend the author. But please include the book
IMMEDIATELY in the “Books Received” section and ALSO in the section on
literature about socialism. And now I kiss all of you, all together, and
you, Lulu, in particular. Your R.

TO HANS KAUTSKY

Levanto, June 20 [1909]

Dear Hans!

I thought you would immediately report your new address to me from
Wengen, but since you’re keeping quiet, I’m writing to the old address.
Hopefully, this letter will be forwarded to you.

I’m coming to Switzerland July 1. I wrote to L[uise Kautsky] and
formally invited her to come visit me exactly on the 1st. I mentioned
Gersau (on the Lake of Lucerne), since I knew nothing else to suggest at
the time. In Gersau I will also wait for Luise and, depending on whether
it will be convenient for her, I’ll remain there or immediately go to
the Walensee [or Lake of Wallenstadt, near Zurich]. Since I can’t
arrange this with her by letter, the best thing will be for us to meet
first and talk.

So then, that will satisfy you.

I couldn’t come to Switzerland earlier, and for L[uise] too there would
have been no point. In fact, the earliest she can start her trip is at
the beginning of July.

I’m very glad that you’re reading diligently. On the great [French]
revolution you should now read the history by Louis Blanc, if it has
appeared in German (not to be confused with two other books he wrote, a
_History of the 1848 Revolution_ and _Ten Years_). If you can’t get hold
of it, try to find SYBEL’s history; it’s tendentiously “German” and
reactionary, but a solid work. —

I felt amused that you’re complaining about my _Jacque_ [a novel by
Bourget]. Young man, I certainly did not praise the NOVEL, which is a
disgusting mess, like most of Bourget, merely the figure of the mother,
which is in fact splendidly true to life. And so, to make up for that,
my [Georg] Büchner has pleased you! One also ought to have read _Notes
from the House of the_ Dead.⁴⁸⁸ However, in your present frame of mind
the thing will depress you. It is gray on gray, and quite grim. Apropos
[of the above]: I now remember a classical work about the great
revolution that you must read: Tocqueville’s _The Ancien Regime and the
Revolution_. That is surely to be had in German, and in its time was
epoch-making.

I certainly hope to see a bit of you, even if you may have other things
in mind, and then we’ll have a cheerful chat. Oh God, if only you
wouldn’t constantly suffer so! I would very much like to see you joyful
and free, like I am, for example.

For now, stay well, and see you soon!

Your R. Luxemburg

TO KOSTYA ZETKIN

[Quarten,⁴⁸⁹ August 13, 1909] Friday

Sweet beloved, one and only darling, for some time now—almost since your
return from the Black Forest—you’ve been writing me so coldly and
mechanically, and only every other day, that I simply can’t account for
it. I’m afraid of any explanations from you because you can [so] easily
have an outburst of rage, and therefore I’ve remained silent and tried
to adjust the tone of my letters to yours. But I can’t bear it any more.
Every day I wait with longing for your letters, and every letter gives
me a deathly cold stab in the heart; I have been quite ill recently.
Therefore I ask you for just one thing: If you no longer love me, say it
to me openly, in just three words. I will certainly not utter the
slightest reproach against you; after all, you can’t do anything about
it, and it must come out someday.

But be open. You owe it to the concept of “having truth in life”— and
also out of consideration for me.

I kiss you, and kiss you even if it’s for the last time, my dear, sweet
love.

TO KOSTYA ZETKIN

[Quarten, August 17, 1909]⁴⁹⁰
Thursday

My dear Costia, it costs me a great effort of will to still write you,
but in parting I do want you to see into me as clearly as I see into
you.

So I have made the effort and am now quite calm. To me it’s as though a
year had gone by since Sunday; I had already survived the most difficult
part when your false letters arrived and when I read the last one, the
candid one, a great coldness and a painful aching entered my heart, but
also, in fact, a great peace. It occurred to me that things have turned
out as I said to you at the beginning: you forced me to love you because
of your love, and if your love were to fade away into nothingness, that
would happen with mine too. It pained me that I didn’t relieve you of
this burden earlier. I felt pained by the angry and tormented looks of a
captured baby bird, but I never dared to say the emancipating word,
because inwardly I regarded our relationship as a sacred and serious
matter. You poor youngster, you felt you were trapped when at any moment
the slightest little word could have freed you, as you now certainly
see, and when in reality I was the trapped one, because the memory of a
soft pleading stammer: “Be true to me, be true to me,” and a letter
pleading: “Don’t leave me, don’t abandon me,” held me like a chain of
iron. The stammering of a beloved little boy held my heart fast even
when your unhappy appearance caused me unutterable torture, when during
sleepless nights in Genoa the unclearness of your attitude toward me
choked me. But I have the sweet consolation that I fulfilled the little
boy’s wish: I was true to him to the end and not once, not once did he
get a nasty, piercing glance from me or even a most hidden thought.

Now the effort has been made. I am going to work with pleasure and love
and am determined to bring more strictness, clarity, and chasteness into
my life. This conception of life for me has grown to maturity in dealing
with you and therefore it is fitting for you to hear these words also.

Now you are free as a bird, and may you be happy. Principaccia no longer
stands in your way. Fare thee well, and may the nightingales of the
Appenine Hills sing to you and the wide-horned oxen of the Caucasus
greet you.

R.⁴⁹¹

TO ANATOLY LUNACHARSKY [AND OTHERS]⁴⁹²

Quarten am Walensee, August 21, 1909

Worthy comrades!

I received your kind invitation, together with your school’s program,
and read them with the greatest interest.⁴⁹³ To my deepest regret it is
too late now for me to think of a trip to Capri. On September 1, because
of my party obligations, I absolutely must be in Berlin, on the spot and
ready to go, because that’s when regular party work resumes and soon
after that, the party school.⁴⁹⁴ Therefore I cannot venture on such a
long trip now. As you see, there is no possibility of that at all.
Perhaps sometime next summer, if arrangements can be made on time.

Meanwhile, I wish all of you much success in your undertaking, and I
shake all of your hands.

R. Luxemburg

TO MAXIM GORKY⁴⁹⁵

[presumably 1909 or 1910]
Berlin SW 69, 3 Linden Street

Dear, respected Comrade Gorky!

The bearer of these lines, our party attorney and friend, Comrade Dr.
[Kurt] Rosenfeld, along with his wife, on the occasion of their trip to
Italy, will pass on to you and your dear wife heartfelt greetings from
Kautsky and me. Hopefully, everything with you is as well as all of us
here wish it to be.

Greetings and a clasp of the hand

Your Rosa Luxemburg

Luise Kautsky herself would be eager to add her greetings as well, but
unfortunately, she is not here at the moment.

TO KONRAD HAENISCH

[Friedenau, before March 14, 1910]

Dear Comrade Haenisch!

I am enclosing two lead articles, whose publication, precisely in your
paper, would be very much appreciated by me.⁴⁹⁶ The situation, to state
it briefly, is this: The [SPD] Executive and the General Commission [of
the Trade Unions] have already considered the mass strike, and after
lengthy negotiations it was defeated by the resistance of the General
Commission. In view of this, the Party Executive naturally believes that
it must trim its sails and would like best to forbid even a DISCUSSION
about the mass strike! I therefore consider it urgently necessary to
carry the discussion to the widest mass audience. The masses themselves
ought to decide, but it is our duty to present the pros and cons, the
general line of argument. I therefore am counting on you to give your
support here [in this matter] and to run the articles without delay. If
they are printed, please send me several copies. My hope is that the
articles will be reprinted [by other papers].

Best wishes Rosa Luxemburg

An honorarium—if possible—would also be viewed with sympathy hereabouts.

TO LUISE KAUTSKY

[Friedenau,] March 17 [1910]

Dearest Lulu!

My life here is now so feverish that I simply don’t get around to
writing you, although I constantly feel a strong urge to do so. So then,
from the “theater of war.”⁴⁹⁷ I reworked and improved my article, which
was refused by Karl [Kautsky], making it even better (clearer and
sharper), and it has already been published in the Dortmund
_Arbeiter-Zeitung_ (Konrad Haenisch).⁴⁹⁸ The people in Leipzig and those
in Bremen have already reprinted it, to be followed by others as well, I
hope.

The day before yesterday, on Tuesday, the 15th, evening meetings were
arranged in 48 places, with the clear intention of preventing any
actions on the 18th, tomorrow.⁴⁹⁹ As speakers, nothing but fourth- and
fifth-rate people, mainly union officials! Besides that, an item was
printed in _Vorwärts_ forbidding any demonstrations in the streets after
the meetings. I found out on the 12th, at the school,⁵⁰⁰ that they were
lacking a speaker, so I immediately took it on and in the evening gave a
speech in the fourth electoral district. The meeting was so full it
could have knocked you out (about one and a half thousand), and the mood
was terrific. Naturally I gave it everything I had, and the response was
stormy applause. (Hannes [Diefenbach], Gerl[ach], Costia [i.e., Kostya
Zetkin], and Eckst[ein] were there with me, and the latter has come over
to my point of view since yesterday, as he told me.)

Today I received an urgent invitation from Bremen by telephone, and one
from Essen by letter, to address meetings on the subject of the mass
strike.⁵⁰¹

I’m considering whether I shouldn’t chuck the school in the near future
and head out across the country in order to heat things up everywhere. I
will send you my articles. This evening I’m going to pay a flying visit
to Nied Street. Write soon! I miss you so!

I send you a kiss in haste. Your Rosa

TO LUISE KAUTSKY

[Dortmund, April 13, 1910]

Dearest Lulu!

All goes well, I have eight public meetings behind me and six more to
go.⁵⁰² Everywhere I find the comrades agree [with me] unconditionally
and enthusiastically. Karl’s article⁵⁰³ elicits only a shrugging of the
shoulders. I observed this particularly in Kiel, Bremen, Dortmund, [and]
with Dittmann in Solingen. The most amusing thing is—as Klara [i.e.,
Clara Zetkin] writes me—that the regional [SPD] secretary Wasner (!) at
a public meeting expressed his amazement at Karl’s behavior in the
sharpest terms. By the way, I knew immediately that I wouldn’t get the
galley proofs. Karl wants, for as long as he can, to make it impossible
for me to reply and it is not “Wurm’s way [of doing things],” as you
think, that the article appears in two separate issues, but Karl’s own
way toward the same end. Tell him that I know well how to evaluate the
loyalty and friendship in these little tricks, that he has put his foot
in it badly by so bravely stabbing me in the back. —How are you? What’s
my Mimi doing? Drop me a line here at Haenisch’s address (16 Dresden
Street). I’ll stay here till the 16th and travel around from here.

A kiss and best wishes to you and the boys. R.

TO MATHILDE AND ROBERT SEIDEL

[Friedenau,] May 28, 1910

Dearest Mathilde and dear Robert!

How many hundreds of times I have written and sent you epistles filled
with love—in my thoughts … It simply didn’t get down in ink on paper
because of the God-damned whirlpool of life in which one lives and in
which one always has “the next urgent thing” to attend to and thus puts
off personal matters such as love “until tomorrow.” How thrilled I was
by your flowers from Weggis, Mathilde! I was seized by such a longing
for Switzerland that I would have preferred to rush off all at once to
visit you. Yet I remain here on the rack of party work. During all of
April, I roared through Germany with rallies and public meetings on the
electoral issue. Now I am romping around in the press (see _Neue
Zeit_).⁵⁰⁴ And always, in between those things, there was the Russian
and Polish work. So there’s always enough to do. But I am personally
satisfied because, after all, I enjoy life most in the midst of the
storm. Besides, for the greatest personal joy in my life I have a little
something out of the ordinary: I paint. This came upon me suddenly, and
now I’m doing portraits in oil, which gives me much pleasure. Of course
I get around to doing this only once a year, in the summer somewhat,
because from fall through spring my time is completely taken up with the
party school. But enough about me. How are you? How is your health,
Mathilde? And how is your work going, Robert? Aren’t you going to come
to Germany sometime? Maybe on the occasion of the Freiligrath
celebration.⁵⁰⁵ What are the “youngsters” doing, that is, the grown-up
gentlemen?⁵⁰⁶ Be “good Christians,” give bread in return for a stone and
write to me soon and at length. Everything about you interests me
deeply. Don’t you hear anything from Olympia [Lübeck]? I haven’t heard
from her in a hundred years, don’t even know her address.

Best wishes to you both, with all my heart, Rosa

TO KONRAD HAENISCH

[Friedenau,] June 18, 1910

Dear Comrade Haenisch!

Both your letters made me very happy, but I was particularly pleased
with the Freiligrath volume. I wanted to let you know earlier what joy
that gave me, but I’ve been very busy.

What you report to me about the latest [official] “decisions” is
certainly quite despicable, but these are the results, after all, of the
“strategy of attrition.”⁵⁰⁷ It is to be hoped that the current
discussion and its continuation at Magdeburg⁵⁰⁸ will shake up our people
and spur them on to greater vigilance _vis-à-vis_ the “higher
authorities.” I consider it my party duty, at any rate, to go forward
with unhesitating, relentless candor. The fact that Karl Kautsky is
stepping so badly ever deeper into the mire is a painful thing for
radicalism.⁵⁰⁹ But even so perhaps some gain will come out of this,
namely that our people will learn to think for themselves more and to
parrot the authorities less.

Karl Kautsky has made a notable blunder on the question of calling for a
republic. That passage [in Luxemburg’s article “What Next?”] about a
republic, which he did not want taken up, has nevertheless appeared as a
separate article, entitled “Zeit der Aussaat” (Time for the Sowing of
Seeds)⁵¹⁰ in the Breslau and Dortmund papers, and perhaps a dozen
others! And now K[autsky] reproaches me with the claim that I myself
“had renounced” it!…

Klara [i.e., Clara Zetkin] is coming here today. I sent her your letter
for purposes of information.

N.B.: Are you familiar with my pamphlet about the mass strike (1906)?⁵¹¹
It deals EXACTLY with all the questions that K. K. [Karl Kautsky] has
brought up. It turns out that even our best people actually did not at
all absorb the lessons of the Russian revolution [of 1905]. I would
consider it very useful for this pamphlet to be circulated more widely
now, perhaps the soil is better prepared now for it to take root. How
would it be if you were to reprint the pamphlet, which is quite short,
in several issues of your “theoretical supplement”? I don’t think the
Hamburg people would have any objections to that.

Klara will be able to inform you better about the Gewehr affair.⁵¹²

I have no faith in any “agreement.” Poor Gewehr will somehow be made to
keep quiet, so that at Magdeburg the Executive and Zietz will not be
blamed.

Heartfelt greetings, your Rosa Luxemburg

TO ÉMILE VANDERVELDE⁵¹³

Berlin-Friedenau, October 8, 1910
58 Cranach Street

Dear Citizen Vandervelde!

I would like to ask you through our friend Karski⁵¹⁴ to do a great
service for the Polish workers’ movement.⁵¹⁵

For eight months we have had in Warsaw a legal publication of the
socialist movement, _Młot_ [_Hammer_]. Despite all difficulties with
confiscations by the police, and undeterred by lawsuits and fines, we
have carried on; it was only after my withdrawal [from the editorial
work] that we changed the name of our publication.⁵¹⁶ The existence of
such an explicitly revolutionary and socialist weekly has unleashed the
hatred of our bourgeoisie, and so for weeks we have been fighting
against the entire bourgeois press, which has pulled out all the stops
against us. In the process—and this is what is most noteworthy—the
attacks on us have come above all from the so-called progressive press,
from the publication “Free Thought” [_Libre Pensée_]⁵¹⁷ [edited and
published by] a certain Niemojewski, who is the most rabid ringleader
among our opponents. And the main point is that this “Free Thought”
publication has suddenly begun preaching against us with the slogan
“Down with the Jews!”—and the entire liberal, progressive press has
abandoned itself to an all-out orgy of anti-Semitism. Socialists are
“Jews,” our _Młot_ is an organ of “the Jewish syndicate,” we are all
agents of “Jewry,” and the “progressive” press is overflowing with
personal slander and vulgarity. As you see, it is a Dreyfus case in
miniature that is happening among us at the present time, and all of
bourgeois Poland—progressives, liberals, and free-thinkers in
competition with full-blooded reactionaries and the clergy—have formed a
single camp to wage class war against us. Therefore we need the moral
support, the assistance, the solidarity of the International, especially
because in the bourgeois press, following a familiar procedure, the
French, German, and other socialists are portrayed as the “good
socialists” in contrast to us, who are designated as “impure and
rootless socialists, lacking a Fatherland.” Write for us, then, an open
letter to the editors of _Młot_, tell us what you think about this
running together of “free-thinkers” with the anti-Semites, and what you
think about the “Jewishness” of socialism, [and also] direct a word of
encouragement to the embattled workers who are carrying on the struggle
under such difficult conditions.

I thank you in advance and send heartfelt best wishes.

Rosa Luxemburg

TO KOSTYA ZETKIN

[Friedenau, March 22, 1911]

Juju, darling!

I wrote you yesterday, but today is so beautiful and warm, the sun is
shining so magnificently, that I simply must write to my Niuniu [again].
The window and the balcony door are wide open, sunlight is filling both
rooms, in the air there is the merry noise of children, the twittering
of birds, and the humming of an electric train. One wants so much to be
happy. I think so often about how Niuniu is feeling now. You haven’t
written anything about it, but surely you must be tormented by a longing
for beauty and happiness in the world at large, and it pains me that you
don’t have any of that.

Today, in a volume of the _Handwörterbuch der Staatswissenschaften_⁵¹⁸ I
found this little note in your handwriting, it certainly has been there
a long time. I felt so glad when I found the note.

I’m already feeling better, you don’t need to worry, the only thing is
that, generally speaking, I’m tired of winter and the school. I have a
great desire to do my work in a sensible way, and now I want to bring
the economics book to an end. I want to move forward because I’ve been
sort of stuck in a rut for several years. I’ve learned a lot during
these years and inwardly feel sure of my own judgment, and therefore I
now must get something accomplished again.

I kiss you, and so does Mimi, N⁵¹⁹

TO KOSTYA ZETKIN

[Friedenau, end of March 1911]

Niuniuś, your note accompanying the flowers made me very happy. I had to
laugh that you noticed exactly the same passage I did in K[autsky]’s
discussion of Hilferding.⁵²⁰ This “discovery” is rather pyramidal.⁵²¹
But when you conclude that this discredits the sorry science of
economics, your judgment is like that of a little boy. It’s only that K.
K. [Karl Kautsky] is making himself ridiculous with all this, showing
how completely out of touch he is with the world, and revealing his
spiritual “bumpkinization” [_Verbauerung_] of the last few years. By the
way, I’m reading Hilferding’s book right now. I haven’t completely
formed a judgment about it yet, but the thought is stirring faintly
within me that he’s only writing around the problem in a supposedly
Marxist manner, but has failed to find the solution. When I’m finished
with the book perhaps I too will write a review, and then I would also
evaluate the “discovery.”

What Hilferding wrote seems like 2 + 2 = 5; I have again been convinced
that good old Parvus, deep inside, is a rather unfinished person; he
strongly urged me to read the book [by Hilferding].

The weather here was lovely on Sunday, I think, but because of noisy
visitors I didn’t really take it in.

Your flowers are fresh and marvelously fragrant, I’ve just sprayed them.
Mimi helped.

We kiss you, N

TO KOSTYA ZETKIN

[Friedenau, April 2, 1911]

Little Niuniuś, don’t be angry with me, but I’m going to Switzerland.
I’m waiting for your mother, though, because I’m awfully happy about
taking a trip with her.

On Saturday there was an end-of-school celebration.⁵²² I had a very good
time, very amusing, and didn’t get home till 2 a.m. On Friday I went to
_Don Juan_ [i.e., Mozart’s opera _Don Giovanni_], which was badly
performed, in part, but in the end, despite everything, it made a
powerful impression on me. Today I’m being dragged off to _The Magic
Flute_, although I had intended finally to get a decent amount of sleep,
which I haven’t managed to do for a long time. I had a lot of visitors
last week.

[Kurt] Rosenfeld was here and sat around until 12:30 a.m. Mrs. Wurm also
paid me a long visit, despite the fact that I don’t ever send greetings
to him [her husband Emmanuel Wurm]. Yesterday Lenin came, and up to
today he has been here four times already. I enjoy talking with him,
he’s clever and well educated, and has such an ugly mug, the kind I like
to look at. Yesterday I received an amusing letter from Constantinople,
which I enclose for you.

Here it’s warm, even balmy again, completely springtime. Poor Mimi keeps
going _kuru_! She impressed Lenin tremendously, he said that only in
Siberia had he seen such a magnificent creature, that she was a _barskii
kot_—a majestic cat. She also flirted with him, rolled on her back and
behaved enticingly toward him, but when he tried to approach her she
whacked him with a paw and snarled like a tiger.

Your mother was going to write from Bremen, but has written nothing yet.

I kiss you, Mimi does too, N

TO LEO JOGICHES

[Sillenbuch, between April 2 and 16, 1911]

It comes to mind once again that someone absolutely must travel to
Warsaw for two days, in order to encourage our people there. If one is
still so very indignant, I would make the trip with pleasure. (The
passport is ready.)

I received the enclosed letter from Kuba, don’t know how I should
respond.

I would like to make an arrangement with Annie [Luxemburg], but I don’t
have her address.⁵²³ If you have it, make this known to her right away,
so that she will come to my place (on Cranach Street), she can live
there and be catered to as if she were at home. Ida [Raduin] does the
cooking anyway.

I received the enclosed card from Huysmans’s “secretary.”⁵²⁴ He
[Huysmans] himself no longer writes, he feels offended that after he
asked twice for the statutes I didn’t send them. Can’t anything be
obtained? It seems peculiar and makes our party look ridiculous.

I enclose the invitation from the French.⁵²⁵ In my opinion, there’s no
harm in writing them a letter expressing best wishes. At the most, one
could telegraph a few words from Berlin, such as: _“Voeux fraternels.
Vive l’unité socialiste et l’intransigeance révolutionnaire.”_⁵²⁶

Rappoport, who was here (to give a talk on Tolstoy), wrote to [Clara]
Zetkin that Lenin has returned from San Remo, where he conferred with
Plekhanov, the latter being once again in agreement with Lenin,
according to him [i.e., according to Rappoport].

The money (obviously from Józef) was received by Ida after I had left.

N.B.: Adolf [Warski] talked about the fact that Jadzia [Warska; wife of
Warski] is willing to go to Warsaw and help out with the dispatching of
our newspaper. Now one could send her instead of Radwański, and pay her
his salary.

I enclose one more letter from Magdeburg and ask that Julek
[Marchlewski] decline on my behalf, but RIGHT AWAY. I myself don’t know
what answer I could give.

TO KOSTYA ZETKIN

[Friedenau, May 3, 1911]

Dudu Jujuka, I was very happy yesterday about your short letter and the
little bottle of eau de Cologne.

Today I feel so joyful. It’s morning now, the weather is splendid, the
street is still quiet and clean, flooded with sunlight, and Mimi is
merry because we are finally alone. Yesterday, you see, we had a great
hurly-burly all day long. In the morning your mother came, and that gave
us both a lot of joy. I had your mother lie down on the sofa, she slept
soundly, and I worked. But then Annie [Luxemburg; her niece] came all
dressed up for the opera, and things became very noisy. Then I had to go
chasing off into the city to buy some things, then I had to send Ida
[Raduin] to the post office quickly so that Niuniuś will receive the
package before his departure, then suddenly Adolf Geck showed up, and we
had to sit around until 10 p.m. But today things are quiet and peaceful
here.

I would like to go for a walk now, but Annie wants to come again, to say
goodbye, so I can’t go out. She totally wants to come back to Berlin and
I reinforced that desire of hers.

Dudu, I hope very much that you are going to Paris. I am waiting for
definite news from you. On Friday morning I am going to Solingen, and
that will be my permanent quarters until the evening of the 15th.⁵²⁷ On
the morning of the 16th I’ll make the trip home. My temporary address
will be: care of the editors, Bergische Arbeiterstimme, Solingen (or
perhaps you have Dittmann’s private address at your editorial offices;
that would be just as good).

You yourself will decide how I should write to you in Paris. The book by
Nettelbeck⁵²⁸ is quite good for travel reading. I think you can reprint
something from it for the _Gleichheit_. I have noted down the numbers of
the relevant pages on the page-marker (in the book). But it was not in
Kolberg that I came across it; rather, I simply saw it in a store and
bought it because I enjoy reading memoirs.

Up to now I’ve been working on a Polish article.⁵²⁹ It took a lot of my
time, and I’ve also been working on the article for the _Leipziger
Volkszeitung_.⁵³⁰ Both are already finished, but now I still have to
write a sequel for the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_, and prepare myself for
the lectures in Remscheid.

As soon as I’m back, I will return to the economic work and I’ll be
writing regularly for the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_. It will be a long
time until my brain becomes somewhat flexible.

Jujuka, I kiss you on your sweet little snout, and so does Mimi, N

[P.S.] I’ll write you another line or two in the morning. N

TO CLARA ZETKIN

[Friedenau, May 18, 1911]

Dear Klärchen!

Many thanks for the material and the many brief reports. That gives me
the necessary groundwork for dealing further with the case of
L[indemann].⁵³¹ My second L[indemann] article has been printed in the
Rhineland press.⁵³² Your letter to August [Bebel] was excellent.
Unfortunately I heard again from [Adolf] Geck yesterday that August
struck a blow once more with his vote AGAINST our people and [Joseph]
Emmel [SPD leader in Alsace] to the benefit of Frank and the
opportunists at the meeting of the Reichstag SPD group on the Alsace
question.⁵³³ (The question is whether we should swallow in advance and
immediately the upper chamber as a price to be paid for universal
suffrage.)

I am very satisfied with my tour in the Rhineland.⁵³⁴ It was a fine
piece of work. In addition, I was able to get a feeling for the people.
Dittmann is entirely our man [_notre homme_] and he will keep the
Rhineland press in step with the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_ and follow its
example. In Düsseldorf I was at our new office, where Limbertz and
Pokorny filled me in for all they were worth, regarding how the work [of
the SPD] is going there.⁵³⁵ I also spoke confidentially with Limb[ertz].
He is excellent—and what makes me happiest—he groans about his new
official position. “I’m stuck here in the office,” he said, “Haenisch is
stuck in an office in Berlin, and so we are paralyzed.” That is not what
we want, we must be out working around the country, in order to have
influence.

As for [Wilhelm] Gewehr, the people there are not happy with him because
he laid a cuckoo’s egg in their nest in the form of Ebert’s candidacy in
Elberfeld.⁵³⁶ This is interpreted as Gewehr’s way of calculating, trying
to do something to win the favor of the [SPD] Executive. Indeed
something similar to that can be seen (such as the mandate K. K. [Karl
Kautsky] was given after Magdeburg), but the poor fellow [Gewehr] is so
dangerously ill (without being aware of it himself), that there is no
point arguing with him anymore, rather some thought must be given to the
fact that with his loss a terrible hole would be torn in the Rhineland.

Apropos of that, I don’t know if I already wrote you this: that
“recommendation” that was used against Thalheimer did not come from K.
K., but from … Lensch!

For today, only this much.

I embrace you, your R.

TO WILHELM DITTMANN

[Friedenau, May 23, 1911]

Worthy Comrade Dittmann!

Forgive me for not providing you with the desired information about our
party school until today—I was very much caught up with things and
couldn’t find a free minute.

If you want to know my opinion, I believe that the way instruction is
organized at the party school has proved itself completely—aside from
the curriculum, which in my opinion is still open to improvement.

I am especially glad that Comrade Schulz and I have had the good fortune
to finally introduce the history of international socialism, and I am
now working on introducing the TRADE UNION MOVEMENT and its history, as
well as its present status in various countries, as a separate subject
(and made a proposal to this effect at the most recent joint conference
of party-school instructors with the [SPD] Executive). I consider this
extraordinarily important and just as necessary as the history of
socialism. The proposal found unqualified support from BEBEL and now
there is only the question of the practical POSSIBILITIES as to when we
put this plan into effect. In particular, one very much needs to take
into account the time and work capacity of the students. As for the way
instruction is now organized, it corresponds in my opinion to the
highest standards of pedagogy. Indeed, we have AT THE MOST thirty
students during a school year.^(*)

But in our case the instruction covers only two, or sometimes three,
subjects each day. Each subject is scheduled for two consecutive hours
(in my case, with a quarter-hour break between the two hours). Thus
actually it is only the morning from 8 to 12 that is devoted to
instruction. In the afternoon only easy subjects are presented, such as
stylistics, speech practice, or nature study. Our ideal, generally
speaking, is to leave the afternoon free (the afternoon classes usually
end around 3 or 4), because the students need time in the afternoon and
evening to do their homework. Without this possibility, without working
over at home the material they heard in the morning, and reviewing their
notes, without the reading of relevant pamphlets and books, all the
instruction becomes totally worthless and pointless. All you have to do
is observe the trade union schools. Do you know the way they’re
organized? To me it’s completely incomprehensible how practical people
can throw their time and money out the window like this.

First of all, each course there [in the trade union schools] lasts six
weeks (whereas we can barely get something of value across to the
students in six months!). And then there are about 60–70 students
sitting together [in a class], so that there can be no idea at all of
discussion with the teacher, no thorough treatment of the material by
allowing questions and talking things over from every angle. On top of
that, five subjects are presented every day, one after the other, by
five different teachers, each for one hour (only one subject per day
being taught for two hours, 3–5 p.m.). Thus the different subjects come
chasing after one another, so that the students can hardly get their
thoughts together. And the instruction is organized in such a way
that—from 9 in the morning to 6 in the evening—it takes up the entire
morning and afternoon. What time then remains for the students to learn
something on their own, to read, to think over what they have heard and
absorb it mentally? Of course, during the midday break, 12–3, no work is
done, and thus the mealtime takes away from everything else, and any
remaining time is unavoidably frittered away. By the time they have gone
home in the evening and had something to eat it’s 7 or 8 p.m., and
naturally they’re too tired, and probably no alternative is left to the
students but to go somewhere, to a bar, to refresh themselves, which can
scarcely contribute to deepening their knowledge or their capacity for
work the next morning. And then there’s another thing that stands out:
From the beginning of September to the beginning of April—while we are
doing ONE course—the teachers at the trade union school have to go
through four courses, one after the other, and in the process, of
necessity, they present one and the same thing, four times over! For me
the free half year in the summer, after the close of the heavy
[six-months’] course, comes as a genuine deliverance, because no one
wants to merely keep repeating [the same material], one wants to gather
fresh material, expand, change, and improve it again and again for each
new course. Finally, I simply cannot imagine how a teacher [in the trade
union school] could avoid having his own teaching become repugnant to
him if he has to whip through it four times in a seven-month period, one
after the other; even with the best of will a person there [under such
conditions] will become a phonograph record. Thus everything seems to be
arranged to impede the teachers as well as the students from finding any
joy in the work or acquiring any real capacity for achievement.

I am observing all this solely from the standpoint of pure pedagogy, as
you see, and so I have not once mentioned who functions as teachers of
the most important subjects: Bernstein, Schippel, Bernhard, and Calwer
(of all people, on cartels!). The [political] tendency of the
instructors is a matter of conviction, but the way the teaching is
organized is a matter of rational pedagogy, and here the whole trade
union school is an outright enigma. Aren’t the “theoreticians” and the
“doctrinaires” in this case once again much more practical than the
supposedly “practical people”? But even with us at the party school
things should be improved and developed further. In every course the
wish is expressed repeatedly that either the course be made longer or a
follow-up course be added. I would prefer the latter, and it could be
done without putting an additional burden on the party. But of course
the Reichstag elections take first place now, and there is no time for
reform plans [for the party school]. I have great hopes that this year
the school will be dropped altogether, I hope that—because I would
indeed like to have the winter as well [as the summer], to be able to do
my own work.

How are you, and how is your wife? Your short letter made me very happy.
I also thank you for the report. The material about liberalism [will be]
in the next letter.

I’ll be speaking with Ros[enfeld] today or tomorrow.

Meanwhile best wishes, your R. Luxemburg

TO KOSTYA ZETKIN

[Friedenau, June 8, 1911]

Darling, I was glad about your note saying the little box did arrive on
time. I am finished with [Anatole] France and very much appreciate the
book.⁵³⁷ The depiction of the abbot is excellent and, for all its
shabbiness, not without greatness; all the other characters are quite
vivid aside from the alchemist, who means nothing to me and I don’t know
how to relate to him. What pleased me most was the drinking bout at
Catherine’s—how coarsely and crudely a German book would have treated
this situation and how gracefully it is handled in the elegant French
spirit! —The scene where the wounded abbot is carried into the village
has the touch of true poetry. I revise my judgment about [Anatole]
France, who previously I could not stand.

Yesterday the Kautskys dragged me off to _Figaro_. The performance was
wretched, and being transported “family-fashion” did not heighten my
pleasure. But the music is indeed immortal and has its effect on me
every time. —Today I gave a close reading to the brand-new issue of
_Gleichheit_ from my Niuniu; I found his improving hand present in the
political survey, and the amber story⁵³⁸ interested me. (I found the
Finnish song in Bücher.) Do you know Dahlmann’s _History of the English
Revolution_? Hannes [Diefenbach] brought it to me.

Mimi is a scoundrel. She leaped at me from the floor and tried to bite
me.

I kiss you. Mimi does too. N.

TO KOSTYA ZETKIN

[Friedenau, June 16, 1911]

Juju, darling, with the Feuerbach⁵³⁹ you’ve given me such joy! I had
just come back from my trip and there on the table was a large package
with Niuniu’s handwriting. Just a glance at the _Iphigenia_ on the cover
made me happy. Then there was your little letter. I hope you received
mine from Danzig.⁵⁴⁰ I came back feeling so wiped-out that I looked
terrible. Hoarse as I was, I had to speak for two hours OUT IN THE OPEN
in front of 5,000 people in Königsberg and again the next day in Elbing,
where the stormy turbulence of the masses outside the meeting hall all
evening caused a scandal. Everywhere the people were terrifically
enthusiastic. In Königsberg, on my departure, they gave me beautiful
flowers. Our great agrarian expert Hofer came to the meeting there, all
the way from Skaisgirren (a trip of about six hours). We sat together in
a café until 1:30 in the morning and the next day he visited with me for
a long time. He wants me to come visit him at his estate. He’s gotten
himself a car and wants to show me all of Mazuria and Lithuania.

What was especially entertaining for me was that he asked what was wrong
with Kautsky, who he said was certainly wavering now in his articles on
agrarian matters and who seemed to have abandoned his earlier
standpoint. I had not followed what he was writing in those articles,
because undoubtedly the same thing would show up in them as in his
writings on other questions. And yet Hofer is the greatest admirer of
K[autsky].

On my way [while traveling] I read the book about Spain and want to go
to Valencia. Are you thinking seriously about Spain? Which part tempts
you the most and what month do you think one should go there? I don’t
think I can go until after the party congress⁵⁴¹ and it won’t be as hot
then, either. Contact with the masses always gives me courage and
flexibility. It’s too bad Niuniu doesn’t come along sometime.

Mimi showed she was happy with me right away and has again become
high-spirited, comes running to me like a dog and grabs at the train of
my dress.

Be cheerful, Dudu, we both kiss you, N. & M.

[P.S.] It’s cold and rainy here. I will have to look at the paintings a
lot more, I just glanced at them quickly to make myself happy, on Sunday
I want to take a long time looking at them.

TO WILHELM DITTMAN

[Friedenau, June 17, 1911]

Worthy Comrade Dittmann!

Thank you for the letter, which I am returning to you, enclosed. I read
it with interest.

Day before yesterday I was in Königsberg, where I talked at length with
Haase: He wants to answer your letter very soon. He fully agrees with
the basic ideas, and so it remains, in that connection, that your
Commission of Seven⁵⁴² will convene before the Party Congress and will
then confer with representatives of the associations of people from a
particular region [_Landsmannschaften_] in order to make possible some
solid collaboration and an ongoing agreement, and thus a duplication of
the Party Congress, like the one at Magdeburg, will not be essential
except at certain more important moments.

On the candidate question,⁵⁴³ he [Haase] is at one with us completely,
that is, he also considers Bock and Hoch the best. He also wants to talk
with Bock and Hoch because he is on very good terms with them both. Now
comes another question to be considered, that of HIS OWN candidacy—which
is certainly not excluded by what was said before; there are many people
who are in favor of it (including Bebel, among others). Whether he will
finally reject being a candidate I will know in two weeks. For the time
being, don’t mention anything about it, either to him or to others.

Here the understanding with the Berliners is difficult. Rosenfeld shares
our views entirely, including on the candidate question, but he
considers it advisable, as I do, to use the utmost caution with Wels &
Co. Up to now we have not been able to hold a meeting; I hope to bring
it about in the near future. As for Leipzig, Lensch, with whom I spoke
recently, assures me that Lip[inski] can be relied on completely and
should be brought in immediately, without any worries, to take part in
any and all conferences. We can be sure of the Leipzigers.

So much for now.

Best wishes, also to your wife, your R. Luxemburg

TO KOSTYA ZETKIN

[Friedenau, before July 6, 1911]

Niuniu, darling, since Saturday the weather has turned around, it’s
cool, and I’m working like a madwoman. And sure enough—on the economics
book, work I’m enjoying very much. Unfortunately I always have to
interrupt the work for other things. This afternoon I wrote a long
Polish article for the Warsaw weekly.⁵⁴⁴ And tomorrow I have to write
something for the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_; otherwise I’ll be bankrupt.

You ask why I’m not painting. Actually I have a picture that I’m
finished with, and I don’t dare start a new one, although I do have one
in mind, because what I want is to move the economic work forward
finally. You’ll get this picture in a few days. I’m angry with myself
for letting myself be talked into sending it first to old man
Diefenbach, who is then supposed to send it on TO YOU, but of course I
have some financial considerations in mind, otherwise I wouldn’t show it
to anyone but you. —What that meant was that old man Diefenbach is going
on vacation soon. Write me as soon as you get it.

Mimi is loved by all and today in the presence of the Adolf [Warski]
family she caused universal amazement, because she was standing on two
paws, holding onto the water faucet and with one paw catching the
falling drips and accompanying them on their downward course.

We both kiss you. N. & M.

TO HENRIETTE ROLAND HOLST⁵⁴⁵

[Friedenau, August 1911]

Dear Henriette!

Comrade Sneevliet has been a pleasant guest for me, not only because I
learned many interesting things from him but also because he brought
news of you. You really are wrong to leave your friend without any word
from you for so long. All of us—that is, the few people who think and
feel along the same lines—must keep in touch with each other! Your long
silence was all the more painful for me because I had to assume for
various reasons you were dissatisfied with the general situation and
consequently with your own.

Now I hear: things are going well with you personally and with your
health, but you want to leave the SDAP.⁵⁴⁶ The first things make me
truly happy, but the last one—no! You certainly know I was strongly
opposed to your staying in the party at the time when the others left
it. I was and am of the opinion that you should all stay together—inside
or outside. Fragmentation of the Marxists (not to be confused with
having differences of opinion) is fatal. But now, when you want to leave
the party, I would like with all my might to prevent you from doing
that. You do not want to join the SDP, or so I hear.⁵⁴⁷ I’m not able to
judge whether that is correct or not. If you want to join the SDP but
can’t, enough said. But then by leaving the SDAP you are leaving the
Social Democratic movement! You can’t do that, none of us can! We can’t
be outside the organizations of the MASSES, out of contact with them.
The worst working-class party is better than none. And times can change.
In a few years a stormy period could sweep away the opportunist muck in
Hol[land] or even in all of Europe. But a person can not wait for such
times FROM THE OUTSIDE, one must carry on the fight within, no matter
how sterile or fruitless the effort may seem—to the very end. If you
stay outside, you are finished, dead for the political movement. Don’t
do that! You also have responsibilities toward the International. Stay
with the rank and file, that is our duty, we are all soldiers. I warn
you against taking a false step!⁵⁴⁸

Your Rosa

TO KOSTYA ZETKIN

[Friedenau, August 14, 1911]

Niuniu, darling, we are both very happy that the heat is continuing.
Yesterday, however, since I didn’t eat anything but a saucer of sour
cream and some sour tomato salad, I got terrible stomach pains and can’t
do anything today except drink tea. In spite of that I’m cheerful and
busily working. On the 20th I’m supposed to speak in Leipzig, at
Störteritzer Field, together with Guesde and Vaillant. It’s not known
yet whether the two of them have agreed and are coming. On the 26th the
people in Hamburg, in Altona, on the occasion of the Kaiser’s presence
at a big ceremony, are going to hold a giant demonstration, at which I
am supposed to speak on the question of a republic. Of all days, on my
moving day.⁵⁴⁹ But I have accepted. I have refused invitations from
Magdeburg and Hagen (to speak against the Morocco policy).⁵⁵⁰ I can’t
let myself be completely taken away from my work again. Thus I will have
done with these disturbances. I am waiting for _Gleichheit_ to come, to
read your introduction to the Nettelbeck excerpt.⁵⁵¹

Mimi is eating almost nothing, but she’s so cheerful and gallops through
all the rooms like a wild hare. We’re now on very good terms with each
other.

We both kiss you on the mouth. N. & M.

TO CLARA ZETKIN

[Berlin, before September 7, 1911]

Dear Klärchen!

I find the outcome of the Stuttgart affair to be good.⁵⁵² The point is
that this has become a sharp crisis that will force people to seek a
radical cure. Any hushing-up of the disagreements is now impossible, and
the masses in Stuttgart and in the state will be roused to action. To me
this outcome is preferable to all pseudo victories and compromises.
Clarification of the situation is the best thing for us.

Where are we going to stay in Jena?⁵⁵³ I’m leaving early on the 7th for
Dortmund.⁵⁵⁴

I embrace you. Your R.

TO KOSTYA ZETKIN

[Südende, September 25, 1911]

Niuniu, darling, since the party congress it’s as though I’ve been on a
treadmill and literally couldn’t get off in order to write you even one
line. On Wednesday I had a public meeting in Magdeburg, on Thursday I
was summoned by telegram to an ISB meeting in Zurich!⁵⁵⁵ I had to start
my journey within a few hours, and on top of that I had people visiting
me all day. Bracke again, and then Schulz with the money, Poland, and so
forth. Friday at 8 a.m. I traveled to Stuttgart (!) where I stayed
overnight. It hurt me to be so near you without seeing you, but I didn’t
want to upset you and disturb your peace for the sake of just a few
minutes. You see, I had to resume my trip the next morning at 8 a.m.,
because the [ISB] meeting was scheduled for 2 p.m. In Zurich all my time
was taken up completely until my departure at 3 p.m. [the next day]. I
traveled all night (third class), my train stopped in Stuttgart for only
9 minutes, so again there was no point in bothering you. We would have
gotten nothing out of it in the midst of such turmoil. Today I arrived
at 9 a.m. And now a hundred tasks are already waiting for me—among
others, an invitation to give a report tomorrow about the Jena Congress,
which I must accept.

I’ll report to you about the Zurich meeting in the next letter. For now,
something more important, I’d like to know more exactly what your plans
are … In particular, I have no intention of coming to where you are. I
want to go on the trip directly from here. Only I thought that if you
can get free by October 5, then I could come to Stuttgart from
Nuremburg, where I’m giving a speech on the 3rd, so that we could meet
there, and since the route to Spain is through Paris, for me it would be
right on the way. So write to me about when you can go. I don’t want to
pressure you, only to know how I should prepare for the trip. At any
rate, I would like it if we could meet on the 5th, because then my
travel expenses as far as Nuremburg would be covered, and in general the
earlier one goes, the better, given the shorter days.

Mimi was very happy today to have me back. I’m very tired and have
pretty much had enough of contact with party comrades and with people in
general. I’m sorry it was rainy on your trip. Let’s hope we have better
weather in the south. We both kiss you.

TO KOSTYA ZETKIN

[Südende, November 14, 1911]

Niuniu, darling, I didn’t receive your Saturday letter until yesterday
morning. I am living a regular life and working. Yesterday and the day
before I sent some lead articles for the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_, but
they will now appear without my initials. —Lensch doesn’t want me to
stick out so much from the rest of the paper anymore. I don’t especially
like that. I like to be responsible for myself, but it’s not fitting for
me to protest. By the way, Lensch wants to come see me very soon.
Yesterday evening I had the desire to get some fresh air, so I went with
Ida [Raduin] to Steglitz and there she showed me the motion picture
theater she goes to on Sundays. I went in with her (thirty pennies per
seat!) and was quite well entertained. They even had musical
accompaniment, hardly anyone but children with their nannies or
messenger boys were sitting there. A very touching story was shown about
a prince who fell in love with a peasant girl, but he was betrothed to a
“princess” from Illyria and abandoned the girl. Ida wept at that and
naturally I did too, but at the same time I was laughing, and Ida was
very surprised at that. Then they showed the pope’s palace in Avignon—an
impressive building, but it looked like a prison. We also saw a story
about a dog who saved his master’s life by running to the police and
leading them to the robber’s den where his master was lying all tied up.
Many different things, all in pouring rain, or that’s how it always
looks.

Mimi is sweet and lovely and playful, last night she got behind the
marble bust above my desk, grabbed it around the neck with her paws, and
bit its nose. It looked very comical.

I am still pretty much being spared from having visitors. We both kiss
you. N. & M.

TO KOSTYA ZETKIN

[Südende, November 21, 1911]

Niuniu, darling, I was so happy about your note on Sunday. When I read
about the earthquake⁵⁵⁶ it occurred to me at first that you had dreamed
it, but the papers arrived with the news at the same time. That
surprised me very much, [and] I’m also very glad you got through it
safely. But I’m surprised that I noticed nothing in the atmosphere, in
other cases one can smell the foul, oppressive air, even from the
Antilles.

In the last few days I had to spend a lot of time with people. They
never stopped coming. Hannes [Diefenbach] is already back in the area,
the Kautskys announce their arrival, as do Adolf [Warski] with wife and
child, Marchlewski with wife and child, and even Miss Gretl Bosch—all
one after the other. And the whole time my thoughts are completely on my
work.

Things are moving forward, that is, the task of solving that problem
purely economically is moving forward, and I have become almost pure
abstraction. How I would like to report and explain the matter to you
right away! But doing it by letter doesn’t work. I took the opportunity
to go back through and read carefully that series of articles by Kautsky
in the 1902 _Neue Zeit_ against Tugan-Baranovsky.⁵⁵⁷ And here too I had
to conclude that it is a crummy, dull, and sloppy job [_loddrige, platte
Pfuscherarbeit_]. When you look at it under a magnifying glass it turns
out to be trash. He has made confusion out of Marx’s theory of economic
crisis and slimed it over in true Kautsky fashion, and then he says:
this is how Marx and Engels understood [the question]. Meanwhile,
actually Tugan-Baranovsky was right against him!

My conflict with Lensch is continuing. He can’t come here on the Day of
Repentance, or so he has just written me, but I won’t write any more
until he formally agrees to let my initials appear and stop “editing” my
articles.⁵⁵⁸ Marchlewski, who is helping out there now, until the
elections, and who flies to the bosom of his family only on Sundays,
told me that the whole editorial board (and that means him too!)
participated in deleting the concluding passage. Indeed these geniuses
were of one mind about the following: no purpose is served now in taking
up a struggle against the Reichstag group and Bebel as well, because we
will end up alone. And look—they triumphantly declare—the entire party
press (aside from Mehring) has swallowed this and remained silent! Those
are arguments?! Thus if the party press has become like a trained dog,
we should become the same, and console ourselves with jokes around the
coffee table about our inner superiority. Yes, Lensch must still be
educated politically. And therefore I don’t give in, although my fingers
are itching to write.

Nowadays I’m getting up late, unfortunately; partly because I go to bed
late; when people take up my time I sit up late afterwards and do my
work. Besides, there’s nothing to tempt me to get out of bed in the
morning like my Niuniu; the cold shower is the only “point of light”
each morning.

We both kiss you. N. & M.

TO KOSTYA ZETKIN

[Südende, between January 15 and 19, 1912]

Darling, your note came today. I continue to take [cold] showers with
pleasure, but the trouble is that it’s impossible to heat my place. I
heat it twice a day and have 8⁰ [Celsius] in the room. That interferes
with my work. Yesterday I was in the city, but I came back home none too
soon, feeling beat. If Juju visits us, he can have a hot bath every day.
For the birds we bought two pounds of good birdseed at Wertheim’s
yesterday, and today they are enjoying it immensely. Mehring is very ill
again, and I feel terrible about that. [By the way,] for even some good
people having the title “member of the Reichstag” really goes to their
heads, for example, Würmchen [Emmanuel Wurm] is now on his high horse
and very much believes in his own godlike qualities.

With others it will be correspondingly worse. I was happy to see
Ledebour win, although of course in that case too the personality of the
candidate has the least effect on the outcome. What is Jujuka reading?
Just now Mimi is staring at the sparrows.

We both kiss you, N. & M.

TO KOSTYA ZETKIN

[Südende, January 20, 1912]

Dear heart, your note with Sunday greetings just came. I don’t want you
to be sad. You mustn’t take the rubbish in the party so tragically, like
your mother, who can’t let go of the ethical element in her appraisal of
things. All of this will soon get back on the rails, if one views it by
and large and on the whole; I believe that more than ever; [historical]
circumstances will definitely take care of all that. I want to write a
lead article for all of you about the tasks that have grown up and
confront the party now that the elections are over,⁵⁵⁹ does that please
you? It is certainly nothing new, but one must always refer back to the
old: the expansion and promotion of socialism should not be forgotten.
Today the cold shower was splendid. I’ve decided that in the near future
your mother should get out of the Press Commission and the Control
Commission,⁵⁶⁰ so as to have peace of mind and be able to do her own
work. Her nerves are in urgent need of that. I very much want to talk
with her when she comes here. I’m already looking forward so much to her
coming. I hope by then it will also be warmer. The frost patterns on the
window glass have already disappeared.

Mimi is sleeping next to me on the easy chair, curled up like a snail.

Be cheerful, darling! We both kiss you, N. & M.

[P.S.] I’m reading and enjoying the supplement with Gorky’s story; also
the poem by Liliencron is beautiful.⁵⁶¹

TO KOSTYA ZETKIN

[Südende, after January 26, 1912]

Juju, darling, your dear note came early this morning, and only now do I
have some peace and quiet for writing you. Yesterday there were people
sitting around at my place—luckily the article⁵⁶² was already
finished—and I couldn’t even remember what I had written to you. This
morning I went out for a bit of a walk and that refreshed me; as I was
going out I met the mailman, who gave me your letter, I read it right
away on the street and became cheerful and happy. Juju, you’re right,
one must now work systematically against parliamentary cretinism, but
first I still have to translate for myself how exactly that is to be
understood. Above all, it seems to me important to agitate for an action
program in the sense that we mean it, and I hope that yesterday’s
article will be reprinted by the press. Otherwise, the only thing our
radicals know—including the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_—is to repeat by
rote: “What we were we shall remain, we will not accept any new
tactics.” This is the eternal defensive response against opportunism,
which only knows the phrase “the good, old tactics, tried and true,”
carrying it like a banner. I believe, to the contrary, that we now have
to make a mighty effort to move forward, to promote greater capability
for action and take the offensive. It’s too bad that Duncker already
expressed readiness for concessions on the question of the presiding
committee [of the Reichstag].⁵⁶³

Once again that’s supposed to be clever politics. I consider it
necessary to say exactly the opposite as sharply as possible, that we
don’t give a hoot about this business. Maybe that will even cause
annoyance among our own people at first—but it will gradually win
acceptance and have a sobering effect.

Most important now would be to hold public meetings on the issues. I’m
still wavering about whether or not I should try to hold one here in
Berlin. It would definitely have an impact. But I feel it would be such
a shame to dissipate my energies again. In the end I must, after all,
stick to my work on economics.⁵⁶⁴

Niuniu, I now have a book for Niuniu, which I will send him by way of
his mother and from which he can take a lot for use in the children’s
supplement. I’m reading it now and enjoying it. Dudu, it’s snowing today
and the world is white. Mimi was meowing for two days and nights, making
me very nervous. She also became thin and faint, but now she’s better
already, today she even played with me a little. Poor, dear Mimi.

Today, among the other sparrows that came to eat, was one with a
dislocated leg, he hopped only on one leg, but he could fly. I felt so
sorry for him!

All of us kiss you: N., M., and the sparrows.

TO KOSTYA ZETKIN

[Südende, March 18, 1912]

Darling, Juju, yesterday evening I was at [a performance of] the St.
Matthew’s Passion of Bach at the Garrison Church. It made a profound
impression on me, it is perhaps even more beautiful than [Bach’s] Mass
in A-Minor (_h-Moll-Messe_), more dramatic and harsher. There is a
back-and-forth conversation the whole time between Christ, Pilate, and
someone else, the Angels, I think (I didn’t have the text), with the
people as the chorus. The Christ part was quite visionary, sung by a
tenor, light and soft; in contrast, the baritone was strong, and Pilate
was a brutal bass; and in between them, over and over again, the choir
would join in with a brief apostrophe, but the two female solos—the alto
(that was Philippi) and the soprano—echoed quite high under the vaulted
ceiling, like the voices of skylarks. Each solo was wedded with a
particular instrument: responding to Christ was the organ, only muffled
and hollow; the alto was accompanied by the cello, and so on. But the
choruses are the most beautiful part: they are simply a crying-out, a
desolate, impassioned alarm being shouted aloud ten times; one literally
sees those Jews of old, with their flowing beards, gesticulating with
their hands and shepherd’s staffs; the chorus consists more of bawling
or yelling than singing, which makes one want to laugh involuntarily. I
have never heard such a wonderful chorus. I believe that here for the
first time it has been shown exactly how a mass chorus should be
handled. The people do not “sing,” they shout and roar and groan. The
orchestra is also undeniably in beautiful form, simple and powerful. Are
you familiar with it, the St. Matthew’s Passion?

This afternoon was so lovely, with a pinkness shimmering on the horizon,
the air fresh and sunny. Mimi and I are alone together. I should be
working, but I’m feeling lazy. Mimi is rolling over teasingly on the
carpet, saying _prau_ [“meow”] and letting herself be tickled on the
tummy.

We both kiss you, N. & M.

And for your dear mother, Mimi and I also send a kiss.

The two violets gave us such joy today! They smell divine. I was
completely happy, and Mimi sniffed at them all day Sunday.

TO KOSTYA ZETKIN

[Südende, March 28, 1912]

Darling Niuniu, your mother has arrived hale and hearty. I had so much
pleasure from your presents and your dear letter. We busied ourselves
with the flowers right away, that is, Mimi and I, she helping me
skillfully the whole time, sitting next to the box on the table,
purring, chewing up a blade of grass now and then, and following
[closely what happened to] every flower I took in my hand. We snipped
off a bit of the end of each one, separately, and placed it in lukewarm
water, [arranged] as follows: The long primroses with the cuckooflower
or lady’s smock formed a complete bouquet. The short primroses
intermixed with the anemone and daisies are in the low blue vase, and
look very colorful and lovely. But the four blue violets, together with
the white one, are standing by themselves like the most tender noble
maidens in a tiny liqueur glass and smelling sweetly. Mimi sniffed at
everything and kissed my hands in the process. It made her very happy
that I was rummaging around with the flowers.

In the evenings usually I read Tolstoy.

Be happy. We both kiss you. N. & M.

TO FRANZ MEHRING

Südende, April 19, 1912

Highly esteemed comrade!

The friendly lines you wrote instilled such great fear in me because of
your closing phrase that I had the urge to take up my pen immediately.
You wrote that perhaps you would not stay much longer at the _Neue
Zeit_.⁵⁶⁵ Today I read Bebel’s attack on you in the _Neue_ _Zeit_⁵⁶⁶ and
also today I learned that one of the commentaries you had submitted was
removed from the issue on orders from Kautsky by telegram. I find
Kautsky’s way of treating his co-editor to be disgusting and Bebel’s
statement to be senile drivel. Every decent person in the party who is
not a spiritual vassal of the Executive will be on your side. But how
could all that make you want to throw away such a highly important
position? Please keep in mind the general situation in our party. You
too must certainly feel that we are coming closer and closer to a time
when the masses, the ranks of the party, will need an energetic and
ruthlessly determined leadership on the grand scale [i.e., one attuned
to the larger patterns of historical development], and that our leading
bodies: the Executive, the central organ [_Vorwärts_], the parliamentary
group in the Reichstag, all are becoming more and more petty, cowardly,
and caught up in parliamentary cretinism—and the same will happen to the
“theoretical publication” [i.e., _Neue Zeit_] without you in your
present position. We must therefore openly look this lovely future in
the eye, occupy and hold fast to all our posts, which make it possible
despite the official leadership to protect and preserve the right of
criticism. How few such posts there are, unfortunately, and how few
people there are who are willing to grasp the real situation, you surely
know better than I. Nevertheless, the MASSES stand behind us and want to
have a different leadership—that was certainly demonstrated by the
recent general meeting of the Berliners⁵⁶⁷ as well as the conduct of
party membership meetings throughout the country. But it follows from
this that we have a duty precisely to hold out, not to do the party
mandarins a favor by “throwing our flint into the cornfields” [i.e.,
throwing in the towel]. We must indeed be prepared for constant combat
and continual clashes, particularly when the holy of
holies—parliamentary cretinism—has been shaken as roughly as you shook
it. But in spite of everything—the best motto seems to me to be “Not one
step backward.” The _Neue Zeit_ ought not to be surrendered completely
to sterility and officiousness. Laugh at the miseries and continue to
write in the magazine, so that the hearts of all of us will dance with
joy!

With heartfelt greetings to you, as well as to your esteemed spouse,
your R. L.

TO KOSTYA ZETKIN

[Südende, May 10, 1912]

Niuniu, darling, hopefully it’s already as fresh and airy where you are
as it is here, so that you won’t suffer any more from the muggy weather.
Here the weather’s splendid. Early yesterday before the session [of the
Control Commission], at quarter of eight in the morning, I dragged your
mother out into the fields, we walked for more than an hour, gathered
wildflowers by the canal, and listened to a nightingale from a
neighbor’s garden. This morning we were at the Sezession [exhibition by
avant-garde painters], from there we went directly to the Schlachtensee
[lake in Berlin], where your mother had an opulent midday meal out in
the open by the water, then we walked along the lakeshore and reached
the station at Zehlendorf by foot. The weather was wonderful, and we
feasted our eyes on the water and the clouds, which at times looked
lovely and innocent and at other times, dark and threatening. The
Sezession is undescribable garbage. Day before yesterday I finished Part
Two of my work [_The Accumulation of Capital_]_:_ 550 manuscript pages.
Now, what’s left is the last part, which, again, will take up about 250
pages and for which I will need four weeks. At that point [i.e., after
finishing Part Two] I allowed myself two days to goof off, then
immediately I resumed thinking about the work and writing it out. How I
would like to read to you from it, to hear your opinion. The way it’s
going now is like when I’m painting a picture: At one moment it seems
excellent to me, and at the next, like complete garbage. But I do hope
it will be good. Now on with it, energetically! Oh, if only I didn’t
have to do other stuff along with this (Polish things, things for
Mehring, etc.). I have never worked so systematically and persistently.
But this time I’m not going to let go of it until the last line is
written. I also thought about letting myself sew the material from your
mother. I’m happy about your new gray suit. The lilies of the valley are
all coming up and smell wonderful. From my potted plants I enclose a
pansy as a Sunday greeting.

We both kiss you. Be happy! Na. & Mi. [short for “Niunia and Mimi”]

TO FRANZ MEHRING

[Südende, February 10, 1913]

Highly esteemed comrade!

Right after I sent off my letter I received Parts II and III.⁵⁶⁸ Many
thanks for your kindness and for “covering my flanks.” It’s too bad that
Nachimson still has a slap in the face coming to him, but perhaps in the
end that would be too great an honor to give this scoundrel and expert
at confusion. It’s more important, at any rate, that you so elegantly
made a laughingstock of that worthy gentleman, Pannekoek; the good man
shows such a wooden lack of understanding of the problem under
discussion that I am simply astonished.⁵⁶⁹ In general, I was well aware
that the book would run into resistance in the short term;
unfortunately, our prevailing “Marxism,” like some gout-ridden old
uncle, is afraid of any fresh breeze of thought, and I took it into
account that I would have to do a lot of fighting at first. My fingers
are itching to demonstrate clearly to Pannekoek in particular that he
suffers from economic narrow-mindedness, but surely the same will turn
out to be necessary with regard to Kautsky and Otto Bauer.⁵⁷⁰ Should I
start firing away right now? Or should I wait and take up the defense of
the whole question later on, doing it all in one wash—in something like
a polemical pamphlet?⁵⁷¹ A further question: Should I leave Nachimson
alone entirely for now, or should I give him a sharp rap on the knuckles
in a signed article in the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_?

I would be deeply grateful for your advice.

Again, many thanks, and best wishes as well to your esteemed spouse.

Your Rosa Luxemburg

[P.S.] Comrade Gerson has, in the meantime, received word from Klara
[i.e., Clara Zetkin].

TO THE EDITORS OF _SOCIAL-DEMOKRATEN_⁵⁷²

Berlin-Südende, October 20, 1913 2 Linden Street

Worthy comrades!

Some time ago a statement by the Party Executive of the Social Democracy
of Poland and Lithuania [SDKPiL], signed by J. Karski,⁵⁷³ was printed in
your publication, warning against collectors of funds who, using the
name of the above-mentioned party [the SDKPiL], sought to entice Danish
comrades to give money for a textile workers’ strike in Russian-occupied
Poland. The statement by the Polish party leadership asserted and
confirmed that these fund-gatherers had taken action on their own,
without the authorization of the party, that in fact this entailed
misuse of the party name by certain individuals, in particular a person
named MARCHEWCZYNSKI, and therefore this was to be regarded as blatantly
false representation.

Thereupon your publication ran an astonishing commentary by the
editorial board, stating it had learned “from a reliable source” that
the above-named Marchewczynski deserves full confidence and, further,
that there are three parties in Poland, that the editorial board does
not know what the disputes are among these Polish parties, and that it
does not want to get mixed up in them. In this way your editorial board,
while saying it did not want to interfere, actually took up the defense,
right there in front of the Danish comrades, of those persons who,
misusing the name of the SDKPiL, have set the unauthorized collectors of
funds in Copenhagen on their course of action.

As the official representative of the SDKPiL on the International
Socialist Bureau (ISB), I must assert the following:

1. In Poland there are NOT “three” Social Democratic parties. There is
only one: the Social Democracy of [the Kingdom of] Poland and Lithuania
[SDKPiL]. (There is another socialist organization in Poland, which uses
the name Polish Socialist Party [Polish initials, PPS] but has nothing
in common with us organizationally, has a different program, speaks
under its own name, is represented on the ISB by other individuals, and
therefore, is not relevant to the matter at hand.)

2. The group from which the collectors of funds in Copenhagen come had
split away from the SDKPiL [at an earlier time] after its organization
[in Warsaw] had been dissolved, because of its obstructionism
[_Quertreiberei_] and violations of party discipline. It was dissolved
by action of the Party Executive and by a conference of the entire
party, and thus this group no longer belongs to the above-named party
[the SDKPiL]. Their attempt to obtain representation at the recent
International [Socialist] Congress in Basel in an unaccustomed way, via
the Russian delegation, was negated by ISB Secretary Camille Huysmans,
and their purported delegates were removed from the list [of delegates
recognized by the Congress].⁵⁷⁴

If this group dares to continue acting in the name of a party to which
it no longer belongs and even collects money among foreign comrades
under that name, such action must be condemned as a gross abuse, and
this condemnation should be stated publicly.

3. The “reliable source” from which the editors of _Social-Demokraten_
take their information about Polish party relations is the
representative of a Russian SOCIAL DEMOCRATIC FACTION, Lenin.⁵⁷⁵ This
faction [headed by Lenin], which for years in Russia itself has
systematically sought to split the workers’ party and recklessly engaged
in faction fighting, which has formed a fictitious “Central Committee,”
not recognized by anyone, which has stubbornly blocked all efforts
toward unification and thereby has brought the Russian party movement to
the verge of ruin—this faction is the most unreliable, non-authoritative
source for any information about Polish party relations. The Lenin
faction and its representatives in fact do not understand a word of
Polish and can therefore say nothing from their own knowledge about
internal party relations in Poland. Nevertheless, in a planned and
deliberate manner they are seeking to cultivate the same kind of split
in Polish Social Democracy as the one they pursue as their specialty in
the Russian [Social Democratic Workers’] Party [RSDRP]. They therefore
blindly support those who cause disruption and disorganization in the
Polish Social Democratic Party and thus, with all their might, they
cause difficulties for our party—as revenge for the fact that Polish
Social Democracy fights with all ITS might against the splitting policy
in Russia.

In view of all this, we, the official representatives of Polish Social
Democracy, that is, its Party Executive, refuse to tolerate that any
information be cited as definitive with regard to party relations in
Poland if it comes from a Russian organization or any other foreign
[i.e., non-Polish] organization. The SDKPiL is a fully autonomous member
of the International Socialist Bureau, and it also has complete
organizational autonomy in the Russian party [the RSDRP] as a whole,
according to the terms of its unity agreement [with it]. It is therefore
just as unacceptable to publicly cite a Russian faction about internal
Polish party matters as it would be, for example, if in Germany
information about some separate or special Danish group was regarded as
definitive if it came, not from the Danish party leadership, but from a
Swedish, English, or Dutch organization.⁵⁷⁶

On the matter in question, let it be firmly stated once again:

THE WARNING GIVEN BY COMRADE KARSKI REMAINS IN FULL EFFECT. The
collecting of funds by Marchewczynski and his friends in the name of the
SDKPiL is a blatant misrepresentation, and the Danish comrades must
beware of that. In Denmark the only authorized representatives of the
above-named party [the SDKPiL] are Comrade Huptich, representative of
Polish agricultural workers, and Comrade Grant.

TO WALTER STOECKER

Berlin-Südende, March 11, 1914 2 Linden Street
Worthy Comrade Stoecker!

I cannot recommend to you any of the bourgeois writings on political
economy, because they will only waste your time and arouse your disgust.
Better that you proceed further in [Marx’s] _Capital_. Before you go on
to the second volume of _Capital_ I would advise you perhaps to go
through my book on accumulation. I know no other book that would serve
to the same extent as an introduction to the second volume of _Capital_;
that volume, however, is very difficult, because it tends more to
present problems than to provide thoroughly worked-out solutions. Just
keep trying, and if the book begins to seem disconcerting, perhaps you
can give mine a try. The most dangerous thing, in my opinion, is if a
person manages to overcome each PARTICULAR difficulty in the second
volume quite well, even with apparent ease. Because most often in the
process one fails to notice that one is not at all clear about certain
fundamental questions: In which FIELD or AREA is the investigation being
conducted, and what are the actual problems being taken up in the
volume? —

That there are comrades who can assume I would flee Germany because of
the prison sentence⁵⁷⁷ —I could be quite amused by that if it were not,
at the same time, rather saddening. Dear young friend, I assure you that
I would not flee even if I were threatened by the gallows, and that is
so for the simple reason that I consider it absolutely necessary to
accustom our party to the idea that sacrifices are part of a socialist’s
work in life, that they are simply a matter of course. You are right:
“Long live the struggle!”

Heartfelt greetings, your R. Luxemburg

TO PAUL LEVI

[Südende, (late) March 1914]

Of all things, the man with the mustache [Leo Jogiches] was here when
your telegram arrived. But instinctively I was guarded about mentioning
you, and when he asked me, later on, whether I was pleased with my
attorney, I was quite reticent in reply.

My travel plans! I will stay put here till April 1, and I only hope that
you will be here Sunday morning, then I dream of traveling south for
three weeks around April 5. At any rate, my travel money will only reach
as far as Geneva or Lake Vierwaldstätter. But one can rest up there too.
In the event that you do come on Sunday, we will talk about the South
and about travel. There are three more days till Sunday, so you can
write me three more times. R. L.

TO PAUL LEVI

[Südende, August] 31 [1914]

When your letter came I was just about to send you a telegram to ask why
I had been so long without news. The report about the conception put
forward by D[issmann]⁵⁷⁸ gave me the distressing certainty that the
clarification of views will be much more difficult than I had already
assumed. The distinction between the good-hearted people who approved
the war and the evil-hearted ones,⁵⁷⁹ between the war patriots without
chauvinism and those with chauvinism, is all right for evaluating people
personally, but unfortunately it’s not appropriate as a political line
of orientation. Besides, the position taken by B[ernard] and the Hanau
people is simply a reflection of the position taken by Hoch,⁵⁸⁰ who
advocated the same point of view in the SPD parliamentary group. I think
your conception would be different and will be different when you find
out about the state of affairs within the parliamentary group from the
mouths of others. In this matter, where we are talking about the vital
nerve center, the “to be or not to be” of international socialism,
NUANCES in the approval of war cannot have decisive weight. Dividing
people according to whether they approved out of necessity or did so
with a joyful heart isn’t worth a pinch of powder. This is shown by the
fact that not one person will admit that he voted for any reason other
than being under coercion, being placed before a _fait accompli_. The
only thing left would be to try and read people’s hearts and kidneys AS
OPPOSED TO their actual statements or explanations. No judgment can be
made about MOTIVES in cases of such world-historical significance, only
about actions. On top of that, almost EVERY ONE of the approvers
presents a slightly different motivation, so that not just two, but six
or eight, different groups can be distinguished, and thus the supposed
line of demarcation disappears in the sand. The reproaches one wants to
make against “those on the right” only involve the DEGREE OF CONSISTENCY
in their approval of the war, and thus the distinction proposed by
D[issmann], in the final analysis, boils down to that between a
consistent pro-war policy or one that is not consistent. I am, under all
circumstances, in favor of consistency, but I expect nothing but
wretchedness from the notion of swallowing approval of the war, and may
consistency be damned. Incidentally, I hope as soon as possible to speak
with you and D[issmann] about all this. I would like it best if you
summoned Dr. Obuch to Frankfurt. Try to do that now, right away. Then I
will telegraph you to say when I am coming, and you can inform O[buch]
and D[issmann] in good time. —Perhaps Karl Liebkn[echt] will come with
me, he has the desire. And so, until we meet again soon!

N.B.: Immediately confirm by telegram the receipt of this letter.

TO KARL MOOR

[Südende,] October 12, 1914

Dear Karl!

I take the opportunity to send you a few lines by a roundabout route.
Above all, many thanks for the newspaper [the _Berner Tagewacht_] that I
also do not receive at home any more. Nowadays it’s a refreshing comfort
to have a Social Democratic paper in front of one’s face that speaks in
the good old way. From the party press here what one gets most often
is—nausea.

In reply to my two postcards I have not yet received any word from you,
I assume that you did write, but the answer didn’t reach me. At the
present time every greeting and every sign of life from co-thinkers in
other countries is doubly precious. Here we feel ourselves to be cut off
from the world, blocked off, in fact, by a double wall: the state of
siege [martial law] and the party officialdom. For your information and
for the information of other friends (but not for publication) let it be
said only that it would be a great error to think that the official
behavior of the [SPD] Reichstag group, the SPD Executive, and the party
editors express the thoughts and feelings of the whole party! On the
contrary, a growing bitterness is observable on all sides. How far this
bitterness extends, which side has the majority, cannot now be
determined, even approximately, since it is precisely the opponents of
the official party tactics whose mouths are gagged, and the political
life of the masses is completely suppressed. Also the mood is shifting
more and more: many who favored voting for the war credits have since
then, in the face of subsequent developments, been overtaken by healthy
fears, and now they are opponents of this policy or will be tomorrow. At
the same time another group of comrades with each passing day are
backsliding most blatantly, following in the wake of the
national-patriotic government policy. Thus the internal development of
the party in the midst of the war, although hidden from observation, is
undergoing an unstoppable process in which different elements are being
sheared off, on the one side, elements actually belonging to the
bourgeois camp, who at best would constitute a reformist workers’ party,
subservient to the military, with a strong nationalist streak, and on
the other side, elements who do not want to abandon the core principles
of revolutionary class struggle and internationalism. This silent
internal struggle has already begun, although we really did not want to
take up the struggle under such unfavorable conditions. Mutual distrust
and mutual hatred, however, can scarcely be concealed and are already
evident as tiny flames flickering on the surface. No one hides it from
himself that as soon as the war and the state of siege have ended, the
internal disagreements will break out with tremendous force, and still
less would anyone hope that the highly prized unity of the party could
be preserved when there is such a deep-going internal rift. It is only
the state of siege and the war that artificially shore up the supposed
party unity. There is no doubt about it: German socialism, and
international socialism as well, are going through a crisis as never
before in history and have been placed before a fateful question by this
war. If after the war international socialism does not succeed in
rejecting imperialism and militarism in all their forms, a real and
proper rejection that is meant seriously this time, and that would apply
even in the event of war, then socialism can let itself be buried, or
rather it will have buried itself already. The process of clarification
after the war will decide the “to be or not to be” of socialism. But
precisely because this process is of such immense world-historical
importance, it must be carried out thoroughly and honestly, with care
and deliberation. To this end, it would be important that no hasty,
ill-considered steps be undertaken on the part of the International,
steps that would to some extent move in the direction of calling a
meeting of the International Bureau or a conference AS SOON AS POSSIBLE.
Because, as of now, only one of two things could result: Either the
representatives of the different countries would angrily quarrel and
refuse to hear any justifications from one another, which would at any
rate provide sad documentary evidence of the collapse of the
International. Or, on the other hand, all the representatives from the
countries at war—perhaps with the blessing of the neutrals—would grant
pardons to one another for the atrocities that have been committed and
declare in the spirit of mutual toleration that each party understands
that the other could not have acted otherwise; that would be even more
fatal, because, while preserving the International, or rather a
hypocritical semblance of an International, it would actually mean the
burial of international socialism. So it would be better that no attempt
to artificially patch up the International, or glue it together, be
made, not before firm and solid foundations have been laid, and this can
be done only by an INTERNAL clarification process. One must first allow
us time in Germany itself to determine what the party is thinking in its
majority and where it stands in regard to the war. The same can be done
by the French, English, Italians, etc. Then the International would know
where it stands and how it can be rebuilt. All forced attempts to tie
together the threads of the International right now, as soon as
possible, could only result in a hypocritical slapdash job, if they did
not move in an even more harmful direction, like the trips being made to
neutral countries from Berlin and Vienna,⁵⁸¹ which have the explicit
purpose of solidifying the neutrals in the interests of the
German-Austrian military leadership and of putting other countries in a
mood favorable to Germany and Austria.

When all is said and done, our situation here inside the party is very
sad, and every day one must pull together all one’s strength and courage
in order to wade further through this morass. For example, the
self-surrender of the _Vorwärts_⁵⁸² was a severe jolt for many, and
there is sometimes a feeling of shame at going along, even partly, with
all this. You can certainly believe that at every opportunity we seek to
oppose the backward flow of this stream. Unfortunately all the central
institutions of the party, which for the moment have the outward-seeming
power in their hands, are dominated by opportunist elements, and the
whole opposition has been broken to pieces, because the masses cannot
protest and in large part they have been scattered to the various
battlefields. N.B.: it made me happy to read MY article⁵⁸³ in your
paper. For our part Mehring and I continue to put out our publication
[_Sozialdemokratische Korrespondenz_], and some newspapers have
reprinted from it. (The article “Scenes from a Comedy”
[_Komödienspiele_] on September 28 was by Mehring.)⁵⁸⁴ Now several
requests:

1. Be so kind as to have the enclosed declaration⁵⁸⁵ printed in your
paper as well as in the _Volksrecht_.

2. Do write to the _Volksrecht_ people conveying my request that they
send me a copy [of their paper] every day (give them my address), and
also that they forward all the back issues from August 1 on.

3. Write to Angelica Balabanoff that a letter is currently on its way to
her by the same route and that she should confirm by a postcard to me
whether she received the letter (give her my address). Actually Klara
[i.e., Clara Zetkin] already wrote to her a month ago, to Mussolini’s
address, but has received not a word in reply.⁵⁸⁶

4. You yourself should confirm to me immediately, with an unobtrusive
postcard, the receipt of this letter and [let me know] whether you will
carry out all my requests.

5. Send a request from me to the editors of [the Italian socialist
publication] _Avanti_,⁵⁸⁷ that they should send me a copy of their paper
[regularly], and that they should do so right away.

6. Send the declaration to _Avanti_ also, because there is no way of
knowing whether it will reach them by any other means.

And now many heartfelt greetings and handclasps to you and all our
friends there and others, who with all their heart have remained true to
the International. Write soon, and in detail, although with caution, to
this address: Mr.Hugo Eberlein, Esq., Berlin–Mariendorf, 82 Ring Street;
nothing more. That way I will get it.

Give my greetings especially to Otto Lang from the bottom of my heart.

TO HANS DIEFENBACH

[Südende,] November 1, 1914

My dear Hannesle,⁵⁸⁸

Today it must happen! For weeks I’ve been writing you the lengthiest,
most detailed letters “in spirit,” but haven’t gotten around to putting
them on paper. This has been a burden to me, like a rock weighing on my
heart. But I have so little quiet or solitude, even though everything
tends to lay me low. Well, now things should get better. I am proposing
once again to “start a new life,” go to sleep early, toss all visitors
out the door, and—go to work, but really with a will. And the first step
in this “new life” is this letter to you. Both of your recent detailed
letters, via Hans [Kautsky], made me awfully happy. Thus I can picture,
at least a little bit, how you are living and what you are up to …

First, a small report about me, since you wanted one. Well, my initial
mood of despair has already become quite different. It’s not as if I
judge the situation to be rosier or have any reason for cheerfulness—not
at all. But the severity of the first blow has worn off, and since then
the blows have become an everyday occurrence. That the party [the SPD]
and the International have gone kaput, thoroughly kaput, is not open to
any doubt, but precisely the increasing dimensions of the disaster have
made of it a world-historical drama, and in this regard the objective
historical significance comes to the fore and the personal feeling of
wanting to tear one’s hair out has been displaced. Of course sometimes
the pain is still there, scarcely endurable, as former “friends” commit
ever new villainies and vile actions and as the press goes through a
process of unheard-of degradation. To counteract this, however, there
remains with me more than ever the inner conviction that—if the fact is
that things cannot go any differently—I can find for myself a lovely
consolation for my modest personal needs: a good book, a walk in the
meadows of Südende in the lovely fall weather, just as, at one time, I
walked with [you,] Hannesle [,] through the stubble, and last of all
there is music! Ah, music! How painful it is to be deprived of it and
how I yearn for it! Up to now I have not been able to provide myself
with any. First, for weeks there was nothing. Then, on any pretext at
all, there began to be patriotic demonstrations at the opera and at the
concert hall. Finally, I feel I could dare to go out [to hear music],
but Hannesle is not here! He’s not here to get the tickets, and besides,
if one is so completely without company, the music is no consolation. In
conclusion, I still have some hope with regard to Hans [Kautsky]. He
visited me a week ago, to bring me your letter. He looks red-cheeked and
refreshed and has grown more youthful. Rome has been excellent for him.
Even without that, he made a very favorable impression on me, and I
promised to go visit him right away—but I haven’t gotten around to it.
Perhaps I’ll go there tomorrow. He promised to play for me two hours
every day if I would only come. He has probably reported to you about
his children: Gretl is the happy bride of a Slovak of touching modesty
and shyness; Fritz is a dashing lieutenant; Robert is an accomplished
painter; only Hansl remains as a prodigal son [_fils perdu_] and makes
fun of his Papa in letters to Robert, and poor Papa just had to go and
find those letters and read them. Luise [Kautsky] is feeling so down, as
H[ans Kautsky] relates, that I would do better not to go there, even a
phone conversation is too much for her. Next week they (H[ans] and
L[uise]) are going to the South again. I envy them. Karli [i.e., Karl
Kautsky, Jr.] has made a career in Frankfurt on the Main. Bendel
[Kautsky], since having typhus, has become as fat as a little pig, [and]
Felix [Kautsky] is the same as ever. All in all, the Kautsky clan is
thriving and finding its way through life’s perils. Last week Lady Klara
[i.e., Clara Zetkin] was with me at my house for six days, she has lost
weight terribly, Costia [i.e., Kostya Zetkin] is still at home and
working on the editorial board of _Gleichheit_.⁵⁸⁹ From Maxim [Zetkin]
there’s been no sign of life again for a month. On the other hand, I
recently received an endearing sign of life from Medi [Hans Kautsky’s
“later” wife]. It’s true that she was sick, but now she’s home and back
at work. Brandel’s father⁵⁹⁰ was here again last week at last, together
with Klara. The poor fellow seems to have changed so much, half his face
is paralyzed. He let me read a letter from Brandel, which was very
interesting and shows the lad in the best of lights. He is stationed not
far from you. Write to him [at this address]: Vizefeldwebel [Sergeant
Second Class] B[randel] G[eck], XVIII. [Eighteenth] Army Corps, 25th
Division, active-duty Regiment 116, Sixth Company. He will certainly be
glad to hear from you. —Kurt Rosenfeld writes to me quite often, he is
in the East, and was recently in Wiłkowyszky, where he—as the battalion
clerk—sets the tax rates for meat, both kosher and non-kosher, carries
out house searches, and performs similar juridical functions. Then he
was involved in heavy fighting, made it through all that dreadfulness,
and now I think he’s back on German soil. Spiritually he has remained
quite fresh and lively and naturally remains true to [our] banner. You
want to know what I’m up to and particularly what I’m writing. All right
then, above all I want to get finished with my work on economics⁵⁹¹
which is advisable in fact for personal economic reasons. This is work
that will take several months. The party school of course has been shut
down for the duration of the war, so I would have time if it were not
for the visitors from morning to night, the discussions and the
meetings. But this should—as I’ve said—now be ended. Besides that, of
course I also want to write a study about the war.⁵⁹² That work—as you
can imagine—will soon be an urgent necessity. In the meantime obviously
the “civil truce” prevails. But in the silence we are living
side-by-side with the Südekums, et al.,⁵⁹³ the way cats live with dogs,
and the atmosphere is becoming more and more strained. The subject [of
the war] attracts me strongly, but of course purely from a theoretical
and fiction writer’s standpoint. “All we need is time, my dear, just
time,” as the poet Dehmel used to sing—Dehmel who has now become a
“volunteer.” The testimonies of all German poets, artists, and scholars
will, at any rate, constitute a _document humain_ of the first order.

Soon I will have to undergo my own version of the “civil truce”— in the
mighty fortress on Prison Street⁵⁹⁴ I cannot claim, under the
circumstances, that this makes me especially happy. Half a year ago I
was glad about it, regarding it as a holiday, but today this “honor”
falls on my chest like the Iron Cross fell on yours. Well, I console
myself with the thought that at the end of the war I will breathe fresh
air again. We will both make our parade into the capital city, you with
oak leaves on your brow as a victor, and I—as your maid of honor dressed
in white. An announcement by the Bundesrat yesterday estimated that the
war would last until after the harvest of 1915 [and] the English and
Russian papers say the same thing. That’s just great! In general people
are asking how the provisions stored up from the harvest are going to
hold out, but I ask how the nerves of the soldiers and officers are
going to hold out. God grant you a continued peaceful life in the
hospitable cottage of your woman farmer, at whose home you seek so
touchingly to make up for the absent husband. I see from your last
letter, by the way, that you have discovered a few sympathetic souls
beneath the masks, and I’m very happy about that. Keep writing me as
often as possible. There is always a big celebration at my house when a
letter from you arrives. Even Mimi sniffs at it lovingly (she calls that
“reading the letter”). Gertrud [Zlottko] has been away since the 15th,
but I’m taking care of myself. Don’t worry about me, Hannesle, I will
fight my way through. But if you, as a conquistador who has enriched
himself, want to toss a hundred marks monthly our way, tell me, could
you not sacrifice that for a young fellow who wants to study, is highly
gifted, but has no means? If he could at least get through the war years
that way perhaps he would create a basis for himself later by his own
efforts. —Gertrud has written to you, by the way, and complains about
your silence. Well, for now, heartfelt greetings from me and Mimi. Write
soon, about whether you received this letter. Your R

[P.S.] You can write to my address without worrying, or if you wish,
write to Felix [Kautsky], who will gallantly pass it on to me. (I mean
when Hans [Kautsky] has gone away again.)

TO THE EDITORS OF _SOCIAL-DEMOKRATEN_⁵⁹⁵

Berlin, November 9, 1914

Worthy comrades, I ask that you publish the following lines:

When I, like other members of the Intern[ational] Soc[ialist] Bureau,⁵⁹⁶
received the proposal of the Party Executive of the Dutch Social
Democracy to move the seat of the International Bureau temporarily to
Holland,⁵⁹⁷ I assumed naturally that this proposal was made after
consultation with the Belgian comrades of the [ISB’s] Executive
Committee and with their agreement. It was natural to assume that the
Belgian comrades, given the circumstances in their country at the time,
were prevented from functioning as the Executive Committee of the ISB
and that they wished to relieve themselves of this honor. The report
recently appearing in _Vorwärts_⁵⁹⁸ that Comrades Huysmans and Bertrand
have declared their willingness to go to Amsterdam and to move part of
the Executive Committee to the Hague offers the happiest solution to the
difficulty at this point. It is clear that as long as our Belgian
friends have declared themselves willing to continue carrying out their
duties as the International Executive, this body must be regarded as the
sole legal body of the old International, and that it can be left to the
Belgian comrades’ discretion whether they want to be reinforced by
Bureau members from other countries. The arrangement arrived at by
Comrades Huysmans and Bertrand seems a practical one, all the more so
because, for the time being, there unfortunately remains only a narrow
sphere of activity for the International Bureau. All attempts to
artificially bring about an international conference as soon as possible
seem to me to be entirely mistaken. Perhaps the soothing reassurances
made by some comrades are very pleasant, [to the effect] that the
International is not dead and that, supposedly, the rift that has arisen
within it will be easy to mend. But what international socialism needs
above all, in my opinion, is an honest and open settling of accounts
with regard to its ignominious bankruptcy over this war. Until an
internal clarification and determination is made by the socialist
parties in every country regarding their position toward militarism,
solid foundations for rebuilding the International will be lacking.
Until then we must content ourselves with avoiding everything that tends
to carry further the bankruptcy of the old International or that
attempts to shove in something new, born out of the war, to replace it.

With socialist greetings,

  R. Luxemburg

TO CAMILLE HUYSMANS⁵⁹⁹

[Südende,] November 10, 1914

Dear friend!

I rejoice at the opportunity to write you a few words. I am happy about
the solution you found for the Executive Committee.⁶⁰⁰ I ask you please
to stick it out and remain at your post despite all attempts that might
possibly be made to strip you of your mandate or convince you to
renounce it.

Enclosed is what I have written and sent to _Het Volk_ in Stockholm and
to Bern.⁶⁰¹

Our situation here is quite difficult. I am convinced that the masses of
workers would be on our side if we had the opportunity to explain the
issue to them. However, in the meantime, the careerists are taking
advantage of the state of siege for their ongoing attempts to terrorize
us and demoralize the masses. (Indeed, more and more are changing their
position.)

The collapse of the International is as complete as it is dreadful! At
the minimum, we are opposed to all efforts to replace it with a farce
and a delusion. Refounding the International can proceed, in my opinion,
only after a rigorous and open criticism of the betrayal that occurred,
and that means after the war. If only I could at least rejoice in the
“freedom” that the end of the war will bring me! But that is highly
uncertain because prison may swallow me up at any moment, whenever … it
pleases “the gods.”⁶⁰²

Clara [Zetkin] was in Switzerland, where she took part in the
congress⁶⁰³ and also spoke with the Italians. She worked hard and
learned many good things about our “_patres conscripti_”⁶⁰⁴ abroad.

I warmly clasp your hand, my dear friend, and send greetings to you and
your family. Write me if you have the opportunity to come across the
border [by mail] at the following address: Mr. Hugo Eberlein,
Berlin–Mariendorf, 82 Ring Street (adding nothing more).

The small volume that I sent off on August 2 has been returned by the
postal service.

R. L.⁶⁰⁵

TO PAUL LEVI

[Südende,] November 17 [1914]

I’ve been wanting to write for a long time, if only I had once had a
SINGLE day, and some peace and quiet! Curse all this busy chasing all
about and talking all about, as a result of which things have not moved
off dead center! All my time goes by as a result. Every day someone new
has “fallen by the wayside,” and every day we have new monstrosities to
hear about. But the main monstrosity is coming up before us on December
2.⁶⁰⁶ Of course the history of August 4⁶⁰⁷ will be repeated, but this
time there will be no grounds for any excuse, such as “a surprise
attack,” distorted information, and the like. The honor of the party
will simply receive the last nail in its coffin. Now our “radicals” will
once again cover themselves with glory. In casting a minority vote, Karl
will certainly find himself alone, or if all goes well—with two or three
others!

The verdict⁶⁰⁸ arrived during the last few days, also the statement of
court costs. So the only thing still missing is the order stating when
the serving of the prison sentence is to begin. I am enclosing the
verdict, it’s lovely.

From Dissm[ann] a letter came today. Even now he still has no courage to
go into action against that little scoundrel Wittr[isch], even now
[there are] still considerations, caution, diplomacy, when it’s really
just a matter of grabbing a little scoundrel by the ear.… And with such
people we’re supposed to turn the world upside down? Soon I’ll have no
patience and no hope of gaining even one victory with this army. I too
do not know of any “firm and intrepid person” who “perhaps” would take
over the post based on the ten conditions which Dissm[ann] has turned
into sheer possibilities out of the blue.⁶⁰⁹ N.B.: Antrick has done
better with his business, he took Thalheimer to Brunswick to replace
Wagner.⁶¹⁰ —Now a question: couldn’t you make several necessary trips in
order to feel people out and establish ties? Above all, Munich,
Karlsruhe, and Hof. If the answer is yes, I will send the addresses. No
one here has the time or the money to do it, but feeling people out is
necessary. It is a fine idea to spend Christmas in Switzerland.
Fortunate the person who could do it!

In case you do make the trip, I will send you letters to friends. The
best way to go to Switzerland would be—by way of Berlin, that is my
opinion. Then one could talk things over and make good use of the trip.

N.B.: The infamous article in your _Volksstimme_ entitled “Three Months
of the World War” (about two weeks ago) is by [of all people] … Lensch!
He is already halfway to falling by the wayside.⁶¹¹

Write soon. RL

TO MARTA ROSENBAUM

Südende, January 5, 1915—2 Linden Street

Dear Comrade Rosenbaum!

Among the many requests and tasks with which I must plague you before my
leaving “to go down below,”⁶¹² there is one matter that brooks no delay.
We have decided to subscribe to the “underground” correspondence of the
General Commission of Trade Unions,⁶¹³ that systematically spreads
poison against the foreign comrades, and we have decided to circulate it
among our own people so as to be able to counteract this sham. We had to
choose someone with an inconspicuous name to be the subscriber. A
comrade in Mariendorf, Hugo Eberlein, who is entirely devoted to us and
is an influential person, undertook to subscribe to the _Korrespondenz_
and to pass it on. The first batch has already been received and is in
the possession of Karl Liebknecht, from him it will go to Mehring, later
to you, and from you to Kurt [Rosenfeld]; and we would like it to
continue even further. Would you be so good—because I am departing—to
take over the regulation of this matter and the finances? The expenses,
which are indeed not insignificant, cannot of course be covered by
Eberlein on his own. We can defray these costs out of the funds of the
magazine.⁶¹⁴ Would you, therefore, be so good as to send payment to
Eberlein in accordance with the enclosed bill? Many greetings [to you]
until we meet again soon! Your R. L.

Eberlein’s address is on the receipt.

TO ALEXANDER WINKLER

Berlin-Südende, February 11, 1915—2 Linden Street

Highly esteemed Comrade Winkler!

In the name of Karl L[iebknecht] and in mine I send you heartfelt thanks
for your energetic support of our undertaking.⁶¹⁵ The preparations are
under way, yesterday the business manager from Leipzig was here, the man
through whom we will send the journal to the printer, and we talked over
the practical side of the matter. The first issue will come out at the
beginning of March, and the articles are already being worked on. I hope
that the thing will have an impact. Here in Berlin and in several party
locations that we are in touch with there is truly a ravenous craving
for a Social Democratic word spoken in the old spirit. What a delightful
prospect! The mass of party comrades—one sees this ever more
clearly—have NOT been re-educated, they have merely unlearned the habit
of trusting their leaders unconditionally, because the latter have
failed them so miserably.

Day before yesterday, here in Charlottenburg, one of the most important
party centers in Berlin, we again had a general membership meeting of
the electoral district (with an attendance of about 600 persons), at
which the elected representative of the district, Zubeil, tried to
justify the behavior of the [SPD] parliamentary group. In the discussion
it became evident that perhaps thirty attending union officials took the
side of the Reichstag group but the whole large meeting was in strong
opposition to that. And we have experienced the same kind of thing in
every meeting so far. The bustling activity of the right wing, the many
pamphlets and articles by Heine, Scheidemann, etc., have obviously had
only the opposite effect [from what was intended]. The eyes of the
masses have been opened, they see what dangers threaten our movement and
our party.

Of course we will not get by without very stormy battles, but I hope the
old tradition will prove to be much stronger than the so-called new
course. —It goes without saying that we will send you the first copy of
the journal, which will soon be finished. May your health allow you,
together with us, to emerge victorious out of the coming severe crisis
in party life.

With best wishes and greetings, your Rosa Luxemburg

TO HELENE WINKLER

Berlin-Südende, February 11, 1915—2 Linden Street

Dear Comrade Winkler!

Your dear letter gave me much joy. I heard that the state of your
father’s health, unfortunately, leaves much to be desired and that you
are looking after him with great dedication. The situation with Karl
Liebknecht is such that he is not at all wearing a coat of gray, in fact
such a thing is expressly “forbidden.”⁶¹⁶ This is a very comical and
very typical story. He was simply summoned by a superior officer, and
the latter explained to him: from today on you are to regard yourself as
a soldier; you may not leave Berlin, you may not wear a uniform, and ANY
POLITICAL COLLABORATION (except in parliament) IS FORBIDDEN TO YOU.
—That was of course the whole purpose. It was to be made impossible for
KL [Karl Liebknecht] to take any part in protest demonstrations against
the majority in the [SPD] Reichstag group, to issue public statements,
etc. In a word: he has been “switched off,” but he performs no actual
military service, perhaps later on he will in fact be called up for duty
if in any way he again “becomes a nuisance.”

Meanwhile in the party things are proceeding along their disastrous
course: the censorship is becoming stricter and stricter, the economic
situation ever more difficult, and the official party, in particular the
trade union leadership, is more and more becoming a government party. A
vehement propaganda campaign is being waged “against the troublemakers,”
that is, against all of us who defend the fundamental old positions and
the glorious traditions of the party. But I trust in the masses and do
not shy away from the struggle. _Ça ira_—it will go on! I don’t know how
things are with you in Thuringia, but here in Berlin and in several
other big cities the mood is excellent.

I will be very happy when you give me another sign of life and also
report on the state of your dear father’s health. I am fairly well, at
least I don’t have much time to think about my health, and that’s the
best way for people like us.

Heartfelt greetings, your R. L.

TO KOSTYA ZETKIN

[Berlin,] April 10, 1915

Niuniu, darling, I hope you will get this letter promptly on your
birthday. I enclose as a gift a picture of Mimi, which I got yesterday
and which gave me great joy. The young doctor who is keeping her is an
acquaintance of Miss [Mathilde] Jacob, he wanted to photograph Mimi with
his camera, but he himself had to hold her in place. I did order a book
for you from Wertheim, but he has not yet sent it; as soon as it comes,
you’ll get it. I hope that on Sundays sometimes you will have the time
and the desire to read for a few hours. With the 10 marks, which will
come to you additionally, you must buy yourself something good, I
certainly can’t do it, unfortunately.⁶¹⁷ Probably one cannot have
flowers in the barracks, so buy something else. I thought that perhaps a
fountain pen might be of use to you. I personally can’t stand such an
implement, for me it belongs in the same category as the thermometer,
but out in the field [on military duty] it could really be useful to a
person.⁶¹⁸

You write so sadly about the Easter vacation, Niuniu. You definitely
should not go around with such a heavy heart. The only serious grounds
for such a thing would be your mother’s condition, but there I have high
hopes that Hope [Adams-Lehmann]⁶¹⁹ will energetically take your mother’s
case. Perhaps you will write a few lines to her (to Hope). That would
have a very good effect. By the way, I still do not want to believe that
there are organic heart problems (nothing more need be said). Your
mother’s previous instances of heart trouble were more than likely
caused by nerves. See that you write down the diagnosis by Hope, so that
we can know the truth. Other than that, you must be calm and cheerful.
Niuniu, have patience for just a little time more. In a year everything
will surely change for the better. Don’t think about anything but the
day’s work, then the time will go by quickly. Next year we want to
celebrate your birthday properly. This is already the second time that
it hasn’t been done right. But the previous year at least you were in
Persia and had a lovely time.

Niuniu, just think, I am doing botany again here! I have my albums [for
dried flowers] with me, as well as the botany book by Fünfstück and the
small atlases from you, and sometimes I get a few flowers myself or in a
letter from Miss Jacob, who is in Thuringia for Easter. I have started a
new album for dried flowers (the eleventh one!), and as the first little
flower in it I inserted the snowdrop from Niuniu for March 5.⁶²⁰ That
was the “greater snowdrop”—_Leucojum vernum_. The “lesser snowdrop” has
three little inner leaves in the corona, not pointed, but in scooped-out
heart shapes, with three little green lines on each; in Berlin this
snowdrop is sold on the streets in large quantities, but I don’t think
you have it in your garden. It has such a pretty name: _Galanthus
nivalis_. Just think, this plant family (the Amaryllidaceae) includes
not only the snowdrop and the narcissus—but also the large agave! If you
find daphne or the “scylla,” which I am not familiar with, or something
else pretty, send it to me in a letter. Miss Jacob has also sent me a
cowslip, which has very soft down, and a goldstar, which is very
beautiful. Are you familiar with it?

It occurred to me how quickly we have become impatient and whiny when
for a time we encounter prison or the barracks or difficulties of any
kind, but Cervantes, for example, spent so many long years in outright
slavery. Human beings are able to endure much more as individuals, on
their own, than as “heroes” to whom the masses look out of slavish
obedience. I don’t know who has recently got me thinking about
Cervantes, but somewhere I read an expression of boundless amazement
over _Don Quixote_. Was it perhaps something written by Goethe?

Niuniu, I am sending a newspaper item for you about Easter Island. I am
fascinated by this name, and above all by the “mystery” of the giant
stone heads. Did you know something about this, and can you make any
suppositions about it? Surely this island was merely part of an older,
submerged continent, which perhaps was once connected with the coast of
Chile. But what about the fact that all these stone figures are looking
out to sea? But wait! Maybe this was just an April Fool’s joke by the
_Berliner Tageblatt_, could that be it?

I embrace you, Niunia

TO FRANZ MEHRING

[Berlin,] August 31, 1915—10 Barnim Street

Highly respected and dear friend, your letter brought great joy to my
heart, all the more so because I was already pining away with longing
for some word from you and your dear wife, Eva, and I very much wanted
to know whether you had found the wished-for rest and recuperation. It
saddens me greatly that you have suffered so from the bad weather, and I
look with alarm through the opening in the air vent above me at the
heavy, gray sky and splashing rain, which are perhaps afflicting you in
the Harz [Mountains] as well, and again ruining your mood. But how wrong
you are to make any connection between these moods and your age! In that
case I could be your grandmother, because I am as dependent on the
weather as a frog, and when the autumn rains come it sometimes seems to
me that my whole existence is a shallow and pointless farce. And what is
youth if not the irrepressible joy one gets from working, scrapping, and
laughing? And when it comes to those things, you still beat all the rest
of us hollow, every day. You certainly don’t know how very much the
example of your amazing capacity for work, and the very thought of your
tremendous flexibility of spirit, as well as the slightest hope for
approval from you—how all those things put me to shame and spur me on
whenever I give in—you know only too little about this shameful weakness
of mine—to the notion of taking to my heels, from sheer impatience, and
getting out from under the yoke of duty.

Obviously the whole situation is now of a kind that is so confused and
complicated that a true joy in the struggle is no match for it.
Everything is still in the process of moving and shifting, and the giant
landslide seems to have no end whatever, and on such churned-up and
fluctuating ground it is a devilishly difficult task to decide strategy
and organize the battle. Actually now I am no longer full of fear and
presentiment, not at all. At the first moment, back on August 4 [1914],
I was horrified and appalled, almost broken; since then I have become
quite calm. The catastrophe has taken on such huge dimensions that
ordinary ways of measuring human guilt and human pain no longer apply;
the elemental devastation indeed has something calming about it
precisely because of its immensity and blindness. And finally if this is
the way things are, if the whole splendor of the peacetime structure was
merely an _ignis fatuus_, a delusory light moving about over a swamp,
then it is certainly better that matters be put to rest. But for the
time being we have the agony and the discomfort of the transitional
situation and there’s a saying that truly applies to us: _Le mort saisit
le vif_.⁶²¹ The jibber-jabber of our wavering friends, which you
complain about, is in fact nothing but the fruit of the universal
corruption from which the structure that gleamed so proudly in peacetime
has collapsed. Wherever one reaches out one touches rotten, brittle
tinder. I think that all of this will still have to disintegrate and
come apart more before the sound wood underneath will finally be
revealed.

In this wretched situation, which I now accept with full calmness of
soul, your words are a true consolation for me. Your first article [in
_Neue Zeit_] was doubly interesting for me because I had just been
reading something by Seeley or Macaulay that’s related to the subject
matter [of your article] and in which I find the view that you presented
fully borne out: that fundamentally the Seven Years’ War was nothing but
a contest between England and France for hegemony in America and Asia,
and that Frederick [King Frederick II of Prussia] was merely an
incidental beneficiary of this rivalry on a world scale. At first I was
astonished by the point of view [you presented]—one certainly brings
from the school bench some limited, home-baked, European points of
view—but now, precisely in the light of today’s experiences, one finds
joy in the broad horizons that you opened up. It also occurred to me in
reading the description of Frederick’s army and its brilliant victories,
as well as the description of such figures as Clive and his sepoys,⁶²²
how much is implied in the light of history by the current [widely used]
chapter headings such as “war heroism—universal conscription—and English
mercenaries.” Now I am waiting with bated breath for the sequel, but
today’s _Neue Zeit_ in its idiotic way contains no continuation of your
article! The letter carrier is probably not an editor there anymore,
because he would at least have presented to the reader the different
parts of your contribution [in immediate sequence] one after the other.

To refresh myself I am reading a little bit further in Lassalle⁶²³ but,
oh ye gods, help me from crawling out of my skin over the annotations by
Bernstein. Like a stupid tomcat he keeps jumping in between Lassalle’s
legs. Just when the latter is holding forth most beautifully, giving
Schulze [Delitsch] a resounding clap on the ear, the ass [Bernstein]
tugs at his arm and comments with finger raised that “actually” Schulze
was “not entirely” wrong “insofar as,” etc. And when Lassalle closes a
chapter like a rolling storm with thunder and lightning and I am
breathing deeply of this good, fresh air, a footnote down underneath
quickly pops up like a spider in its web, the inexorable Ede
[Bernstein], and he “observes” that “actually” Molinari had already said
such-and-such in the year 1846, or he hands us I don’t know what other
bit of rubbish. Oh, may the devil just take you away! I have to shout
like that every moment. He completely interferes and prevents one from
being alone with Lassalle. How could you endure such desecration of the
dead? Why didn’t you rage against that with thunder and lightning? Oh,
we accepted too many things quietly. Your wife Eva was certainly right:
we were much too mild. But I swear I am going to improve myself. I
already feel like a porcupine with all my quills sticking out, burning
to run amok among the philistines.

Unfortunately, with my work things are not going forward very well. It
is probably the monotony and narrowness of life, the absence of
impressions, which gradually overlays the senses like a paste. Generally
speaking, I can only work in a state of exaltation, when I am in a fresh
and joyful mood, but now every little bit I produce is done with great
effort. This is not to complain, but to give “mitigating circumstances,”
to excuse myself if I disappoint your expectations.

Otherwise you need not worry at all about my health, and Miss J[acob]
will get a good talking to because she has been discussing my carcass
too freely. I wish I could be just as calm and unworried about our Klara
[i.e., Clara Zetkin].⁶²⁴ But the uncertainty of what will happen to her
and how long this foul play will continue gets on my nerves somewhat. By
the way, I am indignant—no, let’s be honest: I am happy—that the
“fraction” [the SPD parliamentary group in the Reichstag] has not
uttered a single word about Klara. Do you remember what the dying
Valentin said to Gretchen [in Goethe’s _Faust_]? “Und bist du einmal
eine—so, sei es eben recht!”⁶²⁵

Well now, again the most heartfelt greetings to you both. How much I am
already looking forward to sitting at the little tables in your
comfortable study, chatting and laughing together!

Once again, all best wishes. Your R. L.

Many thanks in advance for _The Lessing Legend_⁶²⁶ and the folded
printer’s sheets of the Marx book.⁶²⁷

N.B.: it was probably inadvertent, but you left your letter completely
unsealed.

TO CLARA ZETKIN
Confirm receipt right
away by postcard!

[Südende,] March 9, 1916

My dearest Klara!

Do you believe me that today for the first time I’ve had the necessary
peace and quiet to be able to write you as I want to, from the heart? I
came directly out of the hole into the hurly-burly, went right to work,
and scarcely have time to breathe. But don’t be concerned about me. I’m
fresh and fit for work, my physical condition isn’t good, but that
doesn’t bother me much. Besides I’m receiving systematic medical
treatment, in the care of a good specialist (right now I’m expecting him
to visit me again), and I follow his orders— except for the rule about
regularly going to bed early and going for a walk twice a day. But from
today on I’m again going to start living somewhat more quietly, at least
that is my intention. —

How can I thank you and “the Poet” for the wonderful display of flowers
on the 5th!⁶²⁸ I am quite overwhelmed by so much kindness, which is
coming to me now from all sides, it’s rather frightening and unfamiliar
[_unheimlich_] to me, I simply don’t know why it’s all happening! The
four vases of flowers from you on the 18th⁶²⁹ bring me joy every day, I
really was short of vases, and now I have such enchantingly beautiful
ones that amaze everyone. And the two baskets of flowers that came on
the 5th are fabulous in their color and fullness! Also the little
flowers that were in your letter are now in a small glass on my desk,
and they gladden my heart because I know that you picked them for me
yourself. You’ve probably already heard how the women comrades here
welcomed me. More than a thousand in number, they gathered me up [from
the prison] and then came in massive numbers to where I live, to shake
my hand. My dwelling place was and still is stuffed full with their
presents, window boxes with flowers, baked goods, canned goods,
fruitcakes, teabags, soap, cocoa, sardines, and the finest
vegetables—just like in a delicatessen, and all of it done by these poor
and warm-hearted women, baked by themselves, canned or preserved by
themselves, and brought by themselves. You must know what I felt when I
saw all that. I wanted to howl with shame and only consoled myself with
the thought that in this case I am just the wooden pole on which they
are hanging their banner of universal readiness for struggle. In
Mariendorf there then followed a reception with an evening of readings,
again with a giant bouquet on the table, and the faces, the serious
expressions and eyes gleaming! It would have been a heartfelt joy for
you to see these women. I was greeted by the chairperson with the
explanation that the demonstration on the 18th had been made quite
spontaneously on their own initiative by the women of Berlin in order to
greet the person who “we missed so much because she always spoke a sharp
word directly to the party leaders, and because she is the kind of
person that the people higher up in the party would rather see going
_into_ prison than coming out of it.” In fact from the Party Executive I
have not received even one syllable, but just a moment!—from Luise
Zietz, thank you, a giant telegram very much from the heart in the name
of all the women of Germany (she obviously can’t even whisper to herself
anymore without saying “in the name of all the women”). —

On the other hand, I want to report to you my impressions regarding our
cause. I believe I have oriented myself already, in general, and can
only tell you that I am very satisfied with the state of things. You
understand me well: I mean of course not the general jibber-jabber and
the frightful suffering that the poor masses of our people have to go
through, what I mean is the situation inside the party and the direction
things are taking as they unfold. I find after a year—among all of you,
no one can testify to this as well as I can—a powerful step forward has
been taken in clarification, strengthening, and differentiation among
the good souls [of the SPD]. The differentiation is proceeding quite
logically and consistently. There is no doubt that individual errors
have been made and wavering has occurred, even among our closest
friends, and that many things could have been done more clearly and more
decisively. But I don’t make much of that at all. By no means do we need
to fidget and fret or get upset about particular details or secondary
matters when, by and large and on the whole, things are going the right
way. I place my trust most of all in the objective logic of history,
which tirelessly carries out its work of clarification and
differentiation. It is also a mistake for a politician to want to eat
the soup before it’s finished cooking. Of course I’m not falling into
some sort of comfortable fatalism, of that there can be no question. I
would only like to impart to you the calm assurance I have, which always
takes into account the fact that this or that detail might not have been
done correctly, something might have been missed or done too quickly,
but nevertheless in all of this we must keep in our sight the main
direction of things and the larger picture. I don’t want to talk with
you about particular details, not because I want to shield you from
them, but because I don’t let such things make me fidgety or fretful, as
many others among our friends do. About the situation on the whole and
in general you can be at peace.

I just got word that our hearing in Dusseldorf on the 22nd has been
CANCELED;⁶³⁰ this news will be pleasant for you too. —I know you too
well not to know precisely how burdensome and intolerable the present
enforced idleness is for you. But really you can bear with it in good
conscience. Out of my mature consideration of things and out of the most
complete conviction I can assure you: not now, but significantly later
on, perhaps in a year, we will need every bit of strength and energy,
which means yours in the front rank, and we will have to exert all our
energies to the utmost. At that time, of course, will come the general
settling of differences [_Generalauseinandersetzung_] with the people on
the right and in the swamp. What is now going on, and will be for
months, is the preparatory internal process of the shearing-off of the
opposition from the swamp, a process that is new for most of our people,
and therefore needs time and an inner ripening, a process which can only
be helped along by measured and careful consideration, and then whatever
will already have been achieved—you can rest easy about it. What I am in
favor of, in general, is that things should proceed slowly and
thoroughly rather than hastily and superficially. It is an entire
process of political schooling that must be gone through by the masses
of our people, and that requires time. In such times of transition,
patience is the duty of a political person and a leader, even if it is
not a pleasant duty. And you too must practice this patience, but as
calmly and cheerfully as possible, as I do, not self-tormentingly, as
you do. I know, dearest, all the things that disturb your peace, but I
also know that you are above all a person with a strong sense of
responsibility [_ein Pflichtmensch_] who gets consumed with worry at the
thought of not being able to lend a hand when the labor seems so
urgently necessary. It is precisely this false notion of yours that I
would like to clear away. I don’t say this _ad usum Delphini_ [in the
manner of the oracle at Delphi] nor to console you. You do know how
serious my evaluation of the situation is. It is this, my strongest
inner conviction, which I immediately expressed to the fretful Karl
[Liebknecht] and others: not to want to do too much; a few, calm,
well-aimed steps—that’s what is now necessary but also completely
sufficient. Objective development, doing its part, will have to
accomplish the rest. Get well rested, then, so that we have you present
when “all hands on board” will actually be necessary. But until
then—fortunately or unfortunately, depending on how one looks at
it—there will still be a good, long while.

The worst thing is that I can’t go visit you now, not even for two days:
(1) I have much to do here, (2) I must continue my treatment and
scarcely feel in condition to make a trip, (3) money must be saved (by
you as well as me and all of us). And here you are sending me such
baskets of flowers, and “the Poet” is also indulging in such luxury! Oh,
you incorrigible _grands seigneurs_ of the heart—with your pockets full
of holes! A long, detailed conversation with you would have such a
liberating effect. But what can we do? This too must be taken in stride
calmly and cheerfully.

In the Barnim Street prison I trained myself so well that I can really
now swallow anything without batting an eyelash. —From Costia [i.e.,
Kostya Zetkin] I received a note for the 5th [Luxemburg’s birthday] that
I want to answer right now. He certainly is not having an easy time of
it, but in his short letter I sense a lot of manly maturity and
strength, he is visibly growing stronger in this hard school,⁶³¹ and if
it ends well, as I hope it will, then all of us will have nothing to
regret. Your book and the one from him have given me heartfelt joy. —Do
you ever get around to reading? I would like it if you were doing only
very light reading, some good fiction. Your Mehring article was
excellent—that’s the prevailing opinion in regard to it.⁶³² The only
thing that makes everything seem black to you is the poor state of your
health. I have not yet seen the women’s paper. —We had a very fine
celebration for the Old Man, with everything done in a serious way and
worthy of the occasion.⁶³³ It was quite different from that time with
Bebel, do you still remember that? The Old Man gave a speech about you,
with which we all heartily agreed. For now I must close, more soon.

A thousand kisses. Yours

[I wrote] about my health only to reassure you. It’s nothing more than a
stomach that has gone to ruin, but the treatment is already working, and
I will continue to pursue the treatment.

TO CLARA ZETKIN

[Südende,] May 12, 1916

Dearest Klara!

You can well imagine how much I’ve been in turmoil and hurly-burly since
May 1⁶³⁴ and that I wasn’t able to write you, though you were in my
thoughts daily and hourly, not even to thank you for your sweet greeting
in the form of flowers on Sunday. From the minute Karl [Liebknecht] was
arrested—it happened at 8:30 am, when we were promenading together with
the crowd on Potsdamer Platz [Potsdam Square]—I of course have not had a
free moment, because it was necessary to find out where he had been
taken and to force a way through to him. Indeed I tried with all the
might of my fists to “free” him [when he was seized] and I pulled at him
and at the policemen all the way to the police station, from which I was
unceremoniously expelled. Then, that same evening, we were unable to
learn anything more about his fate in spite of running around and
driving around by car until 1 a.m. On the next morning I was at his home
during the police search, then there was a quick run to his office,
because there too a police search took place. Then hither and thither
until we both (his wife [Sonya] had to have me with her constantly, as
you can imagine, because she is very upset and doesn’t know what to do)
found out that he was being held under arrest by the military, and we
forced our way through to him, in order to have at least some small
items delivered to him and thus to give him a sure sign that people are
concerned about him. On the next morning his wife was indeed able to see
him, and [the same] every day since then. The people there are very nice
and humane—a hundred times more humane than the pack of dogs at
Alexanderplatz⁶³⁵ or in the Reichstag.⁶³⁶ Karl in his usual manner is
taking on the heavy load, going all out. Nevertheless I still hope that
military justice will show more of a regard for the obvious facts than
the riffraff at the Reichstag and that [the charge of] high treason,
greedily wished for and crassly suggested by the police and the
government, will not be rolled out, in which case we’d never be able to
find him, even searching with a candle. Personally, Karl’s in good
health, looks marvelous (for the first time in a long time the poor man
is eating, sleeping, and reading), and his mood is splendid, as usual.
Every day he is allowed to receive food from home, books, and other
small items. We have the impression that everyone there treats him with
sympathy and respect, they are after all military people, not “party
comrades,” and therefore they still know how to appreciate the
individual and his character even if he is an opponent. For the rest,
what remains is to wait and see what the indictment will say; it should
be drawn up by the middle of next week. He is allowed to and wants to
have a defense lawyer, but the difficulty is that only a few are
permitted to appear before a military court, and among those few one
cannot of course choose just anyone; up to now we have no one. As soon
as the indictment comes out, I’ll send you word right away.

Now to you, dearest! Both the news of the consequences of your “trip” to
the city and, in particular, the conscription of “the Poet”⁶³⁷ appalled
me. What will come of this?! Will “the Poet” really be called up, in all
seriousness? After the examples we have experienced here (for example,
with our poor Weinberg) it seems that no illness can protect one against
“being called up for duty,” and so one must be prepared for the worst.
In this case I would have to come to visit you, in order to nurse you,
but just now, after Karl’s departure, it’s even less possible than ever
for me to leave here. In addition to the larger duties there are all
sorts of small bits of junk (for example, the usual ones involving
Franziskus [Franz Mehring] …), all of which eats up time and energy and
chains me to Berlin. So what is going to happen? I see only one
solution: that you come here to visit me, [especially] if “the Poet” is
going to be drafted in all seriousness. But a trip is unthinkable for
you! And of course I don’t have your magnificent garden here for you.
Really I’m racking my brains over what to do. In all the turmoil of
recent times, by the way, I have also not written to Costia [i.e.,
Kostya Zetkin] for a long time, but I’ll do it tomorrow. Does he know
what’s in store for “the Poet”? I can imagine what his concern is for
you!…

That you don’t go to the Control [Commission meetings] and have been
“excluded” from it, I regard as a victory …⁶³⁸ The Party Executive is
certainly rushing toward anarchy with blind zeal, and with its own hands
is tearing apart all the old, established ties, all the “God-given”
authorities and traditions. This will cure even the most stiff-necked
“legalists” in our opposition circles.

Dearest, I would like to tell you a thousand more things, but I have to
close now, in order to begin running around to chase up a few eggs,
rolls, and the like so that a reasonable “dinner” will happen, and this
has become a more complicated problem every day. Actually it’s hardly
possible to find anything anymore, especially here in the wilderness of
Südende. Keep calm and stay in a good mood in spite of everything. Soon
everything will certainly take a turn for the better. I embrace you many
times, your R

More soon.

TO MATHILDE WURM

Wronke, December 28, 1916

My dearest Tilde!

I want to answer your Christmas letter immediately, while the anger it
stirred up in me is still fresh. Yes, your letter made me hopping mad,
because every line in it, brief as it is, shows how very much you are
again under the spell of your milieu.⁶³⁹ This crybaby tone, this “oh
dear” and “woe is me” about the “disappointments” you’ve
experienced—attributing them to others, instead of just looking at the
mirror to see all the wretchedness of humanity in its most striking
likeness! And in your mouth “we” now means the froggy denizens of the
swamp [i.e., the centrists] with whom you now associate, whereas
earlier, when you were with me, “we” meant in company with ME. So just
wait, and I’ll deal with you [_Dich_— singular, familiar] in plural
terms [_per “Ihr”_—in the plural of “you”; “you-all”; “all of you”].

You suppose, in your melancholy way, that you are “too little of an
adventure-goer” for my taste. “Too little” is good! Generally speaking,
all of you are not “goers” but “creepers.” It is not a difference of
degree, but of substance. In general, “you-all” [_“Ihr”_] are of a
different zoological genus from me, and you-all’s peevish, sour-puss,
cowardly, and half-hearted way of being was never so foreign and so
hateful to me as now. You suggest that “adventure-going” would indeed be
suitable for you-all, but one merely gets put “in the hole” for that,
and is then “of little use.” Oh, you miserable pettifogging souls, who
would certainly be ready for a bit of “heroism,” but only for cash, for
at least three moldy copper pennies, because you first have to see
“something of use” lying on the store counter. And for you people the
simple statement of honorable and straightforward men, “Here I stand, I
can do no other, so help me God,” was never spoken. It’s lucky that
world history up to now was not made by people like all of you, because
otherwise we would have had no Reformation and would probably still be
sitting under the _ancien régime_. As for me, in recent times I, who
certainly was never soft, have become as hard as polished steel and from
now on will neither politically nor in personal relations make even the
slightest concession. When I simply recall the gallery of your heroes,
such a fit of depression takes hold of me [to think of them]: the
sweet-spoken Haase, Dittmann with his lovely beard and lovely Reichstag
speeches, and the wavering, misguided shepherd Kautsky, who your Emmo⁶⁴⁰
follows loyally, of course, over hill and dale, the magnificent Arthur
[Stadthagen]—_ah, je n’en finirai!_⁶⁴¹ I swear to you: I would rather
sit for years [in prison]—and I don’t mean here [in Wronke], where after
all it’s like being in the kingdom of heaven, but rather in the cave at
Alexanderplatz where I, in an eleven square meter cell, without light
both mornings and evenings, crammed in between the C (without W) and the
iron bunk, would recite my Mörike aloud—I would rather do that than
“fight,” if I can use the term, beside your heroes, or in general have
anything to do with them! Indeed I would rather deal with Count
Westarp—and not because he spoke of my “almond-shaped velvet eyes” in
the Reichstag, but because he is a MAN. I tell you, as soon as I can
stick my nose out of here again, I will come hunting and hounding your
company of frogs with the blare of trumpets, the cracking of whips, and
the baying of bloodhounds—I was going to say, like Penthesilea,⁶⁴² but
by God the bunch of you are by no means Achilles. Have you had enough of
my New Year’s greeting yet? Then see that you remain a HUMAN BEING. To
be a human being is the main thing, above all else. And that means: to
be firm and clear and CHEERFUL, yes, cheerful in spite of everything and
anything, because howling is the business of the weak. To be a human
being means to joyfully toss your entire life “on the giant scales of
fate” if it must be so, and at the same time to rejoice in the
brightness of every day and the beauty of every cloud. Oh, I don’t know
any recipe that can be written down on how to be a human being, I only
know when a person IS one, and you too always used to know when we
walked together through the fields of Südende for hours at a time and
the red glow of evening lay upon the stalks of grain. The world is so
beautiful, with all its horrors, and would be even more beautiful if
there were no weaklings or cowards in it. Come, you get another kiss,
after all, because you actually are an honorable, well-intentioned
little girl. A toast to the new year! R.

TO LUISE KAUTSKY

Wronke in Poznań, Fortress, January 26, 1917

Lulu, beloved! Yesterday in Berlin I had a hearing (in my absence), at
which undoubtedly a few months of prison have again fallen to my lot.⁶⁴³
Today it has been exactly three months that I have been stuck “sitting”
here—in the third stage [of my imprisonment].⁶⁴⁴ In celebration of two
such memorable days, by which they have interrupted my existence in this
pleasant way for years now, you deserve to get a letter. Forgive me,
dearest, for letting you wait so long for an answer from me, but I just
had a bout of miserable cowardice for a short time. For several days we
had an icy wind storm, and I felt so tiny and weak that I didn’t go out
of my “den” at all, for fear that the cold would totally destroy me. In
such a mood I was of course waiting for a warm-hearted, encouraging
letter, but unfortunately my friends always wait to be prodded and
nudged by me. None of them ever take a good fresh initiative and write
me of their own accord—other than Hänschen [Diefenbach]. He [Hans
Diefenbach] is probably rather tired by now after two and a half years
of writing letters “that don’t reach you” and that are not answered.
Finally a letter came from Sonya [Liebknecht], but her tone is always
like that of cracked glass. At that point I hastened, as always, to get
back up out of the depths by my own effort, and it is good to do that.

Now I am bright and lively again and in a good mood, and the only way
you’re failing me is that you’re not here chitchatting and laughing as
only the two of us understand how to do. I would very soon get you
laughing again, even though your last few letters sounded disturbingly
gloomy. You know, once when we were coming home from an evening at
Bebel’s and around midnight in the middle of the street three of us were
putting on a regular frog’s concert, you said that when we two were
together you always felt a little tipsy, as though we had been drinking
bubbly. That’s exactly what I love about you, that I can always put you
in a champagne mood, with life making our fingers tingle and us ready
for any kind of foolishness. We can go without seeing each other for
three years, and then within half an hour it’s as though we’d seen each
other only yesterday, and I would so much like right now to suddenly
break in on Hans Naivus [Hans Kautsky] and be able to laugh again with
you and those sitting around your table, the way we laughed in June
during the visit by Hänschen [Diefenbach]. (He wrote me later that in
the train all the way to the front he had to laugh out loud from time to
time to the amazement of his soldier comrades in the railroad
compartment and undoubtedly “looked like an idiot” in their eyes.)
Actual champagne is out of the question and has been now for a long
time, ever since poor [Hugo] Faisst fell as the first casualty of the
World War.⁶⁴⁵

Well, away with champagne and away with the _Lieder_ of Hugo Wolf. By
the way I have a very heart-warming memory of our last “carousal” with
champagne. It was in the last summer [before the war] when I was in the
Black Forest.⁶⁴⁶ He [Faisst] came on a Sunday with Costia [i.e., Kostya
Zetkin], they having clambered up from Wildbad for a visit; it was a
marvelous day and after eating, we sat out in the open around a small
battery of bottles of Mumm [champagne], we rejoiced in the sun and were
very merry. Of course the one who drank the most was “the noble donor”
[of the champagne, i.e., Faisst]. Once again he experienced “an
unforgettable hour,” laughing, gesticulating, crying out, and shoving
one sparkling glass after the other into his wide-open Swabian “trap.”
He was especially amused by the Sunday visiting public that swarmed
around us on the porch. “Look how these Philistines are gaping at us,”
he cried out enthusiastically, “if only they knew who was going on a
bender here!” And the funniest thing was that we were the ones who were
clueless, because the landlord, as he told me later that evening, had
somehow deciphered my unfortunate “incognito” and naturally tipped off
all his guests about it. The scoundrel kept serving us with such
ingratiating smiles and made the corks pop extra loud, but the
Philistines were, as you can imagine, most highly edified by this
“Social Democratic champagne orgy.” —And now for the third time already
over Faisst’s grave the springtime will “let its blue ribbon flutter”
(he sang that song⁶⁴⁷ very beautifully, much better than Julia Culp,
whom we once heard—do you still remember?—once when you and I were
together at the Academy of Song). Probably for you the desire for music,
as for all other things, has gone by for a while, your mind is full of
concern about world history, which has gone all wrong, and your heart is
full of sighs over the wretchedness of—Scheidemann and comrades. And
everyone who writes to me moans and sighs in the same way. Don’t you
understand that the overall disaster is much TOO GREAT to be moaned and
groaned about? I can grieve or feel bad if Mimi is sick, or if you are
not well. But when the whole world is out of joint, then I merely seek
to UNDERSTAND what is going on and why, and then I have done my duty,
and I am calm and in good spirits from then on. _Ultra posse nemo
obligatur_.⁶⁴⁸ And then for me there still remains EVERYTHING else that
makes me happy: music and painting and clouds and doing botany in the
spring and good books and Mimi and you and much more. —In short, I am
“stinking rich” and I’m thinking of staying that way to the end. This
giving oneself up completely to the headaches and miseries of the day is
completely incomprehensible and intolerable to me. See, for example, how
Goethe stood above things with cool composure. But think what he must
have gone through: the Great French Revolution, which surely must have
seemed like a bloody and completely pointless farce from up close, and
then from 1793 till 1815 an unbroken series of wars, when once again the
world must have seemed like a madhouse turned loose. Yet at the same
time how calmly, with such equanimity, he pursued his studies about the
metamorphosis of plants, the theory of colors, and a thousand other
things. I don’t ask that you be a poet like Goethe, but everyone can
adopt for themselves his outlook on life—the universalism of interests,
the inner harmony—or at least strive toward that. And if you say
something like: but Goethe was not a political fighter, my opinion is
this: a fighter is precisely a person who must strive to rise above
things, otherwise one’s nose will get stuck in every bit of nonsense.
—Obviously I’m thinking of a fighter on the grand scale, not a
weathervane of the caliber of the “great men” who sit around your table,
who recently sent a greeting card to me here.… Never mind⁶⁴⁹ —YOUR
greeting was really the only one that was dear to me among all those.
And in recompense for that I want to send you very soon a little picture
from my Turner album. The only thing is that you better not give me a
rebuff in reply to that, as recently occurred for me. Just think, for
Christmas I sent a wonderfully beautiful picture from this album to Leo
[Jogiches] and then I received word by way of Miss Jacob: refused with
thanks; supposedly it was “vandalism,” and the picture must be replaced
in the album! Typical Leo, isn’t that so? I was furious, because I also
hold the view that Goethe expresses here:

Would I have any hesitation,
From Balkh, Bukhara, Samarkand,
These cities’ brightest, shiny goods
To send to you, my love so grand?

Or would you rather ask the king
To grant you these cities from above?
He’s more magnificent and wiser,
But he knows not how to love.⁶⁵⁰

Leo [Jogiches] is neither the king nor “wiser,” but still “he knows not
how to love.” And yet the two of us know, don’t we, Lulu? And when I
next have the chance to pull down a few stars to bestow on someone for
use as cufflinks, there better be no cold-blooded pedant with his finger
raised to restrain me, saying that I’m creating confusion in all the
astronomy textbooks.

The Greiner album that you sent brings me ever more joy, I leaf through
it often, and in doing so, I feel a greater and greater hunger for more.
Couldn’t Robert [Kautsky] send along a few of his latest paintings by
way of the next living being who visits me here? (From Miss J[acob], one
can find out who the finger of Herr von Kessel has designated.) The
paintings would be returned unscathed, it’s guaranteed, and I would have
had a great joy! Generally speaking, couldn’t Robert himself visit me
sometime? Perhaps he could even carry out his intention of painting my
portrait, if three or four sittings would be enough for him. By God,
what fun the very thought of it gives me. Since I’m already “sitting”
[in prison], I could just as well “sit” for HIM. In any case it would do
me a lot of good just to see this sprightly youngster with his gleaming
eyes. I am sure he would get permission as the son of a painter at the
Royal Theater, especially if Count Hülsen⁶⁵¹ were to write a few lines.…
Of course I’m only joking; Hans Naivus [Hans Kautsky] would certainly
rather die than reveal his friendship with [me,] the notorious
incendiary [_petroleuse_]. But Robert would probably get permission
without any patronage. Aside from all that, how are things with YOU?
Have you already applied for a visit? I would of course prefer that you
come in the spring, when this region would look more hospitable, and it
should be beautiful, as people who have seen it report. Given the
present railroad calamities and the bad weather, it would be much too
risky for you now, but I am definitely ordering up a visit from you for
the spring. You will be astounded by everything you will find here
around me. The great titmice are in loyal attendance in front of my
window, they already know my voice exactly, and it seems that they like
it when I sing. Recently I sang the Countess’s aria from _Figaro_, about
six of them were perched there on a bush in front of the window and
listened without moving all the way to the end; it was a very funny
sight to see. Then there are also two blackbirds that come at my call
every day, I’ve never seen such tame ones. They eat out of the metal
plate in front of the window. For this purpose I have ordered a cantata
also to be held on April 1 [April Fool’s Day], which should be quite an
event. Can’t you send me some sunflower seeds for these little people?
And for my own beak I would also like to order another “military cake,”
like the ones you’ve already sent a few times, they provide one with a
slight foretaste of paradise. And now that I’m talking about lofty and
super-lofty things, there’s one more problem that gives me no rest: it
seems that the world of the stars has gone all wrong, without my being
to blame. I don’t know for sure if you have noticed in the midst of your
intense concern about Scheidemann, but last year an epoch-making
discovery was revealed: the Englishman Walkey is said to have discovered
“the center of the universe,” and supposedly it’s the star Canopus in
the constellation Argo (in the southern hemisphere), which is “only”
five hundred light years away from us and is approximately 1.5 million
times larger than the sun. These dimensions don’t impress me at all, I
have become blasé. But I’m concerned about something else: a SINGLE
center around which “everything” moves transforms the universe into a
kind of round ball. Now I find it completely far-fetched to imagine the
universe as a ball—a kind of giant potato dumpling or _bombe glacé_. The
symmetry of such an image, when applied “to the whole,” seems to me a
completely fatuous petty-bourgeois conception. Since we are talking
about nothing more and nothing less than the INFINITY of the universe,
this is like thumbing one’s nose at the concept [of infinity]. Because a
“ball-shaped infinity” is certainly rubbish. And for my own spiritual
comfort I must think of the infinite as something other than human
stupidity! As you see, I literally have the “worries and concerns of the
philosopher Kant.” What does Hans Naivus think about this or his learned
son [_filius_]? Now write a proper letter right away _de omnibus
rebus_,⁶⁵² otherwise I will evict you from the main chamber of my heart,
where you now sit right next to Mimi, and put you in a side chamber. —

Good Lord! I forgot the main thing: I have not yet finished the
translation.⁶⁵³ Only seven signatures [_Bogen_] remain to be finished,
but first I must make a clean copy [of the drafts]. Can’t the publisher
make a judgment based on the twelve “signatures”?! But finally I must
close.

I embrace you, your R.

N.B.: You can write directly to this address: Wronke i. P. [in Poznań],
the Fortress, I will certainly get the letter.

If you receive a letter for me from Hänschen [Diefenbach], send it here
without worrying. He can write to me about everything.

TO MARTA ROSENBAUM

[Wronke, between February 4 and 9, 1917]

My dear Martchen!⁶⁵⁴

I was so happy about your visit yesterday. It was so lovely, so
comfortable and friendly, and I certainly hope that today and Sunday
will be the same. For me your visit gives great refreshment to my soul,
and I will now draw nourishment from it for many weeks to come. You
provide so much healing warmth with your nearness, you dear soul. After
a little while you’ll come again, won’t you? I’m already rejoicing over
the next time. That is, if I continue to sit [in confinement] here. But
in general you can feel at peace about me, really: I am now following
the doctor’s orders with the most painful exactness and have the firm
hope of leaving here healthy and strong, so that you will find it a joy
to see me at work and in battle. There will be very, very much work and
battling to do. But I absolutely do not become disheartened. Dearest,
history itself always knows best what to do about things, even when the
situation looks most desperate. I speak this word not as some sort of
comfortable fatalism! Quite the opposite! The human will must be spurred
on to the utmost, and it’s necessary to fight consciously with all one’s
might. What I mean is: The SUCCESS of such conscious effort toward
influencing the masses now, when everything SEEMS so totally hopeless,
depends on the deep, elemental, hidden wellsprings of history, and I
know from the lessons of history as well as from my personal experience
in Russia that it is precisely when everything has the outward
appearance of being terrible with absolutely no way out, just then a
complete turnaround is being prepared, is in the making, and it proves
to be all the more powerful because of [the delay]. In general, don’t
ever forget: We are linked with the laws of historical development, and
these NEVER fail, even if sometimes they don’t go exactly according to
some “plan F” that we have worked out. And so, in all eventualities:
Hold your head high and don’t let your courage fail.

I embrace you heartily with warmth and love, Your R.

[P.S.] Please also write to Hänschen [Diefenbach], [to say that] in the
event that, as I suggest, he simply wants to show up here, then SUNDAY
afternoon is best. Perhaps next Sunday? Of course he should not mention
that he KNEW Sunday would be best, he should just come “on the off
chance,” because permission from the commandant takes too long. I
guarantee that it will work.

TO MATHILDE JACOB

[Wronke, February 7, 1917]

My dear Mathilde!

My conscience is gnawing at me so: Marta [Rosenbaum] was here today, and
I was in a completely lousy mood. But I will pull myself together for
the next time. That you propose to pawn my birthday off onto Luise
[Kautsky] is absolutely out of the question. I insist on what’s coming
to me. For weeks I’ve been happily looking forward to this visit of
yours, and until now I’ve always had it [your visit] on my birthday, and
now you want to play at magnanimity at my expense! I’m writing to Luise
right now that I’m inviting her to come in May, and please be sure to
inform me who [else] is coming to see me and when.

Today I received the verdict for insulting a criminal official: ten days
of prison and court costs. Please take the necessary steps at the office
of Dr. Weinberg. The verdict was sent from the following address:
Schöffengericht Berlin-Mitte, Abteilung 136 [Special Court, Central
Berlin, Section 136]. It is dated January 25, and has the number 136 D
565/II 16. In the explanation of the grounds for the verdict there’s
nothing more than a restatement of the actions that I admitted to.⁶⁵⁵

Are you really upset about the finger I hurt? There’s nothing to it:
it’s just that I shut the bureau drawer vigorously, forgetting that my
little finger was still there, and it ended up being squashed, which I
quite rightly deserved.

Oh, Mathilde, when will I sit with you and Mimi again in Südende and
read Goethe aloud to both of you? Actually, right now, today, I want to
recite a poem to you out of my head, it came back to me last night—God
knows why. It’s by Conrad Ferdinand Meyer, the dear Swiss author who
also wrote _Jürg Jenatsch_. Sit down now, take Mimi in your lap, and put
that dear reverent, sheepish look on your face, as you are accustomed to
do when I read something out loud to you. Now then. _Silentium!_
[Silence!]

HUTTEN’S CONFESSION⁶⁵⁶

Here now I step across a grave, my own.
Now, Hutten, won’t you your confession make?
Good Christian custom. I will beat my breast.
What person has no consciousness of guilt?
How I regret my late-come sense of duty,
Regret my heart did not burn hot enough,
Regret I did not enter into battle

With sharper blows and with far greater zeal,
Regret that only one time I was banished,
Regret that often I knew human fears,
Regret the day I struck no wounding blow,
Regret the hour when I no armor wore,
And, overcome now with remorse, regret
That I was not three times more keen and bold.

You can have the closing part of this poem placed over my grave … Did
you take that seriously Mathilde? Hey, laugh at it. On my grave, as in
my life, there will be no pompous phrases. Only two syllables will be
allowed to appear on my gravestone: “Tsvee-tsvee.” That is the call made
by the large blue titmouse, which I can imitate so well that they all
immediately come running. And just think, in this call, which is usually
quite clear and thin, sparkling like a steel needle, in the last few
days there has been quite a low, little trill, a tiny chesty sound. And
do you know what that means, Miss Jacob? That is the first soft stirring
of the coming spring. —In spite of the snow and frost and the
loneliness, we believe—the titmice and I—in the coming of spring! And if
out of impatience I don’t live through it, then don’t forget that on my
gravestone NOTHING is to appear except that “Tsvee-tsvee”.

I embrace you and Mimi with terrible longing, Your R. L.

TO MATHILDE WURM

Wronke i. P., Fortress
February 16, 1917
(send your letters directly here SEALED and without the notation
“prisoner-of-war letter.”)

My dear Tilde!

Letter, postcard, and cookies received—many thanks. Be at peace; despite
the fact that you so boldly parried my thrust and are even challenging
me to a duel,⁶⁵⁷ I remain as kindly disposed toward you as ever. I had
to laugh that you want to “engage in combat” with me. Girl, I sit firmly
in the saddle, no one yet has stretched me out on the sand; I would be
interested to see the one who can do it. It was for a different reason,
though, that I had to smile: because you really don’t want to “engage in
combat” with me at all, and you even depend on me politically more than
you want to believe is true. I will always remain a compass for you,
because your very nature tells you that I have the most unerring
judgment—in my case all the distracting side issues fall away: anxiety
or nervousness, routinism, parliamentary cretinism, things that color
the judgment of others. You argue against my slogan, “Here I stand—I can
do no other!” Your argument comes down to the following: that is all
well and good, but human beings are too cowardly and weak for such
heroism, ergo one must adapt one’s tactics to their weakness and to the
principle _che va piano, va sano_.⁶⁵⁸ What narrowness of historical
outlook, my little lamb! There is nothing more changeable than human
psychology. That’s especially because the psyche of the masses, like
Thalatta,⁶⁵⁹ the eternal sea, always bears within it every latent
possibility: deathly stillness and raging storm, the basest cowardice
and the wildest heroism. The masses are always what they MUST be
according to the circumstances of the times, and they are always on the
verge of becoming something totally different from what they seem to be.
It would be a fine sea captain who would steer a course based only on
the momentary appearance of the ocean’s surface and did not understand
how to draw conclusions from signs in the sky and in the ocean’s depths.
My dear little girl, “disappointment with the masses” is always the most
reprehensible quality to be found in a political leader. A leader with
the quality of greatness applies tactics, not according to the momentary
mood of the masses, but according to higher laws of development, and
sticks firmly to those tactics despite all disappointments and, for the
rest, calmly allows history to bring its work to fruition.

With that let us close the debate. I willingly remain your friend.

Whether I also remain a teacher for you, as you want, depends on YOU.

You reminisce about an evening six years ago when we were waiting by the
shore of the Schlachtensee [a lake in Berlin] for the comet to
appear.⁶⁶⁰ Oddly enough, I have absolutely no recollection of that. But
you have awakened another memory for me. At that time on an October
evening I was sitting with Hans Kautsky (the painter) by the Havel
River, across from the Peacock Island, and we were also waiting to see
the comet. The twilight had already deepened, but on the horizon a dim
reddish-purple strip was still aglow, and it was mirrored in the Havel,
transforming the surface of the water into a vast enormous rose petal.
Across the way a buoy sounded softly, and in one area the water was
sprinkled with many dark spots. These were wild ducks, who were taking a
rest from their flight along the Havel, and their muffled cry, in which
there is so much longing and a sense of vast, empty expanse—they were
conveying that cry across the water to us. The mood was wonderful, and
we were sitting there in silence as though entranced. I was looking
toward the Havel River. Hans happened to be looking at me [with his back
to the river]. Suddenly he behaved as though he were appalled and
grasped me by the hand: What was wrong with me? he cried out. Behind his
back a meteor had fallen and had flooded me with a green phosphorous
light so that I looked as pale green as a corpse, and because I started
and had a strikingly startled expression on my face, because of the same
spectacle [behind his back] that he could not see, Hans probably thought
I was having a fatal attack and was dying. (Later he created a beautiful
big painting of that evening on the Havel.)

To me it is disastrous that you now have no time or mood for anything
but “item number one,” namely the miserable state of the party, because
such one-sidedness also clouds one’s political judgment, and above all
one must at all times live as a complete human being. But look here,
girl, if the fact is that you seldom get around to picking up a book,
then at least read only THE GOOD ONES, not such kitsch as the “Spinoza
novel” which you sent me. What do you want with this theme of the
“special suffering of the Jews”? I am just as much concerned with the
poor victims on the rubber plantations of Putumayo, the Blacks in Africa
with whose corpses the Europeans play catch. You know the words that
were written about the great work of the General Staff, about Gen.
Trotha’s campaign in the Kalahari desert:⁶⁶¹ “And the death rattles of
the dying, the demented cries of those driven mad by thirst faded away
in the sublime stillness of eternity.” Oh that “sublime stillness of
eternity,” in which so many cries of anguish have faded away UNHEARD,
they resound within me so strongly that I have no special place in my
heart for the [Jewish] ghetto. I feel at home in the entire world,
wherever there are clouds and birds and human tears.

Yesterday evening there were amazingly beautiful pink clouds above the
walls of my fortress. I stood in front of my grated window and recited
to myself my favorite poem by Mörike:

Into a friendly city I came one day.
Along its streets the ruddy glow of sunset lay.
From an open window just then,
Across a most luxuriant spread of flowers,
Far off I heard the golden trembling of bells,
And a single human voice had the sound of a nightingale chorus,
So that all the flowers quivered,
So that all fragrances became more vivid,
So that a higher redness touched the rose.

Long was I held there, dazed with delight, astonished.

How I came out of the city gates,
To tell the truth, I do not know myself.

And here—how lightly lies the world around me.

The heavens heave with crowds decked out in purple,
The city’s in a golden haze, behind me.
How the stream roars amidst its alder bushes!
How the ground groans with the grinding millstones!

Like one who’s drunk too much, I’m at a loss.
O Muse, you’ve moved my heart to tears,
With your silken fetters of love!

And so, may life treat you well, my fine young girl. Heaven knows when
I’ll have a chance to write you again. Nowadays I have no inclination
for writing. But I owed you this one.

I send you a kiss and a hearty squeeze of the hand, your R.

TO HANS DIEFENBACH

Wronke in Posen, March 5, 1917
(to celebrate the day)⁶⁶²

My dear Hänschen!

Your conjecturing about my impulsive nature, youthfulness, and
flattering things like that is based on an error. Because, first of all,
I DID write to you—a beautiful letter, eight pages long—I merely didn’t
send it (as proof I’m enclosing the drawing that adorned that letter,
perhaps you’ll like it). Second, I was living with the persistent
illusion, suggested by my own longing, that any day you were bound to
make an appearance here in the flesh. But it seems that Herr von
Kessel⁶⁶³ found out that he could strike at me in the most hurtful ways,
and now he wants to put me to the test to see whether I can “withstand”
this. Don’t make the “withstanding” any harder by being angry at me, but
keep on writing to me untiringly—be kind, loving, and patient with me,
even if I’m not worth it—as you always have done.

Actually, right now I’m going through a rather hard time. Things are
repeating themselves exactly as last year at Barnim Street. For seven
months I hold up sturdily, [but] in the eighth, [and] ninth [month],
suddenly the nerves give way; every day that I have to live here becomes
a small mountain that I climb laboriously, and every little trifle
causes me painful irritation. In five days a full eight months of the
second year of my solitude will be over. Surely then, as happened last
year, a revitalization will come of its own accord, especially since
spring will soon be on its way. By the way, everything would be much
easier to live through if only I would not forget the basic rule I’ve
made for my life: To be kind and good is the main thing! Plainly and
simply, to be good—that resolves and unites everything and is better
than all cleverness and insistence on “being right.” But who is here to
remind me of that, since Mimi [the cat] is not here? At home so many
times she knew how to lead me onto the right road with her long, silent
look, so that I always had to smother her with kisses (in defiance of
you!) and say to her: You’re right, being kind and good is the main
thing. So if you sometimes notice from my talk or my silence that I am
contrary or grim, just refer me to that truthful saying of Mimi’s,
and—and you yourself should go ahead of me, setting the example: YOU BE
kind and good, even if I don’t deserve it …

Now, before anything else, many thanks—the list has grown quite long:
for the booklets, for the saccharin (which is coming back to you with a
bonus, because I received a large supply and you need it yourself), for
the picture, the thermometer, the sweets, the two most recent books, and
the portraits of Roman emperors, which teach by their graphic [negative]
example the reaffirmation of republican convictions, but above all,
thanks for your letters, which give me great consolation. It was a lot
of fun for me to read about your epic adventure in Wronke; only it’s too
bad I wasn’t in it with you and couldn’t snatch even one ray of light
from it. But my joy became [especially] boisterous at the letter in
which, with all your cunning arts, you try to seduce me into someday
reading Hebbel and in which you relish in advance the surprise [this
would be] to my ignorance. How glad I am that you still remain the same
old indestructible Hänschen and cannot possibly suppose that I know
anything that did not come from your dear mentoring hands. O
Hanneselein, I’ve known Hebbel longer than I’ve known you. I was already
borrowing him from Mehring at the time when my friendship with him was
passing through its hottest epoch and the region between Steglitz [where
Mehring lived] and Friedenau (where I was still living) was like a
tropical landscape in which the primeval elephant [_Elephas
primigenius_] was grazing and the slender giraffe was plucking green
fronds from the phoenix palm. At that time—when Hänschen did not yet
exist for Berlin, even in conception—I was reading _Agnes Bernauer, Mary
Magdalene, Judith_, and _Herod and Mariamne_ [plays by Hebbel]. I didn’t
get any further, though, because the tropical climate had to yield to
the first great glacial period, and my fat Gertrud [Zlottko] had to
travel to Steglitz with a laundry basket full of borrowed books and
presents received earlier, in return for a shipment of the same sort
which had made its appearance in Friedenau, the kind of thing that
occurred customarily with each and every one of our estrangements. So I
do know Hebbel, and I have a great, if cool, respect for him. I rank
him, however, FAR BELOW Grillparzer and Kleist. He has a lot of
intelligence and beauty of form, but there is too little life and blood
in his characters, they are to a great extent merely signboards, though
cleverly thought out and subtly refined, merely vehicles illustrating
particular problems. If you want to honor me with him [Hebbel] as a
present, might I perhaps trade him for Grillparzer? Quite seriously I
have a great love for the latter. I wonder if you know him and value him
highly enough? If you want to read something magnificent, pick up the
short fragment by him, Judith.⁶⁶⁴ The purest Shakespeare in conciseness,
aptness, and popular humor, along with a tender, poetic touch that
Shakespeare doesn’t have. Isn’t it laughable that in person Grillparzer
was a dry-as-dust government official and quite a boring fellow. (See
his autobiography, which is in almost as poor taste as Bebel’s.)

But how do things stand with YOUR reading? Are you provided for
sufficiently? I, for my part, have in the recent past made a series of
new acquaintances that I would very much like to lay at your feet. Thus,
first of all—in case you’re not yet familiar with it—there’s _Emanuel
Quint_ by Gerhart Hauptmann (a novel). Do you know the paintings of
Christ by Hans Thoma? You’ll have a similar experience of the image of
Christ in this book [by Hauptmann]: the way he [Christ] walks, slender
and tall, veiled in a dark-reddish glow, through fields of ripe grain,
and to the left and right of his dark figure soft waves of purple flow
over the silver tassels of grain. There [in that book] one issue caught
my attention, among countless others, an issue that I’ve never seen
portrayed elsewhere and one that I have felt deeply in my own life: the
tragedy of a person who preaches to the crowd and who is aware that
every word, the moment it leaves the mouth, is coarsened and becomes
congealed in the minds of its listeners in distorted form as a
caricature; and on the basis of this caricature, the preacher is now
nailed fast and in the end is surrounded by disciples, who rage around,
shouting crudely: “Show us the miracle! That’s what you taught us. Where
is your miracle?” It’s absolutely ingenious the way Hauptmann portrays
this. Hänschen, one should never form a finished and final judgment
about people, they can always surprise you, in the bad sense, but also,
praise God, in the good sense. I considered Hauptmann a perfect stuck-up
nitwit [Fatzke], and now the fellow swings around with a book so full of
depth and greatness that I would like best to immediately write him a
feverishly burning letter. I know that YOU would encourage me to do
that, just as you wanted me to write to Ricarda Huch. But I am too shy
and retiring for such ostentatious confessions. It’s enough for me if I
confess to YOU.

I have a thousand more things I would like to say to you. When are you
finally going to come here? Aff’ly.⁶⁶⁵ Your R.

[P.S.] Please pass on my greatest thanks to the March[lewskis] for
_Ingeborg_ by Kellermann and many best wishes. I hope to visit their
domain someday and get to know the charming Jagoda.

TO HANS DIEFENBACH

Wronke i. P., March 27, 1917

L. H. [Liebes Hänschen—Dear Hans]

What’s going on with you? You wrote me on the 13th that you would send a
long, detailed letter “tomorrow,” and then you’ve been silent for two
weeks. I’ve already had the blackest forebodings concerning your
[possible] illness, sudden departure, etc., etc. And then after the
bitter disappointment of the refusal [refusal by the military
authorities to allow Diefenbach to visit Luxemburg], letters are now for
me the only consolation. So improve yourself and do better. And don’t
write at such length in a single letter, or at least send postcards more
frequently in between letters. What does it mean, by the way, that you
are now “working hard”? After all you are a patient!! Or what kind of
“work” did you mean?

You can well imagine what a turmoil [the news from] Russia⁶⁶⁶ has
stirred within me. So many old friends who have been languishing in
prison for years in Moscow, in St. Petersburg, Orel, or Riga are now
walking around free. How much that lightens the burden for me of sitting
here! A comical _change de place_ [changing of places], is it not? But I
am content with it and do not begrudge them their freedom even if MY
chances have become so much the worse as a direct result …

As for my visit to Dr. L[ehmann], the cure [that he suggests] can
fundamentally be reduced to the advice that the good old parson at
Ufenau gave to Hutten when he was deathly ill:

“… Now you will find peace here,
Don’t listen to what’s outside you,
Don’t listen to anything beyond me,
By this quiet bay the storm of time subsides,
Hutten, forget that Hutten’s who you are!”

And in reply to that Hutten says:

“Your counsel is, dear friend, miraculous;
I SHOULD NOT live when live is what I must!”

Well, I have never been accustomed to grieving for long over the
unattainable, and with all my soul I am attached to the present moment
and the beauty that it offers. My worst time, by the way, has already
passed and I am breathing more freely—the ominous eighth month came to
an end yesterday.⁶⁶⁷ We had a cheerful sunny day here, even if it was
rather cool; and the jumble of bushes, still bare and leafless, in my
little garden shimmered in the sunshine with all the colors of the
rainbow. On top of that the larks were trilling up high in the sky, and
there was a hint of spring despite the snow and cold. Then it occurred
to me that last year at this time I was still free, and during the
Easter season I sat with Karl [Liebknecht] and his wife in the Garrison
Church [listening to] the St. Matthew’s Passion.

Yet who needs Bach and the St. Matthew’s Passion? When I was simply
roaming around the streets of Südende on a lukewarm spring day—I believe
that everyone there already knew me from the way I dreamily wandered
around—both hands in the pockets of my jacket, with no destination, just
to gawk and gaze around and breathe life in—from the houses came the
sounds of the beating of mattresses [for spring cleaning] at Easter
time, a hen clucked loudly somewhere, little school kids were scrapping
with each other on the way home in the middle of the roadway with bright
cries and laughter, an urban transit train as it chugs past gives off a
short whistle of greetings, a heavy beer wagon rattles down the street,
and the hooves of its horses clomp rhythmically and vigorously over the
railroad bridge—all those things in the bright sunshine produce such a
symphony, such an “Ode to Joy,” as no Bach or Beethoven could reproduce,
and my heart rejoices about everything, even the plainest, dullest
detail.

I stand next to other gawkers at the little Südende railroad station, in
front of which small groups of some sort are always lounging around. Do
you know what else? On the left there’s a flower shop and on the right a
cigar shop. How splendid is the jumble of colors in the window of the
flower shop! The pretty woman shopkeeper smiles at me from inside,
looking over at me above the flowers that she’s selling to some lady,
she knows me well, because I never go past without buying, even with my
last ten pennies, a little bouquet. In the window of the cigar store
hang colorful lottery tickets. Aren’t they delightful? And I smile, made
happy by the sight of tickets for betting on horses. Inside the store,
the door of which is kept wide open, someone is talking loudly on the
telephone (for only five pennies): “Yes. What? Yes. So then I’ll come at
five o’clock. Yes. All right then. So long. Until five o’clock. See you
then! Adieu!”… How congenial is this fat-sounding voice and this stupid
conversation! How gratifying it seems to me that this gentleman will
arrive somewhere right at five o’clock. I nearly want to call out to
him: “Give them greetings from me.”—I don’t even know to whom. To
whomever you want … Two old women are standing there with market bags on
their arms and gossiping with the usual mysteriously grim expressions on
their faces. I find them lovable … On the corner the emaciated, one-eyed
newspaper guy is toddling along, he rubs his hands and shouts like an
automaton with his eternal “_Vossische Zeitung_, with pickchahs.” … When
the weather is gray—I had to go past here every day on my way to the
party school—this man with his bizarre accent brought me to despair, and
I lost all hope, every time, that something sensible could become of my
life. Now, because he was bathed in April sun from top to toe, I find
his “pickchahs” touching, I smile at him as at an old friend, and by
buying the _Vossische_ I try to make up for all the sour looks I had
shot at him during the winter … On the other corner is a small
Schultheiss restaurant with its yellow jalousies always lowered; the
veiled and dirty window panes and the tables outside in the front garden
with gravel underfoot, with the eternal red and blue checked
tablecloths, which otherwise used to seem so melancholy to me that I had
to rush by in order not to break out in tears, these things today seem
to me actually pretty. Look how the shadows from the boughs of the
nearby oak trees flash and waver slightly back and forth on the tables.
—Can there be anything more lovely? And here at the baker’s the door is
constantly opening and closing with a loud creaking sound. Neatly
dressed servant girls and little children go in and come back out loaded
with white packages. Doesn’t this busy creaking of the door, which
somehow blends with the appetizing flavor of the baked goods from the
store and the chirping of the sparrows in the roadway, doesn’t all of it
together create a good mood and speak of something that is
self-evidently right and proper? Doesn’t it seem to say: “I am life, and
life is beautiful.” … Now there comes diving out of the bakery, in front
of which I am standing and gawking, an age-old, bent-over woman, the
grandmother of the shoemaker who lives on my street. “Miss, you ought to
come visit us some time to have coffee,” she says to me with her
toothless mouth. (Everyone in Südende calls me “Miss,” I don’t know
why.) I can barely understand her, but I cheerfully promise to come for
coffee some time. Quite definitely. And she nods at me smiling, and her
entire wrinkled old face glows. “Well, quite definitely then!” she cries
back at me. Lord God, how good and kind all people really are; a woman
whom I don’t know at all greets me and looks around, smiling at me.
Probably I look like something peculiar with my face aglow with
happiness and my hands in my pockets. But so what? What does that matter
to me! Is there really any higher happiness than to stand around this
way with no destination, out on the street in the spring sunshine, hands
in the pockets and a little bunch of posies for ten pennies in one’s
buttonhole?

Hänschen, I believe that Poznań lies to the east of Wronke. That means
the April sun will come to you first. So then, send it to me as quick as
you can, so that it can show me the wonder of life again, which lies
everywhere out on the streets, and that will make me once again good and
kind, lucid, and at peace … R

TO HANS DIEFENBACH

Wronke i. P., March 30, 1917

L. H. [Liebes Hänschen—Dear Hans]

In the midst of my lovely, laboriously achieved state of equilibrium,
last night before going to sleep I was again seized by a despair blacker
than the night. And today is also another gray day, without sun—a cold
east wind … I feel like a frozen bumblebee; have you ever found a
bumblebee like that in the garden after the first frosty autumn morning,
lying on its back quite cold and still as though dead, lying in the
grass with its little legs drawn in and its little fur coat covered with
hoarfrost? Only when the sun warms it thoroughly do the little legs
slowly start to move and extend themselves, then the little body starts
to turn over [getting off its back], and finally the bumblebee clumsily
rises into the air with a grumbling, droning sound. I always made it my
business to kneel down next to such a frozen bumblebee and waken it back
to life by blowing on it with my warm breath. If only the sun would wake
poor me from this deathly coldness! Meanwhile I fight against the devils
in my insides like Luther—by means of the inkwell. And therefore you
must serve as a kind of sacrificial lamb and put up with a barrage of
letters. Until you have loaded your big guns I will be peppering you
with my small-caliber fire so much that it will keep you frightened and
on edge. By the way, if you loaded your cannon with the same speed at
the front [as in writing to me], then our current retreat on the Somme
and at Ancre really doesn’t surprise me, and you will surely have it on
your conscience if we have to make peace without annexing beautiful
Flanders.

I thank you very much for the small book by Ricarda Huch about
[Gottfried] Keller. Last week, when I was in quite a wretched mood, I
read it with pleasure. Ricarda is really an extremely clever and
intelligent person, only her so evenly balanced, restrained, and
self-controlled style seems to me somewhat forced. Her classicism
strikes me as somewhat PSEUDO-classical and overly deliberate. Whoever
is truly rich and free within themselves can indeed give of themselves
naturally at any time and let their passion sweep them along without
being untrue to themselves. I’ve also been reading Gottfried Keller
again: the _Zurich Novellas_ and _Martin Salander_. Please don’t hit the
ceiling over this, but Keller definitely cannot write a novel or a
novella. What he produces is always a STORY, he tells a tale about
long-gone, dead things and people, but I never experience something
happening in the present. I constantly see only the teller of tales, who
digs up all sorts of lovely old memories, as old people like to do. Only
the first part of _Der grüne Heinrich_ really LIVES. In spite of that,
Keller always does me good, because he’s such a fine fellow, who one
finds quite loveable and with whom one is happy to sit and chat about
the most insignificant things and listen to his recollections in
minutest detail.

I’ve never known such a springtime or experienced one to such a full
extent as the one last year at this time. Maybe that’s because it came
after a year in a prison cell⁶⁶⁸ or because at that time I had an exact
knowledge of every bush and every blade of grass and therefore I could
follow the unfolding in every particular detail. Do you remember, only a
few years ago in Südende, in the case of a yellow-blossoming bush, we
tried so hard to guess what it was likely to be. You made “the proposal”
that we recognize it to be “laburnum.” Of course it was no such thing!
How glad I am that three years ago I suddenly plunged into the study of
botany the way I do everything, immediately, with all my fire and
passion, with my entire being, so that the world, the party, and my work
faded away for me and only one passion filled me up both day and night:
to be outdoors roaming about in the springtime fields, to gather plants
until my arms were full, and then at home to put them in order, identify
them, and put them between the pages of a scrapbook to dry. How I lived
through the whole springtime then as though in a fever, how much I
suffered when I sat in front of a new little plant and for a long time
couldn’t identify it and didn’t know how to classify it; many times I
almost fainted, fretting over such cases, so that Gertrud [Zlottko]
became so worried that she threatened to take the plants away from me.
As a result I am now at home in the realm of greenery. I have conquered
it—by storm—and what you take on with fire and passion becomes firmly
rooted inside you.

Last spring I had another partner in these wanderings: Karl
[Liebknecht]. Perhaps you know how he lived for many years: always busy
with parliament, [sitting in] sessions, commissions, discussions, in a
rush and under pressure, always leaping from the streetcar onto the
electric train and from the electric train into a car, all his pockets
crammed full with notepads, his arms full of freshly bought newspapers,
which he could not possibly have had time to read, his body and soul
covered with dust from the street, and yet all the while with a kind and
loving young smile on his face. Last spring I forced him to take a brief
pause, to remember that aside from the Reichstag and the State Assembly
[of Prussia] a world also existed, and he went strolling with Sonja
[Liebknecht] and me several times through the fields and in the
botanical garden. How happy he could become, like a child, at the sight
of a birch tree with its young catkins! Once we took a hike across the
fields toward Marienfelde. You also know that way—do you know what I’m
talking about?—We took that route together once in the fall, and we had
to make our way over the stubble in the fields. Last April with Karl,
however, it was in the morning, and the fields were covered with fresh
green sprouts from the winter sowing. A mild wind was chasing gray
clouds across the sky by fits and starts here and there, and the fields
gleamed at one moment in bright sunshine and at the next moment would
darken in shadow into an emerald green—a magnificent play of color as we
tramped along in silence. Suddenly Karl stopped and stood still and
began jumping in a bizarre way, but with a serious expression on his
face the whole time. I looked at him with astonishment and was even a
bit frightened. “What’s going on with you?” “I feel so blissful,” he
answered simply, at which of course we all burst out laughing like
fools. Aff’ly. R.

[P.S.] You wrongly wanted to classify me as “the fairest gem” in the
pearl necklace of Hindenburg’s “apes from Asia and Africa.” According to
the official explanation, I am NOT a “prisoner of war.” The proof: I
have to pay for the stamps for my letters.

TO HANS DIEFENBACH

Wronke i. P., April 5, 1917

L. H. [Liebes Hänschen—Dear Hans]

Good day! This little arrow of mine ought to nail you right at the
threshold of your room, in order to bring you the most heartfelt Easter
greetings from Wronke and many thanks for the three letters and six
deluxe volumes of Grillparzer. First to reassure you, I’ve received
EVERYTHING from you right on time except for that one mysterious letter
of the 20th, which has gone astray somewhere, and after all, that
sometimes happens “even in the best of families.” You can, therefore,
continue to write fresh letters to me without worrying. To keep track,
from now on we will NUMBER the letters (NOT the postcards), but you must
make notes on all this for yourself, so that there will be no confusion.

Your long letter of March 24–29 was deeply troubling to me because of
its strained and dejected tone, but probably the reason for that was
that you worked on it [the letter], like our beloved Lord God in
creating the world, for six whole days, and naturally in both cases with
such a method nothing perfect could result. Seriously, Hänschen, your
depression, which speaks out so clearly in that letter as well as in the
short one that followed, has been a great cause of concern for me.
What’s going on at home? Is your old man not doing well? Is something
not right with your aunt, or with your sister? Give me a little hint.

How glad I am that in two weeks you’ll be coming back to Poznań! What
crass egotism I’m displaying, isn’t that right? But it really is
comical: even though I see you certainly as little when you’re here as
when you were in France, the feeling of your geographical closeness
actually gives me quite a different desire to correspond with you
compared to the two years when you were floating back and forth at
unknown distances between Glogau and Gorsous.

I have finished Hebbel’s [play entitled] _The Nibelungen_, which I
bought for myself in Poznań, and I am—please don’t take it the wrong
way—really and truly disappointed. I consider the _Nibelungen_ his
weakest work; there is no comparison, in terms of finished quality and
firm musculature, with his _Judith_, his _Herod_, or his _Gyges_. He was
obviously unable to master the great quantity of material, he gets
tangled up, wanders off onto side issues, and produces no effect, at
least not on me. But above all: he is eternally treating one and the
same question: the power struggle between men and women. This is a
purely academic issue that is spun out artificially and hardly exists in
reality. Because either a woman is a true personality—by this I don’t
mean a so-called “intimidating woman” but a heart full of inner goodness
and firmness, which one can find in a peasant hut as well as in a
bourgeois family—because she establishes herself completely and remains
a moral victor even when she gives in on small matters. Or else she is
inwardly a nonentity—and then once again there is no problem …

Hänschen, a wasp! Really the first young slender wasp, which obviously
just woke up this morning, and it’s buzzing away right now in my room!
It flew in through the open window and immediately hurled itself against
the closed upper pane. One inch below it the window is wide open, but it
continues to bore away at the upper window and constantly keeps sliding
up and down, back and forth, with an angry buzzing as if someone else
were to blame for it being so dumb. Oh, how lovely it is, and what a
reminder of home is its persistent, low-decibel buzzing! It’s such a
reminder of summer, of the heat, and of my open balcony in Südende with
the broad view out onto the fields and groves of trees shimmering in the
heat, and of Mimi [the cat] lazily lying in the sun all folded together
like a soft package, blinking up at the buzzing wasp. And now I have
work to do, as I do every summer: I have to climb up on a chair and,
however far up it is, reach to the upper windowpane, take hold of the
wasp ever so carefully, and deliver it once again to freedom, because
otherwise it would torment itself against the glass until it was half
dead. They don’t do anything to me; out in the open they even land on my
lips, and that’s very ticklish; but I’m worried about doing harm TO THE
WASP when I take hold of it. In the end it all worked out, and suddenly
it’s completely quiet here in the room. Yet in my ear and heart a sunny
echo still keeps buzzing. Hänschen, be cheerful and happy, after all
life is so beautiful! The wasp has said so again, and it knows what it’s
talking about. Best wishes to your old man and to your aunt. R.

TO CLARA ZETKIN

Wronke in Posen, April 13, 1917

My dearest Klara!

A thousand thanks for the marvelous batch of flowers you sent for
Easter. I’ve been able to rig up an entire special little table just for
flowers here, and I feel I’m in royal splendor. The basket came exactly
on Saturday morning just before the holiday. But I didn’t receive a note
from you; I mention that only for “double-checking,” because you also
have complained to Miss J. [Mathilde Jacob] about new painful feelings
[of neglect], whereas I had written to you twice during March—though
they were postcards only, because I assumed they would be more likely to
reach you than a sealed letter. Miss J. says that you’re also constantly
concerned about me. FOR NO REASON AT ALL, dearest. I am doing very well
now. It’s true that during the last two months I had to deal with
nervous tension to some extent, just as I did at Barnim Street last
year, but now I’m completely in good health and hope in the near future
to do some hard work. The news from Russia and the coming of spring also
tend to make a person feel fresh and lively. The Russian events have
immense, incalculable implications, and I regard what has happened there
so far as only a small overture. Things there are bound to develop into
something colossal. It’s in the nature of the situation. And an echo
throughout the world is inevitable.

Spring is coming, though very hesitantly. In my little garden here no
green is yet to be seen. But after the appearance of buds I’ve already
identified all the bushes and expect quite a magnificent blossoming.
Among them are: two young sycamores, one large silver poplar, one
“acacia” (or that’s what people call it, in reality it’s: _Robinia_),
two small chestnut trees, two ornamental cherry trees (like the ones you
have at the entrance to your garden, with the blood-red foliage),
several ornamental currant bushes (the yellow-blossoming _Ribes_),
several snowberries [_Schneebeeren_], a red _Cornus_, which has white
blossoms and blue berries, some privet bushes, two hazel bushes, and in
addition a lot of lilacs! These bushes will bloom one after another
beautifully, and I’m waiting for that without impatience, because the
buds alone give me great joy. As for birds, in addition to my titmice
and blackbirds, the following come here: chaffinch, siskin, bluetit, and
wagtail. The chaffinch comes at 7 every morning and calls at the window
for food; the little rascal is quite tame. Don’t send any more birdseed,
dearest. These rascals don’t want to hear anything about ordinary grain
even during the winter. Only Knorr’s rolled oats, sausage, and bits of
cake—that’s the only thing they ever want to have, anything else they
simply leave lying there, and naturally I have to put out what they
order. —

Many tiny mice have come to us in the prison from out in the fields,
because it has been so rainy and wet out there. One of them chewed a big
hole in a silk dress in my closet, [and] I’m afraid that the coloring of
the silk was poisonous, because day before yesterday, unfortunately, I
found one of them dead; to make up for it I’ve strewn bits of cake
around for them, but the silk definitely seems to be bad for them; I
can’t do anything about it, but I feel so awful when I find one of these
charming little creatures lying there as a corpse. —

You wrote to Miss J[acob] again that my favorite cats at your house
died, does that mean that Mohrle [the little Moor] is no more?! That
would be awful. Why is it that the little cats are passing away like
that? After all, they were so well taken care of. Does that mean you
don’t have any now? Mimi is quite well as ever. I have a great desire to
have her brought here, but I fear the train trip would be too disturbing
for her. You know how I’ve tried to avoid causing her any disturbance,
ever since the time of that incident out in the fields. —Miss J[acob]
recently obtained a reclining chair and a wicker chair for me, and I can
be outside all day long now, only there’s still not enough sun, and it’s
too windy; nevertheless, I spend three or four hours out in the open
every day.

Write to me exactly how you are doing. I must let you know that once
again I’m asking for the _Gleichheit_. I subscribed to it at first, and
then, since two copies were coming, I didn’t renew the subscription, and
now I don’t get any. (To make up for it I get two copies of _Vorwärts_,
when only one is bad enough for me!…) Hannes [Dieffenbach] is now at
home [in Stuttgart], and I expect that he will see you and then report
to me—if only by letter. For Costia [i.e., Kostya Zetkin] I recently
sent you a small book, because I thought he could surely pick it up from
you. Probably Karl’s wife [Sophie Liebknecht], who is now in Stuttgart,
will also visit you. She was down with a bad case of the nerves, but she
does everything so unreasonably; she ought to go to a sanatorium now in
order to recover completely, but instead of that she’s sitting in a
hotel in Stuttgart for weeks on end, which cannot possibly be good for
her. Try to persuade her to go on a trip if she’s still there! —

De Coster’s _Honeymoon Journey_ is of course much weaker than his _Tyll
Ulenspiegel_, but I am very grateful to you that I have come to know
this book. Did you perhaps read the Broodcoorens book⁶⁶⁹ again quickly,
the one I sent to Costia? It is a splendid piece of work. —Please
confirm the receipt of this letter right away and report to me exactly
how you and the Poet are doing and what Costia is up to. Also an exact
report on the animals and the garden.

I embrace you many times and send greetings to the Poet with all my
heart. Your R.

TO LUISE KAUTSKY

Wronke i. P., April 15, 1917

Beloved Lulu!

Your short letter before Easter because of its extremely depressed tone
troubled me deeply, and I’ve immediately taken it upon myself to drill
some sense into your head once again. Tell me, how can you possibly keep
singing your little song of woe, like some unhappy cicada, when such a
bright chorus of larks’ song is ringing out from Russia? Don’t you
realize it’s our own cause that is winning out triumphantly there, that
World History in person is fighting her battles there and dancing the
carmagnole, drunk with joy? When our common cause is going forward so
well, must not all our private miseries be forgotten?

I know it saddens you that I am not free right now to gather up the
sparks that are flying about over there, to help and to provide
direction there and elsewhere. Certainly that would be a fine thing, and
you can imagine how every part of me is itching to do that, and every
bit of news from there hits me like an electric shock that I feel all
the way to my fingertips. But my not-being-able-to-take-part doesn’t get
me down, not one bit, nor does it occur to me to diminish my own joy
over these events by moaning and groaning about something I cannot
change.

You see, I’ve just learned from the history of the past few years, and
looking farther back, from history as a whole, that one should not
overestimate the impact or effect that one individual can have.
Fundamentally the powerful, unseen, plutonic forces in the depths are at
work, and they are decisive, and in the end everything straightens
itself out, so to speak, “of its own accord.” Don’t get me wrong: I’m
not pronouncing my word in favor of a cheap, fatalistic optimism, which
only seeks to veil its impotence, the kind of outlook that, precisely in
the case of your esteemed spouse [Karl Kautsky], is so hateful to me.
No, no, I am ready at my post at all times and at the first opportunity
will begin striking the keys of World History’s piano with all ten
fingers so that it will really boom. But since right now I happen to be
“on leave” from World History, not through any fault of my own but
because of external compulsion, I just laugh to myself and rejoice that
things are moving ahead without me, and I believe with rock-hard
certainty that all will go well. History always knows how to manage for
the best even when it seems to have run into a blind alley of the most
hopeless kind.

Dearest, when one has the bad habit of looking for a drop of poison in
any blossom, one finds good reason, as long as one lives, to be moaning
and groaning. If you take the opposite approach, and look for the honey
in every blossom, then you’ll always find reason to be cheerful.
Besides, believe me, the time that I—and others as well—spend behind
bars, under lock and key, will not be in vain. In the great overall
settling of accounts this too will somehow prove to be of value. I am of
the opinion that one should, without trying to be too crafty or racking
one’s brains too much, simply live the way one feels is right and not
always expect to be repaid immediately with cash in hand. Everything
will come out right in the end. And if not—to me it’s all the same. I
say “oh well” [“_ooch schnuppe_”]; either way, I am enjoying life so
much, every morning I thoroughly inspect the condition of the buds on
all my bushes, and every day I visit a little red ladybug with two black
spots on its back, which in spite of the wind and the cold, I have been
keeping alive for a week on a little bough warmly surrounded by cotton
wool, and I observe the clouds, how they are constantly being renewed
and becoming ever more beautiful, and—on the whole I feel that I am no
more important than the ladybug and I am inexpressibly happy with this
sense of my insignificance.

Above all: the clouds! What an inexhaustible source of enchantment for a
pair of human eyes! Yesterday, Saturday, around 5 in the afternoon, I
stood leaning against the wire fence that separates my little garden
from the rest of the prison yard, I let the sun shine on my back and
looked east. There a large cloud formation was piling up against the
pale blue background of the sky, its color was of the most tender gray,
and above it there was a light glimmering of pink as if some force from
behind had breathed it out; it cast a spell as though it were an entire
distant world in which endless peace and quiet, gentleness, and
refinement reigned. All in all, it seemed like a gentle smile, like a
vague beautiful memory from early childhood, or when sometimes one
awakens in the morning with the cozy feeling of having dreamed something
very beautiful without being able to remember exactly what. The prison
yard was empty and, as always, I was alone, a stranger to everything
around me. From the open windows of the prison came the thumping and
knocking sounds of Saturday’s scrubbing and scouring, and now and then a
loud reprimanding voice could be heard; meanwhile the chaffinch, way up
high in the poplar tree, kept repeating its birdcall over and over, and
the trunk of the poplar tree, which is still quite bare and leafless,
gave off a silvery gleam in the slanted rays of the departing sun.
Everything breathed of such peace, and my gaze was fixed on the softly
smiling cloud formation far off there in the sky. —I stood there as
though enchanted, and I thought to myself, and to all of you: Do you not
see how beautiful the world is? Do you not have eyes as I do and a heart
like I do to rejoice in it all?

Today I began the book _Wallenstein_ by Ricarda Huch and am deeply
thankful to you for the book. It refreshes me tremendously with its
lively activity of thought, as well as the enjoyment felt in depicting
human fates, a joy that speaks so distinctly from every line of the
book. Of course it is not a work of exact science; her conception of
history has no serious basis at all, is thoroughly dilettantish, and for
the most part is actually distorted. But for me it’s not the person or
the book that forms my opinion but the fundamental material out of which
the book and the person are made. Opinions that are quite wrong don’t
bother me at all as long as I find an inner integrity, a lively
intelligence, and the joy of an artist in painting a picture of the
world and of life. How lovely it is that one constantly finds, just
around the corner, new people in whom one can delight!…

I very much want of course to place at the disposal of Julek
[Marchlewski] the volumes you translated from the papers of Marx and
Engels,⁶⁷⁰ but I’m waiting to do that until the next visit, because it
is not so certain that people will get mail in their hands if I am the
sender. What do you think? Incidentally, I don’t even know his [Julek’s]
address. Perhaps I can hand them over soon to you in person! Let’s hope
so. Let me know right away when you get permission or information [about
a visit to Wronke].

As for my translation,⁶⁷¹ —I want to speed it up now; it was hard for me
to work the last few months, but now I want to do better. So have
patience with me.

That you are getting along so well now with Mathilde J[acob] is a great
relief for me. In this case once again you experience something that I
believe in firmly: one can only understand people correctly when one
feels love for them.

And now be cheerful for me, do you hear? Don’t grumble about the gray
weather, but instead study how beautiful and many-splendored this very
gray sky is. And don’t have such impatient haste about the coming of
spring, because, as usual, it all goes by so quickly! Now a person can
at least enjoy the anticipation. Write me again very soon, so that I can
see that you are in a better mood. Hannes [Diefenbach] reported to me
about the failed rendezvous—as usual—that the two of you were supposed
to have at Friedrich Street. [By the way,] I’m already rejoicing at the
thought of his return to Poznań province.

A heartfelt embrace to you and, inclusively, to the unworthy Igel [Hans
Kautsky] from your R.

[P.S.] Greetings from me to Bendel [Kautsky, the youngest son], also to
Hilferding. Henriette [Roland-Holst] could write to me here sometime,
but of course not about politics.

TO HANS DIEFENBACH

Wronke i P., April 16, 1917

Hänschen, yesterday your [letter] No. 1 greatly brightened up my Sunday.
Today it’s raining in torrents here, and yet early in the morning I
roamed around my little garden for two hours—as always without an
umbrella and wearing only my old hat and wrapped in the cape Grandmother
[Minna] Kautsky gave me. It was so lovely to think and daydream as I
walked, while the rain soaked through my hat and hair to run down my
face and down my neck. Even the birds were cheerful. A large titmouse,
whom I have especially befriended, often goes with me on my walks, and
this is how she does it: I go up and down the two sides of the garden
along the walls, but the titmouse keeps pace with me, staying at my side
by hopping from bush to bush, and on occasion flying ahead, then coming
back. Isn’t that sweet? Neither of us shies away from any kind of
weather, and we have already taken daily walks together amid snow
flurries. Today the birdie looked so windblown, wet, and bedraggled, and
no doubt I did too, but we were both feeling fine the whole time.

Now, however, it’s so stormy this afternoon that we’re not going out any
more. The titmouse is sitting on the grating of my window, tilting her
head left and right to try and see me through the windowpane, but I’m
just sitting here at my desk, working and enjoying the ticking of the
clock, which makes the room feel so snug and cozy.

As for the food question, weather like this—as far as I understand—is
quite deadly. It’s impossible now to till the fields to prepare for the
summer sowing. It’s too late for that. But the winter crops have surely
suffered from the late frost. Last year around this time in Südende the
winter wheat was already twenty to twenty-five centimeters high, and in
March the summer fields had already been tilled. On top of that, the
floods are still to come. The poor people “from the lower depths” will
have to pay for that, as always … Now your old man has good reason to
rant and rave, [for] the very skies seem to be in the pay of England.

Your Berlin-Stuttgart odyssey is shocking. There is one good thing,
however, that will not be available to you, [and that is] that this time
you can’t consider dumping the blame for all the spiteful actions of an
inanimate object on my poor sinner’s head, as during our famous
Christmas trips to Stuttgart. The idea of traveling to Nuremburg for a
few days of peace and quiet and to other peaceful nests in the
Palatinate, is very enticing. I have only a vague, foggy image of
Nuremburg, as I do of all the cities in which I found myself only
because of a party congress or some public meeting. From the last public
meeting [in Nuremburg] before the war I remember only that on the podium
there was a giant bouquet of bright red carnations that interfered very
much with the speech I was giving; and I remember that just as I was
about to open my mouth there rang out a cry, which at first I could not
understand. “Medical assistance!” The problem was that the meeting hall
was filled to overflowing, so much so that three people fainted and had
to be carried out of the room, the kind of thing that always has a
depressing effect on me. I had to pull myself together good and proper
before my speech could catch fire.

To make up for that, during the party congress⁶⁷² someone dragged me
away from one of the evening sessions and took me for a tour in a
comfortable Landau that went slowly through the city for several hours.
It was the end of September, the city was in a bluish autumnal haze, out
of which there loomed the fortress covered with foliage near the
cemetery, as well as the high-peaked roofs and churches, very
fantastically and brightly colored, with a medieval appearance, and over
everything there lay the dark-red glow of departing day, while the
shadows of twilight were already thickening down below in the alleyways
and nooks and corners. The vision of those moments that has remained in
my mind is quite wonderful, especially the contrast between the divine
peace and beauty outdoors, with the steady clop-clopping of the horse’s
hooves, and the strife-torn confusion and tormentingly painful
tastelessness encountered at the scene of the party congress. I don’t
even know any more who was sitting next to me in the carriage; I only
know that I didn’t utter a single word during the entire journey, and
when I got out in front of my hotel I fleetingly caught sight of a face
with an expression of disappointment. I definitely want to go to
Nuremburg again, but without any public meeting or party congress, and
to make up for that to have a volume of Mörike or Goethe, from which you
have so often read to me in your deep bass boy’s voice.

What a shame that you can’t read Shakespeare to me here and now, the way
we read through the entire Wallenstein trilogy.⁶⁷³ (I’ve had my William
[Shakespeare books] brought to me here. You know, it’s as Goethe said:

To belong to one woman only,
To admire one man only,
It’s like the oneness of heart and mind!
Lida! Joy of closest closeness,
William! Star of highest highness,
I’ve both of you to thank for what I am!

[_Einer Einzigen angehören_,
_Einen Einzigen verehren_,
_Wie vereint das Herz und Sinn!_
_Lida! Glück der nächsten Nähe_,
_William! Stern der höchsten Höhe_,
_Euch verdank’ ich, was ich bin!_]

Lida is of course [Goethe’s paramour, Charlotte] von Stein.) My renewed
interest in him [Shakespeare] was awakened by—you will be amazed—the
theater critic of the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_. He writes in an
extremely stimulating and intellectually rich manner. Here for example
is his commentary on a female character in _As You Like It_. “This
Rosalind is a woman after the poet’s heart. She is both lady and child
of nature, she knows what is proper and she thumbs her nose at all
propriety, she is not erudite and yet she knows how to say the cleverest
things. She is full of high spirits and full of modesty. She can be all
these things because her instincts are sure, and trusting her healthy
instincts, she dances, leaps, and strides through the world as though no
danger could seriously threaten her. And it is not as though this was
the only instance in which Shakespeare portrays a self-confident young
woman. In his works one encounters several of this type. We do not know
if he ever associated with a woman who was like Rosalind, or Beatrice or
Portia, whether he worked from living models or created images that he
himself yearned for, but we do know one thing for certain: his belief in
woman speaks from these figures. Such was the magnificence of his
conviction of what the female can be on the strength of her special
nature. This was [an expression] of praise for womankind as a whole—at
least for a time during his life—such as no other poet has produced. He
saw in woman a force of nature, which in effect could not be touched by
all the culture in the world. She adopts everything that culture has to
offer and puts it to her own use, but does not allow herself to depart
from that which nature has prescribed for her.”⁶⁷⁴

Isn’t that a fine analysis? If you only knew what a strange fellow,
tasteless and dry, in personal interaction this Dr. Morgenstern is, but
I dearly wish that all future essayists writing in German would have the
kind of psychological acuity he has.… Apropos of that: you yourself are
a descendant of Justinius Kerner, isn’t that right? By God, a notable
ancestor! I don’t really know any of his writings. I only have a general
recollection of bold verse, strong pathos, and the grand revolutionary
gesture. Anyhow, the impact of the name is fabulous. Isn’t it true that
there are names that seem to have been created for eternity, that seem
to strike an Olympian chord, even if one doesn’t know anything more
specific about them? Nowadays, who knows even one line of Sappho’s
verse? Who (aside from me) even reads Machiavelli? Who has listened to
an opera by Cimarosa? But each of them is such a name! Like a flash from
eternity, before which one reverently bares one’s head. In the meantime,
Hänschen, noblesse oblige: you must become something good and proper. We
owe it to Justinius Kerner. R

[P.S.] No mention by you about Klara [i.e., Clara Zetkin]? I hope you
have seen her several times, right?

TO SOPHIE LIEBKNECHT

Wronke, April 19, 1917

Sonyusha,⁶⁷⁵ my dear little bird!

Yesterday your greetings by postcard gladdened my heart, even though you
sounded so sad. How I would like to be with you now, in order to get you
laughing again as we used to laugh back then after Karl’s arrest when we
both—do you still remember?—caused a bit of a sensation at the Café
Fürstenhof with our boisterous gales of laughter. How lovely things were
then—in spite of everything! Our daily drive in a car to Potsdamer Platz
[Potsdam Square] early in the morning, then the trip to the prison
through the flowering Tiergarten Park and down the quiet street, Lehrter
Street, with the high elm trees, then on the way back the obligatory
getting out and stopping at the Fürstenhof again, then your obligatory
visit to me in Südende, where all growing things were standing up in the
splendor of May, the cozy hours in my kitchen, where you and Mimi waited
patiently at the little table with the white tablecloth to receive proof
of my culinary skill. (Do you still remember the superb green beans in
the Parisian style [_haricots verts à la Parisienne_]?) Then sitting at
the flower table with Goethe and a little plate of compote, the table I
set up for you in the bay window, do you remember? I have the vivid
memory that it was invariably hot sunny weather, and only in such
weather does one have the proper joyous feeling of spring. Then in the
evening my obligatory visit to you, to your dear little room—I like so
much to picture you as a housewife, it makes you so very appealing when,
with your sweet little figure like a teenage girl, you serve tea at the
table—and finally, around midnight, we would accompany each other home
through the sweet-smelling dark streets! Do you remember the fabulous
full-moon night in Südende, when I was walking you home, and to us the
gables of the houses, with their sharp black outlines against the
background of a tender blue sky, seemed like the castles of knights of
yore, do you remember?

Sonyusha, I would like to be with you like that always, to chat or be
silent together with you, so that you would not fall into your
despairing moods. You ask in your postcard, “Why is everything like
this?” Dear child, life has always been just “like this,” everything is
part of life: sorrow and parting and longing. One must always take it as
a whole, including everything, and find ALL OF IT beautiful and good. At
least that is what I do. Not through some elaborately worked out form of
wisdom, but simply “just so,” because of my very nature. I feel
instinctively that this is the only correct way to take life, and
therefore I really do feel happy in every situation. I also would not
want to exclude ANYTHING from my life, nor have it be any way other than
it was and is. If I could only bring you to this conception of life!…

I haven’t yet thanked you for the picture of Karl. How joyful you’ve
made me with it! It was really the most beautiful birthday present that
you could have given me. It’s in a good frame on the table in front of
me, and [Karl] follows me with his gaze everywhere. (You know, there are
pictures that seem to be looking at you no matter where you stand.) The
picture is an excellent likeness. How happy Karl must be now over the
news from Russia!

But you too have personal reasons to be happy: now probably nothing will
stand in the way of your mother’s trip to visit you! Have you already
set your sights on that? For your sake I urgently wish sun and warmth to
come your way. Here everything is still at the budding stage and
yesterday we had snow with bits of hail. I wonder what it must look like
now in my “southern landscape” at Südende? Last year we both stood there
in front of the grating and you were amazed at the fullness of the array
of flowers.

That little part of the world reminds me so vividly every time of that
spring poem of Goethe’s that I called to Karl’s attention, but the two
of you, as I recall, didn’t take note of it as fully as you should have.

  ----------------------------- ---------------------------
  Das Beet, schon lockert       Doch was im Garten
  Sich’s in die Höh’,           Am reichsten blüht,
  Da wanken Glöckchen           Das ist des Liebchens
  So weiss wie Schnee;          Lieblich Gemüt.
  Safran entfaltet              Da glühen Blicke
  Gewalt’ge Glut,               Mir immerfort,
  Smaragden keimt es            Erregend Liedchen,
  Und keimt wie Blut.           Erheiternd Wort,
  Primeln stolzieren            Ein immer offen,
  So naseweis                   Ein Blütenherz,
  Schalkhafte Veilchen,         Im Ernste freundlich
  Versteckt mit Fleiss;         Und rein im Scherz.
  Was auch noch alles           Wenn Ros’ und Lilie
  Da regt und webt,             Der Sommer bringt,
  Genug, der Frühling,          Er doch vergebens
  Er wirkt und lebt.            Mit liebchen ringt
  The flowerbed’s unlimbered,   What blooms in the garden
  No longer lying low,          Most richly of all?
  Bellflowers tossing           It is my sweetheart’s
  Their heads white as snow;    Welcoming warmth.
  Saffron’s unfolding           Glances are glowing
  In a red-hot mood,            Ever to greet me,
  Sprouting forth emeralds      A song to stir me,
  And what looks like blood.    A word to cheer me,
  Proud primrose swaggers,      A heart ever open,
  Precociously snide,           A heart in full flower,
  While mischievous violets     When serious, friendly,
  Have tried hard to hide.      When joking, still pure.
  What else there is moving     When summertime brings us
  And weaving its spell?        The rose and the lily
  Enough to say: Springtime     In vain it’s competing
  Is alive and well.            With my precious sweetie.
  ----------------------------- ---------------------------

If you only knew what a heavenly song Hugo Wolf composed from that poem!
My dear departed friend [Hugo] Faisst sang it to me so beautifully on my
birthday!

Sonyusha, you should not trouble yourself with writing letters. I want
to write you frequently, but I am completely satisfied if you merely
send me a short greeting on a postcard! Be out in the open a lot, and do
a lot of botanizing. That small atlas of flowers that I sent you, do you
have it with you? Be calm and cheerful, dearest, everything will be all
right! You’ll see!

I embrace you many times with all my heart, Yours always, Rosa

TO HANS DIEFENBACH

Wronke i. P., April 28 [1917]

Hänschen, unfortunately it’s impossible this time for Mrs. Marta
[Rosenbaum] to make a visit to Lissa [Diefenbach’s place of residence at
that time]. Her leave is too short, and since the new place where she is
living is so far out of the way, that’s already taking a toll. I, for
one, immediately located your residence in the old Diercke school atlas
(it’s the same old Diercke that used to go with YOU to the high school
[_Karls-Gymnasium_] in Stuttgart, because it came to me from Costia
[i.e., Kostya Zetkin—apparently Diefenbach and Kostya attended the same
school]. I also saw that Lissa is halfway between Poznań and Breslau,
and so in the opposite direction from Berlin. To make up for that, you
will certainly be welcoming Hans and Luise [Kautsky] in about two weeks.
Luise will be having time off between May 10 and 15.

I hold it against you in earnest that you failed to visit Klara [i.e.,
Clara Zetkin]. You MUST have been able to find the time. Do you
understand my psychology in this case? The more I reproach myself
inwardly that I can now do nothing to nurture her, so much greater was
the need I felt, and there was the reassurance that you would deal with
the matter better than I could and, so to speak, would make up for what
I was unable to give in the way of kindness and tender feeling toward
her. And now you have failed to do it! I no longer know (God help me)
whether I revealed to her your presence in Stuttgart at Easter or not,
but I now ask you to start writing immediately to her quite often and
honestly and to make good the omission with an endearing letter. Just
don’t play the coward, Hänschen. That is unworthy of you.

I have now finished _Wallenstein_ by Ricarda Huch. At first I found it
very refreshing, but by the end the picture fades away into nothingness.
Despite all the noisy details and depiction of every little thing no
complete whole comes into being, not at all. This is a good example for
a study of how NOT to write an essay, how one would have to do better. I
will stick with my opinion: it’s the German thoroughness that prevents a
true picture of life or of the times from being created, a picture that
should be tossed off with light strokes, which at the same time can be
an utterly exquisite experience. Ricarda also lacks the grace of
spirit—although she is a woman—that would have to tell her that the
elaboration of all these particular details has an exhausting and
depressing effect on a person of keen sensibility, whereas a few
artfully chosen features would stir the reader’s imagination and a
completed picture would round itself out automatically. It’s exactly the
same in personal relations among people who are imaginative or rich in
spirit: the slightest hints give much more satisfaction than spelling
things out in full, crudely and obviously.

In the near future I would like to send you a comedy by Bernard Shaw,
_The Prodigal Father_. At first I was impatient with the flagrant
paradoxes and absurdities of all the characters in the play, but then
there came a few serious passages, which one read with a mixed feeling
of relief and hesitation, only to learn in the end that the author’s
real message and intention was actually to shy away in a certain sense
from the tastelessness of tendentious moralizing. Until one discovers at
the end that the “serious passages” were just a put-on and that Shaw is
simply making fun of the whole world, and of the reader, and of himself
as well, following the motto: There is absolutely nothing in life that
deserves to be taken tragically. The final scene, in which a legal
debate, dry as dust, between two lawyers takes place during a masquerade
ball, and both of them in the end are led away waltzing. It has a
downright Shakespearean effect and hits you in the face like the
bantering hobgoblin mood of _A Midsummer Night’s Dream_. In reading this
final scene—all alone, sitting in my little “den” at around midnight—I
broke into cascades of laughter, the way you know I do. That was right
after a twinge of despair that I again experienced, and this foolish
book did me a lot of good.

Since I am already on the subject of literature, listen to me now, can
you tell me about the following few lines of verse, where I’m getting
them from?

His lofty stature and his noble form,
The smile on his face, the power in his eyes,
And his voice’s magic flow,
The touch of his hand …

[_Sein hoher Gang, seine edle Gestalt_
_Seines Mundes Lächeln, seiner Augen Gewalt_,
_Und seiner Stimme Zauberfluss_,
_Sein Händedruck …_]

I don’t know the rest of it. I could swear that it was “Gretchen at the
Spinning Wheel.”⁶⁷⁶ At the same time I could swear that Gretchen at the
spinning wheel was singing something entirely different, namely “The
King of Thule.” I have with me here only your small Harnack edition of
Goethe, but _Faust_ isn’t there, so I can’t look it up. These rhyming
lines have been going around in my head since Easter, so that I’m soon
going to believe that I have a spinning wheel in my own head. Do you
know how it torments people when they can’t remember where they heard a
scrap of poetry or a melody, where it came from?

Right above my “den” is the schoolroom of our “collection of
curiosities” [_panopticum_]. While I have been writing this, a lesson
has been going on up there. First I heard a clumsy clattering of many
feet, then silence, followed by a teacher’s voice lecturing to everyone,
and now a monotone reading in the voice of a young girl—just the way
small children read in a high, somewhat anxious, half-questioning pitch
without any breaks or interruptions. I cannot distinguish a single word,
but the muffled murmuring has such a strange effect on me, reminding me
of home. This small scene is veiled from me, although going on just over
my head, and the remote sounds are reaching only me, but from it I once
again get the distinct feeling that life is very beautiful. R

[P.S.] The “charmante Marquis Renard,”⁶⁷⁷ a phrase you once used, has
received the Distinguished Service Medal [Germany’s highest award for
service, whether military or civilian]. If there is champagne in Lissa,
drink a bottle [in his honor], “extra dry.”⁶⁷⁸

TO MARTA ROSENBAUM

Wronke, [April 29, 1917]

My dear Martchen!

This time, I fear, nothing will go right. On Friday I was so flustered
(and probably will be today as well), and my head’s going round and
round so much that I can by no means just sit there and chat calmly and
openly with you. It is definitely the result of the redoubled
supervision [by the prison authorities], and there’s nothing to be done
about it. My guess is that you feel the same way. But to at least see
you and feel your nearness is truly a comfort for me. It’s too bad that
it’s all going at such a gallop. Next time you must come on THURSDAY and
stay until Monday or Tuesday. Whether anything more will come of our
“kiss goodbye” tomorrow, I don’t know. But even if things don’t go well,
we must get through it anyhow. I’ve already prepared myself for that.
How thankful I am to you for coming! Don’t worry about me, health-wise.
It’s true that with my stomach things are still not going better, but
with my nerves on the whole there is some slow progress. That means my
stomach will probably calm down too, if only spring would come! Sun and
warmth and fresh young greenery are the most important things for my
general condition, as you well know! Well now, the wonderful events in
Russia are also having a good effect on me, like a life-giving elixir.
For all of us, what’s coming from there is a message of healing. I’m
afraid that all of you don’t have a sufficiently full appreciation of
it, that you don’t realize well enough that it is our own cause that is
winning there. It MUST and WILL have a redeeming impact on the whole
world, it MUST radiate out to all of Europe. I am convinced with
rock-hard certainty that a new epoch is now beginning and that the war
cannot last very long. Therefore I would like to hear that you are in a
better frame of mind, that all of you are in an uplifted and joyful
mood—in spite of all that still exists of misery and horror. You see
that history knows how to manage things even when they seem most
unmanageable. Be cheerful and bright for me, I embrace you a thousand
times and send many best wishes to Kurtchen [Kurt Rosenfeld]. Your R.

TO MATHILDE JACOB

Wronke, May 3, 1917

My dear, dear Mathilde!

Early today I received your short letter, which made me very sad because
you have never before written to me so tersely, and from that I get a
strong sense of how very much overworked and rundown you are again. But
then, this afternoon, your package with the violets came, and that gave
me some consolation. Many thanks for that, and in response I want to
send you a few lines by return mail to reassure you. There’s nothing new
with me except that I sit out in the open, in the sun, a lot nowadays.
In this your beautiful wicker chair comes in very handy, it is so light
and easy to carry around, and it feels positively regal to be sitting in
it. Today a lot of butterflies and bumblebees came, but they didn’t find
a single blossom in the garden. —I therefore brought the flowerpot with
the cineraria in full bloom, the one Marta [Rosenbaum] sent me, and you
should have seen how the little creatures threw themselves upon it and
couldn’t get enough of that wonderful golden pollen. Today I also saw
for the first time in my life a splendid bird: the yellowhammer. I sat
so quiet and motionless that it hopped over quite close and I was able
to observe it in exact detail. All the things I’m getting to know here
in Wronke! Really, Mathilde, I am gathering new bits of knowledge in
massive quantities here, then I immediately do some research, and I feel
that my life has been positively enriched. Many thanks for the
manuscript.⁶⁷⁹ Nevertheless, before I continue reviewing and revising
it, I would like you to ask by way of Lene [Leo Jogiches] whether the
Old Man [Franz Mehring] is still working on it and how far he has
gotten. I could not of course send it directly to the publisher, but
would send it to Mehring, and he would surely be offended if he had a
good part of the work still working to do.

Luise [Kautsky] writes me today from Frankfurt on the Main that she
would come [to Wronke] between the 10th and 15th [of May]. But I would
like to find out as soon as possible the exact day of her arrival, so as
not to be fidgeting around at random for days. Please ask her about it
with a quick phone call (or write to her at Frankfurt on the Main, City
Hospital; she is there with her youngster,⁶⁸⁰ and then let me know.
Luise herself would not do it.

Today I sent you three books from [the publisher] Pfemfert, which I
would like you to return to him with thanks (just between us, they are
not worth very much, I couldn’t read them at all), and I also sent a
little notebook for Marta’s garden [for Marta to keep notes about her
gardening]. According to your latest lecture, I dare not mobilize any
more messengers whatsoever, and so I would like to know when you receive
the package. —And now I wait with longing to receive once again a calm
and kind letter from you, which will do me a lot of good. And with even
greater longing I await you yourself. I hope to see you again at
Whitsuntide in that light muslin dress that I like so much. Couldn’t you
have the dark trimming removed, which ruins the dress, and have a soft
green or soft blue put in its place?

Listen, dearest! Sonya [Liebknecht] is complaining so bitterly about
Lene [Leo Jogiches], saying that “she” [Lene] is neglecting “Karl’s
household” and “Karl’s children,” and that “she” [Lene] ought to concern
“herself” about these things in Sonya’s absence.⁶⁸¹ Karl must be
indignant [about all this]. Please, couldn’t this duty be turned over to
the Old Man [Mehring], if Lene is too busy? At any rate, don’t leave
poor nervous Sonya fidgeting and worrying.

I embrace you and Mimi a thousand times with great longing. Your R.

[P.S.] Thank you for the letter paper, unfortunately I find it somewhat
limp and would at least like to stick with sturdy envelopes. Isn’t it
possible to obtain those anymore? I mean envelopes like the one in which
I’m sending this letter?

TO HANS DIEFENBACH

Wronke, May 12, 1917

L. H. [Liebes Hänschen—Dear Hans]

No. 5 received, many thanks; I’m waiting for your style corrections.⁶⁸²
(Partly you’ve been troubling yourself, as I see, [merely] about
mistakes made by the typist.) Your comment that in the _Anti-Critique_
some passages are mixed up or garbled to the point of being
unrecognizable definitely spurs me on to go over the whole thing again
myself. Otherwise, I would not be capable, I never am, of rereading
something once it has been written, and the more intensely I experience
the writing of it, so much the more for me is it finished and done with
afterwards. I know very well, Hänschen, that my economic works are
written as though “for six persons only.” But actually, you know, I
write them for only one person: for myself. The time when I was writing
the [first] _Accumulation of Capital_ belongs to the happiest of my
life. Really I was living as though in euphoria, “on a high,” saw and
heard nothing else, day or night, but this one question, which unfolded
before me so beautifully, and I don’t know what to say about which gave
me the greater pleasure: the process of thinking, when I was turning a
complicated problem over in my mind, pacing slowly back and forth
through the room, under the close and attentive observation of Mimi [the
cat], who lay on the red plush tablecloth with her little paws curled
under her and kept turning her wise head back and forth to follow my
movements; or the process of giving shape and literary form to my
thoughts with pen in hand. Do you know, at that time I wrote the whole
30 signatures [_Bogen_] all at one go in four months’ time—an
unprecedented event!—and without rereading the _brouillon_ [the rough
draft], not even once, I sent it off to be printed. Things went the same
way for me in Barnim Street [women’s prison] with the _Anti-Critique_.
And then, after experiencing the work so intensely, I lost all interest
in it, to such an extent that since then I’ve hardly troubled myself
about a publisher. Anyway, given my “circumstances” during the past year
and a half, that [worrying about a publisher] was rather difficult. — As
for Eckstein, you very definitely overrate him. His “critique” [of the
_Accumulation of Capital_ (1913)] was nothing but his revenge for
fruitless attempts to befriend me, which I roughly rejected, and it is
precisely this transference of the “all-too-human” into the refined,
upper Alpine region of pure science that has filled me with such
contempt for him. He was capable, by the way, of being quite witty and
nice. On one occasion at the Kautskys’, when I was making dubious and
vain attempts in the antechamber to get my jacket down from the hat and
coat stand, cursing my own Lilliputian stature, he gallantly handed down
the jacket and smilingly murmured a line from a song by [Hugo] Wolf:
“The little things also can enchant us …” [_Auch kleine Dinge koennen
uns entzuecken_.] (You probably know that in Vienna, Hugo Wolf had links
with the house of Eckstein, and that he is regarded there as a household
deity.)

—Your idea that I should write a book about Tolstoy doesn’t appeal to me
one bit. For whom? What for, Hänschen? Everyone can read Tolstoy’s
books, and if the books themselves don’t give off a powerful breath of
life, I wouldn’t succeed in doing so through literary commentary. Can
anyone “explain” to someone else what Mozart’s music is? Can one
“explain” what is the magic of life? [What’s the use] if people don’t
hear it for themselves, don’t deduce it from the littlest everyday
things, or more exactly: if they don’t carry it within their own being?
I also regard, for example, the monstrous amount of Goethe literature
(that is, literature ABOUT Goethe) as pure trash, and it is my opinion
that far too many such books have been written. What with all the
literary noise, people forget to look at the world and all its beauty.

Well then, since the first [of May] we have had a series of sunny days,
and I am already being greeted on my awakening by the first ray of
morning, because my windows here face east. In Südende, where my
residence, as you know, is like a lantern exposed to the sun in all
directions, such morning hours take shape in a very lovely way. After
breakfast I used to take the heavy crystal prism with its countless
angles and facets, the one that lay on the desk as a paperweight, and
put it in the sunlight, and the sunrays would immediately be scattered
over the floor and walls in hundreds of little splashes of rainbow
light. Mimi kept fascinated watch over this game, especially when I
moved the prism and made the bright colors dart here and there and dance
around. At first she ran and jumped up high, to catch at them, but soon
she deduced that there was “nothing” to them, that they were just an
optical illusion, and then she would watch the dance with her merry
little eyes, without bestirring herself. We achieved fascinating effects
when, for example, a tiny rainbow landed on a white hyacinth in the
window box or on the marble bust above the desk or on the large bronze
clock in front of the mirror. The cleanly swept, sun-filled room with
its bright wallpaper breathed so much comfort and peace, the chirping of
the sparrows penetrating through the open balcony door, along with the
hum from time to time of an electric train that glided past or the
distinct metallic clanking of workers repairing the rails somewhere
[nearby]. Then I would take my hat and go out into the fields to see
what had grown overnight, and to gather fresh, juicy grass for Mimi.
Here too I go out into the little garden right after breakfast, and
[there] I have something splendid to keep me busy: watering the
“plantation” I have in front of my window. I arranged for a pretty
little watering can to be purchased for me, and I must run with it to
the water tank probably a dozen times before the whole flowerbed is
moist enough. The spurting sprays of water gleam in the morning
sunshine, and the drops still tremble for a long time on the pink and
blue hyacinths, which are half closed. Why am I nonetheless sad? I
almost think I’ve overrated the sun in the sky and its strength. It may
still shine so strongly, but sometimes it doesn’t warm me at all—if my
own heart borrows no warmth from it. R.

TO SOPHIE LIEBKNECHT

Wronke, May 23, 1917

Sonyusha, my darling, your last letter, dated May 14 (but with the 18th
stamped on the envelope!), was already here when I mailed my last letter
to you. I’m so glad to be in touch with you again and would like to send
you warm Whitsuntide greetings today.

“Whitsuntide, the sweet and lovely holiday, had come.” That’s how
Goethe’s _Reynard the Fox_ [_Reineke Fuchs_] begins. I hope you will
spend it somewhat cheerfully. Last year at Whitsuntide the three of us,
[you and me] with Mathilde [Wurm], made that delightful excursion to
Lichtenrade, where I picked the tassels of grain for Karl and the
marvelous sprig of birch catkins. In the evening we went for another
walk through the fields at Südende, with roses in our hands like the
“three noblewomen of Ravenna.” Here the lilacs are already in bloom now,
the buds opened today; it’s so warm that I had to put on my lightest
summer dress. In spite of the sunshine and warmth, little by little my
friends the birds have fallen almost completely silent. They are
obviously all preoccupied with the business of hatching their eggs; the
females are sitting, and the males have “their beaks full” with things
to do, seeking food for themselves and their mates. Also, their nests
are probably more out in the fields or in the larger trees, at any rate
it’s quiet in my little garden now, only now and then a nightingale
sounds off briefly, or the greenfinch makes its chattering trill, or
late in the evening the chaffinch still warbles once or twice. My
titmice are no longer to be seen anywhere. The only thing was that
yesterday from a distance I had a brief greeting, all of a sudden, from
a blue titmouse, and that completely shook me up. The blue titmouse is
not like the great titmouse, which stays here all winter; the blue one
comes back to us only at the end of March. At first this blue titmouse
always stayed close to my window, came with the others to be fed, and
diligently sang its funny little song, _tsee-tsee-bay_, but it drew out
the sound so much that it sounded like the mischievous teasing of a
child. It always made me laugh, and I would answer with the same call.
Then the bird vanished with the others at the beginning of this month,
no doubt nesting elsewhere. I had seen and heard nothing of it for
weeks. Yesterday its well-known notes came suddenly from the other side
of the wall which separates our courtyard from another part of the
prison; but it was considerably altered, for the bird called three times
in brief succession, _tsee-tsee-bay, tsee-tsee-bay, tsee-tsee-bay_, and
then all was still. It went to my heart, for there was so much conveyed
by this hasty call from the distance—a whole history of bird life. There
was a reminiscence of the splendid days of wooing in the spring, when
the birds could sing and flirt all day long; now the blue titmouse had
to be on the wing all the time catching flies and gnats for itself and
its family. The bird seemed to be saying: “I’ve no time to spare—oh yes,
it was lovely—but spring is quickly over—_tsee-tsee bay, tsee-tsee-bay,
tsee-tsee-bay_! Believe me, Sonyusha, a little snatch of bird song in
which there is so much expression can stir me to the depths.

My mother, who considered the Bible (next to Schiller) the highest
source of wisdom, was firmly convinced that King Solomon understood the
language of birds. Back then, with all the superiority of my fifteen
years and my training in natural science, I used to smile at my mother’s
naiveté. But now I myself am like King Solomon: I too understand the
language of the birds, and of all animals. Not, of course, as if they
were using human words, but I understand the most varied shades of
meaning and of feeling conveyed by their tones. Only to the rude ear of
one who is quite indifferent does the song of a bird seem always the
same. If one has a love of animals, and a sympathetic understanding of
them, one finds great diversity of expression, an entire “language.”
Even the universal silence that exists now after the clamor of early
spring is full of expression, and I know that if I’m still here in the
autumn, which in all probability will be the case, all my friends will
come back to seek food at my window; I’m already rejoicing now at the
return of one particular great titmouse, with whom I have struck up an
especially heartfelt friendship.

Sonyusha, you are embittered about my long imprisonment and ask: “How is
it that [some] human beings are allowed to decide about the lives of
others? What’s the meaning of it all?” Forgive me, my darling, but I had
to laugh out loud when I read that. In _The Brothers Karamazov_ by
Dostoyevsky, one of the characters, Madame Khokhlakova, used to ask
exactly the same kind of question, and in doing so would look around
helplessly from one member of the company to another, but before anyone
could try to answer the question, she had jumped over to something
entirely different. My dear little bird, the whole history of human
civilization, which according to moderate estimates has lasted some
twenty thousand years, is based on “some human beings deciding about the
lives of others”; the practice is deeply rooted in the material
conditions of existence. Nothing but further development, an agonizing
process, can change such things, and at this very time we are witnesses
to one such agonizing transition, and you ask, “What’s the meaning of it
all?” Your question is not a reasonable one to ask concerning the
totality of life and its forms. Why are there blue titmice in the world?
I really don’t know, but I’m glad there are, and I experience it as a
sweet consolation when a hasty _tsee-tsee-bay_ sounds suddenly from the
distance.

By the way, you overestimate my “serenity,” Sonyichka. My inner
equanimity and my blissful happiness can, unfortunately, go to pieces at
the slightest shadow that falls across me, and then I suffer
inexpressibly, only I have the peculiarity that at such times I suffer
in silence. Literally, Sonyichka, I cannot make a single word cross my
lips. For example, during the last few days I was definitely feeling so
bright and cheerful and rejoicing in the sunshine, then suddenly, on
Monday, an icy windstorm took hold of me—I don’t know “why” or “what
for”—and in an instant my radiant cheerfulness changed into the deepest
misery. And if my soul’s happiness had suddenly appeared in person,
standing in front of me, I could not have brought a single sound out of
my mouth and I could have expressed my lament of despair at most by
staring silently. In fact I seldom have much inclination to speak, and
for weeks I never hear the sound of my own voice. Incidentally, that’s
why I made the heroic decision not to have my little Mimi [the cat]
brought here. The little creature is accustomed to cheerfulness and
liveliness, she likes it when I sing and laugh, and play tag with her
all over the house, she would definitely get down in the dumps here.
That’s why I have left her in the care of Mathilde [Jacob]. Mathilde is
coming to visit me in a few days, and I hope then to get my spirits back
up. Perhaps for me, too, Whitsuntide will be “the sweet and lovely
holiday.”

Sonyichka, just for me, be cheerful and calm. Everything will still turn
out well, believe me. Greetings to Karl with all my heart. I send you
many hugs. Many thanks for the lovely little picture. Your R

TO HANS DIEFENBACH

Wronke, June 20, 1917

Hänschen, good day! Here I am again.

It seems to me an eternity since I wrote you and since I received your
letter No. 7 (but you have withheld No. 6!). Miss Mathilde [Jacob] has
surely reported to you in the meantime how much my silence was against
the grain [_contre coeur_] for me. Now I will again get busy, but I also
have the expectation from you that you will behave like a good Christian
and in exchange for the stones of my silence give me the nourishing
manna of frequent letters.

My, my, all the things I have experienced in the meantime! An entire
generation of blossoms under my watchful gaze opened themselves up to
life, then faded and died—from the first lilac bud to the drooping
clusters of acacia with their numbingly sultry aroma that now cover the
ground with the gentle snowfall of their tattered blossoms. Fruits are
quickly forming and swelling, bulging out on all the bushes, green
berries that fill up with juice more lushly every day and are bursting
to turn red or blue and black quite soon. An entire generation of birds
has grown up, whose birth I surmised from the discreet subsiding of the
avian chorus, whose growth I then eavesdropped upon, hearing tender
peeping from the nests hidden in every corner of my little garden, and
which now—oh, joy!—come to my window together with their parents, to be
fed here before my eyes. Most notably, the Chaffinch Family comes here
several times a day. The mother, who I have known intimately since her
days as a bride, always brings a little daughter with her to my window.
The “Little Darling,” who is much larger and fatter than Mama, sits
there with her feathers ruffled, throws open her huge beak with hoarse
squawking, while shaking her bald head like an epileptic and letting
herself be filled up by her emaciated, careworn, and unkempt mama.
Entire loads of my oats thus go down the throat of “Little Darling”
while Mama barely swallows even one grain herself. All this despite the
fact that the brat can fly quite well and peck food for herself, which
she actually condescends to do now and then. Meanwhile I watch the scene
every time from behind the curtain, and sometimes I just want to get in
the middle of it, I want to run out there and box the ears of the
shameless brat. But just in time I remember that Mama Chaffinch in her
youth surely must have must have sponged off of Grandmother in exactly
the same way, and that by next June the “Little Darling” will be just as
weatherbeaten [as Mama is now] and will be stuffing her own brats full,
so that things balance out somehow without my intervention (and my
interventions usually result in something stupid, as when I try to save
some half-dead creature with great effort, thereby only uselessly
prolonging its agony). Lastly, I also remember that in my family it was
regarded as an unbreakable law of nature, in exactly the same way, that
mother existed in the world exclusively to fill our little beaks, which
were forever opened wide (above all, the beak of the paterfamilias!) in
every possible way. And so I remain modestly behind the curtain …

In another month Madame Chaffinch with her little darlings will head
south, but Father is likely to remain here. That is why he is called
_Fringilla_ _COELEBS_—literally, the confirmed bachelor⁶⁸³; not everyone
can manage to make the trip south with the whole family [_en toute
famille_]; and so Father often remains in the foggy northland and merely
sends his wife and children off to Africa. On the other hand, perhaps he
follows them much later in a special “men’s flight” and returns earlier
in the spring in order to have a look around the neighborhood and
prepare the home for the oncoming “women’s flight.”

What a big commotion I experienced yesterday—oh, dear me! In my corridor
there appeared a fat bumblebee (with a little gray fur coat and gold
waistband)! It hurled itself against the closed upper window and began
storming up and down the windowpane, while buzzing with the highest
degree of indignation in the lowest of bass voices. Of course I
immediately dragged up a chair and in my haste grabbed it with my bare
hand, whereupon it immediately stung me so hard I had to cry out loud.
Then I took a handkerchief, caught the bumblebee after a long struggle,
and ran with it down the corridor toward the garden door, to set it
free. But you should have heard how the little creature screamed inside
that handkerchief! Suddenly the deep bass had turned into the highest,
thinnest falsetto! It was literally the plaintive crying of a child,
suffering from the greatest anxiety: it thought its short life was about
to end, poor thing, and it was weeping! This thin little voice affected
my nerves so much that my hands shook and I let it get away twice, and
each time of course it immediately rushed back to the same fatal
windowpane. Finally, the third time, I gathered up all my courage and
with all my strength of character carried it out into the garden—whew,
how it shot up into the sky! And immediately it was humming in its bass
voice again, growling “Adieu!” …

So those were my stirring experiences during this past time. Have you
some equally harmless things to report, my dear?… Listen here, I have
caught that privy councilor Goethe in a falsification of history. Surely
you recall that in his poem “Anacreon’s Grave” (oh, every time Faisst
sang that song for me I perished from sheer delight!), at the end it
goes something like this:

Spring, summer, fall—the poet enjoyed them all.
From winter this mound finally protects him.

From this one presumes: Anacreon must have died around the age of fifty,
at the height of his powers. But recently I read the lyric poems of
Anacreon, and there he describes himself as quite an old wine pouch and
skirt-chaser, who tries over and over again to persuade his Doris,
Phyllis, or Chloe that his “hoary locks” go wonderfully well with her
rosy cheeks, “like a strip of white birch bark next to a red rose in a
wreath.” His poems, in fact, are just eternal variations on the same
theme. Some of them I couldn’t really understand, like this one, for
example:

You shameless rogue! Your pranks are things
That I have seen through now. So watch out.
The quiver, the bow, the arrow, and the target,
Just so in the midst of mischief, gravity, and jest.
Not in that way do you get flustered
As when a woodland goblin laughs.
In simple play, inadvertently,
You pierce my trembling heart straight through
And it bleeds to death. Meanwhile
Go on and do what you like.
I love you. I remain yours.

Heaven knows what all that means and who is talking to whom.

Well, Hanneselein, I now await full confession of what you’ve been up to
in my absence. Aff’ly. R.

[P.S.] I’m greatly concerned about how you’re bearing up under this
brutal heat.

TO HANS DIEFENBACH

Wronke, June 23, 1917

Hänschen, good day to you, here I am back again. I feel so lonely today
and I need to refresh myself a little by chatting with you. — This
afternoon I lay on the sofa to have the siesta prescribed by the doctor,
read newspapers, and decided that since it was half past two, it was
time to get up. A moment later I fell asleep unexpectedly and had a
wonderful [long] dream that was very vivid, but its content was rather
unclear; I only know someone dear to me was with me, that I touched my
finger to his lips and asked: “Whose mouth is this?” The other person
answered: “Mine.”—“Oh, no!” I cried out, laughing, “This mouth actually
belongs to ME!” My laughing over this nonsense woke me up, and I looked
at the clock: It was still half past two, so my long dream had lasted,
obviously, only a second, but it left me with the sensation of a rich
and precious experience and, feeling consoled, I went out into the
garden again. There, once more, I was to experience something beautiful.
A robin landed on the wall right behind me and sang me a little song.
Generally speaking, nowadays the birds are entirely taken up with family
worries, only now and then do they allow themselves to be heard from,
briefly. And so it was with today’s sudden appearance of this robin,
which had visited me a few times only at the beginning of May. I don’t
know whether you are particularly familiar with this little bird and its
song, I have gained a precise knowledge of it here for the first
time—like so much else—and I love it incomparably more than the
much-famed nightingale. The nightingale’s cascade of song is for me much
too prima-donna-like, it’s playing to the public too much with its
rousing songs of triumph and enchanting hymns of praise. The robin has a
very small, delicate voice, and it performs its own kind of intimate
melody, which sounds like a phrase from a prelude or reveille. In the
prison scene of [Beethoven’s opera] _Fidelio_, do you know the
liberating distant sounds of a trumpet that seem to cut through the
darkness of night? That’s approximately what the robin’s song sounds
like, but it is sung in a soft, tremulous tone of infinite sweetness, so
that it sounds quite misty and affects a person like a memory lost in a
dream. My heart contracts with both joy and sorrow when I hear this
song, and I immediately see my life and the whole world in a new light,
as though clouds had parted and a bright ray of sun had struck the
earth. Today from this delicate little song, sung on the wall,
everything in my heart has become so soft and tender. At once I
regretted everything angry that I had ever inflicted on anyone, all
harsh thoughts and feelings, and I decided once again to be kind, simply
to be kind at all costs. That is better than “to be right” and to keep
an exact account of every hurt or injury.

And then I decided to write you right away, today, even though since
yesterday a little tablet has been sitting on my desk with seven “rules
to live by,” the first of which reads: “not to write any letters.” You
see, that’s how I keep my own “ironclad” rules, that’s how weak I am!
If, as you wrote in your last letter, the stronger sex likes women most
when they show themselves to be weak, you would have to be especially
enchanted by me now: here I am, oh! so weak, more than I would like to
be.

By the way, from your mouth over there, as “out of the mouths of babes,”
more truth was spoken than you guessed, and not too long ago I
experienced this truth in the drollest manner. Well, at the Copenhagen
Congress [in 1910] you most likely saw Camille Huysmans, the large young
man with the dark curly hair and typical Flemish face, didn’t you?⁶⁸⁴ He
is now the chief organizer of the Stockholm Conference.⁶⁸⁵ For ten years
we both belonged to the International [Socialist] Bureau [ISB], and for
ten years we hated each other, insofar as my “heart of a dove” (the
expression comes from—of all people, Heinrich Schulz, member of the
Reichstag!) is at all capable of such a feeling. Why [did we hate]?—it’s
hard to say. I believe that he cannot stand politically active women,
and for me, his impertinent face probably got on my nerves. And now,
this is what happened … It was at the last [ISB] session in Brussels,
which was held in the face of imminent war at the end of July 1914.⁶⁸⁶
After the close of the session we were together for a few hours. I was
sitting right next to a bunch of gladiolas—it was in some elegant
restaurant—they were on the table and I was completely absorbed in
staring at them without taking part in the political discussion. Then
the conversation came around to my trip home, and at that point my
helplessness in “earthly matters” came to light, my eternal need for a
guardian who would take care of the ticket for me, put me on the right
train, gather together my misplaced hand luggage—in short, all of my
shameful weaknesses, which have provided you with so many merry moments.
Huysmans watched me in silence the whole time, and in the course of one
hour a ten-year-long hatred changed into a glowing friendship. It was
enough to make you laugh. At last he had seen me weak, and he was in his
element. Now he immediately took my fate in his hands, dragged me
together with Anseele, the charming little Walloon, to his place to have
dinner, brought me a little kitty-cat, and then played and sang Mozart
and Schubert for me. His piano is a good one, he has a pleasing tenor
voice, and for him it was a new revelation that good music is like the
breath of life for me. He did an especially nice job singing Schubert’s
_Limits of Humanity_ [_Grenzen der Menschheit_]; when he came to the
last verse, “the winds and the clouds—they play with us,” he sang it
several times in his funny Flemish accent—with a deep _L_ in his throat,
making the German word for “clouds,” _Wolken_, sound like _Wouken_—all
the while singing in the grip of deep emotion. Then of course he brought
me to the train, carried my suitcase himself, and on top of that, sat
with me in the compartment, and suddenly decided: _“Mais il est
impossible de vous laissez voyager seule!”_⁶⁸⁷ as if I was a total
greenhorn. I barely talked him out of accompanying me at least as far as
the German border, he finally jumped out when the train was already
starting to move, and still he called out: “Farewell, until Paris” [_“Au
revoir, à Paris”_]. We were supposed to hold an international congress
in Paris in two weeks.⁶⁸⁸ That was on July 31 [1914]. But when my train
arrived in Berlin the mobilization was already fully under way, and two
days later poor Huysmans’ beloved Belgium had already been occupied.
“The winds and the clouds—they play with us.” I had to repeat that to
myself …

In two weeks it will be a full year of my imprisonment here—or if you
don’t count the short period in between—two full years will be up.⁶⁸⁹
Oh, how good it would be for me now to have a little hour of harmless
idle chitchat! When I have an hour to meet with visitors we naturally
talk about business matters, all in a hurry, and most of the time it’s
as though I were sitting on coals. And other than that not one human
soul do I see or hear.

It’s now 9 p.m., but of course it’s still bright as day. It’s so quiet
here around me, only the ticking of the clock is to be heard, and from
the distance the muffled barking of a dog. What a strange effect it has
when you’re out in the country in the evening and hear the distant
barking of a dog, isn’t that so? At once I imagine a comfortable
farmhouse, a man in shirtsleeves standing on the threshold, a pipe in
his mouth, chatting with an old lady, his neighbor, and from inside the
house come the sounds of bright children’s voices and the clatter of
dishes, while outside there’s the smell of ripe grain and the first
tenuous croaking of the frogs …

Adieu, Hänschen. R.

TO HANS DIEFENBACH

Wronke, June 29, 1917

Good day, Hänschen! All right, fine, for your sake the first of the
seven “rules to live by” shall be crossed off the list.⁶⁹⁰ The other six
[rules], though, are very sensible and will surely meet with your
approval. It’s quite touching that Gerlach would trade me only for a
field marshal.⁶⁹¹ His [Gerlach’s] letter, by the way, comes across well.
He seems to have grown inwardly during the war, and I will be glad when
I see him again in our “Swabian” circle. When will that be?

Every evening, when I sit at my barred window, legs stretched out on a
second chair, in order to breathe in the fresh air and to dream,
somewhere in the neighborhood there begins an industrious but muffled
beating of a rug or something that sounds like it. I have no idea who is
doing this household chore or where, but because of the regular
repetition of these sounds I have already established, although somewhat
indefinitely, an intimate relationship with that person. These sounds
awaken in me some sort of vague imaginings involving highly competent
housekeeping and a small household in which everything is kept spic and
span, neat and clean—perhaps it is one of our prison officials, who
finds time only late in the evening after a day on duty to take care of
her little household tasks—a lonely old maid or widow, as most of the
prison officials are, who spends her scant leisure time eternally
cleaning her couple of rooms, which indeed no one else enters and of
which she herself makes very little use, but still, she must take pains
to bring them into good order. I know nothing for certain, but the
sounds of rug-beating give me the feeling every time I hear them of a
well-ordered and firmly marked-off realm of peace and quiet; and at the
same time I feel somewhat oppressed at the thought of the narrowness and
hopelessness of a pathetic existence—with a “Vertikow,”⁶⁹² some yellowed
photographs, artificial flowers, and a sofa with stiff upholstery …

Are you also familiar with the peculiar effect of sounds whose origins
we don’t know? I have put this to the test in every prison [that I’ve
been in]. For example, in Zwickau⁶⁹³ I was awakened every night at
exactly two in the morning by the loud “qua-qua-qua-qua!” of ducks that
lived on a pond somewhere in the neighborhood. The first of these four
syllables was uttered in a high register with the strongest emphasis and
with very great conviction, but then [the syllables] went down the scale
into a deep bass muttering. Awakened by this cry, I always had to
struggle to find my bearings in the pitch dark on the stone-hard
mattress, not knowing for the first few seconds where I was. It was
always a slightly depressing feeling to realize I was in a prison cell,
and together with the peculiar intonation of the “qua-qua” and the fact
that I had no idea where these ducks were—I heard them only at night—all
of that imparted to their cry something mysterious and meaningful. It
always sounded to me like some worldly-wise pronouncement, which by
being repeated regularly every night was declaring something
irrevocable, something that has held true since the beginning of the
world, since time immemorial, like some Coptic precept or rule to live
by.

In the high reaches of India’s breezes,
In crypts of Egypt, in their deep recesses,
Only the sacred word have I heard.

[_Und auf den Höhen der indischen Lüfte_,
_Und in den Tiefen ägyptischer Grüfte_,
_Hab’ ich das heilige Wort nur gehört_.]⁶⁹⁴

The fact that I could not decipher the meaning of this duck wisdom and
had only a vague intimation of it aroused a strange uneasiness in my
heart every time, and I used to lie awake, tense with anxiety, long
after I had heard the ducks.

At [the women’s prison on] Barnim Street things were quite different. I
always went to bed at 9 p.m.—since that’s when the lights went
out—_nolens volens_ [whether I wanted to or not], but naturally I could
not fall asleep. Shortly after 9 there regularly began in the still of
night in some nearby tenement the crying of a two- or three-year-old
child. It always started with a few soft, broken, whimpering sounds, as
though of one freshly awakened from sleep; then after a few pauses the
child would gradually sob itself into an outright fit of crying, which
nevertheless did not express a particular pain or particular grievance,
but only the universal discomfort of existence, the incapability of
dealing with life’s difficulties and problems. Mama was obviously not
right at hand. This helpless crying lasted about three quarters of an
hour. Exactly at 10 p.m. I would hear the door open energetically,
light, quick steps, which echoed loudly in the small room, and a
ringing, youthful female voice in which one heard the freshness of
street air: “Why aren’t you sleeping? Why aren’t you sleeping?” There
followed after that, every time, three soft smacks from which one could
literally feel the bed warmth of the little body part that had been
smacked and—oh, wonder of wonders!—those three little smacks suddenly
resolved all the difficulties and complicated problems of existence as
if they were mere child’s play. The whimpering stopped, the little child
instantly fell asleep, and a relief-giving silence reigned once again in
the courtyard. This scene was repeated regularly every evening so that
it became a part of my very existence. I had already gotten into the
habit around 9 p.m. of waiting with tense nerves for the awakening and
whimpering of my unknown little neighbor, all the registers of whose
crying voice I already knew in advance, and during this process I fully
shared the feeling of not knowing what to do in relation to life. Then I
would wait for the young woman to come home, for her to ask her
well-intonated question, and particularly for the three “liberating”
smacks. Believe me, Hänschen, this old-fashioned means of solving the
problems of existence worked wonders on MY soul as well, by way of the
infant’s rear end. My nerves relaxed immediately along with the child’s,
and I fell asleep every time almost simultaneously with the little one.
I never found out which geranium-decorated window, or little dormer, it
was, from which these threads spun themselves out to me. In the harsh
light of day all the houses that I could see looked equally gray,
prosaic, and tightly closed off, with a look about them as if to say:
“We know nothing about anything.” In the darkness of the night, on the
gentle breath of the summer breeze, mysterious links stretched out and
connected people who never knew or saw one another.

And oh, what a lovely recollection I have from Alexanderplatz [the
central police headquarters in Berlin]! Do you know, Hänschen, what
Alexanderplatz is? The month-and-a-half stay that I had there left gray
hairs on my head and rent my nerves in such a way that I will never get
over it. And yet I have a small recollection from there that pops up
like a flower in my memory. Night began there as early as 5:30—it was
late autumn, October, and the cell had no lighting at all. There was
nothing left for me to do in that eleven square meter space than to
stretch out on the plank bed, which was stuck in between indescribably
ugly pieces of furniture, and amidst the hellish music of the municipal
transit trains continually thundering by, making the cell shake as bits
of red light flashed on the vibrating window pane, I recited my Mörike
in a low voice to myself. After 10 p.m. the diabolic concert of the city
trains would grow somewhat softer, and soon after that the following
little episode from the life of the streets would become audible. First
you could hear dimly a hoarse male voice, which had something demanding
and admonishing about it, then in reply, a young girl singing, probably
around eight years old; she sang a children’s ditty while hopping and
jumping and at the same time letting go with silvery peals of laughter
which had a bell-like purity of tone. The man’s voice must have been
that of a tired, bad-tempered janitor, who was calling his little
daughter home to go to sleep. But the little rascal didn’t want to obey,
let the deep gruff voice of her father go in one ear and out the other,
kept flitting around in the streets like a butterfly, and countered the
oncoming strictures and threats with a merry children’s rhyme. One could
vividly picture the short skirt flapping and the thin legs flying in
dance steps. In the hoppity-hop rhythm of a children’s song, in the
rippling laughter, there was so much carefree and triumphant joy of life
that the whole dark and musty building of the central police
headquarters was enveloped as though by a silver cloak of mist and in my
foul-smelling prison cell the air was suddenly scented with the perfume
of dark-red roses falling through the air … Thus, everywhere, one picks
up a bit of happiness from the street and is tempted over and over again
to believe that life is rich and beautiful.

Hänschen, you have no idea how blue the sky was today! Or was it just as
blue where you are in Lissa? Usually before the evening lock-up I go out
for another short half hour to my little flower bed (pansies,
forget-me-nots, and phlox, planted by myself) to water them with my own
little watering can and to walk around in my garden just a bit more. The
hour before sunset has a magic all its own. The sun was still hot, but
one gladly allowed its slanted rays to burn on one’s neck and cheeks
like a kiss. A soft breath of air stirs the bushes like a whispering
promise that the cool of evening is coming soon, relieving the heat of
the day. In the sky, which was of a trembling, shimmering blue, two
towering white cloud formations were piled high, while a very pale
half-moon swam between them as though in a dream. The swallows had
already begun their every-evening’s flight in full company strength, and
with their sharp, pointy wings snipped the blue silk of space into
little bits, shot back and forth, overtaking one another with shrill
cries, and disappearing into the dizzying heights. I stood with my
little watering can dripping in my hand with my head tilted back and
felt a tremendous yearning to dive up into that damp, shimmering
blueness, to bathe in it, to splash around, to let myself dissolve
completely in that dew, and disappear. Mörike came to my mind. Do you
know these lines:

O river of mine, in the rays of morning!
Receive thou now, receive,
This body filled with endless longing
And kiss its breast and kiss its cheek! —
The heavens blue and childlike pure
Wherein the waves are singing,
The heavens are your very soul.
Let me plunge in completely.
I dive in through ever deepening blue
And never can reach its ending.
What is so deep, so deep as thou?
Love alone is so, only love is true.
It is never sated, nor does it sate,
With its light forever changing.

For heaven’s sake, Hänschen, don’t follow my bad example and don’t you
also become so utterly talkative. It shall not happen with me again, I
swear it!

TO HANS DIEFENBACH

[Wronke,] July 6, 1917—Friday evening

Hänschen, are you sleeping? I’m coming with a long piece of straw to
tickle your ear. I need company, I’m sad, and I want to make a
confession. The last few days I’ve been angry and therefore unhappy and
therefore sick. Or was the order reversed: was I sick and therefore
unhappy and hence angry?—I don’t know any more. Now I’m well again, and
I vow never, ever again to lend an ear to my inner demons. Can you blame
me that I’m sometimes unhappy because I always have to see and hear from
a distance those things that for me mean life and happiness? But yes, go
ahead and scold me, I swear that from now on I will be patience and
gentleness and gratitude itself. Good lord, don’t I have reason enough
to be grateful and joyful, since the sun is shining down on me so and
the birds are singing their age-old song, whose meaning I have grasped
so well?…

The one who has done the most to restore me to reason is a small friend
whose image I am sending you enclosed. This comrade with the jauntily
held beak, steeply rising forehead, and eye of a know-it-all is called
_Hypolais hypolais_, or in everyday language the arbor bird or also the
garden mocker. You have surely heard him somewhere because he likes to
nest in the thickets of gardens or parks everywhere, [but] you simply
haven’t noticed him, just as people for the most part pass by the
loveliest things in life without paying attention. This bird is quite an
oddball. He doesn’t sing just one song or one melody, like other birds,
but he is a public speaker by the grace of God, he holds forth, making
his speeches to the garden, and does so with a very loud voice full of
dramatic excitement, leaping transitions, and passages of heightened
pathos. He brings up the most impossible questions, then hurries to
answer them himself, with nonsense, makes the most daring assertions,
heatedly refuting views that no one has stated, charges through wide
open doors, then suddenly exclaims in triumph: “Didn’t I say so? Didn’t
I say so?” Immediately after that he solemnly warns everyone who’s
willing or not willing to listen: “You’ll see! You’ll see!” (He has the
clever habit of repeating each witty remark twice.) And among other
things it means nothing to him to suddenly squeak like a mouse whose
tail has been caught or to break out in laughter that is supposed to be
satanic but which comes off, given that his throat is so tiny, as
unbelievably comical. In short, he never grows tired of filling the
garden with the most blatant nonsense, and during the stillness that
reigns while he’s giving his speeches, one can almost see the other
birds exchanging glances and shrugging their shoulders. But I don’t
shrug mine. I’m the only one who doesn’t shrug; instead, I laugh every
time with joy and call to him out loud: “Sweet dumbhead!” You see, I
know that his foolish chatter is actually the deepest wisdom and that
he’s right about everything. A second Erasmus of Rotterdam, he sings
“The Praise of Folly” with full awareness and in doing so unfailingly
hits the nail on the head. I believe he already knows me by my voice.
Today, after several weeks of silence, he again began to make his noise
and in the process landed on the little hazel bush right in front of my
window. When I joyfully called out to him, with my usual greeting,
“Sweet dumbhead!” he shrieked something impertinent at me in reply that
could be taken to mean: “You’re a big fool yourself.” I conceded this to
him, right then and there, with grateful laughter and was cured at once
of my anger, unhappiness, and sickness. —But, Hänschen, I’m not
imagining about all his dramatic chatter! Everything I’ve said is true.
You yourself will be convinced one day in the Botanical Garden in
Berlin, where the “garden mocker” nests in large numbers, and you’ll
split your sides laughing at this merry rascal.

Here again today was a day of indescribable, unfathomable beauty.
Usually, when things aren’t like this, I go back into my “den” at 10 in
the morning in order to work, but today I couldn’t do it. I lay
stretched out in my wicker chair, my head leaning back, and for hours
gazed up at the sky without moving. On every side giant clouds forming
into fantastic shapes rested against the flat pastel blue, which
shimmered through between their ragged outlines. All around their edges
the clouds were trimmed in bright white from the light of the sun, but
in the middle they were a most expressive gray, which played in all
shades from the tenderest touch of silver to the dark tone of storm
clouds. Have you ever noticed how rich and lovely the color gray is? It
contains something of nobility and restraint, [and] is capable of so
many possibilities. And how wonderfully those shades of gray stood out
against the pastel blue background of the sky! Just as a gray dress goes
well with deep blue eyes. All the while the tall poplar tree in my
garden was rustling in front of me, its leaves trembling as though in a
shudder of pleasure and gleaming in the sunlight. In those couple of
hours, when I was lost in a reverie of blue and gray, it seemed to me
that thousands of years went by.

Kipling, in one of his stories of India, tells of a village water
buffalo herd that is given an outing at noontime every day. These giant
animals, whose hooves could trample an entire village in a few minutes,
patiently submit to the switches in the hands of two dark-brown peasant
children wearing nothing but shirts, who with careful deliberation drive
them to a distant swamp. Here the animals lower themselves with a great
splash into the morass, in which they soak comfortably, sinking in up to
their noses, while the children retreat from the mercilessly blazing sun
to the shade of some wispy acacia bush, slowly chewing on a bit of food
baked from rice flour that they’ve brought along, watching the lizards
sleeping in the sunshine, and gazing silently at the air full of heat
waves.…

“And one such afternoon seems longer to them than an entire lifetime
would seem to some people,” as Kipling puts it, if I remember correctly.
How well it’s said, don’t you think? I too feel just like those Indian
village children when I experience a morning like today’s.

Only one thing torments me: that I shouldn’t be enjoying so much beauty
ALL BY MYSELF. I want to shout out loud over the walls: Oh please, pay
attention to this marvelous day! Don’t forget, as busy as you may be, as
you’re hurrying across the courtyard in pursuit of the day’s pressing
tasks, do not forget to quickly raise your head and cast a glance at
those great silver clouds and that silent blue ocean in which they are
swimming. Do take notice as well of the air which is heavy with the
passionate breath of the last linden blossoms, and take notice of the
resplendence and glory that overlie this day, because this day will
never, ever come again! This day is a gift to you like a rose in full
bloom, lying at your feet, waiting for you to pick it up and press it to
your lips.

R.

TO SOPHIE LIEBKNECHT

Breslau, August 2, 1917

My dearest Sonyichka,

Your letter, which I received on the 28th [of July], was the first news
that reached me here from the outside world, and you can easily imagine
how very happy it made me. In your affectionate anxiety about me you
definitely take too tragic a view of my relocation.⁶⁹⁵ After all, the
likes of us are constantly living “one step at a time,” and as you know,
I take all the twists and turns of fate with the necessary cheerful
equanimity. I have already settled in here quite well, my boxes of books
arrived from Wronke today, and so my two cells here will soon be looking
just as homelike and comfortable as were my quarters there, with my
books and pictures unpacked, along with the modest ornaments that I like
to carry around with me, and soon I will get down to work with redoubled
pleasure. Of course what I don’t have here is the relative freedom of
movement I had at Wronke, where during the day the fortress was wide
open, whereas here I am simply locked up, and then I’m also lacking the
glorious fresh air, the garden, and, above all, the birds! You have no
idea how much I came to depend on the society of those little creatures.
However, one can of course do without all that, and soon I will forget
that I ever had it any better. The whole situation here is almost
exactly like it was at Barnim Street, except that there I had the lovely
green infirmary garden in which every day I could make some new little
discovery in botany or zoology. There is no chance of “discovering”
anything here in the great paved courtyard, which only serves for taking
walks, and as I go back and forth, I keep my eyes riveted on the gray
paving stones to spare myself the sight of the prisoners at work in the
yard, who, in their demeaning prison clothes, it is always a pain for me
to look at, and among whom a few are always to be found whose age,
gender, or individual features have been blotted out under the stamp of
the most profound human degradation, but who, by the force of some sort
of painful magnetism, always catch my eye. Everywhere, of course, there
are also individual figures from whom even the prison clothes do not
detract and who would gladden the eye of any painter. Thus I have
already discovered a young working woman here in the prison yard whose
slender form and concise gestures, with her head wrapped in a kerchief
and the austerity of her profile, is a direct embodiment of a figure
painted by Millet; it is a pleasure to see the nobility of movement with
which she carries her loads, and her gaunt face with the unvarying
chalk-white complexion reminds one of a tragic Pierrot mask. However,
made wiser by sad experience, I try to give a wide berth to such highly
promising manifestations. The thing is that at Barnim Street I came
across a woman prisoner of truly queenly appearance and bearing, and I
thought to myself that there must be a corresponding “interior.” Then
she came to my part of the prison as an odd-job worker [_Kalfaktrice_],
and after two days it became evident that beneath the beautiful mask
there lay such a mass of stupidity, such a base mentality, that from
then on I always averted my gaze when she crossed my path. It occurred
to me then that, ultimately, Venus de Milo could only have earned her
reputation over thousands of years as the most beautiful of women only
because she was silent. Had she opened her mouth, it might perhaps have
come to light that at bottom she was like some women of limited
mentality who take in washing or sewing, and the entire charm of her
person would have gone to the devil.

What I see from my window is the men’s prison, the usual gloomy building
of red brick. But looking diagonally, I can see above the prison wall
the green treetops of some kind of park. One of them is a tall black
poplar, which I can hear rustling when the wind blows hard; and there is
a row of ash trees, much lighter in color, and covered with yellow
clusters of seedpods (later they will be dark brown). The windows look
to the northwest, so that I often see splendid sunsets, and you know how
the sight of rose-tinted clouds can carry me away from everything and
make up for all else. At 8 p.m. (according to [the special] “summer
time,” in reality, 7 p.m.)⁶⁹⁶ the sun has only just sunk behind the
gables of the men’s prison; it still shines right through the skylights
on the roof, and the entire heavens have a golden glow. I feel so happy
then, and something—I know not what—makes me sing softly to myself the
Ave Maria by Gounod (you know it of course).

Many thanks for copying out the items by Goethe. [The poem] “Men of
Entitlement” [_Die berechtigten Männer_] is really very fine, although I
had never been struck by it before; we are all open to suggestion in our
judgment of something’s beauty. If you have time, I wish you would copy
out for me “Anacreon’s Grave” [_Anakreons Grab_] by Goethe. Do you know
it well? Hugo Wolf composed a song [_Lied_] from it, which first enabled
me to really understand it. Set to music, it conveys an architectonic
quality: One seems to see a Greek temple rise before one’s eyes.

You ask, “How does one become good?” How does one get the “subaltern
demon” inside oneself to be quiet? Sonyichka, I don’t know any way other
than to link up with the cheerfulness and beauty of life which are
always around us everywhere, if one only knows how to use one’s eyes and
ears, and thus to create an inner equilibrium and rise above everything
petty and annoying.

Just now the sun—I took a little break from writing, to observe the
heavens—has dropped much lower behind the [men’s prison] building, and
high up in the sky, myriads of little clouds have silently assembled—God
knows from where—their edges have a silvery sheen, but in the middle
they are a soft gray, and with all their ragged outlines they are
heading north. In this procession of clouds there is so much smiling
unconcern that I have to smile along with them, just as I always go
along with the rhythm of life around me. With the presence of a sky like
this, how could one possibly be “bad” or petty? As long as you never
forget to look around you, you will always be “good” without fail.

It surprises me a little that Karl [Liebknecht] wants a book
specifically about bird calls. For me the voice of the birds is
inseparable from their habitat and their life as a whole, it is only the
whole that interests me, rather than any detached detail. Give him a
good book on the geographical distribution of animals, which will
certainly give him a lot of stimulation.

I hope you will soon come to visit me. Send me a telegram as soon as you
have permission to visit.

I embrace you many times, your R.

God bless me! I’ve written eight pages! Well, let that be enough for
this time. Thanks for the books.

Please tell Mathilde [Jacob] right away that in my Leipzig case the
appeals hearing has been set for the 8th of this month, in Dresden, the
Regional Court of Appeals [_Oberlandesgericht_], at 2^(II) Court Street
[_Gerichtstrasse_], room 154.⁶⁹⁷

TO MATHILDE JACOB

Breslau, August 6, 1917

My dearest Mathilde!

Today, Monday, I received both your letters (of the 1st and the 3rd)
together. And for the sake of keeping you properly oriented: I had
received before that a postcard from you on the 1st of August and on the
2nd a postcard again, as well as the joint postcard from you and Marta
[Rosenbaum]. I waited before writing you my letter until I had
confirmation from you of the receipt of my first one, which now has
happened. — The boxes from Wronke arrived here on the 2nd. I of course
unpacked them immediately and by now am “all set up”! Both rooms at this
point look halfway human, only I fear that matters will not work out
properly, and I will have to restrict myself once again to one cell. Two
rooms are really fine if one has access to them, but I’m always tightly
locked into one of them, and before I can manage to gain access to the
other cell, I have to knock and get the woman guard into action. Aside
from the fact that it goes against my grain to frequently ask someone
for something in my own behalf, it is also practically impossible,
because she naturally has many different duties and is often not at her
station at all; in addition, she is generally not there from 1 to 4 p.m.
(afternoon break), and after 6 in the evening she’s off, whereas I am
allowed to have the light on until 10. And in view of all that, things
are difficult, and either I am blocked off from my bed, where I can lie
down in between working sessions or if I’m not feeling well, and blocked
off from my “tea-cooker” and my medicine cabinet, or else I’m separated
from my desk and the light in the evening. In other words, it’s
different here from Wronke and also from Barnim Street, where people
“under protective custody” were locked up only at night and during the
day were allowed to move freely in the prison, and as I said, I doubt
that under these circumstances things will work out with the two cells,
although of course it would be very difficult to end up in one narrow
cell with all my things. But all that will soon be sorted out, so please
don’t be upset about it. Things will just have to proceed in whatever
way possible. —Since Friday I have been down with miserable stomach
trouble, but I hope it will be better now. I think it’s from the bread
here, which I have to get used to. Other than that, the food that the
woman buys for me is very good.⁶⁹⁸ The specialist Dr. Oppler, who has
been given permission to treat me, wrote to me that he will be on
vacation until the end of August. Meanwhile, of course, the resident
physicians are here; but for the time being I obviously can’t be helped
much, because my stomach rejects all medications. Please don’t be
worried about that either; I am getting better already.

You write that Sonya [Liebknecht] is looking forward to visiting me
soon, but you say no word about whether she has obtained permission. But
after all, that is the main problem, and until that happens all the joy
of looking forward to it doesn’t mean much.

You’re still not addressing your letters correctly. Please take note:
two envelopes and double payment of postage are unnecessary. Simply use
this address: Kommandantur [Commandant’s Office] Breslau, for Frau Dr.
R. Luxemburg. That is entirely sufficient. I hear that someone wrote a
postcard here and mentioned both the Commandant’s Office and the prison
[in the address]; naturally the card went there first, and no time was
gained in the process. (I haven’t received that postcard yet.) At the
Commandant’s Office people know well enough where I am to be found.
Please also alert Sonya, Marta, etc., how they should address their
letters. I had a dear letter from Mehring and will answer him some time
soon.

It seems to me that you have grown colder toward Mimi!… I feel hurt by
that. Believe me, she surely feels it. She will become apathetic,
sluggish, and inactive. Do be kind to her, as before!

I thank you for the green tablecloth, and also I can get along quite
well without the two pictures, and so it’s better not to send too much
more! I could use some sort of small book for entertainment. Send it
simply in an envelope or a newspaper wrapper, I received one from
Math[ilde] Wurm that came very quickly; otherwise it’s not worth it.
—Yes, my jar containing adhesive material has gone kaput on me, so
please send me another by way of Sonya. I embrace you a thousand times,
and also Mimi! Your R.

[P.S.] My most heartfelt greetings to your dear mother!

TO HANS DIEFENBACH

[Breslau,] August 13, 1917

Hänschen, I recently wrote a short greeting to you on a postcard and
already have a great longing for a good and proper letter from you. Here
I am leading the regimented existence of an ordinary prisoner, that is,
I’m locked up in my cell day and night and the only thing I see across
from me is the men’s prison. I am of course allowed to walk as much as I
want in the prison yard below, but it is the usual paved yard for
business activities, situated between prison buildings, and prisoners
with work assignments rush back and forth across it, busy with their
tasks, so that while I’m there, engaging in the minimum amount of
physical activity prescribed by the doctors for health reasons, I
restrict the length of my walk and look around as little as possible.
The comedown in comparison to Wronke is a harsh one in every respect,
and I say this not to complain, but only to explain why for now I cannot
write you any letters woven out of rose perfume, blue sky, and wreaths
of cloud, as you were accustomed to receive from Wronke. My cheerfulness
will definitely come back—after all, it exists within me in
inexhaustible quantities—only I must first, to some extent, get my
carcass in order, and to date there has been a disturbing absence of
such order. My stomach has been rebelling for the past week and a half,
so I had to stay in bed a whole week, and even now I’m living mainly on
hot compresses and thin soup. The underlying reason is not clear to me.
Probably it’s the reaction of my nerves to the harsh worsening of my
overall living conditions. Today things are already going somewhat
better, I was down below in the sun for an hour, and I think the worst
is over. In the yard there are two narrow strips of ailing grass, which
are heavily trampled by the prisoners who cross them to hang out their
laundry or take it down, so naturally the grass cannot attain a state of
luxuriance. Nevertheless, in those strips I’ve already identified some
commonly occurring species, though all are in crippled condition; a few
dwarf-sized yarrow plants are blooming, and a dozen hawkweed are lifting
up their sunny yellow heads (surely you are familiar with them without
knowing their botanical name; they look like dandelion flowers, only
much smaller). The white cabbage butterflies, now fluttering around in
droves, like to perch on them. There are also a few pigeons, as in any
prison yard, they are from the neighboring area, but feel quite at home
here and come hurrying over whenever grain sacks (used by the military)
are turned inside out and shaken, probably because bits of grain fall
out now and then. Other than that only a few sparrows are hanging
around.

I am now reading Mignet and Cunow on the French Revolution. What
inexhaustible drama, which stirs and enchants one over and over again!
(Actually I find the English revolution [of the Cromwell era] more
powerful, more full of imagination, and more brilliant [in its own way],
even though it was performed in drab Puritan costumes.) I’ve already
read Guizot three times, but will take him up again even more often.

I am busily working on the Korolenko translation, which I promised to
deliver by the end of the month. However, because of my illness there
has been a substantial delay. —How does the thing strike you?

It occurred to me that perhaps you’ve been writing letters to me
addressed to Frau Dr. Lübeck and that no one here knows that that’s me.
In any case: I’ve received NOTHING from you here and am now waiting with
longing for a letter. Here letters are much dearer guests for me than
they were at Wronke.

So long until the next letter,

Affectionately yours, R.

N.B.: Of course I have already established my identity here as FRAU DR.
LÜBECK⁶⁹⁹ and you can address your letters to me as such without any
worries. Directly to the Commandant’s Office [Kommandantur]. Couldn’t
you send me something in the way of _belles lettres_? I am entirely out
of [such books]. Sonya [Liebknecht] sent me a bunch—utterly
impossible … I enclose a short piece about Shakespeare for you (by Dr.
Morgenstern).⁷⁰⁰

TO HANS DIEFENBACH

Breslau, August 27, 1917

Hänschen, today is a gloomy day, with lousy rainy weather, and so I’ve
been sitting all day long locked up in my “den.” But now they’ve brought
me the mail: a few letters, and among them … from you— and so I’m happy
and cheerful again! It’s a relief to me too that our correspondence has
again begun to flow. By the way, I wrote a letter addressed to you at
Stuttgart, but I was able to get it back and am writing this to replace
it.

Poor Hannesle, I can sense the mood in which you now find yourself, and
I definitely feel the need to hear more from you about your troubles and
sorrows. I would also be in favor of your relocating now to Stuttgart in
order to be near your aging father. If one can no longer help in any way
or do anything, at least it would lighten the burden if you were near
him. Your mere presence would do the poor man good, and you know, later
on one tends to reproach oneself bitterly for every hour that one did
not devote to the old folks. I was not so lucky as to be able to do even
that little bit. I of course had to take care of the pressing business
of humanity and make the world happy, and so I encountered the news of
my father’s death when I returned to Berlin from the International
Congress in Paris,⁷⁰¹ where I had been knocking about with Jaures,
Millerand, Daszyński, Bebel, and God knows who else until the feathers
fairly flew, and meanwhile the old gentleman [Luxemburg’s father]
couldn’t wait any longer, and probably said to himself there was no
point, because I actually had “no time” for him or even for myself—and
so he died. When I returned from Paris he had already been buried for a
week. NOW of course I would be wiser, but people mostly become wise when
it’s too late. So if you can do something, go to your old man and stay
with him to the end. This advice is no small sacrifice on my part. After
all, I feel as though you’re closer [when you’re] at Lissa, and I would
feel totally and completely abandoned if you went to Stuttgart. But I do
have time—NOWADAYS I have a lot of time—and ultimately the mail would
bring me word of you even from there.

Romain Rolland is not an unknown person to me, Hänschen. He is certainly
one of the white ravens [i.e., a rarity] _intra et extra_ _muros_,⁷⁰²
one who, confronted by the war, did not fall back into the psychology of
Neanderthal times. I have read a German translation of his
_Jean-Christophe in Paris_. I don’t want to hurt your feelings, but as
always I want to be quite honest: I found the book to be very brave and
congenial, but more of a pamphlet than a novel, not a true work of art.
I am so unmercifully sensitive about such things that for me even the
most beautifully written tendentious work is no substitute for the
simple and divine quality of genius. But I will be very glad to read
more by him, especially in French, which in itself will be a pleasure
for me, and perhaps I will find more in other volumes than in this one.

How do things stand, though, with my _Fool in Christ_ by Hauptmann?
Haven’t you read it yet? In the mood you’re in now it would be a real
treasure for you. But if you’ve gone through it already, I urgently
request your opinion of it.

For the last few days, wasps have been buzzing into my cell in huge
numbers. (Naturally I keep the window open night and day.) They come
here with a purpose, in search of nourishment, and as you know, I keep
open house. I’ve put out a little bowl for them with all sorts of
goodies on it, and they busily load themselves up. It’s a pleasure to
see these tiny creatures disappear out the window every few minutes
carrying a new load, betaking themselves to a faraway park, whose green
treetops I can barely see off in the distance, and after a few minutes
they come flying back in through the window and go right to the bowl.
Hänschen, what a fabulous capacity for orientation exists in these
little eyes, no larger than a pinhead, and what memory power the wasps
have! Day after day they come, and that means that during the night they
don’t in the least forget the way to that “fine burgher’s lunch table”
behind the bars! At Wronke I observed them daily on my walks in the
garden, the way they bored deep holes and passageways in the earth
between the paving stones, bringing to the surface the dirt they had dug
out. In every square meter there were dozens of such holes, quite
indistinguishable [from one another] to our human eyes. Yet each one of
these creatures knew exactly and immediately which hole was its own when
it returned from a big excursion out in the wide world! Birds pose
enigmas of the same kind in their migrations, with which I have recently
become better acquainted. Hänschen, do you know that in their autumnal
flights to the south, large birds like cranes often carry on their backs
an entire load of smaller birds, such as larks, swallows, gold crests,
etc.?! This is not just some fairy story for children, but a
scientifically verified observation. And the little ones cheerfully
twitter and converse in their “seats on the bus”!… Do you know that in
these autumnal migrations it often happens that birds of prey—sparrow
hawks, falcons, harrier hawks—will make the journey in a single flock
together with little songbirds, which they normally feed upon, in other
circumstances, but during this journey a kind of God’s truce [_treuga
Dei_], a general armistice, is in force? When I read something like this
I am so thrilled and it puts me in such a mood of _joie de vivre_ that I
begin to consider even Breslau a place fit for humans to live in. I
myself don’t know why this affects me so; perhaps it’s because I’m
reminded again that life is indeed a beautiful story. Here at first I
came close to forgetting that, but now it’s coming back to me. I will
not let things get me down.

Write soon. Affectionately, Your R.

[…]

TO FRANZ MEHRING

[Breslau,] September 8, 1917⁷⁰³

With one eye laughing and the other eye weeping I am also following the
inexhaustible outpourings of Kautsky’s pen. He never grows tired of
continuing to calmly spin out one elaborate “topic” after another with
the patience of a spider, breaking everything down neatly into short
sections with subheads, all of which are given “historical” treatment,
that is, beginning with the mists of primordial time and coming right
down to the present. But when it comes to the main thing, he still
doesn’t know what he thinks he knows. I keep thinking of Fritz Adler,
who on his last visit to Berlin told me he agreed completely with
Junius.⁷⁰⁴ In reply to my interjection, “But I thought you held the same
position as Kautsky?” he said: “How could anyone do that? Even Kautsky
doesn’t hold the same position as Kautsky.” Nevertheless, the
Scheidemanns will soon make a martyr of him [Kautsky] and thereby allow
his barren glory to shine freshly again.

TO MARTA ROSENBAUM

[Breslau, after November 12, 1917]

My dear Martchen!

Many thanks for your heart-warming card. For me too your visit here⁷⁰⁵
was a physical and spiritual refreshment, from which I draw nourishment
even now. You radiate so much love and kindness it must give warmth to
everyone. Also, this time everything went more nicely and in a more
“human” way than I had feared, and I hope that next time you are here
things will go even better. For the rest, I am living ever onward in the
same way as before: during the walks in the ugly prison yard I dream to
myself of something beautiful so intensively that I don’t notice the
surroundings at all, and the rest of the time I read in my cell and work
in a calm mood the whole time. For a week or so my thoughts have of
course been on Petersburg.⁷⁰⁶ With impatient hands both morning and
evening I seize on the latest newspapers, but unfortunately the news is
meager and confused. Lasting success there is certainly not to be
counted on, but in any event the courage to seize power is in itself a
punch in the face for Social Democracy here and for the whole slumbering
International. Kautsky, at any rate, knows nothing better than to
“demonstrate statistically” that Russia’s social relations are not yet
ripe for a dictatorship of the proletariat! A worthy “theoretician” of
the Independent Social Democratic Party! He has forgotten that
“statistically” France in 1789, and also in 1793, was even much less
ripe for the rule of the bourgeoisie.… Fortunately, for a long time now
history has not been going according to Kautsky’s theoretical recipes,
so let’s hope for the best.

What are you reading now? What are you writing? (Just think, I still
haven’t gotten my shoes back!… What a funny business.) Dear Martchen,
keep yourself fresh and cheerful and again accept my thanks for
everything. N.B.: The matron here is enthusiastic about you. Drop me a
line once again (without making any mention of this letter). I embrace
you warm-heartedly and send many good wishes to your husband and to Miss
Ann, and also to the violets. Your R.

TO LUISE KAUTSKY

Breslau, November 15, 1917

Dearest!

Thanks for your couple of words, which have put me to shame, because I
certainly wrote you so briefly and bluntly about the horrible news.⁷⁰⁷
But I had just received word and felt: in such a case brevity and
frankness are the most merciful things, as with a serious operation. I
still find no words to say about it.

I only wish that I could now be with you and Hans [Kautsky], because to
me it is as though the atmosphere of love among us three is somehow
woven around him too and keeps him alive.

I still fail to come out of the deep shock. How can this be possible? To
me it is like a word cut short in mid-sentence, like a musical chord
broken off, although I still keep hearing it.

We had a thousand plans for life after the war. We wanted to “enjoy
life,” travel, read good books, and gaze in wonder, as never before, at
the coming of spring.… I cannot comprehend it: How can this be possible?
Like a blossom torn off and trampled underfoot …

Dearest, hold your head high. One must remain proud and show nothing. We
must close our ranks a little more tightly, so that it becomes “warmer.”
I embrace you and Hans in the truest love. Your R.

TO MATHILDE WURM

[Breslau,] November 15, 1917

My dearest Tilde!

How much I would have liked to write to you much earlier; but I hope you
know that my not writing till now did not depend on me: I did send you
word that now I have to restrict myself in the number of letters I
write. Other than that, my thoughts were and are often with you and in
particular I find it so sweet and touching of you to provide for me so
splendidly with the work of your hands. It gladdens my heart every time
when something you have baked arrives and says to me smilingly: Tilde’s
is a nature directed toward the real and the practical, her love and
friendship like to take palpable form [_handgreifliche Forme_]_. Nota
bene_, it made me laugh when I read in your previous letter that
E[mmanuel Wurm] had celebrated his 60th birthday. At the first moment I
thought you had written it incorrectly: that it should have been 50;
then I realized that, after all, that probably couldn’t be right. But
how little this venerable numeral fits with the fresh and supple image
one has of him, and the same goes for you, my dear girl! Well, I was
unable to congratulate him and you on time, so please accept belatedly
my most heartfelt best wishes, including for your birthday, whose date
is unknown to me. I was very troubled to hear that Emmo [Emmanuel Wurm]
was so badly under the weather, but now you write me that he has
improved considerably. That shows once again how colossally flexible the
man is and how he only needed some relaxation and the proper routine in
order to be in good health as ever.

I didn’t write anything to you about the “measures taken”⁷⁰⁸ because,
aside from the fact that I cannot write when I want to, I have too
little to say about this matter. I am not capable of becoming indignant
about people and things that have been “beyond good and evil” for a long
time. I would like to be able to deal with it in a cool, free manner,
without many words, but effectively … Since I cannot do that, I prefer
to remain silent. It is not to my taste to relieve myself with indignant
words restricted to a small circle.

I am living here in the fashion you are familiar with: always buried in
books, preferably of the kind that take me far away from the present and
from the species Homo sapiens. I’m referring to scientific works. Only
rarely am I able to read works of literature, and then only good ones.
Pardon me, dearest, but I still cannot feel friendly toward _Hyperion_,
because Hölderlin [its author] is, generally speaking, foreign to my
nature. However, it may be that someday suddenly I will find my way to
him. Something like that has already happened to me several times. For
example, today I finished _Simplicius Simplicissimus_ by Grimmelshausen,
which has been in my possession for years—in the beautiful edition by
Alb. Langen—but earlier I found I had no taste for it. It is a vast and
powerful portrait of the Thirty Years’ War era, a picture of the
barbarization of society in Germany at that time. I nevertheless advise
you not to read it just now, [because] it would perhaps depress you very
much. I just read it all at one sitting only in order to numb myself and
be distracted, because I have been struck a heavy blow: Hans Diefenbach
has fallen. I know that life will go on, that one must continue and
remain firm and courageous and even cheerful, I know all that—I will
soon be done with [grieving] it, all by myself, and actually I’d rather
not talk about it.

Tell me, have you read Gerhart Hauptmann’s _Fool in Christ_? I have
already asked you about it once. Reply without fail. You must read it,
because the book will refresh your spirit like a hike in the high
mountains.

Quite a while ago I received from Margarete Wengels a heartfelt letter
that made me very happy. I would so much have liked to write back to
her, if only I could. I will do so at the next opportunity. Meanwhile,
give her greetings many times over from me.

My heart beats anxiously for the Russians, but unfortunately I have no
hope for a victory by the Leninists. Yet to me such a demise is
certainly preferable to “living on for the Fatherland”.

Farewell for now, my dear girl, I hope to see you here in the near
future. Remain cheerful and bold. Everything will indeed be different
and better when the times get around to it. In Conrad Ferdinand Meyer’s
_Hutten_ [full title, _Hutten’s Last Days_] it says at one point: “The
greatest things are done by those who cannot do otherwise.”… And so we
will wait it out.

I kiss you and press your hand! Your Rosa

[P.S.] If you send me something [of value], do so only as a registered
package or send it C.O.D. Too many packages are being lost. Recently
another one from Klara [i.e., Clara Zetkin] [was lost]. Thanks for the
volume of Mörike’s letters. I am reading it with pleasure.

TO CLARA ZETKIN

[Breslau,] November 24, 1917

My dearest Klara!

I’m writing you by way of an opportunity [i.e., a letter smuggled out of
prison, avoiding censorship by the authorities], so make no reference to
it in any future letter from you.

Many thanks for both of your detailed letters, which I received at the
same time, because the package was under way for ten days. I already
wrote you that I had the news about Hannes on the 9th [of November].

Gerlach, who writes to me from time to time, sent me [the news]
immediately, for which I was very grateful to him. There is no point
“making words” about it.

It did me so much good that Maxim [Zetkin; one of Clara’s sons] was so
deeply affected by H[annes]’s death. Ask him in a letter if he remembers
the leave-taking on the balcony at my house on August 2, 1914, when
Hannes, like a child with tears in his eyes, protested to us that he did
not want to and could not go to war, [and that] he had the feeling he
would not return, [and] how I had to comfort him like a little child.
All the while Maxim was quietly smiling in his way, but he also had, I
think, tears in his eyes. At the time I accompanied them both a long way
through the fields. I saw H[annes] once more [when I was] at liberty in
Berlin in 1916, and later he also came to visit me at Wronke.

I hope you too will have a good healthy rest now, since you are looking
forward so much to your upcoming visit. It will soon be New Year’s and
then one can already begin anticipating spring, which will bring you out
into your garden again. I am doing some gardening here on a small scale.
Everyone is showering me with flowers and potted plants, so that I have
an entire winter garden in my cell and must spend quite a bit of time on
them, watering and spraying all these “little people” every morning.
Among other things I coaxed a fuchsia into blooming a second time in
October, and from it, as the result of a careful pinching back of its
blossoms, there came a yield of FRUIT! Never before had I seen the likes
of it, because, after all, thoughtless humans always clip off the faded
blossoms and never allow the fruits to form. Thus I find it very
interesting to see what comes out. It’s a red, fleshy little fruit the
size of a hazelnut with many gray seeds inside. By the way the fuchsia
belongs to the same family as the rosebay [_Weidenröschen_] (_Epifolium
augustifolium_). I now have a large blossoming white lily and we will
see what kind of fruit comes from that.

In the way of animal life the only thing I have here are pigeons, which
I feed and which rush down on me from all sides every morning, when I’ve
scarcely managed to appear in the doorway to the prison yard.

Have you gotten back the _Oblomov_?⁷⁰⁹ I asked that it be sent to you
more than a month ago. I wanted to have it sent by registered mail, but
the postal system here doesn’t register items. Forgive me, but I could
read no further than page 25. In earlier days I read it once in Russian
and was very inspired. Now it strikes me as so unbearably long-winded
and colorless, and above all the main character, beginning with the very
first page, appears as a completely standard type, the portrayal of
which is carried to the extreme, so that I have no notion of what he
might have further to offer; any character development and therefore
interest [for me] is immediately closed off. So then, many thanks, but
for me it was impossible.

I have now received, among other things, a small book by Hans Paasche
entitled _Fremdenlegionär Kirsch_ [Foreign Legionnaire Kirsch], which
interests me only because of the author. I don’t know if you know
anything about him. Hans P[aasche] is the son of the former vice
president of the Reichstag [Hermann Paasche], recently was married to
the daughter of Witting, the lord mayor of Poznań (brother of Harden),
and they both made a honeymoon trip to the sources of the Nile River,
and in the process the woman, who is completely fluent in Swahili, went
through all the taxing experiences together with her husband. The two of
them wrote a book about it (an excerpt from which I read in the
_Berliner Tageblatt_), in which they express themselves in such a humane
and freedom-loving way about the African people that the book was
immediately confiscated and ground to pulp. Hannes wanted to buy it for
me, but he was no longer able to obtain it. Now this same H. Paasche has
recently been arrested—as it seems, the arrest was caused by a leaflet
in which he is said to have appealed to the women workers in the
munitions branch of industry to hold a mass strike!… The fact is that he
is undergoing investigation. Isn’t it wonderful that suddenly one can
still discover human beings, REAL MEN, and in circles where they are
least to be expected? See, for an additional example, how bravely Th.
Wolf conducts himself in the _BT_ [_Berliner Tageblatt_], particularly
if one compares him to the _Vorwärts_.

The war between the frogs and mice, between the “Independents” [members
of the USPD] and the Scheidemanns, makes me sick. I am really no longer
capable of reading the victory reports about the speaking tours of
Vogtherr, Geyer, and Dittmann, especially when I can picture these
figures so well. How miserably and ridiculously they bore themselves in
the “notable” Michaelis affair (concerning the rebel sailors at
Wilhelmshaven). It was enough to make you howl.⁷¹⁰

Well, may the devil take the whole bunch of them. I am in a good mood in
spite of it all in regard to the general situation, because I am now
convinced that in the next few years a great upheaval in all of Europe
is unavoidable—especially if the war lasts much longer—and that is more
than likely.

The events in Russia are of amazing grandeur and tragedy. Lenin and his
people will not of course be able to win out against the insuperable
tangle of chaos, but their attempt, by itself, stands as a deed of
world-historical significance and a genuine milestone— unlike the
“milestone” that was always declared at the close of every
doglike-ordinary-crummy-lousy German [SPD] party congress by the blessed
Paul [Singer; co-chair of the SPD Executive]. I am sure that the noble
German proletarians, just like the French and English workers, will at
the present time calmly look on while the Russians bleed to death.

But in a few years everything, all around, will have to change, and no
cowardice and weakness will be able to prevent it. Besides, I now regard
all these things in a completely calm and cheerful manner. The more the
general bankruptcy takes on gigantic dimensions and steadily persists,
the more it will become obvious in an elementary way that appropriate
measures must be taken against it. It is ridiculous to become indignant
against humanity as a whole, one must study and observe things with the
calmness of a research scientist. I have a feeling of certainty that
events will now take a decisive turn. I am merely curious whether I will
have to admire all this through the prison bars.

I of course read very diligently your “women’s supplement.”⁷¹¹ I feel
very sorry for poor Berta [Thalheimer], but I have received a few lines,
cheerful and brave, from her. I don’t know whether my reply has reached
her.

Margarete Wengels writes me very nice letters. It was a terrible shame
about her son, who was my student [at the SPD party school]. Westmeyer
is a great loss.⁷¹² I always thought he had a role still to play in
times of great events.

I embrace you many times, Your R

[P.S.] Please address letters only as follows: Kommandantur
[Commandant’s Office], Abt. [Section] IId, Breslau, Karl Street.

(Don’t send me any more salted meat; because it doesn’t agree with me.
Many thanks for the apples!)

TO SOPHIE LIEBKNECHT

Breslau, November 24, 1917

My dear little Sonyichka, I had already promised myself to make use of
the opportunity [of a smuggled letter, avoiding censorship by the
authorities] to write you again. Now also your dear letter arrived
yesterday, and I must chat with you, although unfortunately I don’t have
as much time or peace and quiet for that as I would like.

Don’t talk to me about “hysterical ladies,” my little chickadee. Don’t
you understand, haven’t you noticed, that, to add to your misfortune,
our best women friends are also suffering. Look at the eyes of poor
Marta [Rosenbaum], in which such a nameless sorrow lies and such
inexpressible anxiety and fear—fear that life’s storehouses have already
been closed and the reality of life has not been touched or enjoyed to
the full. And Luise [Kautsky]—when I first got to know her she was quite
a different person than she is now—robust, content, almost
thick-skinned, and quite mature. Since then sorrow and [the strain of]
dealing with people other than her husband have turned her into a soft
and overly sensitive being; look in her eyes: how much astounded shock,
restlessness, groping and searching, and painful disillusionment there
is! And all that is the same thing you complain about.… I don’t bring
all this up to offer you an insipid consolation to the effect that since
other people also suffer you should forget your own suffering. I know
that for every person, for every creature, one’s own life is the only
single possession one really has, and with every little fly that one
carelessly swats and crushes, the entire world comes to an end, in the
refracting eye of the little fly it is the same as if the end of the
world had destroyed all life. No, the reason I tell you about other
women is precisely so that you will not underestimate and disregard your
own pain, so that you won’t misunderstand yourself and won’t have a
distorted picture of who you are. Oh, how well I understand that for you
every lovely melody, every flower, every spring day, every moonlit night
represents a longing for, an allurement toward the greatest beauty the
world has to offer. And how well I understand that you are “in love with
love”! To me it would also be true that love in itself is always more
important and holier than the circumstances that give rise to it. And
that is so because it allows the world to be seen as a shimmering fairy
tale, because it brings out the noblest and most beautiful qualities in
each person, because it raises up the most ordinary and insignificant
detail and sets it around with diamonds, and because love makes it
possible to live in euphoria, in ecstasy.… But, little Sonyusha, you
have not come to the outer limit of life, like Marta and Luise. You are
young and beautiful, and in the times to come you must live right. One
only needs to survive these few fatal years, but after that—so much is
bound to be different one way or another. You should not and must not
close your accounts with life. That’s ridiculous. I would still like to
immerse you in all the euphoria of the joy of life, and I will firmly
defend your right to experience it.

You are wrong that I am predisposed against the modern poets. About
fifteen years ago I was reading Dehmel enthusiastically.⁷¹³ —I was
especially enchanted by some prose work or other by Dehmel— [about
being] at the deathbed of a beloved woman—I have only a dim recollection
of it now. Arno Holz’s _Phantasmus_ is something I can still recite from
memory. At that time Johann Schlaf’s _Spring_ (poetry in prose form)
thrilled and delighted me. Then I broke away from those new loves, and
returned to Goethe and Möricke. I don’t understand Hoffmannsthal, and I
know nothing of [Stefan] George. It is true that in all of them I take
somewhat amiss the combination of perfect form with the absence of a
grand and noble philosophy. This cleavage between form and substance
produces in me an impression of vacancy, so that the beauty of form
becomes a positive irritant. As a rule they give wonderful portrayals of
mood. But there is more to human beings than their moods.

Sonyichka, the evenings are so magical now, as though it were spring.
Around 4 p.m. I go down into the prison yard, where twilight has already
begun, so that the hideous surroundings are shrouded in the mysterious
veil of darkness, but in contrast, the sky still glimmers with a sweet
blue light, in which there floats a moon of clear silver. Every day at
about this hour, high in the sky, hundreds of crows pass diagonally
across the prison yard in a ragged, widely spread out flock heading out
to the fields to the “roosting tree,” where they will spend the night.
They fly with their wings flapping leisuredly and exchange peculiar
calls—quite different from the sharp _krah_ with which they rapaciously
chase their prey during the day. Now the call sounds soft and muted, a
deep, throaty call that somehow gives me the impression of a little
metallic globule. And when several of them take turns gurgling out this
_kau-kau_ one after the other, to me it is as if they were at play,
tossing one another little metal balls that arc gently through the air.
They’re chatting calmly about what they’ve experienced, talking “of the
day, of the day enjoyed today …” [“_vom Tage, vom heute genossenen
Tag_”].⁷¹⁴

They seem to me so full of grave importance, the way they follow their
custom every evening, flying the same designated path, [and] I feel
something like reverence for these large birds, gazing after them with
my head tilted back—till the very last one is gone. Then I wander to and
fro in the dark and see the prisoners who are still hurriedly doing
their jobs in the yard, like indistinct shadows flitting about, and I’m
happy that I myself am invisible—so alone, so free with my reveries and
the stolen greetings that have passed between me and the flight of crows
overhead—and the balmy, springlike breeze feels so good to me. Then the
prisoners with the heavy kettles (the evening soup!) go across the yard
into the building, two by two, marching in step, ten pairs of them, one
after the other; and I bring up the rear, the last person in the yard;
in the workshops and in the yard the lights gradually go out; I step
into the building and the doors are doubly locked and bolted—day is
done. I am feeling so well in spite of the pain over Hans [Diefenbach].
Actually I am living in a dream world in which he is not dead. For me he
lives on, and I often smile at him when I think about him.

Sonyichka, my little darling, be well. I’m so glad you’re coming. Write
soon—for now, by the official route, certainly that also works —and use
the opportunity [of a smuggled letter] when you can.

I embrace you, Your R.

TO LUISE KAUTSKY

[Breslau,] November 24, 1917

Dearest Lulu!

I recently wrote you a few lines. I’m now taking advantage of the
opportunity [to smuggle out a letter, avoiding censorship by the
authorities], although it’s difficult for me to write anything right
now. With YOU I can of course speak about almost nothing except HIM.⁷¹⁵
But it is exactly on this point that there is nothing to say. At least I
cannot form any words. I dare not even think about it, otherwise I could
not bear it. On the contrary, I live on with the dream that he is still
here, I see his living form in front of me, chat with him in my thoughts
about everything, in ME he continues to live.

Yesterday my letter to him of October 21 was returned, that’s the second
one already. Letters that never reached him.

I had a sweet letter from his sister, she must be a fine woman, but then
she is Hannes’s sister after all.⁷¹⁶

So then, what are you doing and what is your life like without all your
youngsters? It certainly must be very quiet and empty at home now for
you. So how do you spend your days? I still picture you the way you were
at Wronke in May, you looked so sweet then, you had such an
anxious-painful expression in your eyes. You didn’t see me watching you
from my hiding place. You were walking across the prison yard to the
“house,” with a small suitcase full of gifts in your hand. I looked at
your dear face and thought to myself: how young those gray-blue eyes are
in which there lies so much restless, dissatisfied searching and such
helpless torment, those eyes are about twenty years younger than the
rest of you appears to be; they reveal that inside you there is still,
as ever, the groping, searching, anxious young woman. How I love you
precisely for that inner uncertainty!… I wish I were out of here now, so
that I could sit and chat with you. Dearest, don’t be despondent, don’t
live like a little frog that’s been stepped on! Look, we still have—at
least we do here—such marvelous, mild, springlike days, and the evenings
with a moon of silver are so beautiful. I never get my fill of going out
in the twilight for my walks in the prison yard. (I intentionally go out
in the evening so as not to see the walls and the surroundings in
general.) Read something beautiful! Do you have some good books now?
Please be sure to write me about what you’re reading, perhaps I’ll send
you or at least recommend you something beautiful that will refresh you.

I’m up to my ears in studying geology, which stimulates me to an
extraordinary extent and makes me very happy. I only get nervous when I
think about how short a lifespan is still ahead of me and how much there
would still be to learn.

Are you happy about the Russians? Of course they won’t be able to hold
out in this Witches’ Sabbath—not because statistics show such backward
economic development in Russia, as your clever spouse has it all worked
out, but because the Social Democracy in the highly developed West
consists of miserable cowardly dogs, who, while looking on calmly, will
let the Russians bleed to death. But a downfall like that is better than
“living on for the Fatherland.” It is a world-historical deed, the
traces of which will not have disappeared eons from now. I expect even
more great things in the coming years; but I would like to admire the
course of world history—not only through the bars on the cell window …

Dearest, be calm and firm, be cheerful in spite of everything—and write
me soon. I embrace you. Your R.

TO SOPHIE LIEBKNECHT

[Breslau, before December 24, 1917]

Sonyichka, my little bird, I was so happy about your letter, I wanted to
answer right away, but I had a lot to do right then, and I had to
concentrate on it intensely, and therefore I couldn’t allow myself the
luxury [of writing]. Then my preference was to wait for an opportunity
[to smuggle out a letter, avoiding censorship by the authorities]
because it is certainly much lovelier to be able to chat among ourselves
entirely free of compulsion.

I thought of you every day while reading the news from Russia and with
concern I imagined you might be upset for no good reason by every
senseless news dispatch. Certainly what comes from over there nowadays
consists mostly of scare stories, and that goes twice for news from the
south [of Russia].⁷¹⁷ The news agencies (on both sides) have a vested
interest in exaggerating the chaos as much as they can, and they
tendentiously blow every unverified rumor out of proportion. Until
things become clarified, there is no sense in being worried so much at
random and in advance [before anything has actually happened]. In
general things there seem to be proceeding without much bloodshed, or at
any rate all the rumors of “slaughter” remain unconfirmed. It is simply
an embittered conflict between parties which, when illuminated by
bourgeois news correspondents, always comes out looking like pure hell
and madness gone wild. As far as pogroms against Jews are concerned, all
rumors of that kind are directly FABRICATED. In Russia the time of
pogroms has passed once and for all. The strength of the workers and of
socialism there is much too strong for that. The revolution has cleared
the air so much of the miasmas and stuffy atmosphere of reaction that a
new Kishinev has become forever passé.⁷¹⁸ I can sooner imagine— pogroms
against Jews here in Germany.… Anyhow an atmosphere conducive to that
prevails here, one of viciousness, cowardice, reaction, and
thick-headedness.

In this respect you can therefore be completely reassured about southern
Russia. Things there have come to the point of a sharp conflict between
the St. Petersburg government and the Rada,⁷¹⁹ and so a resolution and
clarification must occur soon, at which point one will be able to get a
view of the real situation. From all standpoints it makes no sense, and
there is no purpose, in your tearing your hair out about the unknown. Do
bear up bravely, my little maiden, hold your head high, remain calm and
firm. Everything will turn out for the best, the only thing is not to
always expect the worst!…

I firmly hope to see you here soon, in January. Now it turns out,
Mat[hilde] W[urm] wants to come in January. For me it would be difficult
to go without your visit in January, but of course I cannot arrange
these things. If you explain that you cannot come at any other time,
perhaps things will remain as planned; can Mat[hilde] W[urm] perhaps
come in February? Anyhow, I would like to know soon when I am going to
see you.

It has now been a year that Karl has been sitting in Luckau.⁷²⁰ I have
often thought about that during this month. And exactly one year ago you
were with me at Wronke, and you gave me a beautiful Christmas tree as a
gift.… This year I have had one purchased for me here, but they brought
me a completely shabby one with scraggly, skinny branches—there is no
comparison with last year’s. I bought eight little lights, but I don’t
know how I’m going to put them on it. This is my third Christmas in the
clink, but you should certainly not take that tragically. I am as calm
and cheerful as ever.

Yesterday I lay awake for a long time—these days I can’t fall asleep
before 1 a.m., but I have to go to bed at 10, because the light goes out
then, and then I dream to myself about various things in the dark. Last
night this is what I was thinking: how odd it is that I’m constantly in
a joyful state of exaltation—without any particular reason. For example,
I’m lying here in a dark cell on a stone-hard mattress, the usual
silence of a church cemetery prevails in the prison building, it seems
as though we’re in a tomb; on the ceiling can be seen reflections coming
through the window from the lanterns that burn all night in front of the
prison. From time to time one hears, but only in quite a muffled way,
the distant rumbling of a train passing by or quite nearby under the
windows the whispering of the guards on duty at night, who take a few
steps slowly in their heavy boots to relieve their stiff legs. The sand
crunches so hopelessly under their heels that the entire hopeless
wasteland of existence can be heard in this damp, dark night. I lie
there quietly, alone, wrapped in these many-layered black veils of
darkness, boredom, lack of freedom, and winter—and at the same time my
heart is racing with an incomprehensible, unfamiliar inner joy as though
I were walking across a flowering meadow in radiant sunshine. And in the
dark I smile at life, as if I knew some sort of magical secret that
gives the lie to everything evil and sad and changes it into pure light
and happiness. And all the while I’m searching within myself for some
reason for this joy, I find nothing and must smile to myself again—and
laugh at myself. I believe that the secret is nothing other than life
itself; the deep darkness of night is so beautiful and as soft as
velvet, if one only looks at it the right way; and in the crunching of
the damp sand beneath the slow, heavy steps of the sentries a beautiful
small song of life is being sung—if one only knows how to listen
properly. At such moments I think of you and I would like so much to
pass on this magical key to you, so that always and in all situations
you would be aware of the beautiful and the joyful, so that you too
would live in a joyful euphoria as though you were walking across a
multi-colored meadow. I am certainly not thinking of foisting off on you
some sort of asceticism or made-up joys. I don’t begrudge you all the
real joys of the senses that you might wish for yourself. In addition, I
would only like to pass on to you my inexhaustible inner cheerfulness,
so that I could be at peace about you and not worry, so that you could
go through life wearing a cloak covered with stars, which would protect
you against everything petty and trivial and everything that might cause
alarm.

I’m interested that in Steglitz Park you picked a beautiful bouquet of
black and pinkish-purple berries. The black ones must have been either
elderberries—they hang in heavy, thick clusters among large feathered
(pinnate) leaf fronds, surely you know them—or they were privet berries:
slender, petite, upright panicles amid long, narrow, small green leaves.
The reddish-purple berries hidden under little leaves could have been
those of dwarf medlar: actually they are usually red, but often so late
in the year, they are a bit overripe and starting to rot, and thus
appear reddish-purple; the leaves are similar to those of myrtle, small,
with pointed tips, dark-green, leathery above and rough underneath.

Sonyusha, do you know Platen’s _Fatal Fork_? Can you send it or bring it
to me? Karl once mentioned that he had read it at home. The poems by
[Stefan] George are lovely; now I know where that line comes from that
you used to recite when we were walking in the fields: “And underfoot
the rustling of rusty stalks of grain” [_“Und unterm Rauschen rötlichen
Getreide”_]. When you get a chance, can you write out a copy for me of
“New Amadis”?⁷²¹ I love that poem so much—naturally thanks to the song
Hugo Wolf composed from it—but I don’t have it here. Are you reading
further in _The Lessing Legend_?⁷²² I’ve taken up Lange’s _History of
Materialism_ again, it always stimulates and refreshes me. I’d like so
much for you to read it someday.

Oh, Sonyichka, I’ve lived through something sharply, terribly painful
here. Into the courtyard where I take my walks there often come military
supply wagons, filled with sacks or old army coats and shirts, often
with bloodstains on them … They’re unloaded here [in the courtyard] and
distributed to the prison cells, [where they are] patched or mended,
then loaded up and turned over to the military again. Recently one of
these wagons arrived with water buffaloes harnessed to it instead of
horses. This was the first time I had seen these animals up close. They
have a stronger, broader build than our cattle, with flat heads and
horns that curve back flatly, the shape of the head being similar to
that of our sheep, [and they’re] completely black, with large, soft,
black eyes. They come from Romania, the spoils of war.… The soldiers who
serve as drivers of these supply wagons tell the story that it was a lot
of trouble to catch these wild animals and even more difficult to put
them to work as draft animals, because they were accustomed to their
freedom. They had to be beaten terribly before they grasped the concept
that they had lost the war and that the motto now applying to them was
“woe unto the vanquished” [_vae victis_] … There are said to be as many
as a hundred of these animals in Breslau alone, and on top of that these
creatures, who lived in the verdant fields of Romania, are given meager
and wretched feed. They are ruthlessly exploited, forced to haul every
possible kind of wagonload, and they quickly perish in the process. —And
so, a few days ago, a wagon like this arrived at the courtyard [where I
take my walks]. The load was piled so high that the buffaloes couldn’t
pull the wagon over the threshold at the entrance gate. The soldier
accompanying the wagon, a brutal fellow, began flailing at the animals
so fiercely with the blunt end of his whip handle that the attendant on
duty indignantly took him to task, asking him: Had he no pity for the
animals? “No one has pity for us humans,” he answered with an evil
smile, and started in again, beating them harder than ever.… The animals
finally started to pull again and got over the hump, but one of them was
bleeding … Sonyichka, the hide of a buffalo is proverbial for its
toughness and thickness, but this tough skin had been broken. During the
unloading, all the animals stood there, quite still, exhausted, and the
one that was bleeding kept staring into the empty space in front of him
with an expression on his black face and in his soft, black eyes like an
abused child. It was precisely the expression of a child that has been
punished and doesn’t know why or what for, doesn’t know how to get away
from this torment and raw violence.… I stood before it, and the beast
looked at me; tears were running down my face—they were HIS tears. No
one can flinch more painfully on behalf of a beloved brother than I
flinched in my helplessness over this mute suffering. How far away, how
irretrievably lost were the beautiful, free, tender-green fields of
Romania! How differently the sun used to shine and the wind blow there,
how different was the lovely song of the birds that could be heard
there, or the melodious call of the herdsman. And here—this strange,
ugly city, the gloomy stall, the nauseating, stale hay, mixed with
rotten straw, and the strange, frightening humans—the beating, the blood
running from the fresh wound.… Oh, my poor buffalo, my poor, beloved
brother! We both stand here so powerless and mute, and are as one in our
pain, impotence, and yearning. —All this time the prisoners had
hurriedly busied themselves around the wagon, unloading the heavy sacks
and dragging them off into the building; but the soldier stuck both
hands in his trouser pockets, paced around the courtyard with long
strides, and kept smiling and softly whistling some popular tune to
himself. And the entire marvelous panorama of the war passed before my
eyes.

Write soon. I embrace you, Sonyichka. Your R.

Sonyichka, dearest, in spite of everything be calm and cheerful. Life is
like that, one must take it as it is, [and remain] brave, undaunted, and
smiling—in spite of everything. Merry Christmas!…

R.

TO FRANZ MEHRING⁷²³

[Breslau,] December 30 [1917]

How fine that your _Marx_ is at least assured [of publication] and will
soon appear,⁷²⁴ which is truly a gleam of light in these sorry times. I
hope the book will be a stimulus and an encouragement for a great many
people and at the same time a nostalgic reminder of that lovely time
when one did not yet have to be ashamed to call oneself a German Social
Democrat.

TO FRANZ MEHRING⁷²⁵

[Breslau,] March 8, 1918

I absolutely cannot tell you how shaken I was by your last letter and,
in particular, by the news of your awful accident.⁷²⁶ On the whole I
have been putting up with my slavery, which is now going into its fourth
year, with the true patience of a lamb, but now, under the painful
impact of this news, a feverish impatience overtakes me and a burning
desire to be let out of here immediately, to rush to Berlin, and to
verify with my own eyes how you are doing, to hold your hand and chat
with you for an hour or so. Not to be able to do all this and to have to
lie here in this cell like a dog on a chain with the men’s prison
constantly in view on one side and a madhouse on the other—after your
letter all this has truly stirred me into a state of rebellion.

I have the firm confidence, in spite of everything, that by next year we
will finally be able to gather around you again on your birthday, and
then—I’m counting on the dialectic of history, which in the end must
surely find a way out of all this confusion and come out onto a grand
and open road. I do not doubt for a moment that you, with all of us,
will soon be breathing somewhat purer air than that which one now has to
breathe.

TO ROSI WOLFSTEIN

[Breslau,] March 8, 1918

My dear Rosi,

You brought me great joy with your package and the lines you wrote—they
arrived punctually on the 5th [Luxemburg’s birthday]. The kittens and
the little elephant made me particularly happy. If one could only put an
end to this “happiness in a little corner,” the enjoyment of which I am
now in the fourth year of experiencing. But world history nowadays
certainly reads like a bad book, a sensationalist novel in which glaring
effects and bloody deeds pile up with gross exaggeration and in which
one sees no real people but just wooden puppets in action. Unfortunately
one cannot simply throw this bad book away, one has to grit one’s teeth
and go through it. Nevertheless—“it does move.”⁷²⁷ Not for one moment do
I have any doubts about the ongoing dialectic of history … I am
currently informed about your fate, even if only briefly. I hope you
will always be as fresh, lively, and undaunted as I have known you to be
previously. News from you always does me good. Again, many thanks and I
give you the most heartfelt clasp of the hand! Your R. L.

TO CLARA ZETKIN

[Breslau,] March 11, 1918

My dearest Klara!

How much joy you have given me with your princely package and your
letter! A magnificent bouquet of orchids from you and a great big basket
of white and blue hyacinths from Costia [i.e., Kostya Zetkin] have
transformed my cell into a winter garden. The books are a delight to me;
previously I had only the poems of Mörike, now I will read his novel
_Maler Nolten_ [Nolten the Painter]. The _Italienische Reise_ [Travels
in Italy] by Goethe is a wonderful, beautiful edition. The illustrations
in it truly gladden my heart. The cookies were magnificent, and of
course the apples and salted meat were also. Please write to Costia that
I thank him very much and have been made very happy. How lovely that you
finally have Maxim [Zetkin] back. I also received a very sweet letter
from Hannes’s sister,⁷²⁸ along with flowers and presents from all sides.
If only one had the mood to indulge oneself in all these joys!
But … Indeed you know it yourself [what I mean]. Lord above and damn it
all to hell, if I could only talk with you for a few hours _de omnibus
rebus_.⁷²⁹ Yes, cookies and cakes!… Here too there has been a sliding
back into winter, but not for long, I hope. I feel very tense about your
new living companion, the lynx; he better not go after the kittens,
otherwise I will not want to hear anything about him. I embrace you a
thousand times and send heartfelt best wishes to your menfolk. R.

TO MATHILDE JACOB

[Breslau,] May 28, 1918

My dearest Mathilde,

I received your letter yesterday, which pleased me very much after such
a long wait, then at noon your dear package also arrived safely. I
mentioned to you already in a letter that I had also received, earlier
and on time, the box with the little cookies. That probably escaped your
notice. But again I URGENTLY request that you not send me any more
things to eat! You must respect my request. I NEED NOTHING AT ALL, give
it all to others who really need it more, or to your dear mother from
me, that would be a real joy for me. —As for the shoes, we will buy them
here. —I’m glad to hear that you have returned to a bit of reading and
reflecting; with this in mind, get hold of Nexö’s _Sunday_, [a novel]
which I already gave to Marta [Rosenbaum] to pass on to you eons ago! I
will soon write you at greater length. For today, let me just add, many
heartfelt greetings, and to all your family as well. Your R. L.

TO LUISE KAUTSKY

[Breslau,] May 28, 1918

Dearest, thank you for the postcard, a small sign of life from you gives
me great joy. I can imagine how very much in demand you are now, and I
gather that you have shattered the lovely plans of Igel’s idyll,
although it made me feel a little bit sorry for him⁷³⁰ and also for you.
I simply don’t understand from your card whether you are giving up the
entire trip or just postponing and shortening it. Most likely the latter
is the case! If you do make the trip, I’ll definitely get news of that
first, isn’t that right?

Now to Korolenko!⁷³¹ Just think what occurred to me during a sleepless
night last night: it suddenly became clear to me that I cannot agree to
someone else’s touching the manuscript! To me the thought is unbearable
that a work would be published under my name which would not be MINE
right down to the dotting of an I. It’s incomprehensible why this has
only now occurred to me, but things between us were certainly going with
the usual haste and the confusion of saying goodbye, so that I didn’t
properly come to my senses [until now]. In any case my desire is now
definite, and in my own mind I am quite clear about it and I want to
“come out” just as I am [_telle quelle_]—with all my Slavisms and other
blemishes to my beauty. So please, be so kind as to give the whole thing
to Cassirer [the publisher] for printing “unsweetened, unsoured, and not
watered down,” the same way that my noble countrymen are accustomed to
swallowing down their rum, and come what may [_vogue la galère_]. What
has already been done—that should be allowed to stay of course, but not
one stroke more. You will of course be angry with me with full
justification for having robbed you of so much time, but unfortunately I
cannot change that, and I console myself with the thought that you also
had such a great interest in Korolenko, and above all, I did want to
know your opinion about the whole thing. So once again: don’t be angry
at me, and give it all to Kestenburg [the editor] quick as you can.

I can get by with the material [that I have] for the introduction, and I
thank you many times over for what I have received. I do not want to be
overly wordy, and I intend to keep it short. I reported about that,
incidentally, directly to Cassirer. As soon as you receive the
concluding part from Mathilde J[acob] and have read it, please write me
your final, definitive opinion about the work (and also about the
translation).

I am delighted that the _Beethoven_ pleased you so much.⁷³² Tell me
something, you have never mentioned whether you’re familiar with Gorky’s
[short story] “Three Men and a Girl.” I would very much like to know
what you think of it. To me, quite frankly, it was painful that this
very item has now been presented to the German public, because it gives
a quite antiquated and therefore false picture of Russia. Write soon, if
only a brief line or two!

I embrace you a thousand times. Your R.

TO CLARA ZETKIN

Breslau, June 29, 1918

Dearest Klara, I strongly hope that these lines reach you on time by
July 4 to let you know how much my heart and my thoughts are with
you.⁷³³ When I wrote you from Wronke on your birthday last year I never
thought that this year too I would be prevented from traveling to be
with you, and today I only wonder: how much longer must I be satisfied
with birthday greetings in the form of a letter? More than that I do not
ask because there is no point and it makes no sense. It seems like we’re
just going on forever, which fortunately, even Kühlmann now
recognizes.⁷³⁴ How glad I am, and what a consolation and reassurance it
is for me, that you are enjoying at least a kind of “freedom,” if only
in the highly atrophied form that is determined by the “circumstances of
the time” and the state of your health. Recently on a visit to you Erna
found you fairly fresh and lively as ever—or so it was reported to me. I
am counting very much on your garden, which must be quite splendid now
in the “month of roses,” to strengthen and refresh you for the winter,
both the past one and the one to come. Surely Mehring’s book⁷³⁵ has
given you great joy, I find it magnificent and promise myself it will
have a powerful impact on the masses. If only they will read it! The
“décor” [i.e., the physical appearance] is indeed abominable, but for me
this outer wretchedness is a certain blessing in disguise, because at
least it corresponds to the inner core, the essence, of life today, and
it is not like the snobbish, elegant furnishings [provided for books] in
earlier times, because those represented only a hypocritical outer
shell, in crying contradiction to the inner malaise of spiritual life.
Did Franziskus [Franz Mehring] consider the criticism of the
parliamentary group fairly well done? I enjoyed it tremendously.⁷³⁶

I just had a visit from Miss Jacob, who could only stay here briefly
this time, so that we had to hold our conversations one right after the
other. She left yesterday. For me it was of course a great joy and very
refreshing [to have her here], particularly since I had seen no one
since the middle of April. But she is exhausted beyond all bounds,
extremely overworked, and yet in spite of it all is as fresh and mobile
as ever. The Old Man [Franz Mehring], in contrast, complains very much
about his condition, unfortunately. I feel so bad about what he wrote in
his last letter—that he would have wished for something better in the
twilight of his life. I want to hope, for his sake, that he will still
be able to experience something lovelier than the world war.

Do you have good news from your youngsters?⁷³⁷

Hannes’s sister⁷³⁸ must be a dear and fine person. We are corresponding,
and she has promised to send me books from his library; recently she
even sent me some baked goods! It’s really charming of her to do that
for a person she has never met. Unfortunately, restricted as I am, I can
only rarely write a line to anyone. And to you first of all! You can
imagine how much I would like to write you often and at length!
However—we’ll wait until we can finally really TALK with one another.

I send you once again a thousand greetings and best wishes and hug you
with all my heart. Let me hear from you again very soon! Your R.

[P.S.] Best wishes to “the Poet.” I don’t know whether my _Gil Blas_⁷³⁹
will give you some pleasure. I enjoyed reading it.

TO ROSI WOLFSTEIN

Breslau, July 16, 1918

My dear Rosi, I unexpectedly received such a nice “poke in the ribs”
[_Rippenstoss_] that I want to send you a few lines right away. I asked
long ago by way of Miss J[acob] that many thanks from me be passed on to
you for the recent sweet package you sent, and I hope that happened
[i.e., that it was passed on]. How might things be going with you now?

The constant sameness of my experiences, at least of the “outer” ones,
is well provided for; as for the “inner” ones, they are probably not
very different from yours and those of other friends of ours, except
that I have to—keep them to myself. —I’m afraid that you, so greatly
burdened down with tasks as you are, can hardly get around to reading
books, whereas for my part I am wallowing in an excess [of reading
matter]. Have you read Mehring’s book on Marx? Thank you also for the
[engraving of a] little hare by Dürer, a dear old acquaintance who I was
delighted to see again.

All best wishes and a heartfelt clasp of the hand to you from your R. L.

TO CLARA ZETKIN

[Breslau,] July 23, 1918

Dearest Klara!

Your silence makes me so uneasy. If only I knew how you were doing, how
things stand with your health, whether you have good news from your
youngsters.⁷⁴⁰

With me there’s nothing new, I read a lot, work a lot, and think my
thoughts about what’s going on out in the world. I don’t see the
slightest indication of when and how all this ought to end, but history
does not stand still, and it will surely know soon what path to take
next. Did you get some joy out of Mehring’s book? Write to me! I embrace
you with all the true loyalty of old and send you a thousand greetings.
Your R.

[P.S.] Yesterday it was one year since I started sitting here, and on
the 10th it was two years since I was arrested the second time. —I put a
bean plant in a pot for myself; it has become a large bush with great
big beans on it.

TO JULIAN MARCHLEWSKI⁷⁴¹

[Breslau, end of July or August 1918]

Dear Julek! Thanks for the short letter, I will be extraordinarily happy
to receive news regularly [from you]. For my part, I can communicate
only opinions and impressions because [information] reaches me only
third-hand [about] the actual state of affairs [in Soviet Russia] but do
you think I can transmit my views to you in this way without fear [_sans
gêne_]?⁷⁴² Because I don’t know, I am not so familiar with the
people … The impression given by the latest turn of events is generally
abysmal.⁷⁴³ One would like to give the Bolsheviks a terrible
tongue-lashing, but of course [political] CONSIDERATIONS do not allow
that.… Perhaps these things don’t make such a disastrous impression on
you there, in the midst of the chaos, as they do here, perhaps. Send me
further news as precisely as possible about what is going on. The
specter of an alliance with the “Middle Kingdom”⁷⁴⁴ seems to become ever
more threatening, and that would indeed be the ultimate in swinishness,
really a rope around the neck [would be] better.

Now an urgent matter: Leo [Jogiches] must be gotten out [of prison].⁷⁴⁵
In particular the attorney⁷⁴⁶ has submitted a formal request to your
people there, asking them to LAY CLAIM TO L[eo] as theirs [as a Russian
citizen]. The representative here⁷⁴⁷ is in agreement, but the demand
[addressed to the German government] must come directly from the city in
which you are living.⁷⁴⁸ So get the people there working, whomever you
have to (and Józef⁷⁴⁹ should do that too), so that they make the claim
without delay, and do so energetically. Leo knows all about it and is
prepared. It would also be helpful for you!⁷⁵⁰ Please send me word right
away that you have received this and have done what is necessary. You
must concern yourself about this matter, and do it speedily. That’s all
for today. A heartfelt handclasp for you, Bronka, and Zośka.⁷⁵¹

TO KARL LIEBKNECHT

Breslau, August 8, 1918

Dear Karl!

For your birthday I would at least like to send you direct greetings.
Through Sonya I hear about you often. I have no doubt that you remain
firm and fresh, cheerful and lively. Here’s wishing you all good things!
Till we meet again in better times!

Yours with all my heart, R. Luxemburg

TO STEPAN BRATMAN-BRODOWSKI⁷⁵²

[Breslau, September 3, 1918]

Dear comrade! Your short letter gladdened my heart. At last we are all
slowly starting to communicate with one another again. —When will we
all, God willing, once again talk and work together?!… I see that you
too are not totally enthusiastic about Józ[ef]’s activities.⁷⁵³ But in
the present situation it is rather difficult to “advise” him. First,
because, as one can see, he is already quite heavily engaged, as are all
our people there, apparently,⁷⁵⁴ but also because there is no convenient
way to do that.⁷⁵⁵ Because you understand that things are somewhat
inconvenient by this route, and one must limit oneself to the most
necessary things only …

By the way, I confess that up to now I have not received a single word
directly from Józef, and I too have not yet written to him. I am in the
process of writing to all of you to formulate some general views. At
present one must constantly take into consideration the disastrous
situation of the entire history there in their country, and that very
much restricts criticism. And yet, as you yourself will surely see in a
short time, it is impossible to remain completely silent.⁷⁵⁶ Neither he
[Józef] nor any other of our people there can change the general course
of policy, they are swimming in the general stream which is guided by
others, but actually it is guided—by fate in the direction that was once
set at Brest.⁷⁵⁷ …

I thank you for the gifts, actually for me there is no shortage of food
items, think instead about Leo [Jogiches], who needs them very much. It
seems to me that you could get in contact with him now,⁷⁵⁸ which would
definitely give him great joy. Rather than food, it would be better if
you regularly sent me news—of all kinds, about the Bolsheviks, about our
people and their work (whatever you hear), as well as about conditions
in Switzerland, things one cannot learn from the newspapers. I am
determined to have as vital a contact with life as possible, and from
the (geographically) closest sources⁷⁵⁹ it is extremely difficult even
now and then to extract information, partly because the number of people
is small and they are dreadfully busy, but for the most part because
they are idiots and sleepyheads (I’m talking about the Germans).

How do things stand now between our people and the Left PPS?!⁷⁶⁰ At the
beginning of the war, as far as my talks with Walecki went, it seems to
me there were no disagreements (between us and them), I thought that the
war situation would even speed up the rapprochement between us.
Meanwhile the comrades from Poland (or even from Russia) once wrote to
me that they were completely at odds with the Lefts [of the PPS] and
that they [the Lefts] were completely disoriented. What do you know
about that [?] At any rate greet Walecki [for me].

Keep on being brave, [so long for now] till we meet again in the course
of the work! I warmly shake your hand.

R. L.

[P.S.] It would also make me happy if, when the opportunity arises, you
could supply me with information about the more interesting things that
come up in Switzerland.

I would be glad to know what role Robert Grimm, of the National Council,
is playing at present. Is he still someone to be reckoned with? What
view of Bolshevik policy do the Swiss have (those on the left, like
Platten & Co.)?

TO SOPHIE LIEBKNECHT

Breslau, September 12, 1918

My dearest Sonyichka, how happy I’ve been about your two letters! I’ve
wanted to write you for the longest time, but I haven’t been especially
well, and I always prefer to appear before you only when I am fresh and
bright in order to put you in such a mood as well. Today I am definitely
not back to normal yet, but I don’t want to delay any longer, especially
because we need to come to an agreement about your visit. I therefore
hold you firmly to your word: you are coming in October! I am already
tremendously overjoyed about it. I’m also writing to Marta [Rosenbaum]
at the same time, and I ask you to make no more changes in this
agreement. That means of course if it’s still comfortable and agreeable
to you! Should anything come up that makes your visit in October
inconvenient, then write to ME without any further attempt to arrange a
“trade” with someone else. Otherwise, it will remain true that I will
expect you in October, right? This time as well we will quite certainly
be able to go out together [i.e., leave the prison] once or twice, and I
look forward to that with great impatience. I have never so far had the
pleasure here of going outside together with YOU and to see a bit of the
world. Mathilde [Jacob] will tell you how you should manage that, or
[better] I’ll tell you right now, because it’s very simple: while it’s
still September, submit a request to the Commandant’s Office here for
permission to make two visits [to me] or to take two excursions [out
from the prison]. Then we’ll take ourselves off for a few hours together
in the small wooded area here and gather flowers!

Mathilde told me that it is as though you have been reborn since you
received word from your mother. That was a great comfort to me. I also
see from your letters that you enjoyed the summer vacation to some
extent. And yet I deeply regret that you did not make a proper stay out
in the country. You and I probably think and feel approximately the same
about [the merits] of west versus east, or at least similarly. The
confusion and complication of things seems to want to rise to the most
improbable peaks before human reason begins to prevail, but in the end
the reign of reason will have to come. —Nowadays I’m reading a lot in
the older German literature of the sixteenth and seventeenth centuries,
and along with that a wonderful book on botany that affects me like a
series of pure fairy stories, and yet it is a basic text and a strictly
scientific work. _—The Lost Paradise_⁷⁶¹ is a work that’s impossible for
me to read. — I’ve started it many times before—but it just doesn’t go.
I am now giving a try to _Jerusalem Delivered_ by Torquato Tasso, but I
expect just as little success. For me the light has gone out when it
comes to things like that. Can you manage to do it? The Flemish book you
sent me contains beautiful sketches, sometimes reminding me of Teniers
and then again of Breughel’s scenes from Hell.

Write soon, dearest, about whether and when you are coming.

A thousand greetings! I embrace you, your RL

TO ADOLF GECK

Breslau, September 14, 1918

Dear friend Adolphus!

Many thanks for your dear greetings and also for sending _D’r Alt’
Offeburger_. It was very heartwarming and a joy for me to receive a sign
of life from you, especially because I gathered from your letter that
you are in good health with all the freshness and liveliness of old.
What does it mean that Marie [Geck] is to enter the ranks of “Swabian
elders”? Doesn’t she first have to turn 40? Or rather, I think that
would probably be 50, right? In any case, I send her belatedly my most
heartfelt good wishes. I would be so happy to hear in more detail about
all of you, about every single particular, about the boys as well as the
girls! You have probably been informed about the death of our dear Hans
Diefenbach. With me there is nothing new: I’m “sitting,” working,
reading, and—waiting. I send heartfelt greetings to all of you many
times, and do let me hear from you again.

Devotedly, as ever, R. Luxemburg

[P.S.] Please pass on my greetings as well to both Trabinger comrades.
The reminiscence about L[udwig] Frank was very lovely and well done.

TO JULIAN MARCHLEWSKI⁷⁶²

[Breslau,] September 30 [1918]

Dear Julek! Heartfelt thanks for the short letter, the greetings, and
the information. I know that Leo [Jogiches]’s case is difficult,⁷⁶³ but
all efforts must be made, I’m counting on you and Józ[ef].⁷⁶⁴ —N.B.:
From Bronka [Marchlewska]’s letter to someone else I find out that over
there some sort of malicious rumors have penetrated all the way to where
you are.⁷⁶⁵ For his part, L[eo] wrote to me about it, and I sent an
appropriate letter to that damned old ass Led[er], who is the source [of
the rumors], and in it I demanded either proof [of the accusations] or a
public retraction (i.e., in front of witnesses).⁷⁶⁶ L[eo], and you know
what he’s like, of course confiscated the letter: He didn’t want to
“wallow in the mire.” It’s obvious that such things should not be
allowed to go unpunished. I can now formally demand the presence of
Led[er] before a “court of honor,” in which I, for one, would choose the
[Soviet] envoy [Adolf Joffe] as the arbiter, and thus Led[er] would
either give an explanation or make a solemn retraction. Inform me
immediately to what extent you consider this fitting or what else you
think could be done.

Your situation, as you describe it, is something I can picture exactly
even from afar. A disastrous situation. It is clear that, under such
conditions, i.e., being caught in the pincers of the imperialist powers
from all sides, neither soc[ialism] nor the dictatorship of the
proletariat can become a reality, but at the most [what will come about
is] a caricature of both. I’m afraid that this situation is clear [only]
for you, for me, and for a few others. On the other hand, I’m afraid
that Józef has been carried away [with the idea] that economic and
political holes can be plugged up by energetically tracking down
“conspiracies” and killing “conspirators.” This notion of Radek’s, for
example, of “slaughtering the bourgeoisie” or even just threatening
along those lines, is indeed idiocy _summo grado_ [of the highest
degree]; [it] only discredits soc[ialism], and nothing more.⁷⁶⁷ Then
[came] the OFFICIAL articles in _Izvestia_ and _Vechernyaya Izvestia_ on
the occasion of the “supplementary agreement” to the Brest-Litovsk
Treaty, [and these] were indeed an outright scandal.⁷⁶⁸ This is not
incompetence and sloppiness, as you write, but a misleading of public
opinion. AND ON TOP OF THAT, PRETTIFICATION BY A NORTH GERMAN!⁷⁶⁹

For me [all this] is a symptom of what a twisted situation the
government of the Bolsheviks has been driven into since Brest. The
impression made by their entire foreign policy since Brest is extremely
equivocal. For example, Józef’s latest “master stroke”: the constant
uncovering of Anglo-French conspiracies,⁷⁷⁰ along with his appeal “to
the civilized world”; this arouses only an ironical shrugging of the
shoulders in view of the question: well, and what about Ukraine,
Finland, Poland, and the Baltic countries??⁷⁷¹

In view of these stupidities, next to which those of the Anglo-French
are nothing, [why] haven’t you opened your mouths there, have you
appealed to the civilized world about that? This one-sidedness of policy
since Brest—the unlimited submissiveness toward the abominations of one
side and the great hue and cry over the stupidities of the other
side—undermines any moral authority in [Soviet foreign] policy and makes
it _nolens volens_ [willy-nilly] a tool of one of the two camps. I know
that the reason for this is the complete military helplessness [of the
Soviet government _vis-à-vis_ Germany], but then [there should be]
passive behavior toward both sides. Or if one absolutely must choose in
favor of one side, then at least not the wrong side!…

The work among us here has gone to the dogs since L[eo]’s illness. They
are all softies [_Waschlappen_], and besides they have “no time” for the
work, above all if it’s not paid for in cash. For “work” at the
embassy⁷⁷² —which is sheer foolishness, and nothing more—they do have
time; because there the pay is great. As for the paper and leaflets,⁷⁷³
for which there is now a stormy demand, Maciej Rózga⁷⁷⁴ is the only one
who’s doing any writing, no one else will lift a finger. But not only is
there no time for Maciej to write up reasonable commentaries about the
situation but also one has to suck everything out of one’s thumb or from
the telegraphic dispatches of WTB!⁷⁷⁵ But what can we say about all
this? You are familiar with these people. Surely some terrible things
will have to happen before these people bestir themselves and start to
move. But even after that it looks like they would move slowly. The
scandal for socialism will be definitive if once again peace is dictated
by cannon—American cannon this time—rather than by the action of the
proletariat. Nevertheless, perhaps something will start to move under
the pressure of events. Four weeks ago it looked like big things were
under way in the Rhineland,⁷⁷⁶ but of course our blockheads didn’t
accomplish anything politically and the movement collapsed.

Write often, we absolutely must keep in touch. I have also heard from
Florian.⁷⁷⁷ Write to me about Wesoly,⁷⁷⁸ how his health is, how he
looks, and what work he’s doing. Heartfelt greetings to Bronka, with a
request for news from her. For all our brave Polish youngsters, a
thousand greetings. Be well! Letters for me [should be] always in a
sealed envelope!

Your R.

[P.S.] What’s going on with Adolf [Warski]? Where is he? Are you in
touch with him?

TO SOPHIE LIEBKNECHT

[Breslau,] October 18, 1918

Dearest Sonyichka, I wrote you day before yesterday. Up to today I still
have no decision in reply to my telegram to the Chancellor.⁷⁷⁹ Perhaps
it may take a few more days. At any rate, I definitely feel firm about
one thing: I am already in such a mood that a visit by my friends under
observation by the prison authorities has become an impossibility for
me. I endured everything patiently through these past years and would,
under other circumstances, remain just as patient for more years to
come. But after the general turnaround in the situation a kink has
developed in my psychology. Having conversations while being overheard
by prison officials, the impossibility of talking about what really
interests me—that is already so burdensome to me that I would rather
forego any visitors until we can see each other as free human beings.

It definitely cannot last much longer. If Dittmann and Kurt Eisner have
been freed, the authorities cannot keep me in prison any longer, and
Karl [Liebknecht] will also soon be free.⁷⁸⁰ So it’s better that we wait
until we meet again in Berlin.

Until then a thousand greetings. Yours always, Rosa

TO PAUL LÖBE

[Breslau, November 8, 1918]

I am at the transport workers office at 25 Rossplatz.⁷⁸¹ Now you can
obtain a pass to see me at any hour of the night or morning before the
public rally. It is ABSOLUTELY necessary that we come to an agreement
before the demonstration. R.

TO MARIE AND ADOLF GECK

Berlin, Hotel Moltke
(my address for now)
November 18, 1918

My dear, beloved friends, so close to my heart!

I just received via Breslau the dreadful black envelope.⁷⁸² My hands and
heart were already trembling when I saw the handwriting and the
postmark, but I still hoped that the worst would not be true. This is
something I cannot comprehend, and tears interfere with my writing. What
you are going through—I know it, I feel it, we all know the weight of
this dreadful blow. I had so many expectations for him [Brandel],
boundless expectations of the contributions he would make for the party
and humanity. One has the desire to gnash one’s teeth. I would like to
help you somehow, yet there is no help, no consolation. My dear ones,
don’t let yourselves be overcome by the pain, let the sunlight that one
always felt shining in your home not go out because of this horrible
thing. We all stand under the shadow of blind fate, and it’s a
consolation for me that I too may perhaps soon be sent to the other
world—perhaps by a bullet from our enemies who are lurking on all sides.
But as long as I am alive I remain bound to you by the warmest, most
faithful, most heartfelt love, and I want to share with you your every
sorrow, every pain.

A thousand greetings, Your Rosa L.

[A second note appeared under Luxemburg’s:]

My most heartfelt sympathy and condolences, and many best wishes.

Yours, Karl Liebknecht

TO WOLFGANG FERNBACH

[Berlin,] November 18, 1918—Hotel Moltke

Dear Comrade Fernbach!

With regard to your contributing to the newspaper, we have counted on it
without any problem. There will be a lot of work, because we want to put
out another paper in addition to the _Rote Fahne_.⁷⁸³ The only thing is
that regular contact is necessary. As you can see from today’s issue,
for example, we have already dealt with the topic you chose: the death
penalty. To avoid such occurrences, it will be necessary in the future
that you always come to an agreement with us in advance on the topic and
the length. So then, the biggest difficulty: all of us on the editorial
board are of the opinion that in a single issue no more than two
[substantial] articles can appear, otherwise the paper becomes too
heavy. But currently these two are accounted for by a series of
fundamental political issues of the revolution and of tactics, so that
we cannot freely add any more articles. However, what is very necessary
and useful would be short items [_Notizen_], brief paragraph-length
newspaper items [_entrefilets_] of a current nature. These would have to
be agreed to case by case. For all these reasons it would be necessary
that you come to the editorial office sometime in the near future and
talk with us, in particular with Comrade [Ernst] Meyer, who is the
secretary of the editorial board, or with Comrade [Paul] Levi, who for
the most part deals with that “department” [that is, the kind of short
items needed]. Obviously we do not have an opening on the editorial
board at present. All that kind of thing is still to be organized and
arranged. Yet I hope everything will come together soon.

In the meantime, with best wishes, yours, R. Luxemburg

TO CLARA ZETKIN

My address: Berlin, Hotel Moltke
November 18, 1918

Dearest, in all haste, just a few lines. Since I got off the train⁷⁸⁴ I
have not yet set foot at home. Up until yesterday the entire time has
been taken up in pursuit of the _Rote Fahne_. Would it appear—or
wouldn’t it? The struggle turned on this question from early in the
morning till late at night. You must be patient with the paper,
technically it has not yet reached a high level, all of that will come
as we go along. Above all, however, I want to hear your opinion about
the content. I have the feeling that we will be in full agreement, and
that makes me happy. I am with you in all my thoughts and with all my
heart. If I could only come visit you for a day! But that will happen as
soon as the trains are functioning again. Meanwhile, write me a quick
letter. I wait with longing for your article—[keep it] quite short!
Don’t put in a lot of work. We want to have your name [in our paper]
right away. Write something perhaps about women,⁷⁸⁵ that is so important
now, and none of us here understand anything about it.

Dearest, in haste, a thousand greetings and hugs. Your RL

TO CLARA ZETKIN

Berlin, November 24, 1918
My address for now, Mathilde [Jacob]
(I still haven’t been home!)

Dearest, in fleeting haste, instead of the mile-long letter that is
written out fully in my heart, just a few pitiful lines. The main thing
is: I naturally would like to see you and speak with you. I could only
leave here for two days in about two weeks, assuming that Thalheimer and
Hoernle will in the meantime have come here to help with the paper. The
fact is that we are barely able to take care of things, and on top of
that there’s the terrible lack of space [in the paper], (and we have
especially little room for _feuilletons_ [light, popular pieces of
writing])! No doubt you saw that we were obliged to take out some of the
sentences [in your article], otherwise the issue simply would not have
gone together. We are already thinking about coming out with either six
pages or twice daily, but that of course requires more forces, and we
are waiting impatiently for Thalheimer and Hoernle, because the
soldiers’ paper and the youth paper also need forces!

Now about the agitation on women’s issues! Its importance and urgency is
clear to us exactly as it is to you. Actually, at the first meeting of
our top leadership we decided, at my suggestion, to put out a women’s
paper as well, and for this purpose (or more accurately, by this means)
to steal you from the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_.⁷⁸⁶ (By the way, the
_Leipziger Volkszeitung_ is now conducting itself so boldly that we
actually have no desire to do it any harm.) At any rate a women’s paper
must be produced by us here in Berlin, either as an independent weekly
or biweekly or as a daily supplement to the _Rote Fahne_—that would be
up to you to determine, and of course we will have to come to an
agreement about that! And it is such an urgent matter! Every day lost is
a sin.

Your idea of leaflets is of course splendid. Only one wonders if a daily
supplement to the _Rote Fahne_ wouldn’t be more practical. Everything
depends on where you are and how we arrange things so that you have the
matter fully in hand.

So before all else, a conversation at length [is needed]. As stated: the
earliest I could visit you would be in two weeks. You want to come here.
Can you really risk that? Can we take such stress and strain onto our
conscience? Because nowadays a trip from Stuttgart to Berlin comes close
to being life-threatening. Answer candidly! Your health is indeed more
important than all other considerations. Actually you could not come
here much sooner than I could come to you, because the trains are not
running.

The failings of the _Rote Fahne_ are painfully clear to me, have no
doubt about it! It’s all merely makeshift and a substitute for the real
thing, but it’s bound to get better.

All of us are in over our ears in turmoil and travail. As far as tactics
go, probably there is not the slightest difference between you and us.
This is a great comfort and joy to me! Still, there would be so much to
talk over and consult about! So for now, a thousand hugs for you and
best wishes for your menfolk. Your Rosa

TO CLARA ZETKIN

[Berlin,] November 29, 1918

Dearest, I’m nearly perishing not only because of the work and the
turmoil but also out of concern for the _Rote Fahne_, in which there is
so much still lacking and so many things are still bad. Thalheimer is
helping us with touching zeal, but he is still somewhat inexperienced
editorially, and the good [Fritz] Rück is still very young. His recent
piece signed “Juvenis,”⁷⁸⁷ which was slipped in there without my
knowledge, with the outrageous “polemic” against the Independents [the
USPD], nearly gave me a stroke. I have taken measures so that no such
thing will happen again.

In general we hear only one voice on all sides and in particular from
the Independents themselves: “_Rote Fahne_ is the only socialist paper
in Berlin.” As for the _Freiheit_, all its people are disappointed with
it, to the utmost. Recently at a session of the central executive for
Greater Berlin, as well as at the press commission for _Freiheit_, a
universal, sharply critical appraisal of _Freiheit_ was expressed and
the _Rote Fahne_ was contrasted to it as an example to follow. Only
Haase and Hilferding [the chief editor] defended it, weakly. Däumig,
Eichhorn, and others argued for taking a stand entirely on the same
grounds as ours, and the same was true for Ledebour, Zietz, Kurt
Rosenfeld—and the masses! The “Left” not only approves our criticism but
reproaches us in part for not criticizing the Independents enough. Their
aspirations are obviously to free themselves as quickly as possible from
the fatal link with the Scheidemanns and to march together with us. We
are therefore demanding a party congress [of the USPD].

Now about our _Fahne_. A decision has been made to have a weekly
supplement of half a signature as a women’s paper. You should be the one
to put it together. Go about that as you see fit. We are thinking of a
supplement that would not be theoretical—somewhat in the style of the
_Leipziger Volkszeitung_ supplement—but popular and agitational, more or
less like the _Rote Fahne_ as a whole, of the same caliber. Of course
you yourself will have to put together material for it from the press.
We would like to ask you to always put a leading article [with your
signature] in this supplement, about one or one and a half columns in
length, and then there would be all sorts of subsections and news items,
foreign, domestic, about the bourgeois women’s movement, economic items,
etc. You yourself should involve anyone you consider necessary as
collaborators, but from among people who officially stand on our
position (e.g., NOT Zietz or Mathilde Wurm, because right now that would
lead to confusion). We have the best relations with these two women
personally, but we want to wait until they too come over to us openly,
which is surely inevitable. The only ones that can be considered [as
contributors] now, I’m afraid, are Käte [Duncker], Regina Ruben, and—I
don’t know of any others. The main work would of course fall on your
shoulders, and anyhow you yourself are the one to make the arrangements
and you will definitely see how it is to be done. In terms of money the
group is in a position to bear all the necessary expenses and also to
pay you a subsistence allowance such as we all receive. One more catch!
All these plans depend on paper—which has to be fought for daily here
[in Berlin]. At any rate it is only a question of weeks, perhaps days,
before we will be able to come out with six pages and to bring out a
weekly women’s supplement. Above all, you must answer immediately
whether you are in agreement with this plan and how you conceive of
carrying out this task, that is, whether we can to some extent count on
you for help.

Your proposal concerning leaflets has been generally accepted, and you
should write the first one as soon as possible. Only there’s one
condition: keep it short! The thing is that we’re not getting any paper
that could be used for four-sided leaflets, so figure on two-sided only.
We’re waiting for the manuscript. It should be a general leaflet about
women workers and the revolution.

In addition, we want to introduce a small section entitled “From the
Women’s Movement,” of roughly one-third or one-half column, which would
mainly carry small bits of news, sometimes a commentary, etc. Käte
[Duncker] should put this together. But only when we come out with six
pages.

If only you knew how much I have to say to you and what life is like for
me here—it’s like being in a witch’s cauldron. Last night I didn’t get
home until 12:00 midnight, and then only because we were both—Karl
[Liebknecht] and I—thrown out of the only hotel in this district (near
Potsdamer Platz [Potsdam Square] and the Anhalter railroad station)!

A thousand greetings, I must close. I embrace you. Your R.

[P.S.] I just received the information, after a consultation, that there
will be no difficulty with paper for a women’s supplement. You can
therefore begin as soon as you are ready! Once again, love and kisses!

TO ADOLF WARSKI

[Berlin, end of November or beginning of December 1918]⁷⁸⁸

If our party (in Poland) is full of enthusiasm for Bolshevism and at the
same time (in a secretly printed pamphlet) has come out against the
Brest peace treaty of the Bolsheviks and against their use of the
propaganda slogan “self-determination of nations,” then it is enthusiasm
combined with critical thought—what more could we want of ourselves! I
too shared all your reservations and misgivings, but I have dropped them
on the most important questions, and on many [questions] I did not go as
far as you. The use of terror indicates great weakness, certainly, but
it is directed against internal enemies who base their hopes on the
existence of capitalism outside of Russia, receiving support and
encouragement from it. With the coming of the European revolution, the
Russian counter-revolutionaries will lose not only support [from abroad]
but also—what’s more important—their courage. Thus the Bolshevik use of
terror is above all an expression of the weakness of the European
proletariat. Certainly, the agrarian relations that have been
established are the most dangerous aspect, the worst sore spot of the
Russian revolution. But here too there is a truth that applies—even the
greatest revolution can accomplish only that which has ripened as a
result of [historical] development. This sore spot also can only be
healed by the European revolution. And it is coming!⁷⁸⁹ …

TO CLARA ZETKIN

[Berlin, probably December 20, 1918]

Dearest Klara!

I am again taking advantage of the opportunity to drop you a line. Your
little item about the doctors⁷⁹⁰ is superb and went to press right away.
Send what you can like that in small amounts, preferably of course
something with your signature. But short! We are not getting any paper
[after all] to enlarge our publication, and are suffocating in the three
[two-sided] sheets that we have at our disposal.

I see that you are fresh and lively again, and that was the loveliest
thing about the article. Comrade Unfried⁷⁹¹ is waiting, and so, in all
haste, I send you only a thousand greetings and hugs. Your RL

TO LENIN⁷⁹²

[Berlin,] December 20, 1918

[Dorogoi Vladimir,

[Pol’zuyus poyezdkoi dyadi, chtoby pereslat vsem Vam serdechnyi privet
ot nashei semyi, Karl, Franz, i drugikh.]

Dear Vladimir,

I am taking advantage of uncle’s trip⁷⁹³ to send all of you heartfelt
greetings from our family, Karl, Franz, and the others.⁷⁹⁴ [Dai Bog,
chtoby gryadushchii god vyol nam velikiye ispolneniya.] God grant that
the coming year will bring us great fulfillments [i.e.,
accomplishments].

[Vsego khoroshego!] All the best!

[O nashem zhityo-bytyo raskazhet dyadya.] Uncle will tell about our life
here.

[Poka Vam ruk[o]pozhatiya i privety.] For now [many] handshakes and
greetings,

Roza

TO CLARA ZETKIN

[Berlin,] December 25 [1918]

Dearest Klara, today for the first time since Breslau I’m sitting at my
desk, and I want to send you a Christmas greeting. How much I would
prefer to travel to visit you! But that is out of the question, because
I am chained to the editorial office,⁷⁹⁵ and every day I am there until
midnight, at the printing presses to oversee the making up of the issue,
and besides in these disturbed times the most urgent information and
instructions that must be given still come in at 10 or 11 at night, and
they must be responded to immediately. On top of that almost every day,
from early in the morning, there are conferences and discussions, and
public meetings in between, and as a change of pace every few days there
come urgent warnings from “official sources” that Karl and I are
threatened by gangs of killers [_Mordbuben_], so that we are not
supposed to sleep at home but must seek shelter somewhere else, until
the point was reached that this business became too stupid, in my
opinion, and I simply came back here to Südende. I have been living this
way, in the midst of tumult and turmoil and all in a rush from the first
moment, and I don’t have time to come to my senses or get my bearings.
In all this I have only one small favorable prospect: we are expecting
Julek [Marchlewski] soon, [and] then I could perhaps relax for a short
time and go to visit you. It only depends on when he will succeed in
coming across the border.⁷⁹⁶

The nsions are growing sharper here, both outwardly—with the Ebert
people—and internally, in the USPD. You are probably receiving _Rote
Fahne_ regularly now and you see that we never cease to call for a party
congress [of the USPD]. Yesterday there came an official REJECTION of
that demand. The party is in complete disarray—Ströbel, Haase, Bock (!),
and the _Freiheit_ are openly demanding that a “line of demarcation be
drawn against the left,” which means against us. On the other hand, in
the provinces the merger between the USPD and the Scheidemanns is in
full swing. Zietz is now conducting herself in an extremely ambiguous
manner: it was she who cooked up a “nationwide conference” [instead of a
party congress] and who blocked the holding of a party congress.

Tuesday! And now yesterday [that is, on December 25 during the day—this
letter being written around midnight at the end of Christmas day] there
was of course a “revolutionary disturbance” again. There was an enormous
demonstration [and march] to the Imperial Palace,⁷⁹⁷ and then a section
of the demonstrators spontaneously headed for the _Vorwärts_ building
and occupied it! An armored car and 18 machine guns were found inside! I
was then called in a hurry to a session and didn’t get home here until
11:30 p.m. tonight. Today [on December 26] I have to go back into the
city right away. And that’s how it’s been all these days. It remains
that way, at least as I am writing this hasty greeting.

A thousand best wishes! Yours

TO CLARA ZETKIN

[Berlin,] December 26 [1918]

Dearest, I just received the lines you wrote on December 23. That I
should come visit you now is UNTHINKABLE, I can’t abandon the paper
[_Rote Fahne_] for even one day. The prospect that you would come here
gives me a thousand reasons to rejoice.

Here you have friends waiting for you longingly, also a vast field of
operations, and me with open arms. My little home is naturally at your
disposal and awaits you. From now on I will send you the _Rote Fahne_
myself every day. Write AS SOON AS POSSIBLE whether and when you are
coming. The thought of it makes me happy.

I embrace you with all my heart, as ever, your RL

TO CLARA ZETKIN

[Berlin, December 1918]

Dearest Klara!

I was so happy about the news that you are doing better. A heavy weight
fell from my heart, and I was able to go back to work so refreshed. Now
I am again waiting with longing for further news of how you are doing.

The work here is developing splendidly. Our friend Münzenberg will do
the best job of telling you about it more fully. Also about my and our
views on the most important questions.

As soon as you are back to normal we will talk about the work. We here
are in the process, among other things, of laying the basis for the work
with women and for educational work. We are still weak, unfortunately.
Käte D[uncker] is very ill and not capable of doing much. And other than
that we have no forces!

I myself am so much in tumult and turmoil that I have no time to even
think about how I am. “_C’est la révolution_.” If only I knew that you
were well, then for me everything would go splendidly.

A thousand greetings to all of you, sent in haste.

I embrace you with all my heart, your RL

TO MARTA ROSENBAUM

Berlin, January 4, 1919

My dear, beloved Martchen!

I am sending you, together with a thousand greetings, the first issue of
_Rote Fahne_, the struggle over which has kept me breathless from
morning till night all the past many days. I have the most urgent need
to see you, to hug you, to talk with you. Kurt [Rosenfeld] told me you
felt hurt by me. For me that was like having a rooftile fall on my head.

During the whole time of our friendship haven’t I earned so much trust
that misunderstandings would be ruled out? It was painful for me. Well,
even this has to be accepted; we have to talk, and no shadow can be
allowed to stand between me and my dear Marta, with the heart of gold. I
tried to reach you by phone yesterday, but the call didn’t go through,
and later I didn’t have a moment to spare. I want to see if I can get
through to you today.

In the meantime I embrace you with all the love and loyalty of old, a
thousand times, greeting you and your husband as well. Your Rosa L.

TO CLARA ZETKIN

[Berlin,] January 11 [1919]

Dearest Klara,

Today I received your detailed letter, finally got around to reading it
in peace and quiet, and what’s still more incredible, to answering it.
It is impossible to describe the way of life that I—and all of us—have
been living for weeks, the tumult and turmoil, the constant changing of
living quarters, the never-ending reports filled with alarm, and in
between, the tense strain of work, conferences, etc., etc. I literally
could not find time to write you. I’ve only seen my own place now and
then for a couple of hours at night. Perhaps tonight I will succeed in
writing this letter. Only I really don’t know how to begin, I have so
much to tell you.

Well then, first of all, as far as nonparticipation in the elections is
concerned:⁷⁹⁸ you overestimate enormously the scope and consequences of
this decision. There are no “Rühle-ites,” and Rühle was by no means a
“leader” at the conference. Our “defeat” was only the triumph of a
rather childish, half-baked, one-dimensional radicalism. But that was
only at the beginning of the conference. In its later course the feeling
between us (of the central leadership) and the delegates was restored to
a sound basis, and when I returned briefly to the question of
participation in the elections during my report I already felt quite a
different resonance than at the beginning. Don’t forget that the
“Spartacists” are for the most part a fresh new generation, free of the
stupefying traditions of the “grand old party, tried and true.” —And
that must be viewed in both its aspects, of light and shade. We all
decided unanimously not to make too big an issue of this point and not
to take it too tragically. In reality the question of the National
Assembly [and the elections to it] will be shoved into the background by
the storm of events, and if the course of events continues as it has so
far, it will prove to be highly questionable whether things will even
reach the point of elections and a National Assembly. Your judgment of
the matter (and by this I mean [what you consider] the tragic nature of
the decision) is quite different from ours, because unfortunately you
now have no feeling for the details, as we do, and moreover, a feeling
for the particular situation, for which one would require the experience
of direct observation. My first impulse, when I read your letter and
your telegram about the elections question, was to send you a telegram:
Come here, quick as you can. I am CERTAIN that one week’s stay here and
direct participation in our activities and consultations would be enough
to establish complete conformity between you and us in each and every
respect. Now, however, I see myself obliged to say the opposite to you:
Wait a little while about coming here, until we have quieter times
again, to some extent. To live in the present turmoil and hourly danger,
the constant changing of living quarters, the strain and the rushing
around, is not for you, and in particular there would be no possibility
at all of working or even consulting in an orderly manner. I hope in a
week or so the situation will have clarified itself in one way or
another and regular work will again be possible. Then your relocating
here would be the beginning of a systematic collaboration, in the course
of which mutual agreement and a commonly shared understanding will come
about automatically.

_Nota bene_: We have not taken any “Borchhardtians”⁷⁹⁹ into the
organization. On the contrary, Borchardt was expelled from the
“International Communists”⁸⁰⁰ and indeed that was done on our demand.
For the most part the “Communists” were from Hamburg and Bremen.
Certainly this acquisition [_Erwerbung_] has its thorny aspects, but in
any case these are secondary matters, which one has to get past and
which will be straightened out as the movement progresses.—

On the whole our movement is developing splendidly, and throughout all
of Germany at that. The split from the USPD had become absolutely
unavoidable for POLITICAL reasons, because even if the PEOPLE were still
the same as at Gotha,⁸⁰¹ nevertheless the SITUATION has become totally
different.

The severe political crises that we’ve experienced here in Berlin during
all of the past two weeks or even longer have blocked the way to the
systematic organizational work of training our recruits, but at the same
time these events are a tremendous school for the masses. And finally,
one must take history as it comes, whatever course it takes. —The fact
that you are receiving _Rote Fahne_ so infrequently is disastrous! I
will see to it that I personally send it to you every day. —At this
moment in Berlin the battles are continuing.⁸⁰² Many of our brave lads
have fallen. Meyer, Ledebour, and (we fear) Leo [Jogiches] have been
arrested.

For today, I have to close.

I embrace you a thousand times, your R.

1 It is unclear who “Nadina” was. The editors of the German edition of
Luxemburg’s letters (_Gesammelte Briefe_, vol. 6 [Berlin, 1993]) do not
identify her. In other letters to Krichevsky, in 1893, 1895, and 1898,
Luxemburg refers to Krichevsky’s wife as “Fenya,” presumably a nickname
derived from a longer first name that is nowhere specified. The
Krichevskys had two daughters: Raya (or Raissa), nicknamed Rayechka
and/or Rayinka; and Nadezhda, nicknamed Nadya and/or Nadechka (and
possibly “Nadina”).

2 The four letters to Boris Krichevsky in this collection were
originally written mostly in Russian. Occasional passages that were in
German (or Latin or French) in the original have been italicized to
indicate they were in a different language. The Russian originals of the
letters to Krichevsky are in the Russian State Archive for Social and
Political History (RGASPI), in Moscow. An excerpt from the 1891 letter
was first published, in Polish translation, in Róża Luksemburg, _Listy
do Leona Jogichesa-Tyszki_ (Letters to Leo Jogiches-Tyszka), compiled
with an Introduction and notes by Feliks Tych, vol. 1, 1893–99 (Warsaw,
1968), p. xxvii (of Tych’s Introduction).

3 Oberstrass was the bohemian university quarter in Zurich, where, among
other things, the Polish Readers’ Hall was located. It was a district
favored as a gathering place by Polish and Russian student groups. In
this mostly Russian-language letter, the word _Oberstrass_ was written
in the Western alphabet; hence, it is in italics.

4 In the small French town of Mornex on the border near Switzerland,
Georgy Plekhanov and Vera Zasulich had been living since 1889. After
members of the Russian populist and terrorist group Narodnaya Volya
(People’s Freedom) exploded a bomb in the hills near Zurich in March
1889, both Plekhanov and Zasulich were expelled from Switzerland as
undesirable foreigners.

5 Russian: “continual, unbroken humming.”

6 This city, the birthplace of Leo Jogiches, is now known by its
Lithuanian name, Vilnius. In Polish it was called Wilno, in German,
Wilna, and in Russian, Vilna. Several members of Jogiches’s family were
still living there in 1893: his mother Zofia, his brothers Pawel and
Józef, and his sister Emilia.

7 The following paragraph, according to the Polish edition of
Luxemburg’s letters to Jogiches, was a separate letter written on March
21, 1893. In the German edition, possibly by mistake, it is presented as
part of the March 20 letter.

8 The date and place were stamped on the envelope. In quoting from this
letter, Paul Frölich mistakenly gave the date September 27, 1893. See
his _Rosa Luxemburg: Ideas in Action_ (London, 1972), p. 20.

9 The reference is to SDKP’s publication _Sprawa Robotnicza_ (Workers’
Cause), no. 7, January 1894.

10 The reference is to the International Socialist and Labor Congress,
held in Zurich, August 6–12, 1893. Luxemburg had a major part in
drafting a report to that congress on behalf of the SDKP. See “Bericht
an den III. Internationalen Sozialistischen Arbeiterkongress in 1893
über den Stand und Verlauf der sozialdemokratischen Bewegung in
Russisch-Polen 1889–93. Erstattet von der Redaktion _Sprawa Robotnicza_,
Organ der Sozialdemokraten des Königreichs Polen” (Report to the Third
International Socialist and Labor Congress on the Status and Progress of
the Social Democratic Movement in Russian Poland, 1889–93. Submitted by
the Editorial Board of _Sprawa Robotnicza_, organ of the SDKP), in
Luxemburg, _Gesammelte Werke_ (Collected Works), vol. 1, pt. 1 (Berlin,
1990), pp. 5–13.

11 Krichevsky’s wife.

12 Krichevsky’s older daughter.

13 The offices of the SPD Executive (_Vorstand_) were located at 9
Katzbach Street, in Berlin.

14 The masculine form of “Comrade,” instead of the feminine _Genossin_.

15 It has not been possible to find any article by Luxemburg with
editorial comments by Wilhelm Liebknecht in issues of the _Vorwärts_ in
the weeks immediately following the date of this letter.

16 A pseudonym of Leo Jogiches.

17 The only item by Krichevsky that could be found in _Neue Zeit_ (New
Times) at around the time of this letter was a review by him in the
issue dated February 7, 1894, with the headline “Zur Lage der russischen
Fabrikarbeiter” (On the Conditions of Russian Factory Workers).
Krichevsky’s review was of a book in Russian by Ye. M. Dementyev
entitled _Fabrika, chto ona daet naseleniiu i chto ona u nee beret_ (The
Factory—What It Gives to the Population and What It Takes from It)
(Moscow, 1893).

18 Berfus had an article in _Vorwärts_ on November 22, 1893. He wrote
that the German comrades ought to call on the Polish workers to join the
Polish Social Democratic political associations and to take an interest
in _Gazeta Robotnicza_, the publication of the PPS in German-occupied
Poland, which was subsidized by the SPD Executive.

19 Several words in the original letter are crossed out at this point
and are illegible.

20 Krichevsky’s wife and older daughter.

21 Warski had written a letter in defense of Martin Kaszprak, against
whom defamatory charges had been made by leaders of the PPS living
abroad, alleging that he was an informer working for the police. The
letter was not published.

22 Luxemburg is referring to the article (in Polish) signed “A. W.” and
entitled “An Overall View of the Homeland,” which was published in
_Sprawa Robotnicza_, no. 7, January 1894.

23 Luxemburg is referring to the article (in Polish) by Julian
Marchlewski, entitled “What the May Day Holiday Has Already Given Us,”
which was signed “J.” and published in _Sprawa Robotnicza_, no. 8,
February 1894.

24 Luxemburg is referring to arrested members of the Union of Polish
Workers.

25 Luxemburg is referring to her own article (in Polish), signed with
the pseudonym “R. K.” (R. Kruszyńska) and entitled “The Holiday of May
1, 1892, in Lødz,” which was published in _Sprawa Robotnicza_, no. 8,
February 1894.

26 The article by B. N. Krichevsky (in Polish) entitled “The May Day
Holiday and Socialism” was published in _Sprawa Robotnicza_, no. 8,
February 1894.

27 Luxemburg’s reference is to her own article (in Polish) entitled “The
Struggle for the Shortening of the Workday,” which was signed “X” and
published in _Sprawa Robotnicza_, no. 8, February 1894.

28 Luxemburg is referring to an article (in Polish) by Jadzia Warska
(who used her maiden name, Chrzanowska, as a pen name). The article,
signed “Ch.” and entitled “The May Day Holiday,” was published in
_Sprawa Robotnicza_, no. 8, February 1894.

29 Luxemburg is referring to all the socialist parties and groupings in
France.

30 The reference is to an article (in Polish) by Adolf Warski entitled
“How the May 1 Holiday Must Be Celebrated.” It was signed “A. W.” and
published in _Sprawa Robotnicza_, no. 8, February 1894.

31 On May 1, 1886, a general strike for the eight-hour day was held in
Chicago on the initiative of the American Federation of Labor. When the
police used armed force against the strikers, resulting in a number of
dead and wounded, protest demonstrations and rallies were organized.
During a rally at Haymarket Square in Chicago, on May 4, a provocateur
threw a bomb among the police. This incident served as a pretext for the
arrest of the leaders of the workers’ movement in Chicago, four of whom
were executed, in 1887. The events in Chicago became the basis for
declaring May 1 an international day of struggle for workers in all
countries.

32 Eintracht (meaning “harmony; concord”) was the name of a local
organization of the Social Democratic Party in Zurich.

33 At the beginning of 1889, workers at the London Gas Works waged a
successful struggle for better working conditions. In the same year the
30,000 dockworkers of London Harbor carried out a successful general
strike.

34 A large department store in Paris.

35 Luxemburg is referring to an appeal to be issued in the name of the
SDKP leadership, addressed to German workers in the Prussian-occupied
part of Poland and calling on them to celebrate May Day in solidarity
with the Polish workers by stopping work. This appeal was published in
German in _Sprawa Robotnicza_, no. 11/12, May/June 1894.

36 Luxemburg is quoting back to Jogiches a Russian phrase he had
apparently used in a letter to her.

37 Adolf Reiff, the Polish printer in Paris, had made it possible for a
police agent to meet Luxemburg and had given him a copy of the May issue
of _Sprawa Robotnicza_.

38 Elzevir was the name of a family of Dutch printers and publishers of
the sixteenth and seventeenth centuries. Their editions were renowned
for their high craftsmanship and cost.

39 Luxemburg is probably referring to a pamphlet (in Polish) published
anonymously in Berlin in 1892 and entitled _The 1892 May Day Celebration
in Lodz_.

40 A café in Paris.

41 Luxemburg was considering the possibility of giving a public talk on
the Polish question for the émigrés in Paris, in which she wished to
make clear the differences between the positions of the PPS and those of
the Association of Polish Socialists Abroad.

42 One source states that _Krümelchen_, which means “tiny tot,” was a
pseudonym used by Jogiches. These terms of endearment (_Krümelchen_ and
_Bengelchen_) are given in German because the Polish equivalents of
these terms were, for some reason, omitted from the mostly Polish
three-volume edition published by Feliks Tych in 1968–70.

43 Luxemburg is probably referring to a work (in Russian) by J.
Poznanski, _Proizvoditel’nye sily Tsarstva Pol’skogo_ (Productive Forces
of the Kingdom of Poland) (St. Petersburg, 1880), of which she made
extensive use in her dissertation.

44 At that time Kazimierz Ratyński was in charge of SDKP party work in
Warsaw.

45 The date is in the handwriting of someone other than Luxemburg.

46 The article, signed “R. L-burg” and entitled “Polnische
Sozialdemokratie und Nationalität” (Polish Social Democracy and the
Question of Nationality), appeared on January 26, 1895, in
_Arbeiterstimme_ (Socialist Voice), a Swiss socialist paper edited by
Robert Seidel.

47 Probably Krichesvsky’s wife.

48 Luxemburg is referring to a notice about the sentencing of arrested
officials of the Union of Polish Workers, the second Proletariat party,
and the SDKP. This notice was published (in Polish) under the title “The
Verdict” in _Sprawa Robotnizca_, no. 19, January 1895.

49 Issue no. 21 of _Sprawa Robotnicza_, of March 1895, consisted
entirely of workers’ letters that had been sent from Poland. Contained
on the last page of this special issue, under the title “Prison Songs,”
were the poems of a Social Democratic worker who was imprisoned in the
Warsaw Citadel. The poems were signed with the pen name Mularz.

50 Luxemburg is referring to the members and supporters of the Parti
Ouvrier Français (French Workers’ Party), founded by Jules Guesde, which
considered itself the Marxist tendency within the French working class
movement.

51 The French phrase might be rendered in English as “class-struggle
sentiment.”

52 Luxemburg is referring to the article entitled “The Peasant Question
in France and Germany,” which was published in _Neue Zeit_, in the issue
for November 28, 1894, vol. 1, p. 13. In that article, among other
things, Engels criticized the agrarian program of the Parti Ouvrier
Français, which had been adopted at that party’s congress in Marseille
in 1892. See _Marx-Engels Collected Works_, vol. 27 (New York, 1990),
pp. 481–500.

53 Luxemburg is referring to her article (in Polish) entitled “Nowe
pan-owanie” (The New Reign), which was published anonymously in _Sprawa
Robotnicza_, no. 19, January 1895. The title refers to the reign of the
new ruler of the Russian Empire, Nicholas II, who succeeded his father
as tsar when the latter died in October 1894.

54 Luxemburg is referring to her article (in Polish) entitled “May Day
and the Fate of Social Patriotism,” which was published anonymously in
_Sprawa Robotnicza_, no. 22, April 1895.

55 That is, page by page, rather than column by column.

56 Luxemburg is referring to her article (in Polish) entitled “On the
Congress of the Polish Socialists in Germany,” which was published
anonymously in _Sprawa Robotnicza_, no. 15/16, September/October, 1894.

57 Luxemburg is referring to her twelve-page supplement (in Polish) to
_Sprawa Robotnicza_, no. 13/14, July/August, 1894, entitled “Pod bat
opinii publicznej” (Under the Whip of Public Opinion), which consisted
entirely of articles and brief items directed against the PPS.

58 Luxemburg is referring to her work _Niepodlegla Polska a sprawa
robotnicza_ (Independent Poland and the Workers’ Cause), which was
published under the pseudonym Maciej Różga in Paris in 1895. _Sprawa
Robotnicza_ issued it as a separate publication on behalf of the
Executive Committee of the SDKP.

59 The Union of Polish Socialists Abroad (_Związek Zagraniczny
Socjalistów Polskich_) was an organization of Polish émigrés from the
Russian-occupied Kingdom of Poland. Established in Paris in 1892, it
initiated the founding of the PPS (_Polska Partia Socjalistyczna_) and
became the foreign representative body of the PPS.

60 The reference is to the hundredth anniversary of the 1794 uprising
against the third partition of Poland, which was headed by Tadeusz
Kościuszko.

61 Luxemburg is referring to her article (in Polish) whose title means
“Two Dates.” Published in _Sprawa Robotnicza_, no. 11/12, May/June 1894,
it dealt with the hundredth anniversary of the Kościuszko rebellion.

62 A reference to the supporters of Jean Allemane, who in 1891 split
from the Possibilists and founded the Parti Ouvrier Socialiste
Révolutionnaire. Anarchist tendencies were prevalent in a section of the
party’s membership.

63 The followers of Jules Guesde in the Parti Ouvrier Français (French
Workers’ Party).

64 Luxemburg is referring to _Sprawa Robotnicza_, no. 21, March 1895,
which was to appear as a special issue under the title “Polska
Robotnicza” (Workers’ Poland) and was based entirely on letters and
other writings by workers in Poland.

65 The reference is to the illegal transporting of SDKP party literature
from France into Poland.

66 This is probably a reference to J. S. Blumenfeld.

67 Luxemburg’s request was granted. She completed her final written
examination between April 21 and 24, 1897. Professor Julius Wolf’s
approval of her dissertation dates from the end of March, and those of
Professors Vogt, Treichler, Schneider, Hitzig, Schollenberger, Fleiner,
Cohn, and Meili are dated April 14, 1897. It has not been possible to
establish the exact date of Luxemburg’s oral examination. According to
the records of Zurich University, she completed her studies there at the
end of May 1897.

68 The four-line quotation is from Mickiewicz’s verse drama _Dziady_
(Forefathers’ Eve).

69 The phrase “welcome to the ghost” is also from _Dziady_ by
Mickiewicz.

70 Alternatively, Luxemburg might have meant “that the whole of Berlin
will fire me up.”

71 The Russian wording in the original is as follows: _Da perestan’ zhe
plakat’_; _ty budesh’ vyglyadet’, kak chort znaet chto takoye_.

72 French: “You know how women are …”

73 Reichstag elections were to be held on June 16, 1898.

74 This also means “virgin.”

75 In Russian culture, everyone has, as his/her middle name, a
patronymic, a name derived from the first name of his/her father. For
example, Lenin was the son of a man whose first name was Ilya (Russian
form of Elijah), and so in Russian culture he is known as Vladimir
Ilyich (Vladimir, son of Ilya). In this case Luxemburg is suggesting
that Jogiches, in addressing her, should use an invented middle name, as
though her father’s first name were Ilya (when actually it was Eliasz, a
Polish form of Elijah, equivalent to the Russian “Ilya”). In Russian,
Ilyinichna (daughter of Ilya) is the feminine counterpart to Ilyich, the
masculine form of the patronymic formed from Ilya. In Polish culture,
this use of a patronymic as a middle name for everyone does not occur,
but Luxemburg was probably making a concession here to the Russian
culture that Leo Jogiches apparently identified with (his mother having
spoken Russian). It seems that he usually wrote to Luxemburg in Russian
and wanted Russian spoken in the home when they were together. That is
why, when she quotes from Jogiches’s letters, the quotations are usually
in Russian.

76 This is a reference to Luxemburg’s former landlady in Zurich,
Switzerland.

77 The SPD’s manual with information relating to the Reichstag elections
scheduled for June 16, 1898. It was published by the SPD Executive in
Berlin in 1898 under the title _Handbuch für sozialdemokratische Wähler.
Der Reichstag 1893–1898_ (Manual for Social Democratic Voters: The
Reichstag, 1893–1898).

78 In 1898 the Duncker & Humblot publishing company in Leipzig was
preparing to publish Luxemburg’s dissertation _Die industrielle
Entwicklung Polens_ (The Industrial Development of Poland), both as a
dissertation and in book form.

79 In order to be active politically in Germany without interference by
the authorities, Luxemburg needed to obtain from the police a
certificate of citizenship, a document certifying that she was a German
citizen. For this purpose, in the spring of 1898, she had entered into a
marriage of convenience with Gustav Lübeck, a Prussian citizen, and thus
automatically obtained Prussian citizenship. This sham marriage was
ended by a divorce granted on April 4, 1903.

80 The offices of the SPD Executive were located at 9 Katzbach Street in
Berlin.

81 Luxemburg wrote the above italicized lines in German, quoting her own
remarks to Auer.

82 The beginning of the following paragraph and the first half of the
next one, as well as parts of other paragraphs, are in italics because
they were written in German in Luxemburg’s mostly Polish-language
original. She is quoting Auer about Wilhelm Liebknecht.

83 The SPD Executive consisted of August Bebel and Paul Singer
(co-chairs), Ignatz Auer and Wilhelm Pfannkuch (secretaries), and Karl
Gerisch (treasurer).

84 The reference is to _Gazeta Robotnicza_, which was founded in Berlin
in 1891 with the help of the SPD Executive, which provided financing for
the paper.

85 The reference is to the Union of Polish Socialists Abroad, which was
based in London and which advocated nationalist views on Poland.

86 At the SPD Party Congress in Hamburg, October 3–9, 1897, Wilhelm
Liebknecht had given two speeches on the Polish question.

87 This is probably an allusion to the polemic between Luxemburg and
Wilhelm Liebknecht over “the Eastern question,” which was conducted in
the Social Democratic press at the end of 1896. See Luxemburg’s article
“Zur Orientpolitik des _Vorwärts_” (On the Eastern Policies of
_Vorwärts_) in her _Gesammelte Werke_, vol. 1, pt. 1, pp. 69–73.
Liebknecht was then chief editor of _Vorwärts_.

88 Luxemburg is referring to the centers of PPS strength.

89 On June 4, 1897, an article by August Winter was published in the
_Sächsische Arbeiter-Zeitung_ under the title “The Congress of the
Polish Social Democratic Party.” A section of the PPS leadership took
this as an occasion for sharp attacks on Winter. In his article Winter
had expressed himself roughly to the effect that a kind of Germanization
was going on, against which there was no rational reason to object,
namely the gradual Germanization of Poles through their migration into
German districts, through interaction with Germans in everyday life,
especially on the job and in similar situations, and that there would be
no reason for regret if this Germanization was carried further by good
German schools.

90 The editor of the PPS paper _Gazeta Robotnicza_ was Franciszek
Morawski.

91 The reference is to “Appeal to the Polish People,” a Polish-language
flyer put out by the PPS in the Prussian-occupied part of Poland in May
1898, and to a pamphlet that was published in London under the title _1
Maja 1898. Pamiątka majowa y przedwyborcza ludu pracującego zaboru
pruskiego_ (May 1, 1898: A Commemorative Message for May Day and the
Upcoming Elections, to the Working People of the Prussian-Occupied
District).

92 This comment apparently has to do with the statement by August Bebel
in his report from the Executive to the SPD Party Congress in Halle,
October 12–18, 1890, that the propaganda activity of the party among
Polish workers had to be expanded by establishing a Polish-language
workers’ paper. With political support and financial aid from the SPD
Executive, the weekly paper _Gazeta Robotnicza_, serving the
Prussian-occupied part of Poland, was founded, its first issue appearing
on January 1, 1891.

93 A Polish translation was published in London by the PPS of the
Prussian-occupied part of Poland.

94 Many Polish workers were employed in the Rhineland-Westphalia region,
especially as coal miners. The city of Dortmund was a center of this
industrial region.

95 Luxemburg is probably referring to _Gazeta Robotnicza_, the newspaper
of the PPS of the Prussian-occupied part of Poland. The paper was
subsidized by the SPD.

96 Reichstag elections were scheduled for June 16, 1898.

97 This refers to the SPD manual containing information related to the
upcoming Reichstag elections.

98 Luxemburg is referring to an election campaign pamphlet, many pages
long, entitled “Upper Silesia, to the Ballot Box!” It was distributed in
both German and Polish by the Central Election Committee of Königshütte
(Królewska Huta, an iron-and-steel manufacturing city in Upper Silesia).

99 The reference is to the Executive of the Union of Social Democratic
Workers from the Kingdom of Poland Abroad.

100 Latin abbreviation for “A word to the wise is sufficient.”

101 This is probably a reference to the editorial board of _Gazeta
Robotnicza_.

102 A runoff election was held in a local election district if in the
first round none of the candidates in the district received the required
minimum number of votes. The narrower runoff election was between the
two candidates who received the largest number of votes in the first
round.

103 “Ruscha” is a way of phonetically spelling in German the sound of
Luxemburg’s first name as it occurs in Polish—Róża.

104 In the election district of Grossstrehlitz-Kosel, Tomasz Wolny had
been nominated as the SPD candidate for the Reichstag elections
scheduled for June 16, 1898.

105 Julius Bruhns, in his letter dated June 8, 1898, informed August
Winter, among other things, that he would like to have Luxemburg as a
public speaker for election campaign meetings from June 13 to June 16,
because he himself had an illness and could not speak.

106 In the Breslau newspaper _Volkswacht_ for June 6, 1898, a report was
published about the public meeting of June 5 in Breslau, at which
Luxemburg spoke. At that time, Julius Bruhns was editor of _Volkswacht_
(People’s Sentinel), the SPD newspaper in Breslau (Polish name,
Wroclaw), and a leader of the Social Democratic organization in Lower
Silesia.

107 Luxemburg is referring to the Union of Social Democratic Workers
from the Kingdom of Poland Abroad.

108 The Duncker & Humblot book company, based in Leipzig, published
Luxemburg’s dissertation in 1898, under the title _Die industrielle
Entwicklung Polens_ (The Industrial Development of Poland).

109 Jogiches, in Zurich, was reading the proofs for her book _The
Industrial Development of Poland_.

110 Jogiches and Luxemburg were both reading the galleys and page proofs
for her book _The Industrial Development of Poland_.

111 Nizhgorod is an abbreviation for Nizhny Novgorod, a city on the
Volga River a few hundred miles east of Moscow. In _The Industrial
Development of Poland_ (see her _Gesammelte Werke_, vol. 1, pt. 1, pp.
156–7) Luxemburg recounted that in 1887 at the annual fair in Nizhny
Novgorod a group of merchants from Moscow submitted a petition to the
Russian minister of finance calling for higher tariffs on Polish goods,
and in 1888 they again submitted a petition demanding that the tsarist
government take measures against the “parasitic” industry of Poland.

112 Luxemburg wanted to include a subtitle, meaning “Materials for
Understanding the Capitalist Economy in Poland.”

113 Luxemburg is referring to her article “Die Wahlen in Oberschlesien”
(The Elections in Upper Silesia), which was published in the _Leipziger
Volkszeitung_ of June 2, 1898. See her _Gesammelte Werke_, vol. 1, pt.
1, pp. 217–21.

114 The SPD Party Congress was to be held in Stuttgart, October 3–8,
1898.

115 The “they” being referred to are the PPS elements led by Morawski.

116 From the fall of 1896 to the middle of 1898, Eduard Bernstein
published a series of articles in _Neue Zeit_, the monthly theoretical
magazine of the German Social Democratic Party (generally known by its
initials in German, SPD). In these articles Bernstein renounced Marx’s
concepts of class struggle, capitalist crisis, and proletarian
revolution. Luxemburg’s first articles refuting Bernstein were published
under the title “Sozialreform oder Revolution?” (Social Reform or
Revolution?) in the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_ from September 21 through
September 28, 1898.

117 The Yiddish expression _hazer mit a indyk_ means “a pig along with a
turkey”; that is, two completely different things.

118 In the SPD, the _Vertrauensleute_ (trustees) served as the link
between the rank-and-file membership and the party Executive. Through
this system of intermediary representatives of the membership, codified
in the bylaws of the SPD, it was possible for German Social Democracy to
get around reactionary measures, especially laws restricting unions or
associations and aimed against the workers’ organizations.

119 One of the highest mountains in the Alps.

120 Franciszek Morawski was a leader of the reformist Polish socialist
group, the PPS, in the Prussian-occupied part of Poland, and editor of
its paper.

121 Here Luxemburg uses the original English wording of Shakespeare’s
famous phrase.

122 The Russian phrase means literally “in the end to set down one
little pea, but to devour a goodly mountain.” The concept that Luxemburg
expresses here in Russian is roughly equivalent to the saying in
English, “The mountain labored and brought forth a mouse.”

123 Luxemburg is referring to her article “Step by Step: Toward a
History of the Bourgeois Classes in Poland,” which was published in
_Neue Zeit_. See her _Gesammelte Werke_, vol. 1, pt. 1, pp. 94–111.

124 Luxemburg is referring to an article, which she signed with the
initials “K. P.,” entitled “Die Agitation unter der polnischen
Bevölkerung” (Conducting Propaganda among the Polish Population [of
Germany]), which appeared in the _Sächsische Arbeiter-Zeitung_ (Workers’
Paper of Saxony), June 5 and 6, 1897. See her _Gesammelte Werke_, vol.
1, pt. 1, pp. 74–81.

125 Luxemburg is referring to payment for her dissertation, _The
Industrial Development of Poland_.

126 The reference is to the first, or founding, congress of the RSDRP
(Russian initials for the Russian Social Democratic Labor Party), which
was held in Minsk, March 1–3, 1898.

127 The question refers to the efforts of Leo Jogiches to obtain Swiss
citizenship.

128 This may be a reference to the British industrialist John Hughes,
who in the 1870s established a coal-, iron-, and steel-producing company
town in southeast Ukraine, which was given the name Yúzovka— i.e., the
town of “Húghes-ovka” (now named Donetsk).

129 A reference to the preceding letter of June 24, 1898.

130 The reference is to her article entitled “Die Wahlen in
Oberschlesien” (The Elections in Upper Silesia), which was published in
the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_ on July 2, 1898. See Luxemburg, _Gesammelte
Werke_, vol. 1, pt. 1, pp. 217–21.

131 The reference was to the next session of Germany’s national
legislative body of that era, the Reichstag.

132 The actual title of the journal was _Deutsche Medizinische
Wochenschrift_ (German Medical Weekly).

133 The mostly British phrase “silly season” suggests that in the
summer, a slow news time, newspapers tend to publish silly stories, for
lack of anything else.

134 In Polish, “Swabian” was an ironic term for a German.

135 A library in Zurich, the “Reading Association.”

136 Luxemburg quotes a Russian word that Jogiches had used. It literally
means “unceremoniousness,” but here the meanings “informality” and
“casual treatment,” suggesting impoliteness or disrespect, seem to
convey best what Jogiches was apparently objecting to about the Seidels’
behavior.

137 A reference to the Dreyfus Affair. In 1894 Alfred Dreyfus, a Jewish
officer of the French General Staff, was condemned to life-long
imprisonment on Devil’s Island in French Guyana for alleged treason.
Protests by progressive circles forced a review of the case in August
1899. Dreyfus was again found guilty, but in September 1899 he was
pardoned. In 1906 his name was cleared when the charges against him were
exposed as false. The Dreyfus Affair led to a sharpening of the
political struggle between republicans and monarchists and brought
France to the verge of civil war. Within the working class movement the
Socialists around Jean Jaurès for the most part favored participation in
the struggle against the anti-Semitic camp of reaction backed by the big
bourgeoisie (the “anti-Dreyfusards”), but the supporters of Jules
Guesde, in a declaration of July 1898, called on the proletariat to
abstain from the dispute because in their opinion the Dreyfus Affair was
not a matter of concern for the working class.

138 The reference is to Georgy Plekhanov’s article “Bernstein und der
Materialismus” (Bernstein and Materialism), which appeared in _Neue
Zeit_, vol. 16, 1897/98, no. 2, pp. 545–55.

139 Luxemburg arrived in Berlin on May 16, 1898, and on that very day
after searching in vain for a place to live she wrote to Leo Jogiches:
“I am simply exhausted beyond human endurance and already hate Berlin
and the Germans so much that I could do away with them all. Generally
speaking, in order to live here one apparently needs a reserve of health
and strength quite different from the one I brought with me.” See
_Gesammelte Briefe_, vol. 1, p. 112.

140 _Gazeta Robotnicza_ was the official publication of the PPS in the
German-occupied part of Poland. It was founded in Berlin in 1891 with
the help of the SPD Executive, which also financed it. Its editor was
Franciszek Morawski.

141 The reference is to Luxemburg’s dissertation, _The Industrial
Development of Poland_.

142 Luxemburg had her sister Anna as a visitor.

143 The reference is to the discussion over Eduard Bernstein’s
revisionist views, which had begun in the _Neue Zeit_.

144 Luxemburg is referring to her dissertation and book, _Die
Industrielle Entwicklung Polens_ (The Industrial Development of Poland).

145 The reference is to the agenda of the SPD Party Congress scheduled
for October 5–8, 1898, in Stuttgart.

146 The French original of this letter is at the Plekhanov House (Dom
Plekhanova), in St. Petersburg. It was first published in Luxemburg,
_Vive la lutte! Correspondance 1891–1914_ (Long Live the Struggle!
Correspondence of 1891–1914), compiled, translated, and annotated under
the direction of Georges Haupt, by Claudie Weill, Irène Petit, and
Gilbert Badia (Paris, 1975).

147 The reference is to Plekhanov’s Open Letter to Karl Kautsky, which
was reprinted in the Dresden newspaper _Sächsische Arbeiter-Zeitung_ of
October 30, November 2, and November 3, 1898, under the title “Debates
over Tactics: Why We Should Be Thankful for Them.” Starting at the end
of September, Luxemburg was the managing editor of this newspaper.

148 At the SPD Party Congress in Stuttgart, October 3–8, 1898, August
Bebel intervened in favor of postponement of the debate on Eduard
Bernstein’s revisionist views, on the grounds that discussion of
disagreements over the party’s basic concepts first required a
thoroughgoing preliminary treatment in the Social Democratic press. In
the October 13, 1898, issue of _Vorwärts_, the SPD’s main newspaper,
Karl Kautsky urged Bernstein to summarize and restate his views in a
pamphlet, or booklet. This work by Bernstein was published in March 1899
under the title _Die Voraussetzungen des Sozialismus und die Aufgabe der
Sozial-demokratie_ (The Prerequisites of Socialism and the Tasks of the
Social Democratic Movement).

149 Georgy Plekhanov’s open letter to Karl Kautsky, entitled “The
Discussion on Tactics: Why We Should Be Thankful for It,” was published
in three issues of the _Sächsische Arbeiter-Zeitung_ on October 30,
November 2, and November 3, 1898. Plekhanov expressed his astonishment
at Kautsky’s holding back from the debate with Bernstein. This
reticence, Plekhanov argued, would only contribute to delaying the
settling of accounts with revisionism, and he demonstrated in detail
that Bernstein had adopted the views of the opponents of Marxism and had
transformed himself from a Social Democrat into a social reformer.

150 At the end of September 1898, Luxemburg assumed the editorship of
the _Sächsische Arbeiter-Zeitung_ in Dresden, after the previous
editors, Parvus and Julian Marchlewski, had been expelled from the state
of Saxony as foreigners engaging in political activity. However, after
the November 2, 1898, meeting of the Press Commission of the regional
SPD Executive in the state of Saxony, Luxemburg felt she was forced to
resign as editor of the paper.

151 Emil Eichhorn, Emil Nitzsche, and Heinrich Wetzker, members of the
editorial board of the _Sächsische Arbeiter-Zeitung_, published a
statement in the October 30 issue of the _Vorwärts_, in which they
emphasized that they had not known Luxemburg was going to publish in the
_Sächsische Arbeiter-Zeitung_ a reply to Georg Gradnauer about her
disagreements with him and that they did not approve of such a
procedure. In this connection, see her article “Ein Parteistreit” (A
Party Dispute) in _Gesammelte Werke_, vol. 1, pt. 1, pp. 271–3.

152 This refers to the November 2, 1898, meeting of the Press Commission
on the subject of the _Sächsische Arbeiter-Zeitung_.

153 For a while, Luxemburg wrote weekly summaries of economic news for
the _Sächsische Arbeiter-Zeitung_, using the overall title
“Wirtschaftliche und sozialpolitische Rundschau” (Economic and
Socio-Political Review). See her _Gesammelte Werke_, vol. 1, pt. 1, pp.
278–94, 308–17, 326–47, 352–60.

154 This refers to Luxemburg’s articles entitled “Erörterungen über die
Taktik” (Discussions on Tactics), which were published in the
_Sächsische Arbeiter-Zeitung_ on October 19 and 26, 1898, and in which
she stated her disagreements with the revisionist views of Georg
Gradnauer. See _Gesammelte Werke_, vol. 1, pt. 1, pp. 257–63. In those
articles she also supported the positions of Franz Mehring, presented by
the latter in his “Glossen zur Parteitag” (Comments on the Party
Congress) and published in the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_, October 8–13,
1898.

155 The reference is to the SPD Party Congress in Stuttgart on October
3–8, 1898.

156 Latin for “of all different things.”

157 Luxemburg is referring to her first “Economic and Socio-Political
Review,” signed “ego,” which was published in the _Sächsische
Arbeiter-Zeitung_ on December 4, 1898. See her _Gesammelte Werke_, vol.
1, pt. 1, pp. 278–83.

158 This refers to the second series of articles refuting Bernstein,
which would be published in the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_ from April 4
through April 8, 1899.

159 Apparently a Russian-language book about mining.

160 The reference is to the second series of articles by Luxemburg in
answer to Eduard Bernstein, under the overall title _Sozialreform oder
Revolution_ (Reform or Revolution), which would be published in the
_Leipziger Volkszeitung_ from April 4 through April 8, 1899.

161 Eduard Bernstein’s book _Die Voraussetzungen des Sozialismus und die
Aufgabe der Sozialdemokratie_ (The Prerequisites of Socialism and the
Tasks of the Social Democratic Movement) was published in March 1899. An
English translation of Bernstein’s book was published in 1909 with the
title _Evolutionary Socialism_.

162 Luxemburg carried out her intention. The two series of articles
answering Bernstein were published as a booklet in the first half of
1899 under the title _Sozialreform oder Revolution_ (Reform or
Revolution).

163 Luxemburg’s article “Die englische Brille” (Through English
Eyeglasses), in which she presented her disagreements with Bernstein on
the question of the trade unions, was published in the _Leipziger
Volkszeitung_ of May 9 and 10, 1899. For the German text, see Luxemburg,
_Gesammelte Werke_, vol. 1, pt. 1, pp. 471–82.

164 The reference is to Marx’s _Contribution to the Critique of
Political Economy_.

165 Under the pseudonym “A. Volgin,” Georgy Plekhanov published a work
in St. Petersburg in 1896, entitled _Obosnovanie narodnichestva v
trudakh g-na Vorontsova (V.V_.) (The Justification of Narodism in the
Works of Mr. Vorontsov [V.V.]).

166 The advocates of the “marginal demand theory” propounded a theory of
capital and interest by resorting to subjective psychological factors
and mathematical models. In doing so they attempted to establish a
closed, self-contained system of economics as a counter to Marxism.

167 Luxemburg used a Russian phrase for “Marxist, but not lacking in
peculiarity.” The phrase is: _Marksist ne lishennyi strannosti_.

168 During the SPD Party Congress in Stuttgart, October 3–8, 1898,
Ignatz Auer had spoken disparagingly of Luxemburg and Clara Zetkin, who
at that congress defended the historical tradition and revolutionary
outlook of Social Democracy, advocating tactics consistent with the
perspective of preparing for social revolution.

169 Parvus was publishing a newsletter entitled _Aus der Weltpolitik_
(From World Politics).

170 Karl Marx was the author of _Wage Labor and Capital_ and the
_Communist Manifesto_.

171 The reference is to an article by Heinrich Cunow “Zur
Zusammenbruchstheorie” (On the Theory of the Economic Collapse [of
Capitalism]), which was published in the SPD theoretical magazine, _Neue
Zeit_, vol. 17, 1898/99, no. 1.

172 The reference is to the gift she sent him, a work by David Friedrich
Strauss, _Das Leben Jesu_ (published in Germany, 2 vols, 1835–36;
English translation by George Eliot, _The Life of Jesus_, 1846).

173 Luxemburg is referring to her article “Die Kosten eines Sieges” (The
Costs of a Victory), which was published in the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_
on December 19, 1898. See her _Gesammelte Werke_, vol. 1, pt. 1, pp.
295–308.

174 Luxemburg is referring to her article “Adam Mickiewicz,” which
appeared in the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_ on December 24, 1898. For the
German text, see her _Gesammelte Werke_, vol. 1, pt. 1, pp. 302–7.

175 Actually, this “Economic and Socio-Political Review” by Luxemburg
was published on Wednesday, December 28, 1898, in the _Sächsische
Arbeiter-Zeitung_. See _Gesammelte Werke_, vol. 1, pt. 1, pp. 308–17.

176 Luxemburg is referring to her article “Die Kosten eines Sieges” (The
Costs of a Victory).

177 Luxemburg’s articles were a polemic against the revisionist views of
Max Schippel. They were published as a series of four articles in the
_Sächsische Arbeiter-Zeitung_ on February 20, 21, 22, and 25, 1899,
under the overall title “Miliz und Militarismus” (People’s Militia and
Militarism) and were also intended as an Appendix to her book _Reform or
Revolution_. See her _Gesammelte Werke_, vol. 1, pt. 1, pp. 446–66.

178 In the second part of what Luxemburg “said to herself,” she used a
Russian phrase, _zagnula ne v tot pereulok_, whose literal meaning is
“turned down the wrong alley,” but figuratively it means “you’ve gone
off track.”

179 Luxemburg is referring to the fourth article in her series on
militia and militarism.

180 At a special session of the SPD Reichstag group on January 10, 1899,
Max Schippel’s revisionist views had been condemned.

181 In English in the original.

182 _Freisinnige Zeitung_, organ of the Free-Thinking People’s Party,
published in Berlin from 1885 to 1918.

183 The morning edition of the _Kreuz-Zeitung_ of March 2, 1899,
expressed its views on the “Schippel case” and dismissed with defamatory
phrases the positions taken by Luxemburg as well as others in the
revolutionary workers’ movement, calling them “busy little women.”

185 A reference to Parvus’s newsletter, _Aus der Weltpolitik_.

184 Parvus published a statement entitled “My Fight for Freedom of
Speech in _Vorwärts_.” _This_ appeared in the _Sächsische
Arbeiter-Zeitung_ of January 17, 1899. He accused the editors of
_Vorwärts_ of denying him the opportunity of expressing himself in their
newspaper. In response _Vorwärts_ published a polemical item on January
18, 1899, which Parvus in turn replied to in a letter published in
_Vorwärts_ on January 20, 1899, in the section “Comments and Responses.”
That in turn was followed by a reply from the editors.

186 Zofia Daszyńska published a review of Luxemburg’s _Industrial
Development of Poland_ in the _Sozialistische Monatshefte_ of February
1899. Luxemburg rejected a request from the editors of that publication
that she write a reply to Daszyńska in their magazine. She inquired of
Karl Kautsky whether her reply could eventually be published in _Neue
Zeit_. Kautsky agreed, but no such article was published.

187 That is, Wilhelm Liebknecht.

188 The italicized sentences are in German in the original letter.

189 A reference to Parvus’s newsletter, _Aus der Weltpolitik_.

190 Because of a conflict going back many years between Bruno Schoenlank
and Franz Mehring, Maximilian Harden succeeded in provoking renewed
disagreements between these two experienced socialist journalists, with
the result that Franz Mehring discontinued his collaboration with
_Leipziger Volkszeitung_.

191 Luxemburg is referring to her polemic against the revisionist views
of Max Schippel.

192 The SPD Party Congress was scheduled for Hanover, in northern
Germany, October 9–14, 1899.

193 March 5 was Luxemburg’s birthday.

194 Probably a multivolume reference work on the social and political
sciences, the _Handwörterbuch der Staatswissenschaften_.

195 The full title of the article was “Von Stufe zu Stufe. Zur
Geschichte der bürgerlichen Klassen in Polen” (Step by Step: Toward a
History of the Bourgeois Classes in Poland). It was published in the
_Neue Zeit_, vol. 16, 1897/98, no. 1, pp. 164–76. See her _Gesammelte
Werke_, vol. 1, pt. 1, pp. 94–111.

196 There are differing interpretations of the Russian sentence. In
Elzbieta Ettinger’s interpretation, it means something like: “The re is
only one (such lovely) pair of hands (as yours), such tiny, little
hands.” The German edition interprets the Russian as: “There’s nothing
(around) but sled dogs, and very small ones at that,” suggesting almost
total seclusion from the outside world.

197 Luxemburg is referring to her reply to a review of her dissertation
written by Zofia Daszyńska.

198 The differing tactics used by the SPD in elections to the state
assembly (_Landtag_) in each different state _(Land_) of Germany, such
as in Prussia as distinct from Saxony, led to a discussion in the German
Social Democratic movement in 1898 and 1899. Opinions differed quite
widely over the value of participating in elections in states where
reactionary and restrictive election laws had been introduced.
Particularly strong disagreements were aroused by the question of
whether and to what extent it would be permissible for the SPD to engage
in electoral work together with bourgeois parties.

199 The SPD Party Congress was scheduled for October 9–14, 1899, in the
city of Hanover.

200 Luxemburg is referring to her work _Reform or Revolution_.

201 Here the Latin phrase seems to mean: “Beyond all that, here’s my
assessment …”

202 The offices of the SPD Executive were located at 9 Katzbach Street
in Berlin.

203 Luxemburg was in Upper Silesia to hold public meetings promoting the
SPD from December 23, 1899, to January 1, 1900, making stops in
Katowice, Bielszowice, and Zabrze, among other places.

204 Luxemburg’s article “Die Französische Vereinigung” (The Unification
[of Socialist Parties] in France) was published in the _Leipziger_
_Volkszeitung_, December 18–20, 1899. See her _Gesammelte Werke_, vol.
1, pt. 1, pp. 651–60.

205 This is a joking reference to a statement made by Franz von
Ballestrem, who became president of the Reichstag in 1898. He claimed
that during the so-called _Gründerzeit_ workers’ wages had risen so high
that construction workers were drinking champagne out of beer glasses.

206 Instead of an article by Luxemburg, Jogiches had received in the
mail a Swiss railroad timetable. Luxemburg assumed that there had been a
mix-up in transit through the Swiss postal system.

207 The remainder of the quotation from Jogiches’s “postcard of
yesterday” is italicized because he wrote it in German.

208 Luxemburg is quoting back to Jogiches a Russian phrase that he
himself had used (see previous paragraph).

209 Jowialski is probably a made-up name taken from the Latin
_jovialus_, the same root of our word “jovial” in English. It’s like the
character in some of the poems of Zbigniew Herbert—“Mr. Cogito,” whose
name obviously comes from Descartes’s famous saying, “Cogito, ergo sum.”

210 A play on the saying, “One word to the wise is sufficient.”

211 Luxemburg had spoken in Bielszowice (in Upper Silesia) on December
30, 1899, on the basic ideas of socialism. The report about the public
meeting was published in the issue of _Gazeta Robotnicza_ dated January
13, 1900.

212 Heinrich Cunow was an editor at the _Neue Zeit_.

213 Luxemburg dated this letter “June 24, 1900,” but the contents show
that it was written on April 24.

214 Luxemburg participated in the Fifth Congress of the PPS of
Prussian-occupied Poland, which was held in Berlin, April 15–16, 1900.

215 Luxemburg’s report about the second day of the congress was
published in the _Vorwärts_ of April 20, 1900. The _Vorwärts_ had
reported on the first day in its issue of April 18.

216 The article (in Polish) “About the Party Congress” in _Gazeta
Robotnicza_, no. 16, April 21, 1900, dealt especially with Luxemburg’s
appearance at the PPS Party Congress, welcomed the fact that she had
joined the party, and stated, not without malicious emphasis, that
“Luxemburg finally has become a Polish socialist.” The article implied
that Luxemburg’s joining the PPS meant that she also supported the PPS
program advocating Polish independence. Luxemburg’s reply to this
article was not published immediately after she sent it, but instead the
editors ran a notice in issue no. 17, which put Luxemburg off until the
next issue of this weekly publication. (Luxemburg referred to this
notice in her letter of April 30, 1900, to Leo Jogiches.) Her reply then
appeared in _Gazeta Robotnicza_, no. 18, May 5, 1900, with a note from
the editors that the factual corrections that the author was requesting
would not be made. Luxemburg’s “Complaint to the Executive Body” (in
Polish), was published in _Gazeta Robotnicza_, no. 21, May 26, 1900. The
editors accompanied it with comments by the PPS Executive, which
contained sharp attacks on Luxemburg.

217 Rosa Luxemburg is referring to the book by Richard Schüller entitled
_Die Wirtschaftspolitik der historischen Schule_ (The Economic Policy of
the Historical School), Berlin, 1899. Luxemburg’s review first appeared
in May 1900 under the title “Back to Adam Smith.” It was published in
the _Neue Zeit_, vol. 18, 1899/1900, no. 2. See Luxemburg, _Gesammelte
Werke_, vol. 1, pt. 1, pp. 728–37.

218 Karl Kautsky’s book _Bernstein und das sozialdemokratische Programm_
(Bernstein and the Social Democratic Program) was brought out in a
French translation in Paris in 1900 under the title _Le Marxisme et son
critique Bernstein_.

219 Despite her response stated here to Kautsky, there is no evidence
that Luxemburg ever worked on Marx’s voluminous literary remains, which
contained tens of thousands of pages of manuscripts, articles, essays,
and excerpt notebooks that were not transcribed or published until
decades afterwards.

220 Paul Lafargue was Karl Marx’s son-in-law.

221 Luxemburg was in Poznań (German name, Posen) from March 24 through
March 27, 1900, where she spoke at a number of meetings.

222 This refers to a series of articles, “Agrarische Interessen und
Zollpolitik” (Agrarian Interests and Tariff Policy), and the single
article “Zur Verlegung des polnischen Parteiblattes” (On the Changes in
the Party’s Polish Paper). These were published in the _Leipziger
Volkszeitung_, respectively, on March 23–25 and on March 27, 1900. See
Luxemburg, _Gesammelte Werke_, vol. 1, pt. 1, pp. 709–22.

223 A resolution was published in the April 3, 1900, issue of the
_Vorwärts_, which had been submitted in advance by the Poznań
organization to the Party Congress of the PPS of the Prussian-occupied
part of Poland. It declared that the Poznań organization stood fully and
completely on the same ground as the German Social Democratic Party (the
SPD), and it demanded that the Executive of the PPS should work closely
with the SPD. Luxemburg had introduced this resolution after she had
withdrawn another resolution calling for the dissolution of the PPS of
the Prussian-occupied part of Poland and the admission of its members
into the local SPD organizations.

224 The reference is to the Press Commission for the _Gazeta
Robotnicza_.

225 That is, Luxemburg’s reply to the article “About the Party
Congress.”

226 Luxemburg is referring to the divorce proceedings to end her
marriage, a marriage of convenience with Gustav Lübeck to obtain German
citizenship.

227 Luxemburg’s article “Bilanz der Obstruktion” (A Balance Sheet on
Obstruction), after being rejected by the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_, was
published in the _Neue Zeit_, vol. 18, 1899/1900, no. 2. See her
_Gesammelte Werke_, vol. 1, pt. 1, pp. 752–8.

228 The Polish-language original of this letter is in the Russian State
Archive for Social and Political History, in Moscow. The letter was
first published by Feliks Tych in the Warsaw journal _Z Pola Walki_
(From the Field of Battle), no. 1, 1971, pp. 209–10.

229 The date and place are in the handwriting of someone other than
Luxemburg, probably Cezaryna Wojnarowska, who was then living in Paris.

230 The reference is to Luxemburg’s series of articles under the general
title “The Socialist Crisis in France,” which appeared in five issues of
_Neue Zeit_, from January 16 through February 27, 1901. See Luxemburg,
_Gesammelte Werke_, vol. 1, pt. 2, pp. 5–73.

231 The Workers’ Party of France, headed by Jules Guesde.

232 Boris Krichevsky had been reporting in _Vorwärts_ as its Paris
correspondent, providing information mainly about the tendency led by
Jean Jaurès in the French socialist movement and defending Jaurès’s
views.

233 Luxemburg wrote this letter in French.

234 The reference is to a series of articles entitled “The Socialist
Crisis in France,” which was published in the _Neue Zeit_ in
January–February 1901. See Luxemburg, _Gesammelte Werke_, vol. 1, pt. 2,
pp. 5–73. See “The Socialist Crisis in France,” in _Rosa Luxemburg
Speaks_, edited by Mary-Alice Waters (New York, 1971), pp. 91–105.

235 Anton Fendrich attempted, at a statewide gathering of SPD members in
the state of Baden, in the city of Offenburg, to substantiate and
justify the vote by the group of SPD deputies in the _Landtag_ (state
assembly) of Baden approving the state budget. This voting occurred on
May 28, 1900. August Dreesbach defended this opportunist action and
called for the Social Democratic Party to get involved in “practical
work.” The SPD group in the Baden state legislature also stated that, if
it was numerically strong enough, it would claim the post of second vice
president of the legislature in the next legislative session, arguing
that it did not matter if a Social Democrat, as a member of the
presiding body of the state legislature, had to submit to an
aristocratic practice and report personally to the Prince of Baden.

236 On June 1, 1894, the group of SPD deputies in the _Landtag_ of
Bavaria, under the leadership of Georg von Vollmar, voted for the state
budget, and thus violated for the first time the principle of “Not one
person and not one penny in support of this system!” The majority of SPD
members decisively protested against this opportunist action.

237 Latin: “Oh dear, oh how things change.”

238 At the SPD Party Congress in Lübeck, September 22–28, 1901, the
revolutionary forces directed sharp criticism at the opportunist
behavior of the group of SPD deputies in the Baden state legislature
who, by approving the state budget, had given a vote of confidence to
the capitalist government. In a resolution of the Party Congress their
behavior was termed incompatible with the program of the SPD and the
basic principles of class struggle, and it was declared to be the duty
of all SPD deputies to vote against any budget submitted by the
capitalist authorities.

239 A reference to the SPD Party Congress in Stuttgart, October 3–8,
1898. See the letter of October 31, 1898.

240 From November 1900 to February 1901 there were differences between
the management of the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_, together with the
leadership of the local SPD organization, and the Leipzig branch of the
German Book Printers Union. After new printing machinery was brought
into the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_ print shop, several printers were
dismissed from their jobs. In these dismissals, violations of labor
rights were said to have occurred. A number of typesetters declared
their solidarity with those who had been dismissed. The attempts of the
SPD Executive to mediate the differences produced only partial results.

241 The bourgeois writer Hanz Leuss was sentenced to prison on the
grounds of having committed perjury and after serving his sentence was
unable to find any means of earning a livelihood. He appealed to Franz
Mehring, who helped him find a publisher for his poetry and bring out
several articles in the _Neue Zeit_ about conditions in Germany’s penal
institutions. These articles were a sharp indictment of the system of
class justice. Later, Leuss was allowed to contribute further to the
Social Democratic press, but under severely restricted conditions. This
was followed by some dishonorable actions on the part of one SPD
newspaper, probably the _Sächsische Arbeiter-Zeitung_, which was backed
by the opportunists. However, Franz Mehring cleared up these
difficulties.

242 The French original of this letter is in the International Institute
for Social History, in Amsterdam. It was first published in Luxemburg,
_Vive la lutte! Correspondance 1891–1914_ (Long Live the Struggle!
Correspondence of 1891–1914), compiled, translated, and annotated under
the direction of Georges Haupt, by Claudie Weill, Irène Petit, and
Gilbert Badia (Paris, 1975).

243 “La Verité en marche” (Truth on the March) was the title of a
frontpage article by Louis Dubreuilh about the events surrounding the
entry of the socialist politician Millerand into the cabinet of the
French capitalist government as “minister of commerce.” The article
appeared in Guesde’s publication _Le Socialiste_, no. 11, March 17–24,
1901.

244 No article by Jules Guesde appeared in _Neue Zeit_ during 1901.

245 In _Le Socialiste_ of February 17–24, 1901, Jules Guesde published a
message of greetings to a memorial meeting organized by Cezaryna
Wojnarowska to mark the fifteenth anniversary of the 1886 execution by
the tsarist Russian authorities of four members of the “Proletariat”
party. In response, the Paris group of the PPS criticized Guesde for
making publicity on behalf of Luxemburg and the SDKPiL and
misrepresenting the views of the PPS. Guesde printed a reply in _Le
Socialiste_, no. 13, March 31–April 7, 1901.

246 The Polish-language original of this letter is in the Russian State
Archive for Social and Political History, in Moscow. The letter was
first published in the Warsaw journal _Z Pola Walki_ (From the Field of
Battle), no. 1, 1971, pp. 212–5.

247 The reference is to the SDKPiL.

248 The reference is to Julian Marchlewski.

249 During the International Socialist Congress in Paris, September
23–27, 1900, the PPS representatives challenged Luxemburg’s mandate as a
delegate to the congress. Four emigré students belonging to the SDKPiL
delegation supported the PPS challenge and endorsed a PPS resolution
directed against Luxemburg.

250 At one time there was a three-member editorial board of _Sprawa
Robotnicza_, consisting of Luxemburg, Julian Marchlewski, and Adolf
Warski.

251 The reference is to the leading group of the SDKPiL abroad, which
consisted of the threesome (or “trinity”) of Wojnarowska, Zalewski, and
Julian Marchlewski.

252 Here Luxemburg uses an idiom, “to stretch oneself toward the
ceiling,” but according to one German dictionary the idiom means “to
adjust expenditure to income,” that is, to live within one’s means.

253 Pseudonym of Arkadiusz Kremer.

254 “John Mill” was the pseudonym of Josif Mill.

255 An article with the title “Probleme der jüdisch-proletarischen
Bewegung” (Problems of the Jewish Proletarian Movement), sent by the
editors of the Bund’s publication _Jüdischer Arbeiter_ (Jewish Worker),
appeared on February 6, 1901, in _Neue Zeit_, vol. 19, no. 1.

256 Stanislaw Trusiewicz (Zalewski) favored the establishment of a
Social Democratic Party of Russia on a federative basis, together with
parties representing other nationalities of the Russian Empire.

257 At that time, attempts at unification of the various socialist
organizations in France had repeatedly failed.

258 At the SPD Party Congress in Lübeck, September 22–28, 1901,
Luxemburg had to leave before the congress was over. After her departure
she was sharply attacked by Robert Fischer and was accused of
falsification. She intended to publish a declaration against Fischer in
the _Neue Zeit. The_ editor went to a great deal of trouble to dissuade
her from carrying out this plan. For her declaration, dated October 1,
1901, see her _Gesammelte Werke_, vol. 1, pt. 1, pp. 146–7.

259 At the Lübeck Party Congress, the _Neue Zeit_ and its chief editor,
Karl Kautsky, because of their opposition to revisionist views, were
sharply attacked by the opportunists.

260 This is a slight variation on Johann Wolfgang von Goethe’s famous
poem that starts with the lines, “_Über allen Gipfeln ist Ruh’/ In allen
Wipfeln hörest du/ Kaum einen Hauch_” (“Over all the hilltops, there’s
peace/ In all the treetops, you hear scarcely a breath”).

261 The reference is to Robert Seidel’s booklet _Lebensmittelzölle und
Sozialreform_ (Tariffs on Food Products and Social Reform), supplemented
with a Foreword entitled “History of the 1890/1891 Dispute over Tariffs
and the Tariff Question as of 1902/1903” (Zurich, 1903).

262 Luxemburg was making an effort to have a review written about
Seidel’s work _Die Handarbeit—Der Grund- und Eckstein der harmonischen
Bildung und Erziehung_ (Arts and Crafts—The Foundation Stone and
Cornerstone of Harmonious Education and Training), which had been
published in Zurich.

263 Maxim Gorky’s play _A Night’s Lodging_ (in German, _Nachtasyl_) had
its Berlin première at the Little Theater on January 23, 1903. Gorky’s
play, perhaps his best-known theatrical work, is more commonly known in
English as _The Lower Depths_. In the original Russian, the title is _Na
Dne_ —literally, “At the Bottom,” or “Down and Out.”

264 French: “right in the face.”

265 The Polish original of this letter is in the Russian State Archive
for Social and Political History, in Moscow. It was first published by
Feliks Tych and Bronisław Radlak in the collection they edited under the
title _SDKPiL: Materialy i Dokumenty_ (The Social Democracy of the
Kingdom of Poland and Lithuania: Materials and Documents), vol. 2, pp.
277–80.

266 The reference is to the Polish-language publication _Prawda_, a
political, social, and literary weekly that appeared in Warsaw in the
years 1881–1915 as the “organ” of the positivists. In February 1903,
_Prawda_ had published a slanderous lampoon of Luxemburg by a writer
named Leon Wassilewski.

267 _Przegląd Socjaldemokratyyczny_ (Social Democratic Review),
theoretical journal of the SDKPiL, the Polish organization headed by
Luxemburg and Jogiches; the journal was published in Kraków from 1902 to
1904 and from 1908 to 1910.

268 On October 19, 1902, negotiations took place between the SPD
Executive and the PPS of the Prussian-occupied part of Poland. These
were broken off because the PPS put up its own candidate for the
Reichstag elections, creating the danger that Social Democratic votes
would be cast for differing candidates. Taking part in these
negotiations, besides the executive bodies of the SPD and the PPS, were
Luxemburg, Ignacy Daszyński, and representatives from Poznań, Lower
Silesia, and Upper Silesia. This conference did not arrive at any
agreement, nor did another such gathering on January 19, 1903. The
differences between the SPD and PPS over organization and tactics, as
well as on the national question, proved to be so serious that the PPS
separated from the SPD, of which until then it had been an autonomous
part. The SPD Executive withdrew its subsidy of the PPS newspaper,
_Gazeta Robotnicza_, on the grounds that its nationalistic tendencies
were in contradiction with the program of German Social Democracy. On
December 25–26, 1902, the Seventh Party Congress of the PPS took up the
question of the negotiations with the SPD (which was reported in the
December 28, 1902, issue of _Vorwärts_).

269 The reference is to the Reichstag elections in Germany, which were
scheduled for June 16, 1903.

270 The SPD Party Congress was scheduled for Dresden, September 13–20,
1903.

271 The reference is to the declaration by the SPD Executive, which it
sent on December 9, 1902, to the Social Democrats of Poznań and Silesia.
Luxemburg reprinted the text of this declaration in her article entitled
“How the Special Polish Organization Understands ‘Unification,’ ” in
_Volkswacht_, January 12, 1903, and also in her article entitled “The
Fate of Social Patriotism in Germany,” published in Polish in _Przegląd
Socjaldemokratyyczny_, no. 1, January 1903.

272 Ignacy Daszyński was the leader of the PPSD, which was based in
Galicia, in the Austrian-occupied part of Poland, and which was part of
Austrian Social Democracy. _Przedświt_ was the weekly publication of the
PPSD.

273 Presumably Luxemburg is referring to the preparations for the second
congress of the RSDRP, which was held in Brussels and London July
30–August 23, 1903. She had known since September 1902 that the _Iskra_
people wanted to invite the PPS as well as the SDKPiL. However, in the
end the PPS was not represented at the congress.

274 The reference is to the group that called itself PPS-Proletariat. It
was founded in Zurich in July 1900, and at first used the name Union of
Polish Radicals. The PPS-Proletariat adhered to conspiratorial and
terrorist traditions, but also organized strikes in the Russian-occupied
Kingdom of Poland. The group engaged intensively in publishing activity
and had its own journal from 1900 to 1904. In 1905 it ceased to exist.

275 In the period June 5–15, 1903, Luxemburg undertook a speaking tour,
based in Chemnitz (in southeast Germany), in preparation for the
Reichstag elections as part of the SPD election campaign. She spoke in
Hohenstein, Lichtenstein, Glauchau, Meerane, Mülsen-St. Jacob,
Oberlungwitz, Markneukirchen, Plauern, Adorf, and Oelsnitz.

276 The reference is to Karl Kautsky’s article (in Polish) “The Bloody
Massacre in Kishinev and the Jewish Question,” which appeared in the May
1903 issue of _Przegląd Socjaldemokratyyczny_. There was an especially
brutal pogrom against Jews in Kishinev in 1903.

277 The Yiddish term _Parkhes_, or _Parches_, means roughly the same as
the German phrase _miese Brüder_ (“crummy brotherhood” or “scum of the
earth”). In Polish, the term _parch_ means “mange” or “scab,” and an
adjective derived from _parch, parszywy_, means “mangy,” but is also
used to describe a morally despicable person, someone who is “rotten” or
“lousy.”

278 The italicized sentences are in German in the original letter.

279 A reference to the document certifying that Luxemburg was a German
citizen, obtained after she entered into a marriage of convenience with
Gustav Lübeck in 1898.

280 In the Reichstag elections of June 16, 1903, in the Glauchau-Meerane
electoral district, Ignatz Auer actually did receive 4,912 more votes
than he had in the 1898 elections.

281 Gerisch was a member of the SPD Executive and its treasurer.

282 Warski and Hanecki were the SDKPiL delegates to the Second Congress
of the RSDRP (Russian Social Democratic Workers’ Party), which met in
Brussels and London, July 30–August 23, 1903, and at which the question
of the SDKPiL’s joining the RSDRP was also taken up.

283 Article 7 of the draft program of the RSDRP contained a clause
guaranteeing the self-determination of nations. Luxemburg feared that
this would be used to gain support for the Polish nationalist
bourgeoisie. At the same time she wanted to strike a blow against the
PPS and its emphasis on the nationalist demand for the independence of
Poland.

284 The original Polish texts of the two telegrams above—the first from
Luxemburg and Jogiches; the second of unspecified authorship but
presumably from Luxemburg and Jogiches as well—are in the archives of
the Polish United Workers’ Party, in Warsaw. They were first published
by Adolf Warski in _Z Pola Walki_ (From the Field of Battle), 1929, no.
7–8, pp. 184, 190.

285 In the summer of 1903 Julius Bruhns had to serve a two-month term in
prison.

286 Apparently, Bruhns was moving to Upper Silesia to take over the
local SPD leadership there and continue organizing Polish workers in the
region. He replaced August Winter, who was no longer well and who moved
to Stettin.

287 The reference is to the _Gazeta Ludowa_.

288 Luxemburg’s letter includes the following marginal note at this
point: “Apropos of that, the money (in my opinion) that goes to Gogowski
from the coal miners must always pass through you. Disbursement is in
Gogowski’s hands: 21 Breite Street.”

289 The Russian original of this letter is in the Russian State Archive
for Social and Political History, in Moscow. It was first published by
A. N. Potresov and B. I. Nikolaevsky in _Sotsial-demokraticheskoe
dvizhenie v Rossii. Materialy_ (The Social Democratic Movement in
Russia: Documentary Materials) (Moscow-Leningrad, 1928), pp. 129–30.

290 Potresov had asked Luxemburg to write an article for _Iskra_ in
which she would express her views on a disputed question in the Russian
Social Democratic movement, the organizational structure of the Russian
party. Lenin’s book _One Step Forward, Two Steps Back_ had sparked
renewed discussion on this matter. Luxemburg’s article “Organizational
Questions of Russian Social Democracy” was published in _Iskra_, no. 69,
1904, and in _Neue Zeit_, vol. 22, no. 2, 1903/04. See Luxemburg,
_Gesammelte Werke_, vol. 1, pt. 2, pp. 422–44. See the English
translation in _The Rosa Luxemburg Reader_, edited by Peter Hudis and
Kevin B. Anderson (New York, 2004), pp. 248–65.

291 The Dietz publishing house produced the journal _Neue Zeit_ for the
Social Democratic Party of Germany.

292 The italicized phrase was in German in the letter, which for the
most part was written in Russian.

293 Italian: “Dearest Luise.”

294 In Königsberg (East Prussia), from July 12 to July 25, 1904, nine
Social Democrats were on trial, charged with smuggling illegal
anti-tsarist literature into Russia. Karl Liebknecht, as one of the
defense attorneys, exposed the brutal oppression practiced by the
tsarist regime in Russia and the collaboration between the Prussian and
Russian authorities. The three principal defendants were acquitted, and
the others received only nominal sentences.

295 The quoted phrase was written in English.

296 Natalie Liebknecht, wife of Wilhelm Liebknecht, had the maiden name
Reh, which in German means “roe deer.”

297 Yiddish: “good luck.”

298 This is a pun meaning both “Wasteland on Monday” and “Ede
[Bernstein] on Monday.” In May 1904, Eduard Bernstein began editing a
newspaper called _Das Neue Montagsblatt. Berliner Sozialistische
Montagsschau_ (The New Monday Paper: a Berlin Socialist Review); it
appeared from May 2 to November 21, 1904.

299 Luxemburg was referring to a trip to Amsterdam, where the
International Socialist Congress was to be held August 14–20, 1904.
Luxemburg took part in the congress as a delegate.

300 At a rally in Breslau in the spring of 1904 Clara Zetkin had
denounced the tsarist autocracy and acknowledged the self-sacrificing
struggle of Russian revolutionaries. In her speech she cited Johann
Gottlieb Fichte and made use of a quotation from Friedrich Schiller’s
_Wilhelm Tell_ about the limits of tyrannical power. At that point the
rally was shut down by Prussian officials who were keeping watch.
Because of the quotation, charges were brought against Clara Zetkin for
“inciting class hatred” and other “political offenses.” The case did not
go to trial, because the charges were dismissed, obviously as a
consequence of the Königsberg trial.

301 The Russian original of this letter is in the Russian State Archive
for Social and Political History, in Moscow. It was first published by
A. N. Potresov and B. I. Nikolaevsky in _Sotsial-demokraticheskoe
dvizhenie v Rossii. Materialy_ (The Social Democratic Movement in
Russia: Documentary Materials) (Moscow-Leningrad, 1928), pp. 129–130.

302 For some passages in this letter there exists a corresponding rough
draft with many parts crossed out and with additions, including the
date, written in the handwriting of someone other than Luxemburg.

303 The Council of the RSDRP (Russian Social Democratic Workers’ Party)
met in Geneva on June 13, 1904. The participants in this meeting were:
Lenin, Plekhanov, Noskov, Akselrod, and Martov. Among other matters, the
meeting dealt with a proposal by the PPS which called for a conference
of the two parties in order to reach an agreement for carrying on a
unified struggle. The RSDRP Council spoke out instead for a conference
of various revolutionary and oppositional parties.

304 The General Jewish Labor Bund in Lithuania, Poland, and Russia, also
known as the Jewish Labor Bund, was a secular socialist party advocating
national self-determination for Jews in a socialist Russia. It was the
first nationwide Marxist organization in Russia; it was founded a year
prior to the RSDRP, in 1897. At the RSDRP’s Second Congress in Brussels
and London, in 1903, the Bund’s autonomous position within the party was
revoked. In response, the Bund split from the RSDRP. It rejoined it in
1906.

305 At the meeting of the ISB in Brussels on February 7, 1904, Luxemburg
spoke out against the admission, or recognition, of a separate
Lithuanian Social Democratic delegation and emphasized that the SDKPiL
was the only party representing Social Democracy in Lithuania. The
Lithuanian Social Democrats protested against this, and she answered
them in a notice published in _Iskra_, no. 70, 1904. See her _Gesammelte
Briefe_, vol. 6, p. 89.

306 On January 16, 1904, the regional court in Zwickau (state of Saxony)
convicted Luxemburg of “lese majesty” for allegedly insulting the
Prussian monarch, Kaiser Wilhelm II, in one of her campaign speeches in
1903. In July 1904, after her appeal was denied, the court sentenced her
to three months in prison. She began serving her sentence in the prison
of the Zwickau regional court on August 26, 1904, but was given early
release on October 25 as part of a general amnesty to mark the
coronation of the new king of Saxony, Frederick Augustus III. See J. P.
Nettl, _Rosa Luxemburg_ (Oxford, 1966), pp. 198–9.

307 Kautsky had informed Luxemburg that her article against the views of
the _Vorwärts_ editorial board on terrorism had been rejected by it and
by the Press Commission responsible for the _Vorwärts_.

308 At the International Socialist Congress (ISC) in Amsterdam, August
14–20, 1904, a resolution against revisionism was adopted—the same
resolution that had been passed at the Dresden Congress of the SPD in
1903. The vote at the ISC was 25 for, 5 against, and 12 abstaining.

309 The annual SPD Congress was to be held in Bremen, September 18–24,
1904.

310 Arthur Stadthagen and Paul Singer.

311 Luxemburg was planning to write a review in connection with the then
imminent posthumous publication of Karl Marx’s _Theorien der Mehrwert_
(_Theories of Surplus Value_)—a work that Marx considered the fourth
book of _Capital_.

312 In June 1904, indignant over the mild and inconsistent arbitrator’s
type of pronouncements being made against the opportunists, who had
slandered him at the SPD Congress of September 14–20, 1903, Mehring
expressed his intention of giving up his work at the _Leipziger
Volkszeitung_ and the _Neue Zeit_.

313 Apparently Luxemburg uses the term “Fifth Estate” to refer to the
opportunists and reformists in general.

314 John Lubbock was an English politician, banker, and naturalist
(author of works on anthropology, entomology, and geography). His
_Prehistoric Times_ (first published in 1865) was translated into
several languages and often used as a textbook. Marx made important
excerpt notes on Lubbock’s _The Origin of Civilization_ in his
_Ethnological Notebooks_. See _The Ethnological Notebooks of Karl Marx_,
transcribed by Lawrence Krader (Assen, 1972), pp. 337–52. Luxemburg was
probably unaware of these notes by Marx.

315 In Basel, Switzerland, on September 26–8, 1904, the Third General
Assembly of the Association for the Legal Protection of Workers took
place. The Swiss Social Democrat Eugen Wullschleger, president of the
Basel municipal government, gave the opening remarks at the assembly,
and among those speaking was Alexandre Millerand, the reformist
socialist from France. The Pope allowed his sympathies to be expressed
to the gathering.

316 “Both for the king and for the pope / they’re drinking wine, and
without water.”

317 The German original of this letter is in the International Institute
of Social History, in Amsterdam. It was published—like all the letters
to Roland Holst in the present selection—in the German edition of
Henriette Roland Holst-van der Schalk’s _Rosa Luxemburg: ihr Leben und
Werken_ (Rosa Luxemburg: Her Life and Work) (Zurich, 1937). That book
first appeared in Dutch as _Rosa Luxemburg. Haar leven en werken_
(Rotterdam, 1935).

318 A gyron is a triangular sector on a heraldic shield, as in a coat of
arms; here, probably a metaphor for the coat of arms of the royal house
of Saxony. In other words, Luxemburg is apparently referring to the
first in line of succession for the throne of Saxony.

319 On January 16, 1904, the regional court in Zwickau (state of Saxony)
convicted Luxemburg of “lese majesty” for allegedly insulting the
Prussian monarch, Kaiser Wilhelm II, in one of her campaign speeches in
1903. In July 1904, after her appeal was denied, the court sentenced her
to three months in prison. She began serving her sentence in the prison
of the Zwickau regional court on August 26, 1904, but was given early
release on October 25 as part of a general amnesty to mark the
coronation of the new king of Saxony, Frederick Augustus III.

320 The International Socialist Congress was held in Amsterdam, August
14–20, 1904.

321 Conflicts over the direction and management of the _Leipziger
Volkszeitung_ had begun as early as 1902, between Luxemburg and Franz
Mehring. Such conflicts continued, between Mehring and other members of
the editorial board, with the result that there were frequent arguments
and misunderstandings, as well as changes of personnel.

322 The meeting of the ISB took place in Brussels on January 15, 1905.

323 Luxemburg uses this nickname for Henriette’s husband, Richard
Nicolaas Roland Holst.

324 Richard Nicolaas Roland Holst, Henriette’s husband.

325 The original letter had “eighteenth” by mistake.

326 William Thomas Thornton’s book _On Labor_ was published in 1869.

327 Luxemburg is referring to a German translation by Richard Prager
(Berlin, 1901) of the second edition (1827) of a work by the Swiss
economist and historian Jean Charles Léonard Simonde de Sismondi,
_Nouveaux Principes d’économie politique_ (New Principles of Political
Economy), 1819. The German title of Sismondi’s work was _Neue Grundsätze
der politischen Ökonomie oder der Reichtum in seinen Beziehungen zu der
Bervölkerung_ (New Principles of Political Economy, or Wealth in Its
Relation to Population).

328 Henriette Roland Holst’s work entitled _Generalstreik und
Sozialdemokratie_ (General Strike and Social Democracy) was published in
Dresden in 1905.

329 This probably refers to the article by R. N. Roland Holst,
“Proletariat en Kunst” (Proletariat and Art), in _Nieuwe Tijd_ (New
Times), vol. 9, pp. 787–90.

330 On February 7, 1917, many years after this December 1904 letter to
Henriette Roland Holst, Luxemburg sent a fourteen-line version of the
same excerpt to Mathilde Jacob from imprisonment in the Wronke fortress.
(See below.)

331 The photo referred to may be the same one reproduced in _Herzlichst
Ihre Rosa_ (p. 165), showing Luxemburg and Bebel apparently having a
humorous exchange in Amsterdam in 1904.

332 The reference is to the April 1905 congress of the SDAP (the
Sociaal-Democratische Arbeiderspartij, or Social Democratic Workers’
Party), the Social Democratic organization in Holland. The congress
passed a resolution, regarding the forthcoming parliamentary elections,
not to limit itself to the distinction between bourgeois clerical and
anticlerical parties, but to support only those bourgeois candidates, in
runoff elections, who expressed a binding commitment to instituting
universal suffrage quickly. After the ruling clerical parties suffered
unexpectedly high losses in the first round of elections on June 17,
1905, the SDAP Executive saw itself as being in a position to decide the
outcome and then “interpreted” the congress resolution to mean that it
would be left to individual SDAP voters to decide who to vote for in the
second round.

333 The position taken by the SDAP Executive in the runoff elections
triggered a debate in _Nieuwe Tijd_, the party journal. After Herman
Gorter, a member of the Executive, and others had defended the
leadership’s action as being justified by the changed situation,
Henriette Roland Holst made a sharp attack on this policy, and in part
of what she wrote she used Luxemburg’s arguments word for word.

334 A reference to Icaria, the utopian land imagined in the work of the
early nineteenth-century socialist Étienne Cabet. The name derives from
Icarus, the son of Daedalus in Greek mythology.

335 The reference is to Henriette Roland Holst’s book, _Generalstreik
und Sozialdemokratie_ (General Strike and Social Democracy), with a
Foreword by Karl Kautsky, published in Dresden in 1905.

336 No review of Roland Holst’s book by Luxemburg appeared in _Neue
Zeit_.

337 At the Jena Congress (September 17–23, 1905) Luxemburg spoke on the
relations between the SPD and the trade unions, the ongoing 1905
revolution in Russia, and in general, on the German workers’ movement.
See her _Gesammelte Werke_, vol. 1, pt. 2, pp. 595–604

338 The commission had the function of distributing (apportioning) to
the various revolutionary groups in Russia the funds that had been
raised in support of the 1905 revolution.

339 _Forward_, central organ of the PPSD, the Polish reformist-socialist
group in Austria.

340 This article by Luxemburg (in Polish) dealt with the execution of
Marcin Kasprzak. It was entitled “Niech żije rewolucja!” (Long Live the
Revolution!) and was published in _Z pola walki_ (From the Field of
Battle), no. 12, September 30, 1905.

341 Henriette Roland Holst, _Generalstreik und Sozialdemokratie_
(General Strike and Social Democracy), Foreword by Karl Kautsky
(Dresden, 1906).

342 The reference is to August Bebel’s resolution at the SPD Party
Congress at Jena, September 17–23, 1905. The part of the resolution that
especially caused discussion was worded as follows: “Therefore the Party
Congress declares that it is in particular the duty of the working class
as a whole, in the event of an attack on universal, equal, direct
suffrage and the secret ballot or on the right to form coalitions, to
apply any and every means that seems appropriate for defending itself.
As one of the most effective means of struggle to defend against such a
political attack on the working class, or in order to defend against
such a political crime against the working class or in order to conquer
an important principle for its emancipation, the Party Congress
considers, in the given case, ‘the comprehensive application of the
tactic of a massive work stoppage’ to be applicable. However, in order
for this means of struggle to be as effective as possible, the greatest
possible expansion of the political and trade union organizations of the
working class and the unceasing education and enlightenment of the
masses by the workers’ press and in all oral and written agitation are
absolutely essential.”

343 Luxemburg discussed this question in the _Vorwärts_, no. 277,
November 26, 1905, in an article entitled “Eine Haupt- und Staatsaktion”
(A Major Action of Statewide Significance), and she discussed it more
thoroughly in her pamphlet _The Mass Strike, the Party, and the Trade
Unions_.

344 In issue number 146 of _Vorwärts_ on June 25, 1905, a review by the
editors was published of Henriette Roland Holst’s work _Generalstreik
und Sozialdemokratie_ (General Strike and Social Democracy), that
amounted to the argument that the mass strike should be regarded as a
means of struggle for the working class, but nonetheless it should not
be allowed to interfere with the highest principle of socialist
politics, the revolutionizing of hearts and minds. The title of the
review was “Über politische Streik” (About the Political Strike).

345 The Russian phrase means “Dear Rakovsky” and was written by Bebel in
the Russian alphabet. He often used this joking form of address in his
letters to Luxemburg.

346 The rest of Bebel’s letter, as quoted by Luxemburg to Jogiches, was
in German.

347 After the death of Wilhelm Liebknecht (in 1900), the new chief
editor of the _Vorwärts_ was Kurt Eisner, and under him the SPD’s
central newspaper followed more and more in the wake of the
opportunists. In 1905 it sided with the opponents of the political mass
strike, but by taking this position it aroused the indignation of the
majority of SPD members. This conflict was especially evident at the SPD
Congress in Jena (September 17–23, 1905). Under pressure from the mood
among the ranks, the party Executive felt obliged on October 23, 1905,
to ask for the resignation of six editors (Paul Büttner, Kurt Eisner,
Georg Gradnauer, Julius Kaliski, Wilhelm Schröder, and Heinrich Wetzker)
and to replace them with revolutionary-minded SPD members. Luxemburg was
also brought on to the staff of the _Vorwärts_ for a short time
(November–December 1905). Later the SPD’s central newspaper fell under
the influence of the opportunists again.

348 In Russian: _polozhenie khuzhe gubernatorskogo_.

349 The preceding sentence in italics was in German in the original,
mostly Polish letter.

350 In Russian: _vstupaet v kulak zheleznoe raspolozhenie dukha_.

351 In Russian: _na novykh nachalakh_.

352 “Mr. Zołzikiewicz,” a fictional character in Henryk Sienkiewicz’s
_Sketches in Charcoal_—a village official who lorded it over others
because he was the only “educated person” in the village who knew how to
write.

353 This sentence is in German in the original letter.

354 Italicized sentences in this letter are in German in the original.

355 Luxemburg was referring to the second part of her lengthy work
_Czego chcemy_, which was published in _Przegląd Robotniczy_ (Workers’
Review, newspaper of the SDKPiL), no. 6, 1905. Together with the first
part, which had been published in _Przegląd Robotniczy_, no. 5, 1904,
this work was published as a pamphlet with the overall title _Czego
chcemy? Komentarz do_ _programu Socjaldemokracji Królestwa Polskiego i
Litwy_ (What Do We Want? A Commentary on the Program of the Social
Democratic Party of the Kingdom of Poland and Lithuania [Warsaw, 1906]).
For a German translation, see Luxemburg, _Gesammelte Werke_, vol. 2, pp.
37–89.

356 The term “self-administration” was used in Russia from the time of
the 1860s reforms to refer to local governmental functions on a province
or district level.

357 In the Reichstag by-election on October 12, 1905, the candidate of
the PPS in the Prussian-occupied part of Poland, Franciszek Morawski,
received the smallest number of votes. In contrast to the voting on June
16, 1903, when he won 10,044 votes, he received only 4,780 votes in
1905. The bourgeois journalist Albert Korfanty was elected with 23,550
votes.

358 This pamphlet by Luxemburg was published anonymously in Warsaw in
1906 under the title _Program federacji, czyli PPS w blednym kole_ (A
Program for Federation, or the PPS in a Vicious Cycle).

359 Luxemburg devoted a series of articles (in Polish) to the question
of autonomy, under the general title “The Question of Nationalities, and
Autonomy.” It was published in _Przegląd Socjaldemokratyyczny_ (Social
Democratic Review) from August to December 1908 and from June to
September 1909.

360 The reference is to the Mensheviks, who gained control of the RSDRP
newspaper _Iskra_ in late 1903.

361 This was a nickname for Victor Adler, the Austrian socialist leader.

362 The Russian word means “racing, or chasing, around.”

363 A novel by the Swiss writer C. F. Meyer.

364 The SPD Party congress was held in Jena, September 17–23, 1905.

365 This is a reference to Parvus’s argument at the end of 1905 that any
call for a boycott or non-participation in the new State Duma, which was
scheduled to open in January 1906, would be a sign of weakness and
timidity.

366 The italicized sentences in this letter are in German in the
original.

367 Victor Adler.

368 These were Russian-language publications in the series “Social
Democratic Library” that were published for the revolutionary movement
in Russia during the first half of the 1890s by Leo Jogiches, who was
then based in Switzerland.

369 Luxemburg is referring to her article “Socialism in Poland,” which
appeared in the October 1897 issue of _Sozialistische Monatshefte_. See
her _Gesammelte Werke_, vol. 1, pt. 1, pp. 82–93.

370 The sailors of the battleship _Potemkin_, part of the Black Sea
Fleet, mutinied against tsarist rule in June 1905, an event memorialized
in Sergei Eisenstein’s film _Potemkin_.

371 On October 25, 1905, a statement of the SPD Executive was published
in the _Vorwärts_, giving notice that the resignation of six editors had
been accepted.

372 Here Luxemburg used a Russian phrase, transliterated as _zadavat’
ton_, meaning “set the tone.”

373 The italicized sentences in this letter are in German in the
original.

374 On July 3, 1905, the SPD Executive called on the German workers to
support the revolution in Russia not only with expressions of sympathy
but also by donating funds. By November the money collected added up to
about 130,000 marks. The October 13 issue of the _Vorwärts_ reported a
sum of 116,390 marks.

375 In the _Vorwärts_ of October 26, 1905, the six editors who had
submitted their resignations protested against discussion by the SPD
Executive and Press Commission of political and personal issues at the
_Vorwärts_ and also against Luxemburg’s becoming a regular contributor
to and staff member of the _Vorwärts_.

376 On October 20, 1905 (October 7 by the old Russian calendar), wage
laborers and salaried employees of the Moscow-Kazan railroad stopped
work, by decision of a Bolshevik organization. The Central Bureau of the
All-Russia Union of Rail Workers then proclaimed a general strike on all
the railroads, and as a result, between October 11 and October 14
(October 24–7, Old Style) most rail lines were shut down. By October 17
(October 30, Old Style), the general strike was an accomplished fact on
all railroads of the Russian empire.

377 A political tendency seeking conciliation with the tsarist regime.

378 By using the spelling _Aujust_ (pronounced “Auyust”), Luxemburg is
giving the name jokingly in a Berlin accent.

379 Luxemburg is referring to her articles “Stillstand und Fortschritt
im Marxismus” (Stagnation and Progress in Marxism) and “Karl Marx,”
which were published in the _Vorwärts_ on March 14, 1905. See her
_Gesammelte_ _Werke_, vol. 1, pt. 2, pp. 363–77. See “Stagnation and
Progress in Marxism,” in _Rosa Luxemburg Speaks_, edited by Mary-Alice
Waters (New York, 1971), pp. 106–11.

380 This sentence is in German in the original.

381 The SPDKPiL was planning to put out a German-language newspaper,
mainly intended for the German workers in the region of łódż, and
adopting the title _Vorwärts. The_ first issue appeared in February
1906.

382 Yiddish: “shameless audacity; gall.”

383 The Central Committee of the RSDRP called a conference of the
national Social Democratic parties (e.g., of Latvia, Poland, etc.), at
which tactics in relation to the Bulygin Duma and joint, coordinated
action were to be discussed. The conference was held in Riga, September
20–22, 1905 (September 7–9, Old Style). Represented at the conference
were the RSDRP Central Committee (the Bolsheviks), the Bund, the Latvian
Social Democratic Workers’ Party, the SDKPiL, and the Revolutionary
Ukrainian Party. Leo Jogiches and Adolf Warski participated on behalf of
the SDKPiL. A representative of the Organizational Committee (OK) of the
RSDRP, that is, the Mensheviks, who rejected any form of joint action,
was present at the conference, but was not empowered as a delegate. The
conference expressed itself in favor of a boycott of the Bulygin Duma,
since the latter was proposed by the tsar as a consultative, not a
legislative assembly and with a tiny electorate. The Bulygin Duma was
named for Alexander Bulygin, Russian Minister of Interior Affairs from
February to October 1905.

384 In October 1905 in all the industrial centers of tsarist Russia,
political mass strikes were carried out with such slogans as “Down with
the Autocracy,” “Boycott the Bulygin Duma,” “For a Constituent
Assembly,” and “For a Democratic Republic.”

385 The reference is to articles Luxemburg wrote on problems of the 1905
revolution. They were published in February and March 1905 in the _Neue
Zeit_, the _Sächsische Arbeiter-Zeitung_, and the _Vorwärts_. See her
_Gesammelte Werke_, vol. 1, pt. 2, pp. 485–532.

386 Luxemburg’s article “Das neue Verfassungsmanifest Nicholaus’ des
Letztens” (The New Manifesto about a Constitution by Nicholas the Last)
was published anonymously in the November 1, 1905, issue of the
_Vorwärts_.

387 Luxemburg’s article “Das Pulver trocken, das Schwert geschliffen!”
(Keep the Power Dry, and the Sword Well-Sharpened!) was published
anonymously in the November 2, 1905, issue of the _Vorwärts_.

388 In the face of the political general strike of October 1905 in
Russia, the tsarist regime felt obliged to make concessions by offering
a constitutional monarchy. The tsar’s Manifesto of October 30 (October
17, Old Style) guaranteed civil liberties, enlarged the franchise for
elections to the Duma (National Assembly), and gave legislative powers
to the Duma.

389 French: “all the way; to the outermost limit.”

390 The news dispatch from Sosnowiec, Poland, was published in the
November 2, 1905, issue of _Vorwärts_ with the title “A Police Chief
Arrested by Social Democrats.”

391 The Russian word means “wag the tail.”

392 The italicized sentence appears in German in the original.

393 On December 28, 1905, Luxemburg set out on a trip from Berlin to
Warsaw, traveling with a passport identifying her as “Anna Matschke,” an
actual Berlin journalist, in order to take a direct part in the
revolution. The 1905 revolution in the Russian empire had passed its
high point, but intense class battles were continuing. Only a small
group of her closest friends and comrades-in-arms knew about the trip.

394 Luxemburg uses the Yiddish word for the Jewish Sabbath, i.e.,
Saturday, implying that in Illowo any travel by horse and carriage
depended on Jewish tradesmen.

395 Alexandrowo was the point at which the train crossed from the German
empire into the Russian empire, where presumably Luxemburg’s documents
came under scrutiny by border officials.

396 The OK was the Organizational Committee of the Mensheviks.

397 A pejorative term for “Muscovite”; probably a reference to the “man
from the OK.”

398 Under the election law of December 1905 in Russia, voters were
divided into four classes, or voting bodies (curiae), and as a result
the big landowners retained special privileges and the number of
deputies representing workers and peasants was restricted.

399 The reference is to the Mensheviks, who at the end of 1903 gained
control of the Russian Social Democratic newspaper _Iskra_.

400 The Fourth Party Congress of the RSDRP, which became known as the
unification congress, actually was not held until April 23–May 8, 1906,
in Stockholm. Luxemburg was unable to take part in that congress because
on March 4, 1906, she was arrested in Warsaw.

401 This is probably a reference to Luxemburg’s work _Z doby
rewolucyjnej: Co dalej?_ (In Revolutionary Times: What Next?), no. 3,
Warsaw, 1906. See a German version in her _Gesammelte Werke_, vol. 2,
pp. 11–36.) This work appeared as a pamphlet, published by _Czerwony
Sztandar_. Parts 1 and 2 appeared as supplements to issues no. 25 and 26
of _Czerwony Sztandar_, but they were not numbered. See the German
versions in _Gesammelte Werke_, vol. 1, pt. 2, pp. 541–72.

402 Luxemburg is referring to the RSDRP congress, which had been
scheduled for December 1905, but because of the revolutionary events in
Russia it could not be held until April 23–May 8, 1906, in Stockholm.

403 The “lares and penates” were the household gods of the ancient
Romans; thus the Latin phrase _ad penates_ here has a meaning equivalent
to “homeward; back to the home fires.”

404 French: “there is the plague of the revolution.”

405 During Luxemburg’s absence from Berlin, the Kautskys were holding
the funds of the SDKPiL (Social Democratic Party of Poland and
Lithuania) in their own bank account.

406 A line spoken by Mephistopheles in Goethe’s _Faust_.

407 After Luxemburg’s departure from Berlin to go to Warsaw at the end
of December 1905, Block was brought onto the _Vorwärts_ staff to replace
her. He was a supporter of Karl Kautsky.

408 A reference to the International Socialist Bureau, on which
Luxemburg had been active since 1904 as a representative of the SDKPiL.

409 By bribing a Russian official, Luxemburg’s comrades-in-arms
succeeded in having her released from prison on bail (3,000 rubles) on
June 28, 1906, but there was a proviso that she could not leave Warsaw
before completion of the investigation into her case. On July 31, she
received permission, on the basis of a physician’s affidavit, to leave
Warsaw in order to obtain medical treatment elsewhere. On August 1, she
traveled to Kuokkala, Finland, by way of St. Petersburg.

410 During her stopover in St. Petersburg, Luxemburg spoke with the
Mensheviks. Afterward, in Kuokkala, she had ongoing discussions with
Lenin and a small circle of other Bolsheviks about the Russian
revolution and the perspectives for the international workers’ movement.

411 The SPD Party Congress was scheduled to be held in the southwest
German city of Mannheim, September 23–9, 1906.

412 The Kautskys, during Luxemburg’s absence from Germany, had accepted
custody of the party funds of the SDKPiL and held those funds in their
own bank account.

413 The reference is to Alexander Helphand (Parvus), who during the 1905
Russian Revolution had been a leading member of the St. Petersburg
Soviet and had been imprisoned. Later in 1906, while being transported
to Siberian exile, Parvus escaped and made his way back to Germany.

414 A secret agreement between the SPD Executive and the General
Commission of German Trade Unions had become public knowledge. This
agreement had been reached, with the union leaders exerting strong
pressure, during a consultation held on February 16, 1906, and was
directed against any acknowledgment of the mass political strike as a
method of class struggle. Here Luxemburg equates this action by the
union leaders to an arbitrary ruling from a medieval court. The
revelation of this secret agreement, demanded by the union leaders,
unleashed a wave of indignation among the members of the SPD. As a
result, a sharp dispute arose between the Executive and the trade union
commission.

415 A reference to the upcoming SPD Party conference, scheduled for
September 23–9, 1906.

416 Stephen Eric Bronner gives the date of this letter as March 20, 1907
in his _The Letters of Rosa Luxemburg_ (Atlantic Highlands, 1993
edition), p. 121, although he does not specify the source for that date.
We have not been able to determine the exact date of this letter.

417 Luxemburg is probably referring to an appeal issued by the SPD
Executive and published in the December 16, 1906, issue of the
_Vorwärts_. In this appeal, concerning the elections to the Reichstag
scheduled for January 25, 1907, the Executive called on party members to
make the election campaign their top priority, to give a boost to the
party’s finances, to recruit new members to the party and new
subscribers to the socialist press, and not to let themselves be bluffed
by the bourgeois parties.

418 The latter phrase is _sintemalen sie selbst zuallererst in die Hosen
gemacht haben_; literally, “because they themselves were the first to
soil their pants.”

419 Luxemburg was in London to attend the Fifth Congress of the Russian
Social Democratic Labor Party (RSDRP), the proceedings of which took
place May 13–June 1, 1907. She participated in this Congress as a
delegate from the Polish party, the SDKPiL, and as a representative of
the German party, the SPD. For excerpts from one of her speeches at the
Russian Party Congress, see _The Rosa Luxemburg Reader_, edited by Peter
Hudis and Kevin B. Anderson (New York, 2004), pp. 200–7.

420 Luxemburg wrote the italicized phrase in English.

421 Luxemburg quotes the poem in English. The verse fragment is from a
drama by Thomas Heywood (d. 1649), _The Rape of Lucrece_, printed in
1608.

422 The German original of this letter, as is the case with most of the
letters to Kostya Zetkin in this collection, is in the Russian State
Archive for Social and Political History, in Moscow.

423 Luxemburg broke off her longtime love affair with Jogiches not long
after his return to Germany in 1907, shortly before this letter was
composed.

424 From the German _Bub_, “boy child; little boy.”

425 Sillenbuch, near Stuttgart, was the site of the Zetkins’ family
home.

426 On the grounds of alleged “incitement to acts of violence” in her
speech about the mass political strike at the SPD Party Congress in Jena
in 1905, Luxemburg was sentenced by the regional court in Weimar on
December 12, 1906, to a two-month prison term. As a result she was
incarcerated in the women’s prison on Barnim Street in Berlin from June
12 to August 12, 1907.

427 Luxemburg was in London to take part in the Fifth Congress of the
Russian Social Democratic Labor Party (RSDRP), held from May 13 through
June 1, 1907. At the congress she attacked the Mensheviks for their
pro-liberal conception of the Russian revolution, stating, “Into what an
anxious cackling of hens, pecking away in search of a pearl in the dung
heap of bourgeois parliamentarism, you have transformed this doctrine
[of Marx], which represents the mighty beating of the eagle wings of the
proletariat.” See Luxemburg, “Rede über die Rolle der Bourgeoisie in der
Revolution 1905/06 in Russland” (Speech on the Role of the Bourgeoisie
in the 1905/06 Revolution in Russia), in _Gesammelte Werke_, vol. 2, p.
224. While broadly agreeing with the Bolsheviks, she also criticized
them for “overestimating the so-called role of the armed insurrection.”

428 The International Socialist Congress was scheduled for Stuttgart,
August 18–24, 1907.

429 Luxemburg was in this prison from June 12 to August 12, 1907.

430 In a letter to Clara Zetkin, Luxemburg explained that by the phrase
_per Gelegenheit_ she meant an opportunity to smuggle a letter out of
the prison, thus avoiding censorship by the prison authorities and also
preventing them from reading her letters and knowing what she was
writing about. See _Gesammelte Briefe_, vol. 2, pp. 296–7.

431 Presumably Luxemburg is referring to Lily Luxemburg, the wife of her
brother Mikolaj.

432 Here Luxemburg is recalling her participation in the London Party
Congress of the RSDRP (May 13–June 1, 1907), her two-month confinement
in prison in Berlin (June 12–August 12, 1907), and her participation in
the First International Conference of Socialist Women (August 17 and 19,
1907) and the International Socialist Congress at Stuttgart (August
18–24, 1907).

433 As foreigners not having German citizenship, the Austrian socialist
Rudolf Hilferding and the astronomer and Dutch socialist Anton Pannekoek
were prohibited by order of the Prussian authorities from teaching at
the SPD party school, which had been started in November 1906. Luxemburg
jumped in to fill the breach and, beginning on October 1, 1907, began
teaching courses at the party school on economics and economic history.

434 Luxemburg had planned to give a course in Berlin during October and
November 1907. It was to have been on economics, covering six topics.
These lectures, each prepared as a separate pamphlet, remained partly
unfinished, but in 1910–11 they were supposed to be published under the
title _Einführung in die Nationalökonomie_ (_Introduction to Political
Economy_). Various circumstances prevented publication, and the
surviving parts were first published in 1925. This version, checked
against the original handwritten text, is included in Luxemburg,
_Gesammelte Werke_, vol. 5 (Berlin, 1990), pp. 524–778. An English
translation of the full manuscript will be contained in the next volume
of this series.

435 The reference is to Karl Marx’s _Capital_, vol. 1, chapters 26–33.

436 At the center of the SPD Party Congress in Essen, September 15–21,
1907, were discussions about the party’s position on war and on the
colonial question.

437 French: “The king is dead, long live the king.”

438 French: “The queen is dead, long live the queen.”

439 A “Dr. Mikhailov” of St. Petersburg had requested of Karl Kautsky
that he state his opinion on the question of socialists contributing to
bourgeois newspapers. Mikhailov intended to write an article for the
liberal Russian newspaper _Tovarishch_ (Comrade), to which Plekhanov and
other Mensheviks had contributed as well. He wanted also to publish
Kautsky’s reply in this newspaper. Kautsky answered Mikhailov on
December 3, 1907, and sent his statement to Luxemburg as well.

440 The place and date have been added according to what was stamped on
the envelope.

441 The sons of Karl and Luise Kautsky.

442 In 1908, whenever Kostya Zetkin was in Berlin, he stayed at the
house of Mrs. Grossmann in Friedenau at 14^(IV) Peschke Street.

443 The place and date are according to what was stamped on the
envelope.

444 A History of Gracchus Babeuf and of Babouvism, Based on Numerous
Unpublished Documents.

445 Luxemburg wanted to get a job for Kostya as an instructor at the
party school where she was teaching.

446 The National Convention, during the French Revolution, was the
highest representative body of the people. Based on the demands of the
people, the Convention passed legislation abolishing feudal relations,
in particular by redistributing land from feudal landowners to the
peasantry.

447 The Mountain was the extreme revolutionary party of Danton and
Robespierre, which occupied the highest seats in the National Assembly
of 1793. The Jacobins were the leading force in this party, which led
the popular uprising of May 31–June 2, 1793, bringing the revolution to
its highest point and instituting the Jacobin dictatorship.

448 The reference is to Karl Kautsky, _Die Klassengegensätze im
Zeitalter der Französischen Revolution_ (Class Contradictions in the Age
of the French Revolution).

449 E. Levasseur, _Histoire des classes ouvrières en France depuis 1789
jusq’au nos jours_ (History of the Working Classes in France from 1789
to the Present), published in 1867.

450 Alfred-Victor Espinas, “Eighteenth-Century Social Philosophy and the
Revolution.”

451 The place and date are according to what was stamped on the
envelope.

452 Goethe’s _West-East Divan_ is a collection of poems written in
imitation of the fourteenth-century Persian Sufi poet Hafiz. The poems
by “Suleika” in the _West-East Divan_ were by Goethe’s friend and lover
Marianne von Willemer. One of the meanings of _divan_, a term that
originated in Persia, is a collection of poems by one author (or in this
case two closely associated coauthors).

453 The reference is to a Polish revolutionary whose name it has not
been possible to determine.

454 The date and place are according to what was stamped on the
envelope.

455 Luxemburg had been making an effort since the beginning of 1908 to
collect money from various friends in order to post bail for the release
of an imprisoned young revolutionary in Warsaw who was very ill. See her
_Gesammelte Briefe_, vol. 2, pp. 360–1.

456 The SPD Party Congress was held in Nuremberg, September 13–19, 1908.
Luxemburg took part in it as a delegate from Poznań (German name, Posen)
and Sulechów–Krosno Odrzańskie (German name, Züllichau-Krossen).

457 The reference is to _Przegląd Socjaldemokratyyczny_ (Social
Democratic Review), theoretical organ of the SDKPiL.

458 Luxemberg is referring to her _Introduction to Political Economy_.

459 Author of the two-volume work on Babeuf mentioned in the letter of
May 8, 1908.

460 Luxemburg is probably talking about the guiding principles for a
workers’ youth organization and the corresponding resolution, which were
presented and explained by Clara Zetkin at the Fifth Conference of
Social Democratic Women of Germany, September 11–12, 1908, in Nuremburg.
The guiding principles and the resolution were approved by a large
majority at the women’s conference.

461 On September 13, 1908, in Nuremburg, the SPD Party Congress was
scheduled to begin. Luxemburg and Clara Zetkin took part as delegates to
the congress.

462 The SPD Party Congress was scheduled for September 13–19, 1908, in
Nuremburg.

463 Luxemburg was teaching at the SPD party school in Berlin. The
six-month session began on October 1.

464 The SPD Party Congress was scheduled for September 13–19, 1908, in
Nuremburg.

465 Luxemburg is referring to the classes she was giving at the SPD
party school in Berlin.

466 Under the statutes of the judiciary, which became law in Russia in
1864, a unified system of judicial institutions was introduced, based on
the principle of formal equality before the law for all social groups in
the population. Despite all the progress represented by this judicial
reform, the influence of surviving remnants, or vestiges, of feudalism
and serfdom remained clearly evident, and in practice the courts
continued to be subordinate to the tsarist autocracy and its
bureaucratic officialdom.

467 Luxemburg is referring to her pamphlet, published in 1906, entitled
_Program federacji, czyli PPS w blednym kole_ (A Program for Federation,
or the PPS in a Vicious Cycle).

468 Yekaterina Zarudnaya-Cavos.

469 The reference is to a series of articles by Hugo Heinemann entitled
“Zur Reform der Strafprozessordnung” (On the Reform of the Criminal
Procedural Code), which was published in _Neue Zeit_, vol. 27, no. 1,
1907/08.

470 Adolf E. R. Ritter von Hildebrand, _Das Problem der Form in der
bildenden Kunst_ (The Problem of Form in the Fine Arts).

471 The Russian original of this postcard is at the Russian State
Archive for Social and Political History in Moscow. It was first
published in the journal _Krasnaya Nov’_ (Red Virgin Soil), no. 3,
January 20, 1924, p. 73.

472 On this postcard it is possible to decipher the place from which it
was sent, but not the date. It was addressed to the political prisoner
N. S. Sesyulinsky at a prison in the city of Tyumen, in Siberia.

473 Luxemburg was writing a series of articles entitled “The Question of
Nationalities, and Autonomy” for the SDKPiL publication _Przegląd
Socjaldemokratyyczny. The_ series was published from August to December
1908 and from June to September 1909.

474 In 1902 Franz Mehring published a four-volume collection entitled
_Aus dem literarischen Nachlass von Karl Marx, Friedrich Engels und
Ferdinand Lassalle_ (From the Literary Legacy of Karl Marx, Friedrich
Engels, and Ferdinand Lassalle). In his introductory essay to the third
volume, “Collected Writings of Karl Marx and Friedrich Engels from May
1848 to October 1850,” Mehring took up, among other things, the Polish
question. He acknowledged his indebtedness for most of the content of
this essay to relevant publications by Luxemburg and to an unpublished
manuscript that she had made available to him. This manuscript of
Luxemburg’s has not been published. As with many of her papers, it has
apparently been lost.

475 Clara Zetkin had agreed to present a cycle, or series, of five
lectures in Berlin on the topic “The Position of Women Historically.”
She gave these lectures from May 14 to May 28, 1909.

476 In London on April 26, 1909, an international rally and
demonstration of women for universal suffrage took place, in which Clara
Zetkin took part as secretary of the International Proletarian Women’s
Movement. She presented the case for universal equal suffrage for women.
She also spoke at the 1909 May Day demonstration in London’s Hyde Park.

477 A reference to her writings on the National Question for the SDKPiL
publication _Przegląd Socjaldemokratyyczny_.

478 Italian: “sea without fish, mountains without trees, men without
faith, and women without shame.”

479 That is, the men are also “without shame.”

480 The Italian Riviera to the east of Genoa is called Riviera di
Levante (Riviera of the East); west of Genoa it is called Riviera di
Ponente (Riviera of the West).

481 A reference to Zetkin’s lectures on “The Position of Women
Historically.”

482 Felix Kautsky and Karl Kautsky, Jr.

483 In Germany, boys who had graduated from high school but not yet
entered college were called _muli_ (“mules”). The Italian word _asini_
means “asses.”

484 Bendel Kautsky.

485 Luxemburg quoted the Italian phrase in _Il Secolo_, which stated
that Gerhart Hauptmann _sta lavorando nella tranquilità lucida et
fragrante_ (“is working in fragrant and clear tranquility”).

486 The Italian phrase means “to the greatest statesman,” but Luxemburg
is playing with the word _statisto_, which can also mean “stupid
person.”

487 In a letter of May 18, 1909, Lenin had informed Luxemburg that he
was sending her his book on philosophy and asked that she publish a
notice about the book in _Neue Zeit_. Such a notice, about Lenin’s work
_Materialism and Empiriocriticism_, did appear in _Neue Zeit_, vol. 28,
1909/10, no. 1.

488 By Fyodor Dostoyevsky, about his experience in a penal colony in
Siberia, first published in 1862.

489 Quarten is a resort town in Switzerland, on the Walensee, or Lake of
Wallstadt, near Zurich.

490 August 17, 1909, was a Tuesday. It has not been possible to
establish with certainty whether Luxemburg wrote this letter on Tuesday,
August 17, or Thursday, August 19.

491 Despite the note of finality in this letter, it did not mark the end
of the relationship between Luxemburg and Kostya Zetkin. Kostya wrote
back, apologizing and asking that their friendship and correspondence
continue. As will be seen by subsequent letters in the present
selection, the two remained in communication even during Luxemburg’s
wartime years in prison, 1915–18, that is, until a few months before her
death.

492 The Russian original of this letter is held at Columbia University
Library in New York. It was first published in Luxemburg, _Vive la
lutte! Correspondance 1891–1914_ (Long Live the Struggle! Correspondence
of 1891–1914), compiled, translated, and annotated under the direction
of Georges Haupt by Claudie Weil, Irène Petit, and Gilbert Badia (Paris,
1975), pp. 314–15.

493 The RSDRP party school on the Italian island of Capri was
established in the spring of 1909. It began operations in August 1909.
The lecturers were: Aleksandr Bogdanov, G. A. Alexinsky, Anatoly
Lunacharsky, Maxim Gorky, M. N. Lyadov, M. N. Pokrovsky, and V. A.
Desnitsky. Lenin was also invited to speak, but refused to do so because
of what he claimed was the factional character of the school. Luxemburg
had been invited by Bogdanov, Alexinsky, and Lunacharsky to give
lectures at the Capri school. She had the desire to do so, but at the
same time she wrote (to Leo Jogiches): “Nevertheless I don’t know
whether, given the hostility between Lenin and the Capri colony, that
might not conflict with party political principles.” See her _Gesammelte
Briefe_, vol. 3, p. 66.

494 On October 1, 1907, Luxemburg began teaching economics and economic
history at the SPD party school in Berlin.

495 The German original of this postcard is in the A. M. Gorky [Gor’kii]
Archives at the Institute for World Literature, Russian Academy of
Sciences, in Moscow.

496 The reference is to Luxemburg’s two-part article “Was weiter?” (What
Next?), which was published in the Dortmund newspaper _Arbeiter-Zeitung_
on March 14 and 15, 1910, after Karl Kautsky refused to print it in
_Neue Zeit_. Haenisch was the editor of the Dortmund paper at that time.
For an English translation, see “The Next Step,” in _Rosa Luxemburg:
Selected Political Writings_, edited by Robert Looker (New York: 1974),
pp. 148–59.

497 The reference is to the powerful upsurge of struggle by the German
working class in early 1910 (including many strikes, frequent
demonstrations, and clashes with police). The workers were demanding a
democratic change in the restrictive electoral laws, especially in
Prussia.

498 A reference to Luxemburg’s two-part article “Was weiter?” (What
Next?).

499 On March 18 every year, Berliners held memorial activities in
Friedrichshain in honor of those who fell in the 1848 revolution.

500 The SPD’s party school in Berlin, where Luxemburg was a teacher of
economics and other subjects.

501 Luxemburg spoke in Bremen on April 6, 1910, on the topic of “The
Electoral Struggle and Its Lessons,” and in Essen on April 11, 1910, on
the mass strike and the political situation.

502 From April 3 to April 18, 1910, Luxemburg made a speaking tour in
which she discussed the struggle to expand suffrage and the lessons of
that struggle. She spoke in Gottesberg, Liegnitz, Breslau, Essen,
Elberfeld, Barmen, Düsseldorf, and Frankfurt on the Main, among other
places.

503 The reference is to Karl Kautsky’s article “Was nun?” (What Now?),
which he published in _Neue Zeit_, vol. 28, 1909/10, no. 2. In reply to
Luxemburg’s demand for the use of the political mass strike in the fight
for democratic election rights and for a democratic republic, Kautsky
rejected any discussion about the mass strike, because in his view the
time was not yet ripe for struggles outside the electoral, parliamentary
arena.

504 In _Neue Zeit_ and in the daily press, Luxemburg took issue
primarily with Karl Kautsky’s views on the question of the mass strike
and his “strategy of attrition.”

505 A celebration was scheduled for June 1910, for the hundredth
anniversary of the German poet Ferdinand Freiligrath.

506 Kurt and Alfred Seidel.

507 This theory, advanced by Karl Kautsky in spring 1910, held that the
struggle of the proletariat should be conducted only on the
parliamentary level—that is, in the electoral arena, not with strikes
and street demonstrations—in order supposedly to undermine the positions
of political strength held by the ruling class, thus “wearing down” the
class enemy by “attrition.” Kautsky argued that as a consequence, it
would be possible to “grow over” into socialism by peaceful means.
Luxemburg’s sharp opposition to Kautsky’s theory led her to break from
him, in 1910. For her critique of the “strategy of attrition,” see
“Theory and Practice,” in _The Rosa Luxemburg Reader_, edited by Peter
Hudis and Kevin B. Anderson (New York, 2004), pp. 208–32.

508 Magdeburg was the location of the 1910 SPD Party Congress, held
September 18–24, at which the central issues under discussion were the
mass strike and working class tactics (parliamentary or otherwise).

509 By “radicalism” Luxemburg meant the left-wing tendency in German
Social Democracy, i.e., the German Left.

510 Luxemburg’s article “Zeit der Aussaat” was first published in the
Breslau _Volkswacht_ of March 25, 1910. See her _Gesammelte Werke_, vol.
2, pp. 300–4.

511 Luxemburg’s pamphlet _Massenstreik, Partei und Gewerkschaften_ was
first published in Hamburg in the fall of 1906. The German text is in
her _Gesammelte Werke_, vol. 2, pp. 91–170. An English translation,
under the title _The Mass Strike, the Political Party, and the Trade
Unions_, may be found in _Rosa Luxemburg Speaks_, edited by Mary-Alice
Waters (New York, 1971), pp. 153–218.

512 At the end of 1909, a secretary was supposed to be added to the
editorial board of _Gleichheit_ on a temporary basis for six months. The
editors of the newspaper proposed Elfriede Gewehr. The SPD Executive
rejected this proposal. A complaint against this decision was filed with
the SPD Control Commission, but it was never taken up, because in the
meantime the matter was resolved.

513 The French original of this letter is in the Archives of the Polish
United Workers’ Party, in Warsaw.

514 Pseudonym of Julian Marchlewski.

515 In connection with the campaign of the Polish bourgeois press
against _Młot_ (Hammer), the SDKPiL leadership decided to ask leading
representatives of the international workers’ movement to write open
letters supporting _Młot_. For that purpose Julian Marchlewski traveled
to Paris on October 9 and returned to Berlin on October 13. Letters from
Jean Jaurès, August Bebel, and others were then published in _Młot_.

516 The newspaper _Młot_ appeared from August 6 through November 19,
1910, as the continuation of _Trybuna_ (Tribune), which came out from
April 2 through July 30, 1910. Luxemburg wrote on October 7, 1910, that
the _Trybuna_ and eight issues of _Młot_ had come out splendidly without
her participation. See her _Gesammelte Briefe_, vol. 3, p. 238.
_Vorwärts_ printed two instructive reports about the campaign against
_Młot:_ one on December 14, 1910, under the heading “Befremdende
Kampfmethoden” (Repugnant Methods of Struggle); and one on December 20,
1910, with the title “The Suppression of Młot.”

517 The Polish name of the publication in question was _Myśl
Niepodległa_ (Independent Thought).

518 _Concise Dictionary of the Political Sciences_; apparently a
multi-volume work of the “desk encyclopedia” type.

519 The “N” stands for “Niunia.” Using nicknames in her letters to
Kostya, she calls him “Niuniu” (diminutive form, “Niuniuś”) and herself
“Niunia.” Sometimes she uses other nicknames, e.g., “Gugu” and “Yagugu.”

520 The reference is to Rudolf Hilferding’s _Das Finanzkapital: Eine
Studie über die jüngste Entwicklung des Kapitalismus_ (Finance Capital:
A Study of the Latest Phase of Capitalist Development) (Vienna, 1910).
Karl Kautsky published a series of articles about Hilferding’s book
under the title “Finanzkapital und Krisen” (Finance Capital and Crises)
in _Neue Zeit_, vol. 29, 1910/11, no. 1.

521 A sarcastic comment, to the effect that Kautsky’s “discovery” of the
supposed importance of Hilferding’s book is akin to “discovering” the
pyramids.

522 The SPD’s party school in Berlin.

523 Luxemburg’s niece Annie was a student at the conservatory in Berlin.

524 This card, dated May 31, 1911, from E. de Puyt, asked that the
program and statutes of the SDKPiL be sent to the International
Socialist Bureau (ISB) as soon as possible, since the intention was to
publish the programs and statutes of all the parties affiliated with the
ISB.

525 The French socialists (of the SFIO) had sent an invitation, dated
March 11, 1911, asking that the SDKPiL take part in the French socialist
congress scheduled for April 16–19, 1911, at Saint-Quentin.

526 “Fraternal best wishes. Long live socialist unity and revolutionary
intransigence.”

527 Luxemburg was in the Rhineland to give agitational speeches from May
5 to May 15, 1911.

528 A book by Joachim Nettelbeck, _Bürger zu Kolberg. Eine
Lebensbeschreibung von ihm selbst aufgezeichnet_ (Citizen of Kolberg: An
Account of His Life, Set Down by His Own Hand).

529 Luxemburg is referring to her unsigned article (in Polish) entitled
“Against the Scoundrels,” which was published in _Wolny Glos_, no. 7,
June 3, 1911.

530 In the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_ for May 6 and May 8, 1911,
Luxemburg’s article “Peace Utopias” was published. See her _Gesammelte
Werke_, vol. 2, pp. 491–504. For an English translation, see “Peace
Utopias,” in _Rosa_ _Luxemburg Speaks_, edited by Mary-Alice Waters (New
York, 1971), pp. 250–7.

531 An opportunist, Hugo Lindemann, had been nominated as the SPD
candidate in the mayoral election in Stuttgart, held on May 12, 1911.
Luxemburg wrote an article on the subject entitled “Gefährliche
Neuerungen” (Dangerous Innovations), which was published in the
_Leipziger Volkszeitung_ on May 9, 1911. See her _Gesammelte Werke_,
vol. 2, pp. 505–8. Lindemann was defeated in the election.

532 The reference is to Luxemburg’s article “Der Disziplinbruch als
Methode” (Breaking Discipline as a Method), which appeared in the
_Leipziger Volkszeitung_ of May 15, 1911. See her _Gesammelte Werke_,
vol. 2, pp. 509–14.

533 There was a debate in the Reichstag over a proposal for a
constitution for Alsace-Lorraine that would include universal, equal,
and direct suffrage as well as the secret ballot in elections to the new
second (and lower) chamber of parliament in Alsace-Lorraine. To assure
its adoption, which the SPD was striving for, it accepted, as a
trade-off, the inclusion in the draft constitution of an acknowledgment
of the Kaiser’s ruling authority over Alsace-Lorraine and the
establishment of an upper chamber (a more conservative body, controlled
by the aristocracy and the wealthy). The SPD claimed that this unique
state constitution for Alsace-Lorraine was a step forward, but it did
not meet the demand of that region’s population for autonomy.

534 Her speaking tour in Rhineland was from May 5 to May 15, 1911.

535 In 1910 the SPD Executive, in association with the German Mine
Workers’ Union of Bochum, established an SPD office for
Rhineland-Westphalia in Düsseldorf, headed by Heinrich Limbertz and
Franz Pokorny. Its main task was to follow what was being published from
day to day and to gather material, mainly against the Center Party and
the industrialists of the Ruhr, and have it available for purposes of
agitation (and political campaigning).

536 Friedrich Ebert was the SPD candidate in the Elberfeld-Barmen
electoral district for the Reichstag elections, scheduled for January
12, 1912, and he was elected.

*[Note by RL:] Of those, for the past three years, ten openings have
been available for the trade unions; unfortunately, only the Miners
Union and the Bricklayers Union have made use of this, insofar as they
each sent two students each year. The other unions, particularly the
Metal Workers, are boycotting the party school—to their shame and to
ours!

537 The reference is to _La Rotisserie de la Reine Pedauque_ by Anatole
France.

538 A story entitled “Amber” (_Bernstein_) by Eugenie Jacobie appeared
in the children’s supplement of _Gleichheit_, no. 18, 1911.

539 Evidently Zetkin had sent an album with reproductions of paintings
by Anselm Feuerbach, one of the paintings being _Iphigenia_.

540 Luxemburg spoke on the topic “Our Struggle for Power” in Danzig on
June 13, 1911, in Ludwigshof near Königsberg on June 14, and in Elbing
on June 15.

541 The SPD Party Congress was scheduled for Jena, September 10–16,
1911.

542 The Commission of Seven consisted of Dittmann, Heinrich Stubbe,
Edmund Gottschalk, Richard Lipinski, Max Süssheim, Kurt Rosenfeld, and
Wilhelm Haupt. Its purpose was to organize permanent connections and
cooperation among revolutionary-minded elements in the SPD. It was the
result of the first attempts by revolutionaries of the SPD Left to
oppose the revisionists in an organized way, and originated during the
preparatory period before the 1910 SPD Party Congress at Magdeburg.

543 A suitable candidate needed to be found for the SPD Executive as a
successor to Paul Singer, who died January 31, 1911.

544 The reference is to _Wolny Głos_, legal organ of the SDKPiL,
published weekly in Warsaw from April to October 1911.

545 The German original of this letter is at the International Institute
of Social History, in Amsterdam. It was first published in Henriette
Roland Holst-van der Schalk, _Rosa Luxemburg. Haar leven en werken_
(Rosa Luxemburg: Her Life and Work) (Rotterdam, 1935). See also the
German edition, _Rosa Luxemburg: ihr Leben und Werken_ (Zurich, 1937).

546 The initials SDAP stand for the Sociaal-Democratische
Arbeiderspartij (Social Democratic Workers’ Party) in Holland.

547 The initials SDP stand for the Sociaal-Democratische Partij (in
Holland), which later became the Communist Party of Holland.

548 Henriette Roland Holst joined the SDAP in 1897. In 1909
disagreements between the reformists and the Marxists led to a split.
The latter founded the SDP. Roland Holst left the SDAP in 1911, founded
the Revolutionair Socialistisch Verband (Revolutionary Socialist
Association), and together with that group joined the SDP in 1916.

549 Luxemburg was about to move from Friedenau, a western suburb of
Berlin, to Südende, a suburb south of Berlin.

550 In the spring of 1911 France sought to extend its domination to all
of Morocco and to consolidate its colonial rule over that country.
Germany chose this occasion to renew its demand to exert its own
influence in Morocco. On July 1, 1911, the German government sent the
warships _Panther_ and _Berlin_ to the port of Agadir in Morocco, thus
provoking the imminent danger of war. England’s intervention on France’s
side forced the inspirers of Germany’s colonial policy to back down. A
compromise was reached between France and Germany.

551 In the children’s supplement to _Gleichheit_, no. 23–5, 1911, there
appeared an article with the title “Negerhandel” (The Negro Slave
Trade), with the subtitle “Aus Nettelbecks Lebensbeschreibung” (From
Nettelbeck’s Story of His Life).

552 In Stuttgart, at a statewide meeting of SPD members in the state of
Württemberg, Friedrich Westmeyer and Otto Krille, the revolutionary
editors of _Schwäbische Tagwacht_, were reprimanded, at which point a
large minority walked out of the meeting. This was a blow against all
attempts at reconciliation between the Left and the opportunists.

553 The yearly congress of the SPD was scheduled for Jena, September
10–16, 1911.

554 In Dortmund on September 7, 1911, Luxemburg gave a speech at an
election campaign rally before a runoff election for a seat in the
Reichstag. The election was held on September 19, and the SPD candidate
received 48.55 percent of the vote.

555 The International Socialist Bureau (ISB) met in Zurich on September
23–4, 1911. Luxemburg introduced a resolution on the rising cost of
living, which was adopted unanimously. See her _Gesammelte Werke_, vol.
3 (Berlin, 1990), p. 57.

556 On November 16, 1911, an earthquake shook all of south and central
Germany. The effects were felt as widely as Kassel, Magdeburg, and Halle
(Saale).

557 The reference is to a series by Karl Kautsky entitled
“Krisentheorien” (Theories of Crisis) in _Neue Zeit_, vol. 20, 1901/02,
no. 2.

558 Paul Lensch, chief editor of _Leipziger Volkszeitung_, had published
articles by Luxemburg without her name or initials, against which she
protested. In the case of her article “The Mass Strike [Comes] Before
the Reichstag,” a concluding passage, critical of the SPD parliamentary
group in the Reichstag, was deleted.

559 Luxemburg’s article was published under the title “Was nun?” (What
Now?) in _Gleichheit_, no. 10, February 5, 1912. See her _Gesammelte
Werke_, vol. 3, pp. 91–9.

560 The reference is to the Press Commission of the _Schwäbische
Tagwacht_ and to the SPD Control Commission. Clara Zetkin was a member
of both commissions.

561 In the women’s supplement of _Gleichheit_, no. 9–11, 1912, Maxim
Gorky’s story “Yemelyan Pilyay” was published; and the children’s
supplement, no. 9, 1912, reprinted the poem by Detlev von Liliencron
“Heide im Winter” (Heather in Winter).

562 A reference to her article “Was nun?” (What Now?) in _Gleicheit_,
no. 10, February 5, 1912.

563 The question at issue was whether the SPD, on the basis of its
strength in the Reichstag, ought necessarily to be represented in the
Reichstag’s presiding committee. At a meeting in Stuttgart on January
25, 1912, at which Hermann Duncker spoke, a resolution was adopted
demanding “that the [SPD Reichstag] group assert its rights to be
represented in the parliamentary leadership.”

564 The reference is to her work _The Accumulation of Capital_, which
she had begun in January 1912.

565 A conflict arose between Karl Kautsky and Franz Mehring over their
fundamentally different positions on parliamentarism and the relation
between reform and revolution. In this dispute the SPD Executive took a
position against Mehring. His criticisms of the policies of the
Executive, which had appeared in the _Neue Zeit_, served Kautsky and the
Executive as a pretext for denying him permission to continue writing
lead articles for the _Neue Zeit_.

566 The reference is to the article by August Bebel “Berichtigung und
Ergänzung” (Correction and Addition) in the _Neue Zeit_, vol. 30,
1911/12, no. 2.

567 Luxemburg is referring to the general meeting of the Association of
Social Democratic Voters’ Leagues of Berlin and its environs on March 17
and 31, 1912, at which the secret agreement between the SPD Executive
and the bourgeois Progressive People’s Party for the runoff elections in
January 1912 was rejected because it served as an impediment to the
Social Democratic election campaigns in a whole series of electoral
districts.

568 In a three-part article Mehring had summarized the essential content
of Luxemburg’s book _The Accumulation of Capital_ and had taken issue
with a number of critical reviews of the book.

569 M. I. Nachimson reviewed Luxemburg’s book in the _Dresdener
Volkszeitung_ of January 21 and 22, 1913, and Anton Pannekoek did
likewise in the _Bremer Bürger-Zeitung_ of January 29 and 30, 1913.

570 Kautsky published a review by Otto Bauer of Luxemburg’s _The
Accumulation of Capital_ in the _Neue Zeit_, vol. 32, 1912/13, no. 1.

571 In fact, Luxemburg did not write her reply to critics until she was
in prison during the World War, in 1915. Her _Anti-Critique_ was first
published posthumously in 1921. The full title was _The Accumulation of
Capital, or What the Epigones Have Made of Marx’s Theory: An
Anti-Critique_. For the original German text, see her _Gesammelte
Werke_, vol. 3, pp. 413–523. An English translation was published as
_The Accumulation of Capital: An Anti-Critique_, edited by Kenneth
Tarbuck (New York, 1972).

572 The German original of the above letter is in the Library and
Archive of the Workers’ Movement, in Copenhagen. It was first published
by Gerd Callesen in _Arbog for Arbejderbevaegelsens Historie_ (Archive
for the History of the Workers’ Movement) (Copenhagen, 1971), pp.
109–11.

573 “Karski” was the pseudonym of Julian Marchlewski.

574 Luxemburg’s letters to Camille Huysmans, dated December 2, 1912, and
December 16, 1912, and the notes accompanying those letters, provide a
detailed account of the dissolved Warsaw organization of the SDKPiL and
the unsuccessful attempt by that unrecognized splinter group to obtain
representation at the 1912 International Socialist Congress, with
support from the Russian delegation, headed by Lenin. See Luxemburg,
_Gesammelte Briefe_, vol. 6, pp. 181–6.

575 In the Warsaw organization of the SDKPiL an opposition group was
formed to oppose the policies of the party’s top leadership. At a
conference in Warsaw on December 10, 1911, this opposition group elected
its own committee and decided to publish its own newspaper. Numerous
arrests by the Russian secret police at that time led the SDKPiL
leadership, urged on in particular by Luxemburg, to accuse the Warsaw
committee of being the work of the Russian secret police. In June 1912
the top leaders of the SDKPiL founded a new Warsaw committee, acceptable
to them, declared the “splitter” organization dissolved, and expelled
its leaders from the SDKPiL. Also in June 1912, the SDKPiL leadership
published a leaflet on the subject signed on behalf of the leadership by
Józef Domanski, J. Karski, Jan Tyszka, and Adolf Warski. Luxemburg also
signed as the representative of the SDKPiL on the International
Socialist Bureau (ISB). Lenin took an opposing position and defended the
Warsaw committee. He demanded that all parties belonging to the Second
International be informed. The top leadership of the SDKPiL decided to
issue a reply to Lenin, dated October 16, 1912, which was also sent to
the ISB.

576 An October 14 draft version of the present letter includes the
following comment: “This systematic support for attempts to split the
Polish party movement from behind the scenes by the Russian faction of
Lenin should be raised for discussion by the International and its
judgment ought to be binding.” This sentence was omitted from the final
version of the letter dated October 20, 1913.

577 In October 1913, criminal proceedings against Luxemburg began on the
grounds that at two public meetings—one in Fechenheim on September 25,
1913 and one in Bockenheim on September 26, 1913—she had called for a
struggle against the danger of war and urged workers, in the event of
war, not to fire on their class brothers in France or other countries.
The trial was held on February 20, 1914, at the regional court in
Frankfurt on the Main, and Luxemburg was sentenced to one year in
prison. In the end Luxemburg served this sentence from February 18,
1915, to February 18, 1916, in the Berlin women’s prison on Barnim
Street. An English translation of Luxemburg’s speech in her own defense
at the trial in Frankfurt on February 20, 1914, is in J. P. Nettl, _Rosa
Luxemburg_, (Oxford, 1966), pp. 488–92.

578 Robert Dissmann was seeking to justify the action of the SPD
parliamentary group in the Reichstag, which had voted for war credits.

579 On August 4, 1914, the SPD parliamentary group—with group discipline
applied against the minority—voted in favor of the war-credits motion of
the imperialist government. The decision to approve money for war was
made on August 3, after a heated dispute within the SPD parliamentary
group, by a vote of 78 to 14. The support given by the majority to the
war meant that an open split in the SPD was inevitable.

580 In the caucus sessions of the SPD’s Reichstag group before August 4,
1914, Gustav Hoch actually spoke in favor of approving the war credits,
and he was part of the commission assigned to draft the final wording of
the declaration that was made by the SPD parliamentary group on August
4.

581 Shortly after the World War began the SPD Executive sent Albert
Südekum to Italy, Richard Fischer to Switzerland, Philip Scheidemann to
Holland, and Wilhelm Jansson to Denmark and Sweden, while the Executive
of the Austrian Social Democratic Party sent three representatives to
Italy—their purpose being to justify the pro-war conduct of the German
and Austrian party leaderships in the eyes of the Social Democrats of
the neutral countries and win them over to the German-Austrian position.

582 On September 27, 1914, under martial law, the high command of the
March of Brandenburg (the region including Berlin) banned the main SPD
newspaper, the _Vorwärts_, for an indefinite length of time, because of
an article entitled “Deutschland und das Ausland” (Germany and the
Outside World), in which it was suggested that the German workers, and
the workers of other countries, had been forced to take part in the war
against their will. After the SPD Executive gave a written pledge to
edit the _Vorwärts_, from then on during the war, in such a way that the
topics of “class war and class hatred” would not be touched on, the ban
was lifted, on September 30. In this way the SPD Executive blatantly
demonstrated its submission to the military dictatorship.

583 Luxemburg’s unsigned article “Gegen den Franktireurkrieg” (Against
Guerrilla War) appeared in the September 17, 1914, issue of
_Sozialdemokratische Korrespondenz_. It was reprinted on September 19 in
the _Volkswacht_ in Halle (Saale), from which it was taken for
publication on September 30 by the _Berner Tagewacht_ in Switzerland.
For the German text, see Luxemburg, _Gesammelte Werke_, vol. 4 (Berlin,
1990), pp. 6–8.

584 Mehring’s article appeared unsigned in the _Sozialdemokratische
Korrespondenz_ of September 22, 1914, and was reprinted by other
publications, including the _Bremer Bürger-Zeitung_ on September 24 and
the _Berner Tagewacht_ on September 28.

585 A declaration signed by Luxemburg, Karl Liebknecht, Franz Mehring,
and Clara Zetkin, dated September 10, 1914, was sent to various foreign
newspapers. For the German text, see Luxemburg’s _Gesammelte Werke_,
vol. 4, p. 5. It was published in the _Berner Tagwacht_ on October 30,
1914, and in the Zurich newspaper _Volksrecht_ on October 31, 1914. For
an English version of this brief declaration, see J. P. Nettl, _Rosa
Luxemburg_ (Oxford, 1966), p. 610.

586 At the start of World War I in August 1914, Benito Mussolini was a
leading member of the left wing of the Italian Socialist Party and
strongly opposed the war. Unbekownst to Luxemburg, shortly afterwards,
in October 1914, he swung sharply to the right and became a leading
proponent of Italian intervention in the war, on the side of the
Entente. As a result, he was expelled from the Italian Socialist Party
in November 1914.

587 Mussolini was the editor of _Avanti!_ from 1911 until his expulsion
from the Italian Socialist Party in November 1914, a month after the
composition of this letter.

588 A diminutive form of Hans, a term of endearment. In addressing
Diefenbach, Luxemburg used, besides “Hannesle,” both “Hänschen” and
“Hanneselein.”

589 Kostya Zetkin worked as an editor at _Gleichheit_ and for the most
part edited the newspaper’s “Supplement for Our Children.”

590 Brandel Geck was the son of Luxemburg’s friends and political
allies, Adolf and Marie Geck.

591 Luxemburg is referring to her _Introduction to Political Economy_.

592 Luxemburg is referring to her powerful tract denouncing World War I,
the so-called Junius pamphlet, which she wrote in early 1915.

593 Südekum was one of the most fervent war supporters among the SPD
officialdom.

594 Luxemburg assumed that her prison sentence would have to be served
at the Moabit prison on Prison Street (Turmstrasse).

595 Luxemburg sent a comparable letter to the editors of _Het Volk_ (The
_People_), a Social Democratic paper in Stockholm, and of the _Berner
Tagwacht_. The German original of this letter is in the Archive and
Library for the Workers’ Movement, Stockholm. It was first published by
Jürgen Rojahn in _International Review of Social History_, vol. 30, pt.
1, 1986, pp. 146–7.

596 The words “like other members of the Intern. Soc. Bureau” were
inserted by hand by Karl Liebknecht in this letter, the rest of which
had been typed.

597 As the representative of the SDKPiL on the ISB, Luxemburg had
received a circular dated October 2, 1914, and addressed to all parties
affiliated to the ISB. The circular stated, in particular, that “when
the time approaches to prepare for peace,” the ISB would have big tasks
to carry out and for these it would have to gather necessary material
and as regularly as possible maintain contact with the affiliated
parties. “It is also desirable in general, for the continued existence
and good functioning of the International, that in the midst of the
storm of national passions at least a central point of organization
should exist, where the affiliated parties will know how to find one
another.” The circular also stated that the idea of holding an
international conference on the question of changing the location of the
ISB did not seem “feasible” at that time.

598 The reference is to the report “Verlegung des Internationalen Büros”
(Relocation of the International Bureau) in _Vorwärts_, no. 208, October
31, 1914.

599 The French original of the above letter is in the Camille Huysmans
Archive in Antwerp. It was first published in Luxemburg, _Briefe an
Freunde_ (Letters to Friends), edited by Benedikt Kautsky on the basis
of the manuscript prepared by Luise Kautsky (Hamburg, 1950), pp. 67–9.

600 The reference is to the transfer of the ISB Executive Committee to
the Hague.

601 See the preceding letter, of November 9, 1914, to
_Social-Demokraten_ in Copenhagen, a copy of which Luxemburg sent to
Stockholm and to Bern.

602 At her trial in Frankfurt on the Main, on February 20, 1914,
Luxemburg had been sentenced to one year in prison. Because of the poor
state of her health, she was granted a postponement of the date on which
she would begin serving her sentence. In the end, she served from
February 18, 1915, to February 18, 1916, in the Barnim Street women’s
prison in Berlin.

603 The reference is to the party congress of the Swiss Social
Democratic Party, which took place at the House of the People
(_Volkshaus_) in Bern on October 30–1, 1914, and about which _Vorwärts_
printed an item on November 5, 1914.

604 Latin: “fathers having been conscripted.”

605 Following this letter was a postscript from Karl Liebknecht, in
which he expressed his solidarity with Huysmans.

606 Luxemburg assumed that on December 2, 1914, when the proposal to
approve war credits would come up for the second time, the SPD
parliamentary group in the Reichstag would vote in favor. In the actual
vote, Karl Liebknecht was the only elected representative who refused to
vote for the war credits.

607 The day in 1914 when the SPD parliamentary group approved credits
for the war.

608 The reference is to the verdict in the Frankfurt trial. After
Luxemburg’s appeal was rejected on October 22, 1914, the verdict went
into effect.

609 The reference is to a reorganization, or reassignment of posts, on
the editorial board of the _Volksstimme_ in Frankfurt.

610 With the beginning of the World War, Richard Wagner, an editor of
the _Volksfreund_ in Brunswick (Braunschweig) who previously had shared
the views of the German Left, suddenly assumed a pro-war position and
consequently was removed from the editorial board. On the initiative of
Otto Antrick, August Thalheimer was brought in as an editor to work on
the _Volksfreund_.

611 The “infamous” article appeared in the November 2, 1914, issue of
the _Volksstimme_ in Frankfurt.

612 Luxemburg was referring to the prison sentence she was soon to begin
serving.

613 This probably refers to the _Internazionale Korrespondenz_
(International Correspondence), which began publication in Berlin in
September 1914 under the editorship of Albert Baumeister, a union
official. This publication served as a vehicle for rightist and pro-war
views.

614 This probably refers to _Die Internationale_ (The International),
the publication edited by Luxemburg and Franz Mehring.

615 Alexander Winkler had responded to a request from Karl Liebknecht
and had given financial support to the revolutionary forces in putting
out agitational material and especially in establishing _Die
Internationale_.

616 On February 6, 1915, Karl Liebknecht received a telegram informing
him that as of February 7 he was drafted to serve as a soldier “for
reinforcement purposes” in the local militia. On February 7 he was
informed that aside from his duties as an elected representative he was
forbidden to engage in any other political activities and that he would
be “given leave” to take part in sessions of the Prussian house of
representatives and the Reichstag. Liebknecht remained in Berlin from
then until March 21, 1915.

617 From February 18, 1915, to February 18, 1916, Luxemburg had to serve
the sentence that was handed down against her at the Frankfurt trial of
February 20, 1914. She served the sentence in the Berlin Women’s Prison
on Barnim Street.

618 Kostya Zetkin was called up for military service in March 1915.

619 A doctor from England, then living in Germany.

620 March 5 was Luxemburg’s birthday.

621 French: “The dead lays hold of the living.”

622 General Robert Clive laid the groundwork for English colonial power
in East India; “sepoy” was the term for native Indians trained to serve
in the army of the East India Company.

623 Probably Luxemburg was referring to an article by Ferdinand Lassalle
entitled “Herr Bastiat–Schulze von Delitsch, der ökonomische Julian,
oder Kapital und Arbeit” (Mr. Bastiat–Schulze von Delitsch, the Julian
of Economics, or Capital and Labor), in Volume Three of Lassalle’s
_Reden und Schriften. Neue Gesamtausgabe_ (Speeches and Writings: A New
Complete Edition), edited by, and with a biographical introduction by,
Eduard Bernstein.

624 On July 29, 1915, Clara Zetkin was arrested in Stuttgart and sent to
Karlsruhe. On July 30 an investigation was begun against her on charges
of “attempted treason.” The investigative proceedings took up her
leading role at the International Socialist Women’s Conference, held in
Bern, Switzerland, March 26–8, 1915, and her dissemination in Germany of
the manifesto of that conference. On October 12, 1915, the charges were
dropped and Clara Zetkin was released from custody.

625 The line—which means roughly “And if you are just who you are—well,
that will be exactly right”—is from _Faust_, Part One, the scene
entitled “The Street in Front of Gretchen’s Door.”

626 _The Lessing Legend_ was one of Franz Mehring’s best-known books.

627 Franz Mehring was working on his biography of Karl Marx.

628 March 5 was Luxemburg’s birthday. _Der Dichter_, “the Poet,” was a
nickname for Clara Zetkin’s second husband, Georg Friedrich Zundel.

629 Luxemburg was released from the Barnim Street women’s prison in
Berlin on February 18, 1916.

630 In May 1915 criminal charges had been filed against Peter Berten,
Rosa Luxemburg, Franz Mehring, and Clara Zetkin in connection with their
work on the journal _Die Internationale_. The proceedings were pending
in Dusseldorf, because that was the journal’s place of publication.

631 Kostya Zetkin, who had been called up in March 1915, was in training
as a medical orderly. When that training was completed in July 1916 he
returned to his regiment at Ulm.

632 The reference is to an unsigned article by Clara Zetkin, entitled
“Franz Mehring. Zum 70. Geburtstag” (Franz Mehring: On His 70th
Birthday), which was published in _Gleichheit_, no. 11, February 18,
1916.

633 The “Old Man” was a nickname for Franz Mehring.

634 During the Berlin May Day demonstration on Potsdam Square on May 1,
1916, Karl Liebknecht shouted: “Down with the war! Down with the
government!” He was arrested and taken to a military prison on Lehrter
Street in Berlin.

635 Alexanderplatz, in Berlin, was the location of police headquarters
and the central police prison. Later in 1916, in July and in
September–October, Luxemburg herself was incarcerated there.

636 On May 2, 1916, the SPD parliamentary group in the Reichstag made a
motion that “the legal proceedings against Dr. Liebknecht be suspended
for the duration of the current Reichstag session and that the
imprisonment imposed on him be ended.” On May 9, this motion, together
with a similar motion by the centrist Social Democratic Working Group,
was referred to a commission that dealt with points of order. On May 11,
this commission proposed that both motions be rejected, and in the
subsequent Reichstag voting the commission’s proposal was adopted by a
vote of 230 to 110 with two abstentions. In explaining the rationale for
the SPD motion, Otto Landsberg had reaffirmed the SPD majority’s support
for the war policies of the government and had distanced himself from
Liebknecht’s fight against the war.

637 Friedrich Zundel served as a civilian driver for the Red Cross,
using his own automobile. Among other duties he was assigned to the war
zone in France.

638 Since 1895, Clara Zetkin had been a member of the SPD Control
Commission. For a long time, because of her poor health, she was not
able to take part in the sessions of the Commission, held in Berlin. In
May 1917 she was officially dropped from the Commission, because she
belonged to a revolutionary Social Democratic organization that had been
established in Stuttgart and that stood in opposition to the SPD
Executive and no longer paid membership dues to the SPD Executive.

639 Luxemburg is referring to the milieu of the centrist opposition in
German Social Democracy, grouped around Karl Kautsky.

640 The nickname of Emmanuel Wurm, Mathilde Wurm’s husband.

641 French: “oh, I could never finish [the list].”

642 In ancient Greek myth, queen of the Amazons, who fought against and
is killed by Achilles in the Trojan War. In Heinrich von Kleist’s play
_Penthesilea_, which Luxemburg directly refers to in another letter,
Penthesilea kills Achilles.

643 Charges were brought against Luxemburg before the Royal Special
Court in central Berlin for insulting an officer of the criminal justice
system. She was sentenced to an additional ten days in prison.

644 The first “stage” was in the prison at Alexanderplatz, the second
was at the women’s prison on Barnim Street, and the third was at Wronke.
On July 10, 1916, because of her political activity, Luxemburg was taken
into “military protective custody” by order of General Gustav von
Kessel, the top military commander of the March of Brandenburg. At first
she was held in the police prison at Alexanderplatz in Berlin, then on
July 21, she was moved to the Berlin women’s prison on Barnim Street.
From October 26, 1916, to July 22, 1917, she was held in the Wronke
fortress in the province of Poznań. From there she was sent to the
Breslau prison, from which she was finally freed by the German
revolution on November 8, 1918.

645 Hugo Faisst died on July 30, 1914.

646 Rosa Luxemburg is probably referring to the time she spent at
Wiesenbach in the Black Forest. She was there together with Clara Zetkin
in August 1912.

647 The reference is to Eduard Mörike’s poem “Er ist’s” (He’s the One),
set to music by the composer Hugo Wolf.

648 Latin: “None are obliged to do more than they can.”

649 These two words were written in English.

650 These lines are from Goethe’s _West-East Divan_.

651 Hans Kautsky, Robert’s father, was a painter at the Royal Theater,
the head of which was Count von Hülsen.

652 Latin: “about all things.”

653 Luxemburg was translating from Russian to German the
autobiographical novel by Vladimir Korolenko, _Istoriia moego
sovremen-nika_ (History of My Contemporary). Her translation was brought
out posthumously in Berlin in 1919 by Paul Cassirer Publishers. She
wrote her “Introduction” to this book in July 1918 while in prison in
Breslau; the German text of the “Introduction” is in her _Gesammelte
Werke_, vol. 4, pp. 302–31.

654 Diminutive, endearing form of Marta.

655 The explanation of the grounds for the verdict against Luxemburg
contains the following passage: “The accused is guilty of having
insulted Constable Palm by word and deed, in Central Berlin on September
22, 1916, by shouting at him, ‘You’re just an ordinary police spy and a
swine. Get out of here,’ and at the same time throwing an inkpot at
him … The accused was under protective custody at the Berlin women’s
prison. On the day in question Constable Palm was present as overseer
during her conversation with Mathilde Jacob. After the expiration of ten
minutes he declared that the conversation was ended. The accused has now
confessed to making the above-mentioned verbal insult. She denies having
thrown anything at the police official.”

656 Ulrich von Hutten (1488–1523) was a German humanist and poet, an
outspoken advocate of the Reformation and ally of Martin Luther.

657 See above, the letter to Mathilde Wurm of December 28, 1916.

658 The Italian phrase means literally “whoever walks softly, walks
sensibly”; an equivalent English phrase is “slow but sure.”

659 The Greek word for sea is _thalassa_.

660 The reference was to Halley’s comet, which was visible in 1910.

661 In 1904, in German Southwest Africa, the Herrero and Hottentot
peoples rose up against the harsh colonial rule of German imperialism.
To put down the uprising a force of 12,000 colonial troops was deployed
under the command of General Lothar von Trotha. The indigenous people
were driven out into the desert, cut off from their sources of water,
and as a result tens of thousands were left to die a horrible death.
General von Trotha also gave orders to shoot and kill women and
children. Earlier, in 1900, von Trotha had commanded a German brigade
during the suppression of the Boxer Rebellion in China; an alliance of
Western governments employed mass murder to put it down. Von Trotha
later became a leading member of the racist Tule Society, which greatly
influenced the young Adolf Hitler.

662 March 5 was Luxemburg’s birthday.

663 General Gustav von Kessel was Supreme Commander of the March of
Brandenburg, and it was under his authority that Luxemburg was
imprisoned under “military protective custody.”

664 Luxemburg was referring to the fragment by Grillparzer entitled
_Esther_.

665 Here where Luxemburg used the abbreviation _Herzl_., presumably for
_Herzlich_, we have used an abbreviation, “Aff’ly,” for
“Affectionately.”

666 In Petrograd, Russia’s capital, over the course of five days,
beginning on International Women’s Day, March 8, 1917 (February 23 by
the old Russian calendar), strikes and mass demonstrations by hundreds
of thousands of workers against food shortages, against the war, and
against the rule of the tsar culminated on March 12, when the 150,000
soldiers of the Petrograd garrison mutinied and went over to the side of
the workers, causing the downfall of the tsarist regime. Tsar Nicholas
II abdicated on March 15, terminating the 300-year rule of the Romanov
dynasty. A “dual power” arose, with Councils of Workers’, Soldiers’, and
Peasants’ Deputies forming in all parts of Russia and exercising at
least as much real authority as the Provisional Government.

667 On October 26 Luxemburg, held in prison under “military protective
custody,” was transferred from the Barnim Street women’s prison in
Berlin to the Wronke fortress in the province of Poznań.

668 Luxemburg served one year in the women’s prison on Barnim Street in
Berlin, from February 18, 1915, to February 18, 1916. This prison
sentence resulted from a February 1914 trial, where she was convicted on
the basis of her antiwar speeches of 1913–14.

669 The reference is to the novel _Red Flemish Blood_ by Pierre
Broodcoorens, which appeared in German translation in 1916.

670 Luise Kautsky had translated into German many writings in English
from the papers of Marx and Engels, including Marx’s newspaper articles
published in the _New York Herald. The_ translation came out in two
volumes, edited by N. Ryazanov (Stuttgart, 1917), under the title
_Gesammelte Schriften von Karl Marx und Friedrich Engels 1852 bis 1862_
(Collected Writings of Karl Marx and Friedrich Engels, 1852–1862).

671 Luxemburg was translating Korolenko’s _History of My Contemporary_.

672 The reference is to the SPD Party Congress in Nuremburg, September
13–19, 1908.

673 The trilogy by Friedrich Schiller, _Wallensteins Lager_
(Wallenstein’s Military Camp), _Die Piccolomini_ (The Piccolomini), and
_Wallensteins Tod_ (Wallenstein’s Death).

674 This passage is from the “Feuilleton Supplement” of the _Leipziger
Volkszeitung_, March 16, 1917.

675 Sophie Liebknecht was from a Russian Jewish family in Rostov on the
Don. Her name in Russian was “Sofiya.” Luxemburg uses several Russian
nicknames for “Sofiya,” among them “Sonya,” “Sonyusha,” and “Sonyichka.”

676 The reference is to a scene in Goethe’s _Faust_.

677 This probably refers to Friedrich Zundel, the second husband of
Clara Zetkin. He was serving in the Red Cross as a civilian.

678 The last two words were written in English.

679 The reference is to the manuscript of Luxemburg’s _Anti-Critique_
(full title: _Die Akkumulation des Kapitals, oder was die Epigonen aus
der Marxschen Theorie gemacht haben. Eine Antikritik_ [The Accumulation
of Capital, or What the Epigones Have Made out of Marx’s Theory: An
Anti-Critique]), which she wrote while in the women’s prison on Barnim
Street in 1915, but which was published only posthumously, in Leipzig in
1921.

680 Karl Kautsky, Jr., was working as a doctor at the City Hospital in
Frankfurt on the Main.

681 Sophie Liebknecht was staying at a sanitarium near Munich for a rest
cure.

682 Here Luxemburg is apparently referring to Hans Diefenbach’s
proofreading of her _Anti-Critique_.

683 The Latin word _coelebs_ means “unmarried”; the English word
“celibate” is derived from the same Latin root.

684 The reference is to the International Socialist Congress held in
Copenhagen August 28–September 3, 1910.

685 A Dutch and Scandinavian committee of the International Socialist
Bureau, together with the Petrograd Council (Soviet) of Workers’ and
Soldiers’ Deputies under the leadership of the moderate socialists
(Mensheviks and Social Revolutionaries), after protracted preparations,
decided to issue a joint call for a peace conference in Stockholm in the
summer or fall of 1917, in which socialists of all countries were to
take part, including supporters of the war. The Bolsheviks in Russia and
the Spartacus League in Germany protested against a conference in which
right-wing socialists would participate, and they saw to it that the
International Socialist Commission, a body established by the Zimmerwald
movement, refused to participate. The English and French governments,
for their part, denied permission for socialists from those countries to
go to Stockholm, and consequently the conference did not take place.

686 This session of the ISB in Brussels was held on July 29–30, 1914.

687 “But it’s not possible to let you travel alone!”

688 An International Socialist Congress had been called for the week of
August 23–9, 1914, but at the ISB session of July 29–30, 1914, in view
of the state of war between Austria-Hungary and Serbia, the decision was
made to move the congress to Paris. But the Austria-Serbia conflict
developed into full-scale world war, and the congress in Paris was never
held.

689 Luxemburg served one year in the women’s prison on Barnim Street in
Berlin, from February 18, 1915, to February 18, 1916. This prison
sentence resulted from a February 1914 trial, where she was convicted on
the basis of her antiwar speeches of 1913–14.

690 For Luxemburg first reference to her newly adopted “rules to live
by” [_Lebensregeln_], see the preceding letter, dated June 23, 1917.

691 This may be a reference to the possibility of an exchange of
prisoners between Germany and the Russian Provisional Government, formed
after the fall of the tsarist monarchy in March 1917.

692 _Vertikow_—a kind of storage furniture, or chiffonier, oriented
toward the vertical (i.e., higher than wide), usually having two paneled
doors, with a drawer and a flat top above them; named after Otto
Vertikow, a cabinetmaker in Berlin, who began building such furniture
around 1860.

693 See the Note at the beginning of Luxemburg’s letter from Zwickau
prison, dated September 9, 1904, to Luise Kautsky.

694 The lines are from Goethe’s “Kophtisches Lied” (Coptic Song).

695 On July 22, 1917, Luxemburg had been transferred from the Wronke
fortress to a prison in Breslau (then the capital of Silesia, on the
Oder River).

696 In Germany in 1917, from April 16 to September 17, there was a
special summer reckoning of time by which all clocks were set one hour
ahead of the standard time (equivalent to “daylight savings time” in the
USA).

697 In Leipzig, on July 6, 1916, Luxemburg had spoken before a group of
SPD active members about the situation created by the split in the
party, about the war aims of the German government, and about the vote
by the SPD majority in the Reichstag in favor of war credits. Since this
meeting had not been “properly” registered with the authorities and
since the content of the speech had not been submitted to the police, an
order of summary punishment by a district court judge was imposed on the
leader of the meeting, Johannes Scheib, and on Luxemburg, based on an
1851 law governing the conditions of a state of siege. They were
sentenced, respectively, to three days and six weeks imprisonment. The
defendants’ appeal was heard by the Royal Special Court in Leipzig on
March 29, 1917. The verdict was a fine of 100 marks for Scheib and six
weeks imprisonment for Luxemburg. Against this verdict Luxemburg filed
an appeal, which was rejected by the Superior Court of Saxony in Dresden
on August 8, 1917, and consequently the verdict remained in effect.

698 On the basis of arrangements made by Mathilde Jacob, Mrs. Selma
Schlisch had undertaken to provide food for Luxemburg while she was
imprisoned in Breslau.

699 Luxemburg used this name on occasion after her marriage of
convenience to Gustav Lübeck in 1898, as well as after the marriage was
legally ended in 1903.

700 In her letter to Diefenbach of April 16, 1917, she had quoted
Morgenstern on the subject of Shakespeare’s strong female characters,
such as Rosalind in _As You Like It_.

701 The International Socialist Congress was held in Paris, September
23–7, 1900.

702 Latin: “inside and outside of the walls.”

703 This excerpt was published in _Die Internationale_, vol. 6, 1923,
no. 3. The original letter has not been found.

704 Luxemburg had used the pseudonym Junius in her pamphlet _The Crisis
of Social Democracy_, written in 1915 and published in 1916.

705 Marta Rosenbaum was in Breslau and visited Luxemburg four times from
October 26 to November 1, 1917.

706 On November 6, 1917 (October 24 by the old Russian calendar), the
Petrograd Soviet, in which the Bolsheviks were the elected majority,
began armed insurrection. During the course of November 7–8, they
overthrew the Provisional Government, headed by Alexander Kerensky. On
November 8, the Second All-Russia Congress of Soviets (Councils)
resolved to take full power in Russia in the name of the Councils of
Workers’, Soldiers’, and Peasants’ Deputies in all parts of the country,
although actual power was effectively in the hands of the Bolsheviks.
The Congress passed the Decree on Peace and the Decree on Land, both
drafted by Lenin, and elected the first Soviet government, the Council
of People’s Commissars, with Lenin as chairman.

707 On November 10, 1917, Luxemburg had written a brief note to Luise
Kautsky, saying: “I have just received word that Hannes [Hans
Diefenbach] has fallen. For the moment I am unable to write more.”
Diefenbach was killed on the Western front, in France, on the night of
October 24–5, 1917.

708 Effective October 1, 1918, the SPD Executive removed from the
editorial board of _Neue Zeit_ both Karl Kautsky, a cofounder of that
magazine, and Emmanuel Wurm, who had been an editor of the magazine for
many years. They had both joined the new Independent Social Democratic
Party of Germany, founded in April 1917. The contention was that they
were not editing the magazine in the spirit of the official SPD
majority. The editorial direction was turned over to Heinrich Cunow.

709 The novel by the Russian writer Ivan Goncharov.

710 Imperial Chancellor Georg Michaelis, in the Reichstag debate on
October 9, 1917, about the attempted uprising by sailors of the German
High Seas Fleet in August 1917, reaffirmed the view he had already
expressed earlier, that he saw in the USPD a party that was dangerous to
the continued existence of the German Empire, and therefore he could not
treat it in an objective manner, like other parties and tendencies. In
this debate the leading representatives of the USPD distanced themselves
from the revolutionary struggle of the crewmen, whose representatives
had turned to the USPD for help after that party was founded in April
1917. The leaders of the USPD merely expressed regrets for the sailors
who had fallen as victims of the reprisals imposed by the naval justice
system after the suppression of the attempted uprising.

711 After Clara Zetkin was removed as editor of _Gleichheit_ by the SPD
officialdom, the USPD began publication of a “women’s supplement” to the
_Leipziger Volkszeitung. The_ editorial direction of the supplement was
entrusted to Clara Zetkin, and the first issue appeared on June 29,
1917.

712 On November 14, 1917, Friedrich Westmeyer died in a military field
hospital on the Western front, in France.

713 For Dehmel, see the letter to Hans Diefenbach, November 1, 1914.

714 Stephen Eric Bronner attributes this line of verse to the German
avant-garde poet Arno Holz in _The Letters of Rosa Luxemburg_ (Atlantic
Highlands, 1993 edition), p. 238.

715 The reference is to the death of Hans Diefenbach.

716 Diefenbach’s sister was Margarete Müller.

717 Sophie Liebknecht came from Rostov on the Don, in the south of
Russia, and evidently was worried about her family members there.

718 In Kishinev in April 1903, an armed organization sponsored by the
tsarist regime carried out a reign of terror (a pogrom) against Jews.
This pogrom was the reaction of the tsar’s government to strikes and
demonstrations by workers.

719 In Kiev in March 1917 a bloc of Ukrainian parties formed the Central
Rada, or Council. The Central Rada comprised a wide assortment of
political tendencies, including Ukrainian nationalists and radicals and
Russian and Jewish socialist parties. In June 1917 the Rada obtained
national autonomy for Ukraine from the Provisional Government in Russia.
The Central Rada had majority support among Ukrainians; in the November
1917 elections Ukrainian parties received 75% of the vote, as against
10% for the Bolsheviks. On December 17, 1917, the Bolshevik deputies in
the Rada broke from it and set up a rival government in support of
Lenin’s government, at the same time as the Bolsheviks initiated a
military invasion of Ukraine. On February 8, 1918 (January 26 by the old
Russian calendar), Soviet troops occupied Kiev and ended the rule of the
Central Rada.

720 Karl Liebknecht was sent to the Luckau penitentiary on December 8,
1916, after having been sentenced earlier in 1916 to confinement in a
penitentiary for four years and one month.

721 A poem by Goethe.

722 One of Franz Mehring’s best-known works.

723 This excerpt was published in _Die Internationale_, vol. 6, 1923,
no. 3. The original letter has not been found.

724 Franz Mehring had written a biography of Marx, which was published
in 1918 under the title _Karl Marx. Geschichte seines Lebens_. The
authorized English edition was first published in 1936 as _Karl Marx:
The Story of His Life_.

725 This excerpt was published in _Die Internationale_, vol. 6, 1923,
no. 3. Until now the original letter has not been found.

726 Franz Mehring suffered a fainting spell while walking along a street
and injured himself on the back of the head when he fell.

727 Paraphrasing the statement attributed to Galileo: _eppur si muove_.

728 Margarete Müller, the sister of Hans Diefenbach.

729 Latin: about all things.

730 “Igel” was a nickname for Hans Kautsky.

731 Luxemburg was translating Korolenko’s _History of My Contemporary_.

732 _Beethoven_, a novel by Romain Rolland.

733 Clara Zetkin’s birthday was July 5.

734 Richard Kühlmann, the German foreign secretary, speaking in the
Reichstag on June 24, 1918, stated: “Given the enormous magnitude of
this war between coalitions and the large number of forces involved,
including from overseas, an absolute end through purely military
decisions is hardly to be expected without diplomatic negotiations.”

735 The biography of Marx by Mehring, _Karl Marx: The Story of His
Life_.

736 Clara Zetkin, in an article entitled “On the People’s Right to Vote
in Prussia,” published in the women’s supplement to _Leipziger
Volkszeitung_ of May 18, 1918, among other things had criticized the
opportunist conduct of the USPD parliamentary group during negotiations
in the Prussian House of Representatives about a reactionary proposal on
the election law.

737 Maxim and Kostya Zetkin.

738 Margarete Müller, the sister of Hans Diefenbach.

739 A novel by Alain-René Lesage.

740 Maxim and Kostya Zetkin.

741 The original of this letter was in Polish. It is on file in Moscow
at the Russian State Archive for Social and Political History. It was
first published by Feliks Tych in _Internationale wissenshaftliche
Korrespondenz zur Geschichte der deutschen Arbeiterbewegung_
(International Scholarly Correspondence on the History of the German
Workers’ Movement), vol. 27, no. 3, September 1991, p. 360.

742 Luxemburg was wondering whether she could safely transmit her views
by way of the Soviet embassy in Berlin.

743 Luxemburg is referring to the Bolsheviks’ use of terror and
suppression of democracy, especially the execution or arrest of hundreds
of Left SRs (members of the Left Socialist Revolutionary Party) as
“expiatory sacrifices” in retaliation for the Left SR uprising against
the Soviet government that began in Moscow on July 6, 1918, with the
assassination of the German ambassador to Russia, Wilhelm Graf von
Mirbach-Harff. See Luxemburg’s manuscript “Zur russischen Revolution”
(The Russian Revolution) in her _Gesammelte Werke_, vol. 4, pp. 332ff.
For an English translation, see _The Rosa Luxemburg Reader_, edited by
Peter Hudis and Kevin B. Anderson (New York, 2004), pp. 281–311. See
also her letter to Luise Kautsky of July 25, 1918, in _Gesammelte
Briefe_, vol. 5, pp. 402–4.

744 Luxemburg means Germany.

745 Leo Jogiches was arrested in Berlin in March 1918 and was held in
the Moabit investigations prison. The immediate grounds for his arrest
was the charge that he had played a leading role in printing and
distributing material calling on German soldiers to oppose the war, as
well as in organizing strikes in various munitions plants, and for such
activity he faced a possible death penalty. An attempt was now to be
made to free Jogiches in the same way that Julian Marchlewski had been
freed from the Havelberg internment camp—that is, by a prisoner exchange
between Soviet Russia and Germany. Since 1901, Jogiches had held Swiss
citizenship, but before that he had been a Russian subject, and on that
basis he was presumably eligible to be included in a Russian-German
exchange of prisoners. Such an exchange, however, did not take place.

746 Oskar Cohn, an attorney in Berlin.

747 The Soviet ambassador to Germany, Adolf Joffe.

748 Moscow.

749 “Józef” was a party name used by Feliks Dzierżyński.

750 Luxemberg is suggesting that having Jogiches in Soviet Russia would
help the group of Polish Social Democrats active there.

751 Bronka is a nickname for Bronislawa Marchlewska, wife of Julian
Marchlewski, and Zośka, a nickname for their daughter Zofia.

752 The original of this letter was in Polish. It is on file in Moscow
at the Russian State Archive for Social and Political History. It was
first published by Feliks Tych in _Internationale wissenshaftliche
Korrespondenz zur Geschichte der deutschen Arbeiterbewegung_
(International Scholarly Correspondence on the History of the German
Workers’ Movement), vol. 27, no. 3, September 1991, pp. 361–3.

753 In 1930 Brodowski made the following observation: “The term _Józ_
was understood to mean not only Józef [Feliks Dzierżyński] personally
but also the Polish comrades (in Soviet Russia) as a whole, and also the
entire Bolshevik party.”

754 Luxemburg is referring to members of the SDKPiL who were in Soviet
Russia at that time and had joined the revolutionary movement led by the
Bolsheviks. This involved primarily Polish prisoners of the tsarist
regime who were freed by the revolution of March 8–12, 1917, but were
cut off from any return to Poland by the battlefronts of the World War.
After the Bolshevik seizure of power on November 7–8, 1917, many SDKPiL
members in Russia took important positions in the government, the party,
the army, and the diplomatic service.

755 The only means of contact was through the Soviet embassy in Berlin.

756 At that time Luxemburg was working on her manuscript “Zur russische
Revolution” (On the Russian Revolution).

757 The peace treaty of Brest-Litovsk (March 1918) was between Soviet
Russia and the Central Powers (Germany, Austria-Hungary, Bulgaria, and
Turkey). With this treaty Soviet Russia withdrew from the World War, but
under onerous terms, including Germany’s de facto domination of Ukraine,
Poland, part of Belorussia, the Baltic region, and Finland. The treaty,
dictated by the German side, was signed, under duress, on March 3, 1918,
by the Soviet representatives at Brest-Litovsk, then was ratified by a
Congress of Soviets on March 16, and by the German Reichstag on March
22. An area of one million square kilometers, with a population of
forty-six million, was thus lost to Soviet Russia, including its most
valuable grain-growing regions, almost all its sources of petroleum, 90
percent of its coal mines, and 54 percent of its industry. See
Luxemburg, “Die russische Tragödie” (The Russian Tragedy), in her
_Gesammelte Werke_, vol. 4, pp. 385–92, first published in
_Spartakusbrief_ (Spartacus Letter), no. 11, September 1918. For an
English translation, see “The Russian Tragedy,” in _Rosa Luxemburg,
Selected Political Writings_, edited by Robert Looker (New York, 1974),
pp. 235–43. After the German revolution, which overthrew Kaiser Wilhelm
and the Hohenzollern monarchy on November 8–9, 1918, the Brest-Litovsk
treaty was annulled.

758 Presumably through Mathilde Jacob.

759 Presumably Luxemburg meant the comrades of the Spartacus League.

760 The Left PPS (PPS-Lewica) was formed in 1906 as the result of a
split in the PPS in Russian-occupied Poland. The right wing of the PPS,
led by Józef Pilsudski, founded its own party. Shortly before the
outbreak of the World War, negotiations about unification between the
SDKPiL and the Left PPS had gone quite far. Bratman-Brodowski led the
negotiations on behalf of the SDKPiL. It was not until mid-December 1918
that unification of the two parties came about, when they jointly
founded the Communist Workers’ Party of Poland. In early 1914 and in
1915, Maksymilian Horwitz-Walecki, one of the leaders of the Left PPS
and its most important spokesperson, held talks in Berlin with Luxemburg
about unification between the SDKPiL and the Left PPS.

761 _Das verlorene Paradies_, a novel by Anton Freiherr von Perfall.

762 The original of this letter was in Polish. It is on file in Moscow
at the Russian State Archive for Social and Political History. It was
first published by Feliks Tych in _Internationale wissenshaftliche
Korrespondenz zur Geschichte der deutschen Arbeiterbewegung_
(International Scholarly Correspondence on the History of the German
Workers’ Movement), vol. 27, no. 3, September 1991, pp. 363–6.

763 On Jogiches’s case, see Note 746 in the previous letter to
Marchlewski, from the end of July or August 1918.

764 “Józef” was a party name used by Feliks Dzierżyński.

765 Marchlewski was then in Moscow.

766 This letter has not been found, nor has it been possible to
establish what rumors about Leo Jogiches were being discussed.

767 The reference is to Karl Radek’s article “The Red Terror,” in
_Izvestia_, September 6, 1918, p. 1. On September 2, 1918, in the
aftermath of the attempted assassination of Lenin on August 30, the
All-Russia Central Executive Committee of the Soviets announced that any
attack on a representative of the Soviet government would be answered
with “red terror” against the bourgeoisie and its agents, that hostages
would be taken “among the bourgeoisie,” and that for every murdered
representative of the Soviets, hostages would be shot in retaliation.

768 On August 27, 1918, three supplementary agreements to the
Brest-Litovsk peace treaty were signed in Berlin: a political treaty (a
German-Russian supplementary agreement to the Brest treaty), an
agreement on private property rights, and a German-Russian financial
agreement. The last-named agreement obliged Russia to pay Germany an
indemnity, in various forms, of up to 6 million marks. The Soviet press,
above all the government newspaper _Izvestia_, took pains to present the
circumstances to its readers in the best possible light.

769 “North German” is probably a reference to Radek, who had been active
in North Germany, in Bremen.

770 An example of what Luxemburg is referring to here was the so-called
Lockhart conspiracy. In the early hours of September 1, 1918, the Soviet
government made known the discovery of an Anglo-French conspiracy guided
by British and French diplomats accredited to Russia and aiming at the
overthrow of the Bolsheviks.

771 Luxemburg also took a very critical position on the Brest-Litovsk
treaty and the German occupation of Ukraine, Finland, Poland, and the
Baltic countries in her manuscript “Zur russischen Revolution” (On the
Russian Revolution).

772 The Soviet embassy in Berlin.

773 Luxemburg is referring to the _Spartacus Letter_ and the leaflets
put out by the Spartacus League.

774 Maciej Rózga was one of Luxemburg’s pseudonyms. The name comes from
one of the characters in the verse drama by Adam Mickiewicz, _Pan
Tadeusz_, one of the epic works of Polish national culture.

775 Wolff’s Telegraph (News) Bureau.

776 In the summer of 1918 several industrial regions of Germany were
caught up in a wave of strikes. The strikers were protesting against the
drastic worsening of living conditions and against the continuation of
the war.

777 The pseudonym used by Stepan Bratman-Brodowski in the SDKPiL.

778 The reference is to Bronislaw Wesołowski.

779 At the beginning of October 1918, Prince Max von Baden was appointed
Chancellor by Kaiser Wilhelm II. The head of the armed forces, General
Ludendorff, had informed the Kaiser at the end of September 1918 that
the war could not be won and advised that a new government be formed
that would sue for peace. Prince Max von Baden, reputed to be a liberal,
included SPD leaders in his government and began to make democratic
concessions to the people, including the freeing of political prisoners.
However, that did not affect Luxemburg. She was not freed until a revolt
by sailors in the German navy, on November 3–4, spread and became a
general mutiny and general strike, along with the formation of workers’
and soldiers’ councils all over Germany. On November 8–9, the monarchy
fell, Kaiser Wilhelm fled from Germany, and a republic was proclaimed.

780 Karl Liebknecht was freed from the Luckau penitentiary on October
23, 1918.

781 Luxemburg was released from the Breslau prison on November 8. On
November 10 she returned to Berlin. After her release on November 8, she
evidently went to the office of the transport workers union, from which
she sent this note to a leader of the Breslau SPD, Paul Löbe, whom she
had known and with whom she had corresponded before the World War. On
November 9, she spoke at the mass rally and demonstration she refers to
in this note. It was held in the central square of Breslau.

782 Luxemburg had been released on November 8, 1918, from Breslau
prison, where she had been held for more than fifteen months. The letter
with the black envelope contained the news that Brandel Geck, son of
Marie and Adolf, had been killed just as the World War ended.

783 The newspaper of the Spartacus League.

784 Luxemburg was released from prison in Breslau on November 8, 1918.
She returned to Berlin by train on November 10.

785 Clara Zetkin’s article appeared in the _Rote Fahne_ of November 22,
1918, under the title “The Revolution—Thanks to the Women.”

786 The _Leipziger Volkszeitung_ was at that time the organ of the USPD,
and Clara Zetkin was editing the women’s supplement to that paper.

787 The article by Fritz Rück, entitled “Der Weg zum Nichts” (The Road
to Nowhere) and signed with the pseudonym “Juvenis,” appeared in the
_Rote Fahne_ of November 28, 1918. J. P. Nettl, in his two-volume
biography of Luxemburg, mistakenly attributes this article to her. See
Nettl, _Rosa Luxemburg_ (Oxford, 1966), p. 908.

788 The original letter was in Polish. This passage was translated into
German by Adolf Warski in his _Rosa Luxemburgs Stellung zu den
taktischen Problemen der Revolution_ (Rosa Luxemburg’s Position on
Tactical Problems of the Revolution) (Hamburg, 1922), pp. 6–7.

789 For more on Luxemburg’s views on the problems of the Russian
revolution, see her manuscripts “On the Russian Revolution” and “On the
War, the National Question, and the Revolution” in her _Gesammelte
Werke_, vol. 4, pp. 332ff., 366ff.

790 The reference is to the short item (_Notiz_) entitled “One Bit of
Socialization,” which was published in the _Rote Fahne_ of December 21,
1918.

791 Emil Unfried, member of the Stuttgart Workers’ Council, was staying
in Berlin and serving as a courier.

792 The following is an English transliteration of the Russian text of
Rosa Luxemburg’s letter to Lenin, interspersed with the English
translation.

793 The nickname “uncle” apparently refers to Eduard Fuchs, who was
assigned by the central leadership (_Zentrale_) of the Spartacus League
to establish direct contact with Lenin and other influential
representatives of the Russian Communist Party (Bolshevik) and the
Soviet government. He was the obvious choice because after 1914 he had
met with Lenin in Switzerland several times, enjoyed his confidence, and
had been assigned by the Soviet government to carry out the functions of
civilian commissar for Russian prisoners of war who found themselves in
Germany. In connection with this mission he traveled to Soviet Russia
and met with Lenin in Moscow between December 26 and 28, 1918. Eduard
Fuchs handed over to Lenin this letter from Luxemburg, along with her
draft program of the Spartacus League, “Was will der Spartakusbund?”
(What Does the Spartacus League Want?), for which see her _Gesammelte
Werke_, vol. 4, pp. 440ff. Luxemburg’s letter to Lenin was first
published in Moscow in _Pravda_, on February 2, 1919.

794 By “our family” was meant the Spartacus League.

795 Luxemburg and Karl Liebknecht were officially the co-editors of
_Rote Fahne_, and jointly responsible for its production, although in
fact Luxemburg did most of the editorial work.

796 Julian Marchlewski was taken into “military protective custody” on
May 22, 1916, and imprisoned in the Berlin municipal prison. On October
25, 1916, he was transferred to the Havelburg internment camp, from
which he was freed in mid-1918 by the Soviet government in exchange for
German prisoners of war. He went to Moscow by way of Petrograd, from
which he was able to return to Berlin only after overcoming great
difficulties, and not until January 18, 1919.

797 On the afternoon of December 25, 1918, many Berlin workers protested
in the Tiergarten Park against an attempted coup undertaken by
counterrevolutionary troops the previous day, attacking the People’s
Naval Division at the Imperial Palace and Stables. Speakers for the
Spartacus League, including Karl Liebknecht, for the Revolutionary Shop
Stewards, and for the People’s Naval Division denounced the
counterrevolutionary machinations and called for the formation of a Red
Guard and workers’ militia, and for the disarming of officers and NCOs
active with the counterrevolution. After the rally in the Tiergarten a
huge procession of demonstrators marched to the Imperial Palace and
Stable. After a further speech by Karl Liebknecht, in which he warned
against new acts of coercion by the government and lambasted the lies of
the _Vorwärts_ about the revolutionary movement, a section of the
demonstrators hurried to Linden Street and occupied the editorial
offices and printing works of the _Vorwärts_, which were located there.
In the building they found an armored car and 21 machine guns, along
with a large supply of ammunition and a large quantity of hand grenades.

798 At the founding congress of the KPD (German initials for the
Communist Party of Germany), December 30, 1918–January 1, 1919, a
resolution was adopted not to participate in the elections for a
National Assembly, in opposition to the views of Luxemburg, Karl
Liebknecht, and other representatives of the central leadership. The
resolution was introduced and motivated by Otto Rühle.

799 A reference to Julian Borchardt.

800 In November 1918 the name “International Communists” was adopted,
first of all by left groups in Hamburg and Bremen, and also by a group
in Dresden. They joined the KPD at its founding congress.

801 The USPD held its founding congress at Gotha on April 6–8, 1917.

802 On January 4, 1919, the Social Democratic government announced the
dismissal of Emil Eichhorn as head of the Berlin police. Eichhorn
belonged to the left wing of the USPD. The revolutionary workers and
soldiers responded to this with a massive rally in Berlin, and proceeded
to arm themselves for an uprising for which they were largely
unprepared. The uprising was quickly crushed. Within a few days of this
defeat, Luxemburg and Karl Liebknecht were tracked down by
counterrevolutionary, protofascist military groups (the so-called
Volunteer Corps, or _Freikorps_), and on January 15 they were arrested
and assassinated.



A GLOSSARY OF PERSONAL NAMES


With some exceptions, the following biographical data generally covers
the time period up to the death of Rosa Luxemburg in January 1919. Where
no nationality is given, it may be assumed that the nationality is
German.

ABRAMOVICH, see Tyutryumova-Abramovich, R. A.

ADAMS-LEHMANN, HOPE BRIDGES (1855–1916), physician; Social Democrat;
born in England; lived in Germany from 1872 on; worked as a doctor in
Frankfurt on the Main beginning in 1881, and then in Munich; wrote in
the Social Democratic press on women’s issues and issues of public
health.

ADLER, FRIEDRICH (1879–1960), Austrian physicist; Social Democrat; a
theoretician of the Austro-Marxist school; 1907–1911, lecturer at the
University of Zurich; 1910–1911, editor of the Swiss Social Democratic
newspaper _Volksrecht_; after that, secretary of the Social Democratic
Party of Austria; on October 21, 1916, made an attempt on the life of
Count Stürgkh, the Austrian prime minister. He was a spokesperson for
the left wing of the Social Democratic Party of Austria after 1914.

ADLER, GEORG (1863–1908), German statist economist and proponent of
social betterment.

ADLER, VICTOR (1852–1918), physician and journalist; cofounder and
leading member of the Social Democratic Party of Austria; a spokesperson
for reformism in the Second International who was often at odds with
Luxemburg; elected to the lower Austrian Diet in 1905; during World War
I, supported the war; active in the abortive socialist peace conference
in Stockholm in 1917.

ADVIELLE, VICTOR (1833–1903), French writer; author of historical and
biographical works, including a study of Gracchus Babeuf and the
Conspiracy of Equals; high official in the Ministry of Finance.

AKSELROD, see Axelrod, P. B.

ALEKSEYEV, S. A. (ca. 1878–1930), editor of Social Democratic
literature, first in Odessa in 1904 and later in St. Petersburg;
translated Karl Marx’s _Poverty of Philosophy_ into Russian.

ALLEMANE, JEAN (1843–1935), French socialist; a participant in the Paris
Commune of 1871; later, a possibilist and proponent of revolutionary
syndicalist views; in 1890, founded the Revolutionary Socialist Workers’
Party; elected to parliament in 1901, 1906, and 1910.

ANACREON (570–488 B.C.), Greek lyric poet; his poems dwelt on such
themes as love and the observations of everyday people and life.

ANDERSEN NEXÖ, MARTIN (1869–1954), Danish poet and revolutionary writer;
his novel _Pelle Eroberen_ (four volumes, 1906–10) is regarded as a
Danish classic; in 1919, a cofounder of the Danish Communist Party.

ANSEELE, ÉDOUARD (1856–1938), cofounder and leader of the Belgian
Workers’ Party; leading representative of the Belgian cooperative
movement; member of the International Socialist Bureau; in 1918 became
minister of public works.

ANTONI, JÓZEF MALECKI (1821–1913), member of the SDKPiL who took an
active part in the work of transporting into Poland party literature
printed in Berlin.

ANTRICK, OTTO FRIEDRICH WILHELM (1858–1924), cigarmaker; Social
Democrat; 1898–1903 and 1912–18, member of the Reichstag; 1903–06, city
councilor in Berlin; party secretary in Braunschweig (Brunswick),
beginning in 1906.

ARONS, MARTIN LEO (1860–1919), physicist; university lecturer in Berlin
from 1890 on; Social Democrat; suspended in 1899 because of his
political standpoint; worked in the trade unions and cooperatives;
financial contributor to and longtime collaborator with the publication
_Sozialistische Monatshefte_.

ASKEW, JOHN B. (d. 1929), English socialist; member of the Social
Democratic Federation and Independent Labour Party; moved to Germany and
was active as a political journalist; translated Karl Kautsky’s _The
Materialist Conception of History_ (1906) and other works by Kautsky
into English.

AUER, IGNATZ (1846–1907), saddler; Social Democrat; 1869, joined the
Social Democatic Workers’ Party of Germany (SDAP), also known as the
“Eisenachers”; 1874, secretary of that party’s Executive Committee;
1875, at the Gotha (Unity) Congress where the SDAP joined with Ferdinand
Lasalle’s General German Workers’ Association (ADAV), elected as one of
the secretaries of the SDAP; member of the Reichstag in 1877–78,
1880–81, 1884–87, and 1890–1907; in 1890, became secretary of the
Executive of the SPD; an influential reformist from the mid-1890s on.

AUGSPURG, ANITA (1857–1943), women’s rights advocate; studied law at
Zurich and graduated in 1897, returning to Germany that same year; in
1903, founded the German Association (_Verband_) for Women’s Right to
Vote and became a cofounder and leader of the Women’s International
League for Peace and Freedom.

AXELROD, P. B. (1850–1928), in the 1870s, a Narodnik; in 1883, a
cofounder of the Emancipation of Labor group (the main group of Russian
Marxists); in 1900, became an editor of _Iskra_; after 1903, one of the
leading Mensheviks.

BABEUF, GRACCHUS (real first name, François-Noël) (1760–97), French
revolutionary and utopian communist; in 1797, edited the newspaper _Le
Tribune du people_; in 1796, with the Conspiracy of Equals, began
preparations for an armed uprising to carry the French Revolution
further.

BACH, JOHANN SEBASTIAN (1685–1750), German composer.

BALABANOFF, ANGELICA, see Balabanova, A. I.

BALABANOVA, A. I. (1878–1965), Social Democrat; active in the Russian
socialist movement and, after emigrating from Russia in 1897, in the
Italian socialist movement; member of the Central Committee of the
Italian Socialist Party and editor of _Avanti_; member of the ISB; took
a centrist position during World War I; participated in the Zimmerwald
Conference in 1915 and the Kienthal Conference in 1916; returned to
Russia for a short time after 1917.

BALLESTREM, FRANZ, GRAF VON (COUNT OF) (1834–1910), German
industrialist; belonged to the conservative wing of the Center Party;
member of the Reichstag in 1872–93 and 1898–1906; first vice president
of the Reichstag in 1890–93 and its president in 1898–1903.

BARÈRE DE VIEUZAC, BERTRAND (1755–1841), French lawyer and political
figure in the French Revolution; as a deputy to the Convention, he
became a Jacobin; later took an active part in the coup of July 27, 1794
(Thermidor).

BAUER, OTTO (pseudonyms: Karl Mann, Friedrich Schulze, Heinrich Weber)
(1882–1938), one of the leaders of Austrian Social Democracy and the
Second International; founded the theoretical magazine _Der Kampf i_n
Vienna in 1907; theoretical spokesperson for Austro-Marxism; wrote
important works on the National Question. Took a disapproving attitude
toward the Bolshevik Revolution in Russia in 1917; was foreign minister
of Austria in 1918–19.

BAUMANN, H. (birth and death dates unavailable), renter of rooms in
Zurich.

BAUMEISTER, ALBERT (1882–?), German Social Democrat and trade union
official; editor of _Internationale Korrespondenz_; strong supporter of
World War I; cofounder of the Republican Soldiers’ Defense Corps and of
the Reichstag Regiment, which alongside the Freikorps took part in the
bloody repression of the January 1919 Spartacus League uprising.

BEBEL, FERDINAND AUGUST (1840–1913), lathe operator; Social Democrat;
member of the Reichstag, 1867–81 and 1883–1913; 1869, cofounder of the
SDAP; led the legal and illegal struggle of the party during the period
of the antisocialist “exceptional” laws in Germany and contributed in a
major way to the founding of the party’s central organ _Der
Sozialdemokrat_; 1881–90, a member of the state assembly _(Landtag_) in
the state of Saxony; 1892–1913, one of the two cochairmen of the SPD;
from 1889 on, a leading member of the Second International, and from
1900 on, a member of the ISB.

BEBEL, JOHANNA CAROLINE JULIE (1843–1910), August Bebel’s wife and
companion in the Social Democratic movement.

BECKER, BERNHARD (1826–82), German writer and editor; Social Democrat;
in 1863, participated in the founding of the ADAV and was its president
in 1864–65; in 1870, went over to the SDAP, edited the _Freie Presse_ in
Chemnitz in 1871 and the _Volksfreund_ in Braunschweig (Brunswick) from
the end of 1871 to 1874; turned away from the workers’ movement in 1874.

BEER, MAX (1864–1943), historian; moved from Germany to London in 1894
and to Paris in 1897, where he worked part-time as a newspaper
correspondent; 1901–11, in London, where, among other things, he worked
as a correspondent for the Berlin _Vorwärts_; returned to Germany, where
he was prominent as a revolutionary writer and translator.

BEETHOVEN, LUDWIG VAN (1770–1827), German composer.

BEIN, LEOPOLD (nickname, Lopek) (born 1867; died sometime after 1935),
leading representative of the Union of Polish Workers; in 1892, moved
closer to the reformist positions of _Przegląd Socjalistyczny_; in
1893–94 was a member of the PPS; arrested in 1895 and subsequently
banished to Arkhangelsk province; later lived as an émigré.

BERFUS, AUGUST STANISLAW (pseudonyms: Ber, Stach) (born 1852; died
sometime before 1914), in 1892, secretary of the Union of Polish
Socialists in Berlin; 1893–1905, chairman of the PPS in the
Prussian-occupied part of Poland; co-editor of _Gazeta Robotnicza_;
under the impact of the Russian Revolution of 1905, came closer to the
left wing of the PPS and to the Left in Germany.

BERNARD, GEORG (1876–?), German machinist and Social Democrat; in 1913
he became district leader of the Metal Workers Union in Frankfurt on the
Main; was second chairman of the Social Democratic Union for Bockenheim.

BERNHARD, GEORG (1875–1944), German Social Democrat; wrote for bourgeois
publications and evolved into a mainstream journalist; in 1914, became
one of the chief editors of _Vossische Zeitung_.

BERNHARDT, SARAH (real name, Henriette Rosine Bernard) (1844–1923),
French actress.

BERNSTEIN, EDUARD (1850–1932), German political journalist; Social
Democrat; in 1872, joined the SDAP; 1890–1901, lived in emigration in
London; 1896–1900, regular contributor to _Neue Zeit_; from 1896 on, one
of the main theoreticians of “revisionism,” the view that Marxism should
be revised and “modernized”; 1901–05, editor of _Documente des
Socialismus. Hefte für Geschichte, Urkunde und Bibliographie der
Socialismus_; member of the Reichstag in 1902–06 and 1912–18; in 1906,
became a teacher at the trade union school in Berlin; regular
contributor to _Sozialistische Monatshefte_; resigned from the SPD on
pacifist grounds after August 4, 1914, when it supported World War I; in
1916, joined the Social Democratic Working Group
(_Arbeitsgemeinschaft_); in 1917, became a member of the USPD; in 1919,
rejoined the SPD.

BERTEN, PETER (1873–1960), in 1908, became editor of the _Volkszeitung_
in Düsseldorf; belonged to the International Group (Spartacus Group); in
1917, became a member of the USPD.

BERTENSON, L. (1850–1929), in St. Petersburg, member of the scientific
committee on mining; wrote a work on mining conditions in Poland
entitled _Sanitarno-vrachebnoe dielo na gornykh promyslakh Tsarstva
Polskago_ (The Medical-Hygienic Situation in the Mining Industry of the
Kingdom of Poland) (St. Petersburg, 1893).

BERTRAND, LOUIS (1856–1943), Belgian labor leader; member of the
International Workingmen’s Association (also called the First
International); 1878–81, editor of the Belgian labor and socialist
publication _La Voix de l’Ouvrier_ (Worker’s Voice); 1885–1914, editor
of _Le Peuple_, main newspaper of the Belgian Workers’ Party; historian
of the Belgian workers’ movement; member of the Executive Committee of
the ISB.

BIELECKI, JAN (nickname, Janek) (1869–1926), at Zurich University joined
the first Polish Social Democratic group around Rosa Luxemburg; after
1896, lived in England and France, withdrawing from the workers’
movement; in 1919, became a professor of chemistry at Warsaw
Polytechnic.

BISMARCK, OTTO EDUARD VON (1815–1989), German nationalist, militarist,
and anti-socialist; Prime Minister of Prussia from 1862–90 and
Chancellor of German Empire from 1871–90; in 1878 imposed Anti-Socialist
laws, directed against the SPD and other groups, which prohibited open
propagation of socialist views; tried to undercut socialist movement by
introducing social welfare programs from above.

BLANC, LOUIS (1811–82), French journalist, historian, and politician;
reformist socialist; in 1848, member of the Provisional Government;
1848–70, lived in England as an émigré; in 1871, elected to the French
National Assembly; supported the regime of Thiers and took a position
against the Paris Commune; in 1876, became a member of the Radical
Party.

BLOCK, HANS (1870–1933), bookseller; Social Democrat; in 1892, managing
director of the _Westfälische Freie Presse_ in Dortmund; 1895–99, editor
of _Arbeiter-Zeitung_ in Dortmund; 1899–1906, editor of _Sächsische
Arbeiter-Zeitung_ in Dresden; 1906–11, an editor of _Vorwärts_; in 1911,
became chief editor of _Leipziger Volkszeitung_.

BLUMENFELD, J. S. (1865–1941), typesetter; member of the Russian Marxist
group Emancipation of Labor; later a member of the _Iskra_ organization;
after 1903, a Menshevik; withdrew from political activity after the
Bolshevik Revolution.

BLUNTSCHLI, JOHANN CASPAR (1808–81), judge; reactionary politician and
interpreter of constitutional law in Switzerland and Baden; a resolute
supporter of Prussian hegemony in Germany.

BOCK, WILHELM (1846–1931), joined the ADAV in 1867; participant in the
founding congress of the SDAP at Eisenach in 1869; 1873, chairman of the
International Shoe Workers’ Union and editor, in 1875–78, of its organ
_Der Wekker_; in 1875, took part in preparing and carrying through the
unity congress at Gotha (where the ADAV and SDAP merged); in 1878,
founded the _Gothaer Volksblatt_; 1878–87, editor of _Der Schuhmacher_;
member of the Reichstag in 1884–87, 1890–1906, and 1912–18; 1893–1918,
member of the state assembly in the Duchy of Coburg-Gotha; in 1901,
became a member of the Control Commission of the SPD and was its
chairman in 1913–17; in 1917, joined the Social Democratic
_Arbeitsgemeinschaft_, the “working group” of SPD deputies expelled from
the Reichstag for voting against war credits in December 1915; 1917, a
cofounder of the USPD.

BOGDANOV, ALEXANDER (1873–1928), Russian Marxist philosopher, scientist,
and economist; widely regarded as pioneering figure in systems theory;
initially trained as a physician, joined Narodnaya Volya as youth;
joined Bolshevik faction of RSDRP in 1903; in 1904–06 published
three-volume philosophic work _Empiriomonism_, which sought to reconcile
Marxism with recent discoveries in logical empiricism; led a group of
Bolsheviks opposed to participation in Tsarist Duma (the _otzovists_);
clashed often with Lenin, who attacked him in his 1908 _Materialism and
Empirio-Criticism_; 1909, expelled from Bolsheviks; after 1911,
abandoned active involvement in revolutionary politics; in 1917,
denounced Bolshevik seizure of power; 1918–20, became leading figure in
proletarian art movement (_Prolekult_); arrested in 1923 for supporting
opposition group, Worker’s Truth.

BÖHM-BAWERK, EUGEN VON (1851–1914), Austrian statesman and economist;
leading representative of the marginal school of economics; author of
_Karl Marx and the Close of His System_ (1896); finance minister of
Austria in the years 1895, 1897–98, and 1900–04; taught economics at
University of Vienna until his death in 1914.

BORCHARDT, JULIAN (1868–1932), Social Democrat; in 1900–01, editor at
the Hamburg newspaper _Volksblatt fur Harburg, Wilhelmsburg, and
Umgegende_; in 1901–06, editor at the _Königsberger Volkszeitung_;
1907–13, made speaking tours for the SPD; 1911–13, member of the
Prussian Chamber of Deputies; in 1913, became editor of the publication
_Lichtstrahlen_; in the November revolution of 1918–19 in Germany, was
an adherent of the IKD (International Communists of Germany).

BÖRNE, LUDWIG (real name, Löb Baruch) (1786–1837), German author of
imaginative literature and political journalism; a radical democrat in
the period after the July Revolution in France of 1830; _Briefe aus
Paris_ (Letters from Paris) is his most famous work.

BORYS, KLEMENS (1874–1938), one of the pioneers of the Polish socialist
movement in Upper Silesia; later, a prominent PPS activist in the same
region.

BOURGET, CHARLES-JOSEPH-PAUL (1852–1935), French novelist, essayist, and
dramatist; in 1894, became a member of the Académie Française.

BRACKE (DESROUSSEAUX), ALEXANDRE-MARIE (1861–1955), classical scholar
and French socialist; member and secretary of the French Workers’ Party
and secretary of the Socialist Party of France; editor of _Le
Socialiste_; contributor to _Travailleur du Nord_ and _Petit Sous_;
1912, editor of the newspaper _l’Humanité_; member of the ISB; in 1912
and 1914, a member of the French Chamber of Deputies; strongly supported
World War I.

BRATMAN-BRODOWSKI, STEPAN (pseudonyms: Florian, Floriański) (1880–1937),
in 1903, joined the SDKPiL; in November 1905, representative in Warsaw
of the party’s top leadership; 1906, secretary of the SDKPiL in łódż;
1908–12, secretary of the SDKPiL’s foreign bureau; during World War I,
active in Switzerland; from May 1918 on, a Soviet diplomat.

BREUGHEL, PIETER D. J. (ca. 1564–ca. 1638), Dutch painter.

BROODCOORENS, PIERRE (1885–1924), Belgian writer; he was a socialist and
Flemish nationalist.

BRUHNS, JULIUS AUGUST FRIEDRICH (1860–1927), cigarworker; Social
Democrat; 1890–93, member of the Reichstag; 1890–94, editor of _Bremer
Bürger-Zeitung_; 1895–1903, editor of _Volkswacht_ in Breslau;
1898–1903, city councilor in Breslau; 1903–08, SPD party secretary for
Upper Silesia; 1908, editor of the _Offenbacher Abendsblatt_;
contributor to the _Sozialistische Monatshefte_.

BRUHNS, SELMA (birth and death dates unavailable), second wife of Julius
Bruhns.

BRZEZINA, KAROL (birth and death dates unavailable), member of the left
wing of the PPS in the part of Poland annexed by Prussia; participated
in the transporting of illegal SDKP literature into the so-called
Kingdom of Poland, the Russian-dominated part of Poland.

BUCHER, ADOLF LOTHAR (1817–92), Prussian judicial official; in 1848,
belonged to the left wing in the Prussian National Assembly, but later
went over to the reactionary camp and until 1864 was a close
collaborator of Bismarck’s.

BÜCHER, KARL (1847–1930), part of the “Young” German Historical School
of economists that emphasized statistical and sociological analysis as
against classical economists’ universal support of free markets;
defended Germany’s authoritarian welfare state.

BÜCHNER, GEORG (1813–37), revolutionary-democratic political journalist,
playwright, and narrative writer; an admirer of the French revolution,
he founded a Society for the Rights of Man and drafted a revolutionary
pamphlet, _Der Hessische Landbote_ (The Hessian Messenger), which
included the phrase, “War on all the palaces; peace with all the
hovels”; escaped arrest in 1835 by fleeing to Strasbourg; in 1836
emigrated to Zurich.

BUDILOWITSCH, FELICIA (in Polish, Felicja Budzilowicz), one of Rosa
Luxemburg’s pseudonyms.

BUDZILOWICZ, see Budilowitsch, Felicia.

BÜTTNER, PAUL (birth and death dates unavailable), German Social
Democrat; an editor of _Vorwärts_ until 1905.

CABET, ÉTIENNE (1788–1856), French lawyer; utopian communist; member of
the Carbonari; took part in the July Revolution of 1830; until 1831 was
attorney general on the island of Corsica; 1834–39, lived in exile in
London; later founded utopian communities in the United States.

CALWER, RICHARD (1868–1927), German Social Democrat; in 1891, became
editor of the _Volksfreund_ in Braunschweig; after 1895, became a
contributor to the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_; 1898–1903, member of the
Reichstag; one of the more conservative figures in the SPD, he later
wrote for the revisionist organ _Sozialistische Monatshefte_; left the
SPD in 1909.

CAMÉLINAT, ZÉPHIRIN (1840–1932), figure in the French workers’ movement;
1864, cofounder of the Paris Section of the First International; during
the Paris Commune in 1871, director of the mint; comptroller of the
Socialist Party of France.

CARNAUD, MAXIMILIEN-ANTOINE-ALBERT (1863–1937), French schoolteacher;
socialist; ministerialist; 1906, deputy director of the newspaper _La
Petite République_; left the Socialist Party in 1906.

CASSIRER, PAUL (1871–1926), German art dealer; cofounder of the Berlin
Sezession; a cousin of the Neo-Kantian German philosopher Ernst
Cassirer.

CAVOUR, CAMILLO, COUNT OF (1810–61), Italian statesman; founded the
newspaper _Il Risorgimento_; pursued a moderate liberal policy; helped
achieve the unification of Italy in 1861.

CELLINI, BENVENUTO (1500–71), Italian goldsmith and sculptor of the late
Renaissance; also famous for his autobiography.

CERVANTES SAAVEDRA, MIGUEL DE (1547–1616), Spanish writer; most famous
as the author of _Don Quixote_.

CHAUVIN, RENÉ AUGUSTE (1860–1936), French socialist; member of the
French Workers’ Party; in 1901, joined the Socialist Party of France;
left the party in 1914.

CHLOSTA, MICHAL (1868–1936), member of the SDKP; emigrated to Germany in
1895; member of the Berlin section of the Association of Polish Social
Democratic Workers Abroad.

CIMAROSA, DOMENICO (1749–1801), Italian opera composer; in 1799,
condemned to death for taking part in a popular uprising in Naples, but
then granted clemency.

CLEMENCEAU, GEORGES BENJAMIN (1841–1929), French politician; leading
spokesperson for French Radicalism before 1903; by 1906 became forceful
opponent of worker’s movements; 1906, minister of the interior;
president of France, 1906–09 and 1917–20; extreme chauvinist, especially
in World War I; supported policy of “total war.”

CLIVE, ROBERT (BARON CLIVE OF PLASSEY) (1725–74), English governor and
commander in chief in India; laid the foundation for English rule in
India.

COHN, OSKAR (1869–1934), attorney; Social Democrat; from 1909, a city
council member in Berlin; 1912–18, member of the Reichstag; 1916,
belonged to the Social Democratic Working Group; in 1917, became a
member of the USPD.

COSTER, CHARLES DE (1827–29), Belgian writer and political journalist.

CULP, JULIA (1880–1970), Dutch concert singer; known as the “Dutch
nightingale.”

CUNOW, HEINRICH WILHELM CARL (1862–1936), economist, historian,
sociologist, and ethnographer; Social Democrat; member of the staff and
contributor to _Neue Zeit_, becoming its editor in 1898; 1902–14, an
editor of _Vorwärts_; 1907–14, instructor at the SPD party school in
Berlin; before 1914 an opponent of revisionism; during World War I,
moved to the right and became a strong supporter of the war; in 1917,
became chief editor of _Neue Zeit_; in November 1918, a member of the
“Socialization Commission.”

DAHLMANN, FRIEDRICH CHRISTOPH (1785–1860), German historian and
instructor in constitutional law; 1848, a member of the Frankfurt
National Assembly.

DALSKI, see Ettinger-Dalski, Adam Stanislaw.

DAN, FYODOR I. (real name, F. I. Gurvich) (pseudonyms: D. Bersenev,
Derevo, and others) (1871–1947), Russian Social Democrat; member of the
Emancipation of Labor group and _Iskra_ group; became leading Menshevik;
in 1905, member of the editorial board of St. Petersburg newspaper
_Nachalo_ (Beginning); 1908–11, editor of the newspaper _Golos
Sotsial-Demokrata_ (Voice of the Social Democrat); 1913, editor of the
newspaper _Luch_ (Ray), and head of the Social Democratic faction in the
Fourth State Duma; supported World War I and opposed Bolshevik
Revolution.

DANTON, GEORGES JACQUES (1759–94), French lawyer; played a leading role
in preparing the popular uprising of August 1792; became minister of
justice after the fall of the monarchy; in April 1793, became a member
of the Committee of Public Safety; at the end of 1793, argued for an end
to the Jacobin dictatorship; executed at the beginning of April 1794 by
the order of Robespierre.

DASZYŃSKA-GOLIŃSKA, ZOFIA (1866–1934), economist and sociologist; came
close to holding Marxist positions, but then became a proponent of
reformist ideas.

DASZYŃSKI, IGNACY (1866–1936), leading spokesperson for the PPSD and a
deputy in the Austro-Hungarian Parliament.

DÄUMIG, ERNST FRIEDRICH (1866–1922), German Social Democrat; 1901–11,
editor of Social Democratic newspapers in Gera, Halle, and Erfurt; in
1911, became a regular contributor to _Vorwärts_ on questions of
culture, education, and military science; 1912–18, chairman of the SPD’s
Berlin district committee on culture and education; in 1917, became a
member of the USPD and, in May 1918, secretary in the USPD party
leadership; 1918, one of the leaders of the Revolutionary Shop Stewards
in Berlin.

DAVID, EDUARD (1863–1930), teacher; Social Democrat; in 1896, became a
leading advocate of revisionism; 1896–97, editor of _Mainzer
Volkszeitung_; 1898–1908, member of the lower house of Hesse; member of
the staff and regular contributor to the revisionist organ
_Sozialistische Monatshefte_; 1903–18, member of the Reichstag; he was a
fervent supporter of German expansionism and strongly supported World
War I.

DĘBIŃSKI, BOLESLAW (pseudonyms: Józef Drut, Bolek) (1866–1921), studied
medicine in St. Petersburg and Warsaw; member of the Union of Polish
Workers; 1892–93, editor of the quarterly _Przegląd Socjalistyczny_
(Socialist Review), published in Paris; later became a proponent of
national-democratic ideas; after 1905, a practicing physician in Warsaw.

DEFNET, ALFRED (birth and death dates unavailable), Belgian socialist.

DEHMEL, RICHARD (1863–1920), German writer who voiced social criticism
in his poetry; in 1914, he volunteered to fight in World War I.

DEICH, LEV G. (pseudonyms: Yevgeny, Alleman) (1855–1941), Russian
Narodnik and, later, Social Democrat; cofounder of the Emancipation of
Labor group (the Russian Marxists around Plekhanov); in 1884, condemned
to hard labor; escaped in 1901 and emigrated to Zurich; after 1903, a
Menshevik; a supporter of World War I.

DEMENTYEV, Y. M. (1850–?), Russian writer on economics; author of _The
Factory—What It Gives to the Population and What It Takes Away_ (1893).

DEUTSCH, LEO, see Deich, Lev G. DICHTER, see Zundel, Friedrich.

DICKENS, CHARLES (pen name: Boz) (1812–70), English novelist.

DIEFENBACH, G. (d. 1917), father of Hans Diefenbach.

DIEFENBACH, HANS (1884–1917), physician; was sympathetic to German
Social Democracy; wrote articles for _Neue Zeit_; Luxemburg’s lover for
several years prior to 1915; killed in action during World War I.

DIERCKE, C. (1842–1913), cartographer; publisher of school atlases.

DISSMANN, ROBERT (1878–1926), lathe operator; Social Democrat; 1900–05,
head of the German Metalworkers’ Union in Barmen-Elberfeld and,
1905–1908, in Frankfurt on the Main; 1908–12, party secretary for the
SPD in Hanau; 1912–17, SPD regional secretary for Hesse-Nassau;
beginning in 1912, city councilor in Hanau; 1917, became a member of the
USPD.

DITTMANN, WILHELM FRIEDRICH CARL (1874–1954), carpenter; Social
Democrat; 1899–1902, editor of _Die Norddeutsche Volksstimme_ in
Bremerhaven and, 1902–04, of _Die Bergische Arbeiterstimme_ in Solingen;
1904–09, party secretary and regional chairman of the SPD for Frankfurt
on the Main and, 1907–09, city councilor in Frankfurt; 1909–17, once
again editor of _Die Bergische Arbeiterstimme_; 1912–18, member of the
Reichstag; 1916, member of the Executive of the Social Democratic
Working Group; 1917, cofounder and one of the chairmen of the USPD.

DOMANSKI, JÓZEF, pseudonym of Feliks Dzierżyński.

DÖNNIGES, HELENE VON (1845–1911) (later Princess Helene von Racowitza),
German actress and writer; the cause of the duel in which Ferdinand
Lassalle was fatally wounded.

DOSTOYEVSKY, FYODOR M. (1821–81), Russian writer known for his probing
explorations of human existence and psychology; a liberal revolutionary
as a youth, he later became very conservative.

DREESBACH, HERMANN JOSEPH AUGUST (1844–1906), cabinetmaker and merchant;
Social Democrat; before 1875, a member of the ADAV; member of the
Reichstag in 1890–93 and 1898–1906; 1891–1903, member of the Baden state
assembly; founder and editor of the _Badisch-Pfälzisches Volksblatt_ in
Mannheim.

DUNCKER, HERMANN LUDWIG RUDOLF (1874–1960), German Social Democrat;
1896–1900, studied philosophy, economics, and history; 1903, volunteer
editorial worker on the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_; 1904, head of the
Leipzig Workers’ Secretariat and, in 1905–07, of the Dresden Workers’
Secretariat and instructor in training courses; beginning in 1906, went
on speaking tours as a traveling lecturer for the SPD; 1912–14,
instructor in the history of socialism at the SPD party school in
Berlin; an adherent of the German Left; cofounder of the International
Group (Spartacus Group); on November 9, 1918, together with rebel
workers and sailors, occupied the _Berliner Lokal-Anzeiger_ and produced
the first issue of _Rote Fahne_; member of the Zentrale (central
leadership body) of the Spartacus League and cofounder of the KPD;
husband of Käte Duncker.

DUNCKER, KÄTE (1871–1953), teacher; Social Democrat; 1906–08, on the
editorial staff of _Gleichheit_; an adherent of the German Left; was
actively involved in the proletarian women’s movement; cofounder of the
International Group (Spartacus Group) and of the KPD; wife of Hermann
Duncker.

DUNCKER & HUMBLOT, German book publishing company, founded in Berlin in
1809; after 1866, moved to Leipzig, and after 1912, to Munich.

DZERZHINSKY, English transliteration of the Russian spelling of the
Polish name DZIERŻYŃSKI (see below).

DZIERŻYŃSKI, FELIKS (pseudonym: Józef) (1877–1926), prominent figure in
the Polish and Russian workers’ movements; 1895, a member of the
Lithuanian Social Democracy; from 1897 on, arrested many times,
condemned to internal exile, and escaped; 1900, a cofounder of the
SDKPiL; beginning in 1902, lived as an émigré in Berlin and then in
Kraków; member of the SDKPiL’s Committee Abroad and, beginning in 1905,
of the SDKPiL’s Chief Executive Committee; in 1906, became the
representative of the SDKPiL on the Central Committee of the RSDRP;
after 1908, lived as an émigré, mainly in Kraków; in Warsaw in 1912,
arrested and again imprisoned; upon his release in 1917, joined
Bolshevik Party; after the Bolshevik Revolution, became head of the
Cheka, the secret police.

EBERLEIN, MAX ALBERT HUGO (1887–1944), graphic artist; Social Democrat;
1909, cofounder and chairman of the freelance Organization for Graphic
Artists; in 1915, arrested for distributing antiwar material; January 1,
1916, participant in the national conference of the Gruppe
Internationale in Berlin; 1916, chairman of the district executive
committee of the Social Democratic Voters League (_Wahlverein_) for the
Berlin district of Teltow-Beeskow-Storkow-Charlottenburg; member of the
Zentrale (central leadership body) of the Spartacus League; member of
the KPD from the time of its founding and representative of the KPD to
the founding congress of the Communist International.

EBERT, FRIEDRICH (1871–1925), harness maker; Social Democrat; 1891–1905,
at various times, chairman of the Social Democratic party organization
in Bremen; 1893–94, local editor and court reporter for the _Bremer
Bürger-Zeitung_; in 1905, became a member of the SPD Executive; 1908,
chairman of the _Zentralstelle_ (central office) for the Working Youth
of Germany; 1912–18, member of the Reichstag; in 1913, together with
Hugo Haase, cochairman of the SPD; a leading representative of reformism
and strong supporter of World War I; in 1916, became the chairman of the
Reichstag group of SPD deputies; on November 9, 1918, Ebert was named
chancellor of the German Empire by Prince Max von Baden; became chairman
of the anti-revolutionary Council of People’s Representatives; was
decisively involved in the crushing of the January 1919 Spartacus League
Uprising.

ECKSTEIN, GUSTAV (1875–1916), Austrian historian and economist; Social
Democrat; 1910–11, instructor in the history of socialism at the SPD
party school in Berlin; beginning in 1910, editor of _Neue Zeit_.

EHRENFELS, CHRISTIAN FREIHERR VON (1859–1932), Austrian philosopher; in
1900, became a professor at Prague University; in one of his works,
_System der Werttheorie_ (A System of Value Theory), he makes ethics the
basis for a general theory of value.

EICHHORN, ROBERT EMIL (1863–1915), mechanic; Social Democrat; 1895–1900,
editor of the _Sächsische Arbeiter-Zeitung_ in Dresden; 1900–04, chief
editor of the _Volksstimme_ in Mannheim; 1901–09, member of the Baden
state assembly; 1903–11, member of the Reichstag; 1908–16, head of the
SPD Press Bureau in Berlin; in 1917, became a member of the USPD; was
chief of police in Berlin during the November revolution of 1918–19.

EISNER, KURT (1867–1919), writer and political journalist; Social
Democrat; 1899–1905, editor of _Vorwärts_; 1907–10, chief editor of
_Fränkische Tagespost_ in Nuremburg; a proponent of ethical-socialist
and reformist views; in 1917, became a member of the USPD; in 1918, took
part in preparing for and carrying out the November revolution in
Germany; 1918–19, president of the Bavarian Republic; assassinated by
the counterrevolution on February 21, 1919.

EMMEL, JOSEPH LEOPOLD (1863–1919), in 1902, became managing director of
the _Mülhause Volkszeitung_ in Alsace; member of the district council
and the state assembly; chairman of the precinct organization and the
control commission of the SPD in Alsace-Lorraine.

ENGELMANN, OTTO, pseudonym of Leo Jogiches.

ENGELS, FRIEDRICH (1820–95), Marx’s closest colleague and collaborator;
author of _The Condition of the Working Class in England_ and editor of
Volumes II and III of Marx’s _Capital_.

ESPINAS, ALFRED-VICTOR (1844–1922), French philosopher who was
influenced by English positivism; 1877–94, professor at Bordeaux; 1904,
professor at the Sorbonne in Paris; in 1905, became a member of the
Academy of Moral and Political Sciences.

ETTINGER-DALSKI, ADAM STANISLAW (1878–1934), Polish jurist and
sociologist, prominent in the SDKPiL; after 1918, had connections with
the Communist Workers’ Party of Poland.

EULENBURG, ALBERT (1840–1917), German physician; beginning in 1894,
editor of the _Deutsche Medizinische Wochenschrift_; in 1903, became
professor of neurology in Berlin.

FAISST, HUGO (nickname, Meister) (1862–1914), initially, an attorney; as
a pianist and singer he promoted the work of composer Hugo Wolf; was
close to the German Social Democratic movement. Luxemburg referred to
Faisst as “the master” because of his superb renditions as pianist and
singer of poems by Goethe and Mörike set to music by Hugo Wolf.

FEINSTEIN, WLADISLAW (pseudonyms: Zdzislaw Leder, Zdzislaw, Witold)
(1880–1938), Polish jurist and political journalist, prominent in the
Polish and international workers’ movement; in 1903, became an official
of the SDKPiL; in 1906, became a member of its chief leadership body
and, in 1908, secretary of that body; in 1919, became a member of the
Communist Workers’ Party of Poland.

FELDMAN, KONSTANTIN (1898–?), Russian sailor who took part in the revolt
on the battleship _Potemkin_; played himself in Sergei Eisenstein’s
famous film of the same name.

FENDRICH, ANTON (1868–1949), writer; Social Democrat; 1897–1901, member
of the Baden state assembly; proponent of revisionist views.

FERNBACH, WOLFGANG (1889–1919), writer and socialist activist; along
with Werner Müller, one of the two representatives of the besieged
workers and Spartacus League supporters who occupied the _Vorwärts_
building in mid-January 1919; he offered to surrender to the
counterrevolutionary forces when it became clear the battle was lost; he
was killed by the besiegers shortly after his surrender.

FEUERBACH, ANSELM (1829–80), German painter; lived mainly in Italy.

FICHTE, JOHANN GOTTLIEB (1762–1814), German philosopher, post-Kantian
idealist who had major impact on the young Hegel; professor at Berlin
University and the first elected rector of that institution; initially,
defender of the ideas of the French Revolution of 1789 and of
Jacobinism; later became staunch promoter of German nationalism.

FISCHER, KUNO (1824–1907), German historian of philosophy; author of the
highly influential _History of Modern Philosophy_ (1852–77); wrote major
studies of Kant and Hegel; helped influence the development of
Neo-Kantianism.

FISCHER, RICHARD (1855–1926), typesetter; Social Democrat; 1893–1918,
member of the Reichstag; in 1902, became head of the union at the
_Vorwärts_ printing plant; a proponent of revisionist views; strong
supporter of World War I.

FORRER, LUDWIG (1845–1921), attorney in Winterthur, Switzerland; member
of the National Assembly; in 1900, became director of the Central
Council for International Rail Transport; beginning in 1902, member of
the Federal Council.

FOURIER, FRANÇOIS-MARIE-CHARLES (1772–1837), French utopian socialist.
His writings were a major influence on the young Marx, who held his work
in high regard. Marx also refers to Fourier in the _Grundrisse_ and
_Capital_.

FRANCE, ANATOLE (real name, Anatole François Thibault) (1844–1924), one
of the greatest French writers of the late nineteenth and early
twentieth centuries; author of _The Temptation of St. Anthony_ and _The
Revolt of the Angels_; witnessed the Paris Commune of 1871; lifelong
anti-clericalist and free thinker; worked with Emile Zola on the Dreyfus
case.

FRANK, LUDWIG (1874–1914), attorney; Social Democrat; beginning in 1904,
city councilor in Mannheim; 1905–14, member of the Baden state assembly;
cofounder of the working-class youth movement in South Germany; 1906–08,
editor of the journal _Die Junge Garde_; 1907–14, member of the
Reichstag; leading representative of reformism; prominent as a supporter
of World War I; volunteered for military duty and was killed in the war.

FREILIGRATH, FERDINAND (1810–76), lyric poet; joined the revolutionary
movement of the pre-March 1848 period; emigrated to Switzerland in 1845;
1846–48, member of the Communist League; became a close friend of Karl
Marx and returned to Germany in 1848; contributor to the _Neue
Rheinische Zeitung_; withdrew from political activity in the mid-1850s.

FREYTHALER, WILHELM (1862–?), lathe operator, working on both wood and
iron; Social Democrat; in December 1902, became editorial secretary for
the _Vorwärts_; 1902–09, chairman of the League of Social Democratic
Voters in the 6th Reichstag electoral district of Berlin.

FRIEDRICH II (1712–86), King of Prussia, 1740–86.

FUCHS, EDUARD (1870–1940), satirist, artist, and journalist; initially
an anarchist, joined the SPD in the late 1880s; in 1890s, in Munich,
edited satirical magazine _Süddeutscher Postillon_; devoted himself to
publishing books on art history; ceased active participation in politics
for several years after 1908 but remained on friendly terms with SPD;
close friend of Franz Mehring and other Spartacus leaders; 1916–18,
served as messenger for the Spartacus League; December 1918, traveled to
Moscow to deliver message from Luxemburg to Lenin; helped publish the
complete works of Franz Mehring; member of the Communist Party
Opposition (KPO) in late 1920s.

FÜNFSTÜCK, MORITZ (1856–1925), botanist; professor in Stuttgart.

GANELIN, S. S. (1862–1926), Russian chemical engineer; found his way to
Marxism from the ideas of the Narodnik movement; arrested in 1885, he
emigrated in 1886; attended the Polytechnic Institute in Zurich and
joined the Russian Marxists in the Emancipation of Labor group; in 1892,
moved to America; after 1897, no longer politically active.

GASPEY, THOMAS (1788–1871), English historian; author of _History of
England: Continued from the Reign of George the Third_ (1852).

GECK, BRANDEL (1893–1918), Social Democrat; son of Adolf Geck.

GECK, ERNST ADOLF (1854–1942), technician; Social Democrat; 1897–1919,
member of the Baden state assembly; 1898–1912, member of the Reichstag;
1899–1933, editor of the weekly _D’r alt Offeburger_; 1902–16, member of
the SPD Control Commission; in 1917, joined the USPD; husband of Marie
Geck.

GECK, MARIE (1865–1927), Social Democrat; wife of Adolf Geck.

GELFAND, see Helphand, Alexander L.

GEORGE, STEFAN (1868–1933), German poet, close to the French symbolists;
a sharp critic of modernity; translated Dante, Shakespeare, and
Baudelaire into German; in 1892, founded the journal _Blätter für die
Kunst_, whose publication continued until 1919.

GERISCH, KARL ALWIN (1857–1922), mechanical engineer; Social Democrat;
member of the Reichstag in 1894–98 and 1903–06; 1892–1912, treasurer of
the SPD Executive and, in 1912–17, secretary of that body.

GERLACH, PAUL (1888–1944), German physician who sympathized with the
SPD.

GERSON, JULIUS (1868–1942), merchant; proprietor of a lithographic
printing works in Berlin; Social Democrat; member of the USPD; provided
financial assistance to the Spartacus League in 1917–18.

GEWEHR, ELFRIEDE (birth and death dates unavailable), Social Democrat;
1908–09, participant in the third school year of the SPD party school in
Berlin; daughter of Wilhelm Gewehr and cousin of Luxemburg.

GEWEHR, WILHELM (1858–1913), woodworker; Social Democrat; 1908, editor
of the Social Democratic newspaper _Freie Presse_ in Elberfeld; 1910,
chairman of the Social Democratic Committee for Agitation in the Lower
Rhine region.

GEYER, FRIEDRICH AUGUST CARL (1853–1937), cigarmaker; Social Democrat;
1886–1918, member of the Reichstag; 1895–1918, editor of the
_Tabakarbeiter_; 1898–1902, chairman of the Social Democratic
Association for the City of Leipzig; beginning in 1913, member of the
Control Commission of the SPD; during World War I, a centrist; in 1916,
belonged to the Social Democratic Working Group; in 1917, became a
member of the USPD.

GOETHE, JOHANN WOLFGANG VON (1749–1832), German poet, prose writer,
dramatist, and naturalist; foremost representative of German classical
literature.

GOGOWSKI, JOSEPH (1870–1919), Social Democrat; 1899–1903, workers’
secretary for the SPD in Poznań; the same in Iserlohn in 1904, and later
in Singen and Lübeck.

GÖHRE, PAUL (1864–1928), evangelical theologian and politician who
advocated social reform; in 1900, became a member of the SPD;
contributor to _Sozialistische Monatshefte_; elected to the Reichstag in
June 1903, he gave up his mandate on October 1, 1903.

GOLDENBERG, JAKUB (pseudonym: Stanislaw Turski) (1872–1935), physician;
in 1902, became active in the SDKPiL in Warsaw; after the Russian
Revolution of 1905, emigrated to France and took an active part in the
French workers’ movement.

GOLDENDACH, see Ryazanov, D. B., the party name by which Goldendach was
best known.

GONCHAROV, IVAN A. (1812–91), Russian writer, best known for his novel
_Oblomov_, but also the author of many literary-historical works.

GORDON, ANNA (birth and death dates unavailable), participant in the
socialist movement in Wilno, and later a student in Switzerland; closely
associated with Leo Jogiches.

GORKY, MAXIM (real name, A. M. Peshkov) (1868–1936), Russian and Soviet
writer; founder of “socialist realism,” largely at Stalin’s instigation.

GORTER, HERMAN (1864–1927), Dutch poet and socialist; 1880s, leading
member of Tachtigers, group of left-wing Dutch writers; 1897 joined
SDAP; 1889, published _Mei_, an epic poem considered one of outstanding
works of Dutch Impressionism; 1909, broke from SDAP to help form
Social-Democratische Partji (SDP) of Netherlands in opposition to
reformist orientation of the Second International; initially supported
Bolshevik Revolution but then became (along with Anton Pannekoek)
leading left-wing critique of Leninism; 1921, helped found Communist
Workers’ Party of Germany (KAPD), which opposed the Third International.

GOTTSCHALK, EDMUND (1870–?), shoemaker; Social Democrat; beginning in
1908, circulation manager for the Solidarity League of Worker
Bicyclists; 1909–10, second regional chairman for the SPD in Offenbach
(on the Main).

GOUNOD, CHARLES FRANÇOIS (1818–93), French composer; best known for his
opera _Faust_, based on Goethe’s play.

GOUPY, G. MORIN SUCC., a printing establishment in Paris.

GRADNAUER, GEORG (1866–1946), writer; Social Democrat; 1890–96, editor
of the _Sächsische Arbeiter-Zeitung_ in Dresden; 1895–1907, editor of
the _Vorwärts_; 1898–1906 and 1911–18, member of the Reichstag; a
proponent of opportunist views; supported World War I.

GRANNY, see Kautsky, Minna.

GRANT, pseudonym of Feliks Dzierżyński.

GREINER, OTTO (1869–1916), painter and graphic artist.

GREULICH, HERMANN (1842–1925), bookbinder; in 1865, moved to
Switzerland; cofounder of the Social Democratic Party of Switzerland; a
leader of the reformists in the Second International; supported World
War I.

GRILLPARZER, FRANZ (1791–1872), Austrian poet and playwright; inspired
by Friedrich Schiller, he is widely considered Austria’s greatest
playwright.

GRIMM, ROBERT (1881–1958), one of the leaders of the Swiss Social
Democratic Party (its president until 1919) and of the Second
International; in 1909–18, editor of _Berner Tagwacht_; beginning in
1910, a member of the Swiss National Council and, in 1945–46, its
president. During World War I, he at first took an antiwar position; was
chairman of the Zimmerwald Conference (1915) and of the Kienthal
Conference (1916), and chairman of the International Socialist
Commission; then in January 1917, he aligned himself with the Swiss
supporters of the war; later became one of the founders of the “2½
International” and then a member of the Bureau of the Second
International. For a detailed account of Grimm’s role in violating the
antiwar principles of the Zimmerwald movement that he supposedly
represented, see the writings of Lenin in early 1917 (when Lenin was
still living in Switzerland), for example, his “Open Letter to Charles
Naine” (in Lenin, _Collected Works_, Eng. ed., vol. 23, p. 220 ff.).
(Naine was one of the Swiss socialists who, unlike Grimm, continued to
support the Zimmerwald antiwar position.)

GRIMMELSHAUSEN, HANS JAKOB CHRISTOFFEL VON (ca. 1622–76), writer of
prose fiction, with an orientation toward social criticism.

GROSOWSKI (often shortened to Grossi), pseudonym of Leo Jogiches. Also
spelled Grozowski, Grosovski.

GUESDE, JULES (MATHIEU-BASILE) (1845–1922), French journalist; initially
a follower of Mikhail Bakunin, later became leading figure of statist
socialism in France; 1879, founder of the French Workers’ Party, which
advocated revolutionary positions; later, by 1914, evolved into a
reformist and supporter of World War I.

GUIZOT, FRANÇOIS PIERRE GUILLAUME (1787–1874), French historian and
statesman; 1840–48, as the guiding hand of France’s domestic and foreign
policy, he defended the interests of finance capital and big business.

GURCMAN, BENEDYKT (1882–1907), Polish engineer, active in the SDKPiL;
1904, arrested together with Marcin Kasprzak when the illegal print shop
of the SDKPiL was seized; sentenced to fifteen years of internal exile
in Siberia, where he died.

GUREVICH, E. L. (pseudonyms: V. Danevich, Pariser, Ye. Smirnov, K.
Petrov) (1865–?), Russian radical political journalist; in 1885, sent
into internal exile at Ufa; until 1890, a member of the populist and
terrorist group Narodnaya Volya (People’s Will), and after that, a
Social Democrat; contributor to the newspaper _Nasha Zarya_; after the
1903 RSDRP Congress, a Menshevik; in 1911, one of the Social Democratic
deputies elected to Russia’s State Duma; after 1917, worked at the
Institute of Marxism-Leninism.

GURVICH, see Dan, Fyodor I.

GUTT, STANISLAW (1868–ca. 1907), member of the Union of Polish Workers
and later of the SDKPiL; in 1894, emigrated to Switzerland, where he was
active in the Union of Polish Social Democratic Workers Abroad; in 1905,
returned to Poland; proved to be an agent of the tsarist _Okhrana_
(secret police).

HAASE, HUGO (1863–1919), German lawyer; Social Democrat; 1894–1910, city
councilor in Königsberg; member of the Reichstag in 1897–1906 and
1912–18; 1911–16, together with Friedrich Ebert, cochairman of the SPD;
1912–15, chairman of the SPD’s Reichstag group; in 1914, opposed voting
of war credits but did not break party discipline by making his views
public; 1916, member of the Executive Committee of the Social Democratic
Working Group; 1917, one of the chairmen of the USPD; 1918, member of
the Council of People’s Representatives, assassinated by a monarchist in
1919.

HAENISCH, KONRAD (1876–1925), Social Democrat; in 1898–99, editor of the
_Pfälzische Post_ in Ludwigshafen and in 1899–1900 of the _Sächsische
Arbeiter-Zeitung_ in Dresden; 1900–05, editor in chief of the
_Arbeiter-Zeitung_ in Dortmund; 1905–06, editor of the _Leipziger
Volkszeitung_; 1906–11, once again editor in chief of the
_Arbeiter-Zeitung_ in Dortmund; until 1914, he defended the views of the
German Left, but during World War I evolved toward a pro-war position;
1915–19, editor of _Die Glocke_.

HANECKI, JAKUB (real last name, Fürstenberg) (pseudonyms: Franciszek,
Henryk, Kuba, Mikolaj) (1879–1937), 1903–10, member of the top executive
body of the SDKPiL; after the 1912 split in that party, he belonged to
the wing that established closer contact with the Bolsheviks; 1912–15,
lived in Kraków and Poronin; after that lived in Sweden, where in 1917
he was a member of the Foreign Bureau of the Central Committee of the
RSDRP (Bolshevik); after the Bolshevik Revolution of 1917 in Soviet
Russia he was active in government work.

HARDEN, MAXIMILIAN (real name, Maximilian Felix Ernst Witkowski)
(1868–1927), author and political journalist; founder and director of
the political weekly _Die Zukunft_; spokesperson for extreme German
nationalism before World War I, he later became a pacificist; most
famous for having outed homosexual relations among Kaiser Wilhelm’s
ministers, in what became known as the “Harden-Eulenburg Affair.”

HARTMANN, MIECZYSLAW (nickmame, Mitek) (1869–93), Polish student in
Zurich, linked with the Polish Social Democratic foreign students
grouped around Rosa Luxemburg.

HAUPT, WILHELM (1869–1914), shoemaker; Social Democrat; in 1899, became
the circulation manager of the _Volksstimme_ in Magdeburg; in 1900,
became a city councilor of Magdeburg; in 1912, became a member of the
Reichstag.

HAUPTMANN, GERHART (1862–1946), German playwright, novelist, and poet,
especially famous for his realistic plays expressing social criticism.

HEBBEL, CHRISTIAN FRIEDRICH (1815–63), German dramatist and prose
writer.

HEINE, HEINRICH (1797–1856), one of Germany’s greatest poets, essayists,
and political journalists; close friend and associate of the young Marx.

HEINE, WOLFGANG (1861–1944), lawyer; Social Democrat; 1898–1918, member
of the Reichstag; leading representative of revisionism; staff member of
_Sozialistische Monatshefte_ and contributor to the bourgeois _Berliner
Tageblatt_; during World War I, a social chauvinist and revisionist;
November 1918–January 1919, Prussian minister of justice.

HEINEMANN, HUGO (1863–1919), lawyer; Social Democrat; taught criminal
law at the SPD party school in Berlin; regular contributor to
_Sozialistische Monatshefte_; supported World War I.

HEINRICH, WLADYSLAW (1869–1957), as a student in Zurich he was connected
with the SDKP; in 1896, withdrew from the workers’ movement; later
became a prominent Polish philosopher and psychologist.

HELLER, HUGO (1870–1923), Austrian Social Democrat; contributor to _Neue
Zeit_; 1902–05, editor of the _Schwäbische Tagwacht_; returned to Vienna
and started a business dealing in books and art.

HELPHAND, ALEXANDER L. (pseudonym: Parvus) (1867–1924), Russian Social
Democrat; in the 1890s, became active in the German Social Democratic
movement; 1895–96, editor of the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_; 1896–98,
chief editor of the _Sächsische Arbeiter-Zeitung _in Dresden; in 1902,
together with Julian Marchlewski, founded a publishing house in Munich
for progressive international literature; 1898–1905, produced a
newsletter entitled _Aus der Weltpolitik_; during the Russian Revolution
of 1905, a member of the St. Petersburg Workers’ Council (_Soviet_);
helped produce the newspaper _Nachalo_ (The Beginning); 1906–09, on the
editorial staff of the _Arbeiter-Zeitung_ in Dortmund; supported World
War I; in 1915, founded Social Sciences Publishers and edited the weekly
_Die Glocke_; after the Bolshevik Revolution in Russia in 1917, offered
to assist the Bolsheviks, but Lenin turned him down; husband of Tatyana
Helphand.

HELPHAND, TATYANA (birth and death dates unavailable), wife of A. L.
Helphand, originally from Odessa.

HERKNER, HEINRICH (1863–1932), conservative political economist,
representative of socialism of the Academy (_Kathedersozialismus_);
professor at Freiburg, Karlsruhe, Zurich, and Berlin; in 1907, became
chairman of the Association for Social Betterment.

HILDEBRAND, ADOLF E. R., RITTER VON (1877–1941), sculptor and art
theorist; became a member of the Berlin Academy in 1892.

HILFERDING, RUDOLF (1877–1941), Austrian children’s doctor in Vienna;
Social Democrat; 1904–23, co-editor of the Vienna journal _Marx-Studien.
Blätter zur Theorie und Politik des wissenschaft–lichen Sozialismus_;
author of _Finance Capital_; 1907–15, editor of _Vorwärts_ in Berlin;
1907, lecturer on political economy and economic history at the SPD
party school in Berlin; supported World War I; from the end of 1915
until November 1918, an army doctor in the Austro-Hungarian military
service; in 1917, became a member of the USPD and, in 1918, chief editor
of its central organ, _Freiheit_; in 1918, became of member of the
Socialization Commission; rejoined SPD and served in several SPD
governments in 1920s; murdered by the Nazis.

HOCH, GUSTAV (1862–1942), Social Democrat; 1894, editor of _Volksstimme_
in Frankfurt on the Main; 1895–1919, head of the workers’ secretariat in
Hanau and editor of the _Deutsche Dachdecker-Zeitung_ (German Roofers’
Newspaper); member of the Reichstag in 1898–1903 and 1907–18; 1902–19,
city councilor in Hanau; supported World War I.

HOERNLE, EDWIN (1883–1952), 1904–09, attended a theological seminary and
became a vicar; in 1909, resigned from his vicarage; in 1910, joined the
SPD; 1912–14, editor of the _Schwäbische Tagwacht_ in Stuttgart; after
1914, was for a time editor of _Sozialdemokrat_ and _Gleichheit_ in
Stuttgart, as well as of the revolutionary youth paper _Morgenrot_;
1916, participant in the illegal conference of oppositional socialist
youth in Jena; adherent of the Spartacus Group; member of the KPD from
1918.

HOFER, ADOLF (1868–1935), Social Democrat; in 1913, became a member of
the Prussian House of Deputies; in 1917, expelled from the Social
Democratic group in the House of Deputies and became a member of the
USPD and of its Central Committee.

HOFMANN, FRANZ HERMANN THEODOR (1852–1903), cigarmaker; Social Democrat;
member of the Reichstag in 1892–1903.

HOFMANNSTHAL, HUGO VON (1874–1929), Austrian poet and writer; main
representative of the Vienna neo-Romantic school.

HÖLDERLIN, JOHANN CHRISTIAN FRIEDRICH (1770–1843), German poet and prose
writer; author of _Hyperion_; close friend of the young Hegel and
Schelling; an early supporter of the French Revolution.

HORWITZ, MAKSYMILIAN HENRYK (pseudonym: H. Walecki) (born, 1877; died
not long after 1937), political journalist and prominent figure in the
Polish and international workers’ movement; in 1893, went to Belgium as
a student from Russian-occupied Poland; 1895, joined the Belgian
Workers’ Party and the Association of Polish Socialists Abroad, and then
the PPS; 1899–1901, imprisoned in Russia; 1901–02, in Siberian exile;
escaped and went to Switzerland; after 1906 (in Poland), a leading
representative of the PPS-Lewica (left wing); in 1915, emigrated to
Zurich and took part in preparations for the Zimmerwald conference and
the Kienthal conference (1916); 1917, still in Zurich, was a member of
the editorial board of the newspaper _Volksrecht_; in 1918, returned to
Poland and was one of the initiators of the unification of the
PPS-Lewica with the SDKPiL to form the Communist Workers’ Party of
Poland, to whose Central Committee he belonged.

HOLZ, ARNO (1863–1929), German poet and writer.

HUCH, RICARDA (1864–1947), German poet and writer; major proponent of
the naturalist movement in literature.

HÜLSEN-HAESELER, GEORG, GRAF VON (COUNT OF) (1858–1922), in 1905–18,
general director of the Royal Theater in Berlin.

HUMBLOT, see Duncker & Humblot.

HUPTICH, pseudonym of Feliks Dzierżyński.

HUTTEN, ULRICH VON (1488–1523), German humanist and poet; an outspoken
advocate of the Reformation and ally of Martin Luther; joined anti-papal
forces fighting in the Rhine region (the Knights’ War, 1522); after
their defeat fled to Switzerland, seeking to join the Reformation
movement there; died in Swiss exile at a monastery on a lake on the
island of Ufenau.

HUYGENS, CHRISTIAAN (1629–1695), Dutch mathematician and astronomer;
made one of the first telescopic sightings of Saturn and its moon Titan;
invented the pendulum clock; renowned for his theory that light consists
of waves (known as the Huygens-Fresnel principle).

HUYGENS, CORNÉLIE (1847–1902), Dutch feminist and socialist writer;
author of an 1897 novel, _Barthold Meryan_, in which Huygens gives a
fictional account of her conversion to the SDAP; committed suicide by
drowning herself.

HUYSMANS, CAMILLE (1871–1968), Belgian journalist and professor of
philology; socialist; joined Belgian Workers’ Party in 1890s; 1904–19,
secretary of the ISB; beginning in 1910, was elected as a representative
in the Belgian Parliament; although he initially supported World War I,
he supported the 1917 Stockholm peace conference; later held many posts
in Belgian governments.

IGEL, see Kautsky, Hans.

IHRER, EMMA (1857–1911), Social Democrat, active mainly in the unions
and the proletarian women’s movement; 1891, edited the Social Democratic
women’s newspaper _Die Arbeiterin_; cofounder and temporary leader of
the Women Workers’ Committee in the trade unions; in 1903, founded the
Union of Flower, Feather, and Leaf Workers and edited its newspaper _Der
Blumenarbeiter_; in 1908, became representative of the General
Commission of the German Trade Unions in the Central Office for the
working-class youth of Germany; contributor to _Sozialistische
Monatshefte_.

ILYIN, VLADIMIR, see Lenin, Vladimir Ilyich.

INGRAM, JOHN KELLS (1823–1907), English economist and philologist;
professor at Dublin University; president of the economics section of
the British Scientific Association.

ISAEV, ANDREI ALEKSEEVICH (1851–1924), Russian economist, statistician,
and sociologist; author of _Krizisy v Narodnom Khoziaistue_ (Crises in
the Economy).

ISEGRIM, name of the male wolf in traditional animal stories, notably
the group of stories about Reineke Fuchs (Reynard the Fox). Originally
the name of a Germanic hero, the “Isegrim” appellation came to be used
for any disagreeable or rapacious character, and also for dangerous and
deadly ones.

In late 1898, Max Schippel used “Isegrim” as a pen name for an article
in which he spoke favorably of military industry because it provided
jobs for workers. Luxemburg then wrote a series of four articles
polemicizing against Schippel’s views. These articles were reprinted as
an Appendix in an 1899 edition of her work _Sozialreform oder
Revolution_? (Reform or Revolution?). This appendix, which was entitled
“Miliz und Militarismus” (Militia and Militarism), can be found in
_Selected Political Writings of Rosa Luxemburg_, edited by Dick Howard
(New York, 1970), pp. 135–58.

JACOB, EMILIE (1849–1933), mother of Mathilde Jacob.

JACOB, MATHILDE (1873–1943), ran a small typing and duplicating office;
became Rosa Luxemburg’s secretary; a sympathizer of the Social
Democratic movement.

JANEK, see Bielecki, Jan.

JANET, PAUL (1823–99), French philosopher; professor at Bourges and
then, beginning in 1864, at the Sorbonne in Paris; member of the
Academie des Sciences Morales et Politique; proponent of an idealist
philosophy heavily influenced by Victor Cousin and Hegel.

JANISZEWSKI, JÓZEF KONSTANTY (1855–1923), one of the pioneers of the
socialist movement in the Poznań region; in the 1890s, founded a print
shop in Berlin where the PPS weekly _Gazeta Robotnicza_, as well as
publications of the SDKPiL, were produced.

JANSSON, WILHELM (1877–1923), gardener; Social Democrat; 1896–1900,
chairman of a cashier’s office of the Gardeners’ Trade Union, becoming a
member of the union’s national committee in 1897 and serving on its
chief executive body in 1902–09; in 1905, became an editor, based in
Berlin, on the newsletter (_Correspondenzblatt_) of the General
Commission of Trade Unions of Germany; strongly supported World War I.

JAURÈS, JEAN LÉON (1859–1914), one of the leaders of the French
Socialist Party, the Second International, and the SFIO (French Section
of the Second International), his activity in the French workers’
movement began in 1892–93; founder of the newspaper _L’Humanité_; often
clashed with Luxemburg over his reformist inclinations; one of the most
prominent opponents of war, he was assassinated by pro-war chauvinists
on July 31, 1914.

JEFRON, see Yefron, Y. A.

JOFFE, ADOLPH ABRAMOVICH (also spelled Ioffe and Yoffe) (1883–1927),
Russian revolutionary and diplomat; joined RSDRP in 1903, took active
part in Russian Revolution of 1905; was close to Trosky’s position in
RSDRP and helped edit _Pravda_ with him from 1908 to 1912; in July 1917,
joined the Bolsheviks and became a member of its Central Committee;
supported the Bolshevik Revolution of 1917 and criticized other leading
Bolsheviks like Kamenev and Zinoviev for their initial opposition to the
seizure of power; 1917–18, headed Soviet delegation sent to negotiate
Brest-Litovsk Treaty; 1919–20, member of Council of Labor and Defense
and People’s Commissar of State Control of Ukrainian Soviet Republic;
negotiated Treaty of Riga which ended Polish-Soviet War of 1920; a firm
supporter of Trotsky’s Left Opposition from 1923 onward, he committed
suicide upon hearing of Trotsky’s expulsion from the Communist Party.

JOGICHES, EMILIA (birth and death dates unavailable), sister of Leo
Jogiches.

JOGICHES, JÓZEF (nickname, Józio) (1902–?), brother of Leo Jogiches.

JOGICHES, LEO (pseudonyms: Grosovski, Jan Tyszka, Leonie, Otto
Engelmann) (1867–1919), prominent figure in the Russian, Polish, and
German workers’ movements; Luxemburg’s lover from the early 1890s to
1907; initially in Wilno had connections with the Narodnaya Volya, but
later as an émigré in Switzerland was closer to the Russian Marxists in
the Emancipation of Labor group around Plekhanov; 1893, cofounder of the
SDKP (which in 1900 became the SDKPiL) and in 1902–14 a member of its
main leadership body; 1893, became co-editor of _Sprawa Robotnicza_;
1900, moved to Germany; 1916, a co-organizer of the Spartacus Group;
1918, cofounder of the Spartacus League and member of its central
leadership body; 1918, member of the Central Committee of the KPD; in
March 1919, arrested, then murdered in prison.

JOGICHES, PAWEL (birth and death dates unavailable), brother of Leo
Jogiches.

JOGICHES, ZOFIA (d. 1898), mother of Leo Jogiches.

JÓZEF, pseudonym of Feliks Dzierżyński.

JULEK, see Marchlewski, Julian.

JUNIUS, pen name of Rosa Luxemburg.

KAISER, see Wilhelm II.

KALISKI, JULIUS (birth and death dates unavailable), an official of the
Social Democratic Party in Berlin; until 1905, an editor at the
_Vorwärts_; later, wrote for _Sozialistische Monatshefte_.

KANT, IMMANUEL (1724–1804), major European philosopher; wrote
extensively on epistemology, ethics, logic, anthropology, and politics;
leading representative of German transcendental idealism.

KARSKI, see Marchlewski, Julian Balthazar.

KARSKI, MRS., see Marchlewska, Bronislawa.

KASPRZAK, MARTIN (pseudonyms: Martin, Maciej, Dlugi, Teofil, Theodor,
and others) (1860–1905), worked as a roofer; in 1885–86, played an
important part in organizing the socialist movement in Poland; 1888,
cofounder of the Second Proletariat party, which he led until 1891, when
he left Poland to live in London; assisted Luxemburg in her escape from
Poland to Switerland; worked closely with Russian revolutionaries; from
1896, a functionary of the PPS in the part of Poland annexed by Prussia;
1902–03, editor of _Gazeta Ludowa_; 1904, returned to the Russian-ruled
part of Poland; was a member of the SDKPiL; in April 1904, because of
his armed defense of an illegal print shop, was arrested and sentenced
to death; executed on September 7, 1905.

KAUTSKY, BENEDIKT (nickname, Bendel) (1894–1960), son of Karl Kautsky,
Sr.

KAUTSKY, FELIX (1891–1953), son of Karl Kautsky, Sr.

KAUTSKY, FRITZ (birth and death dates unavailable), son of Hans Kautsky,
Sr.

KAUTSKY, GRETE (nicknames, Gretel, Gretl) (birth and death dates
unavailable), daughter of Hans Kautsky, Sr.

KAUTSKY, HANS (nickname, Igel) (1864–1937), professor of art; painter at
the Royal Theater of Prussia; brother of Karl Kautsky, Sr.

KAUTSKY JR., HANS (1891–1966), chemist; professor of chemistry at the
University of Leipzig; in 1949, moved to University of Marburg; son of
Hans Kautsky.

KAUTSKY, KARL (1854–1938), Social Democratic writer; 1882, cofounder of
the journal _Neue Zeit_ and until 1917 its chief editor; influential
theoretician of the Second International; from 1910, when Luxemburg
broke from him, he moved closer to reformism with his “strategy of
attrition”; 1917, a cofounder of the USPD; after the Bolshevik
Revolution of 1917 in Russia, became a fierce critic of Soviet policies;
during the November revolution of 1918–19 in Germany; he was an
appointed state secretary in the Foreign Office and chairman of the
Socialization Commission; returned to SPD in 1920; husband of Luise
Kautsky.

KAUTSKY JR., KARL (1892–1978), edited _August Bebels Briefwechsel mit
Karl Kautsky_ (August Bebel’s Correspondence with Kautsky), among other
works; son of Karl Kautsky.

KAUTSKY, LUISE (nickname, Lulu) (1864–1944), wife of Karl Kautsky, Sr.

KAUTSKY, MINNA (Granny) (1837–1912), Austrian writer; gave a depiction
in literature of the struggle of the organized working class; mother of
Karl Kautsky, Sr.

KAUTSKY, ROBERT (1895–1962), son of Hans Kautsky, Sr.

KELLER, GOTTFRIED (1819–90), Swiss prose writer and realist poet; a
progressive bourgeois democrat.

KELLERMAN, BERNHARD (1879–1951), German writer; best known for _The
Tunnel_ (1913), a utopian work about the construction of a tunnel
between Europe and North America, and _The Ninth of November_ (1921),
based on the German Revolution of 1918.

KELLES-KRAUZ, KAZIMIERZ (pseudonym: Michal Luśnia) (1872–1905),
political journalist and sociologist; an official and theoretician of
the PPS; beginning in 1893, was part of the leadership of the ZZSP;
editor of a foreign bulletin of the PPS; in 1897, became an instructor
at the Collège Libre des Sciences Sociales in Paris and subsequently at
the Université Nouvelle in Brussels; in his sociological works, he took
positions close to Marxism, but advocated reformist views.

KERNER, JUSTINIUS (1786–1862), German physician and poet of the Late
Romantic so-called Swabian school of poetry.

KESSEL, GUSTAV VON (1846–1918), Prussian general; in 1909, became
commandant (Gouverneur) of Berlin and commanderin-chief of the March of
Brandenburg, borderlands colonized by Germans, originally having
non-German populations.

KESTENBERG, LEO (1882–1962), pianist; during World War I, director of
the Paul Cassirer Publishing House; 1915, member of the New Fatherland
Alliance.

KIPLING, (JOSEPH) RUDYARD (1865–1936), English poet and prose writer;
born and lived in Mumbai, India until 1870; again lived in India from
1882 to 1889, where he worked as a journalist and writer; enthusiast for
British imperialism and anti-socialist; 1907, received the Nobel Prize
for literature.

KLEIST, HEINRICH VON (1777–1811), German poet and playwright; major
figure of German romanticism; works include _Betrothal in St. Domingo_,
based on the Haitian slave revolt of 1803, and _Penthesilea_.

KOCZAN, see Morawski, Alfons.

KOL, HENRI HUBERT VAN (1852–1925), Dutch socialist; a leader of the
Dutch Social Democratic Workers’ Party (_Sociaal-Democratische
Arbeiderspartij_); held reformist views; opposed Soviet regime in
Russia.

KOLB, ALOIS (1875–1942), painter and graphic artist; worked as an
illustrator for _Jugend_; in 1907, became a professor of graphic art and
book design at the Academy for Graphic Arts and Bookmaking.

KORFANTY, WOJCIECH (ALBERT) (1873–1939), Polish politician and
journalist; in 1901, founded a daily paper of National Democratic
orientation, _Górno-ślązak_; 1905, edited the publication _Polak_;
1903–18, member of the Prussian House of Deputies; 1903–12 and 1918,
member of the Reichstag.

KOROLENKO, V. G. (1853–1921), Ukrainian writer and political journalist;
author of _History of My Contemporary_; longtime critic of tsarism, he
also opposed the “red terror” of the Bolsheviks.

KOŚCIUSZKO, TADEUSZ (1746–1817), Polish general and freedom fighter,
leader of the uprising in 1794 against the second partition of Poland.

KRAUZ, see Kelles-Krauz, Kazimierz.

KRAVCHINSKY, S. M. (pseudonym: S. Stepniak) (1851–95), Russian
revolutionary, author of fiction, and political journalist; Narodnik;
took up residence in London in 1884 and befriended G. V. Plekhanov and
Friedrich Engels; published many books in English about the Russian
revolutionary movement.

KREMER, ARKADIUSZ (pseudonyms: Alexander, Solomon) (1865–1935),
socialist activist from Wilno; in 1889, arrested for his work with the
Second Proletariat Party and sentenced to six months in Pawiak prison;
1891–97, cofounder of and leading figure in the Bund (the General Jewish
Workers Union) in Russia; collaborated in smuggling illegal literature
into Russia; in 1900, fled abroad; 1905, in Russia again, illegally;
1907, a delegate of the Bund at the London conference of the RSDRP; in
1912, went to France and became an electrical engineer, working in the
French rail industry.

KRICHEVSKY, BORIS N. (pseudonym: B. Veillard) (1866–1919), Russian
revolutionary; one of the leaders of the League of Russian Social
Democrats Abroad; Paris correspondent of _Vorwärts_; 1899, editor of
_Rabocheye Dyelo_; a proponent of revisionist views; after 1903,
withdrew from the Social Democratic movement.

KRILLE, OTTO (1878–1954), German poet, prose writer, and playwright;
Social Democrat; editor at the Hamburg newspaper _Volksblatt fur
Harburg, Wilhelmsburg, and Umgegende_; 1908, editor at the _Schwäbische
Tagwacht_ in Stuttgart; worked with the Stuttgart Free Youth
Organization.

KRUSZYŃSKA, R., pseudonym of Rosa Luxemburg.

KUBA, see Hanecki, Jakub.

KÜHL, O. (birth and death dates unavailable), political journalist;
Social Democrat; editor of _Die Neue Welt_.

KÜHLMANN, RICHARD VON (1873–1948), German diplomat; in the diplomatic
service until 1917; 1917–18, secretary of state of the Foreign Office;
in 1918, signed the Treaty of Brest-Litovsk.

LAFARGUE, PAUL (1842–1911), French physician; socialist; member of the
First International; together with Jules Guesde, leader of the French
Workers’ Party; leading propagandist of Marxism in the French and
international workers’ movements; son-in-law of Karl Marx, married to
Marx’s daughter Laura.

LAGARDELLE, HUBERT (1875–1958), French socialist; founder of the journal
_Le Mouvement Socialiste_ in 1899; theoretician of revolutionary
syndicalism.

LANDSBERG, OTTO (1869–1975), lawyer; Social Democrat; 1903–09, city
councilor in Magdeburg; member of the Reichstag in 1912–18; in November
1918, became a member of the Council of People’s Representatives.

LANG, OTTO (1863–1936), Swiss high court judge; socialist; central
president of the Swiss Grütli Verein, a radical political union of
workers; strong supporter of World War I.

LANGE, FRIEDRICH ALBERT (1828–75), German philosopher, social theorist,
and political journalist; liberal democrat; author of _History of
Materialism_.

LANGEN, ALBERT (1869–1909), book publisher; in 1896, founded the
satirical weekly _Simplicissimus_ and the bimonthly _März_.

LANGENSTEIN (birth and death dates unavailable), a Social Democrat in
Plauen.

LASSALLE, FERDINAND (1825–64), writer and political organizer; major
figure of German socialism; participant in the 1848–49 revolution;
1849–62, maintained connections with Karl Marx, who broke with him for
being “a worker’s dictator”; 1863, cofounder and president of the ADAV.

LAVROV, PYOTR L. (1823–1900), Russian sociologist and political
journalist; theoretician of the Narodnik movement and reformist
socialism; belonged to the organizations Zemlya i Volya (Land and
Freedom) and Narodnaya Volya (People’s Will; also called People’s
Freedom); member of the First International.

LEDEBOUR, GEORG THEODOR (1850–1947), journalist; Social Democrat;
1890–95, contributor to _Vorwärts_ and, 1895–98, a member of its
editorial staff; 1897–1900, editor of the _Sächsische Arbeiter-Zeitung_
in Dresden; 1900–14, contributor to _Vorwärts_ and other Social
Democratic publications; member of the Reichstag in 1900–18; supported
World War I; 1916, a member of the Executive Committee of the Social
Democratic Working Group; 1917, a cofounder of the USPD, to whose
Central Committee he belonged until March 1919.

LEIBNIZ, GOTTFRIED (1646–1716), pathbreaking mathematician and
philosopher; developed infinitesimal calculus and theory of binary
numbers; leading advocate of rationalism; developed theory of monads;
also made crucial discoveries in physics and biology.

LENBACH, FRANZ VON (1836–1904), painter.

LENE, see Jogiches, Leo.

LENIN, VLADIMIR ILYICH (real last name, Ulyanov) (1870–1924), Russian
revolutionary; from 1903 on, leader of the Bolsheviks; worked closely
with Luxemburg, especially immediately after the 1905 Revolution, though
differing with her on many issues; after Bolshevik Revolution of 1917,
leader of the revolutionary government of Soviet Russia.

LENSCH, PAUL ALBERT (1873–1926), Social Democrat; 1900–02, editor of the
_Freie Presse für Elsass_–_Lothringen_ in Strasbourg; 1902–07,
contributor to _Leipziger Volkszeitung_ and, until 1913, its chief
editor; member of the Reichstag in 1912–18; a proponent of the views of
the German Left until 1914; during World War I, evolved into supporter
of militarism; in the November revolution of 1918, delegate from the
Council of People’s Representatives to the army high command.

LERDA, GIOVANNI (1853–1927), Italian socialist; author of _The Influence
of Christianity on Economics_ (1898).

LESAGE, ALAIN-RENÉ (1668–1747), French novelist and playwright;
satirized the moral failings of the ruling classes of his time.

LEUSS, HANS (1861–1920), German writer; editor of _Welt am Montag_.

LEVASSEUR, PIERRE-EMILE (1828–1911), French economist and geographer;
member of the Académie des Sciences Morales et Politiques.

LEVI, PAUL (1883–1930), lawyer; Social Democrat; participant in the
national conference of leading left-wing Social Democrats in March 1915
in Berlin; an adherent of the International Group (Spartacus Group);
Luxemburg’s lawyer and colleague during World War I; became a leader of
the KPD in 1918, until expelled from it in 1921; publisher of
Luxemburg’s _The Russian Revolution_; returned to SPD in 1920s.

LIEBKNECHT, KARL PAUL AUGUST FRIEDRICH (1871–1919), attorney; Social
Democrat; son of Wilhelm Liebknecht; 1902–13, city councilor in Berlin;
1906, cofounder of the proletarian youth movement in Germany; 1907,
cofounder of the Socialist Youth International and, until 1910, its
president and member of the International Youth Secretariat; 1908–16,
member of the Prussian House of Deputies and, in 1912–18, member of the
Reichstag; a leading representative of the German Left; cofounder of the
International Group (Spartacus Group) and, in 1918, of the Spartacus
League, a member of its central leadership body and co-responsible, with
Luxemburg, for the editing of its publication, _Die Rote Fahne_;
cofounder of the KPD; assassinated on January 15, 1919.

LIEBKNECHT, NATALIE (1835–1909), first wife of Wilhelm Liebknecht.

LIEBKNECHT, ROBERT (1903–94), painter and graphic artist; son of Karl
Liebknecht.

LIEBKNECHT, SOPHIE (nicknames, Sonya, Sonyichka; maiden name, Ryss)
(1884–1964), art historian; second wife of Karl Liebknecht.

LIEBKNECHT, VERA (1906–34), physician; daughter of Karl Liebknecht.

LIEBKNECHT, WILHELM (nickname, Helmi) (1901–75), son of Karl Liebknecht.

LIEBKNECHT, WILHELM PHILIPP MARTIN CHRISTIAN LUDWIG (1826–1900), German
Social Democrat; 1848, participant in the republican uprising in Baden,
after that an émigré, at first in Switzerland and then in England;
member of the Communist League; in 1862, returned to Germany; in 1863,
became a member of the ADAV and, in 1864, a contributor to
_Social-Demokrat_; correspondent for and authorized representative of
the International Workingmen’s Association (First International) in
Germany; 1869, cofounder of the SDAP and editor of _Der Volksstaat_;
1874–1900 (with an interruption in 1887–88), member of the Reichstag;
beginning in 1876, editor and, in 1891 and after, chief editor of the
_Vorwärts_; cofounder of, and leading participant in, the Second
International.

LILIENCRON, DETLEF VON (1844–1909), resigned from service as a Prussian
military officer in 1870; became a teacher and civilian official and in
1885 a freelance writer.

LIMBERTZ, HEINRICH (1874–1932), mine worker; Social Democrat and trade
union leader; 1902–03, workers’ secretary for the SPD in Iserlohn and
1904–07 in Essen; 1907–10, and again, beginning in 1913, editor of the
_Arbeiterzeitung_ in Essen; 1911–13, head of the SPD Bureau for
Rhineland-Westphalia; member of editorial staff of _Volkswacht_.

LINDEMANN, CARL HUGO (1867–1950), writer; economist; Social Democrat;
member of the Reichstag in 1903–06; beginning in 1906, member of the
Württemburg state assembly; contributor to the revisionist publication
_Sozialistische Monatshefte_; strongly supported World War I; 1918–19,
member of the government of Württemburg state.

LIPINSKI, RICHARD ROBERT (1867–1936), Social Democrat; 1894–1901, editor
of the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_; member of the Reichstag in 1903–06;
beginning in 1908, SPD chairman for the Leipzig region; member of the
SPD national committee; beginning in 1917, a member of the USPD and its
chairman for the Leipzig region; in December 1918 and January 1919,
president of the Free State of Saxony.

LÖBE, PAUL GUSTAV EMIL (1875–1967), typesetter; Social Democrat;
1899–1900, editor and, from 1900 to 1920, chief editor of the
_Volkswacht_ in Breslau; held opportunist views; 1904–19, city councilor
in Breslau; 1915–20, member of the Silesian provincial assembly;
strongly supported World War I; beginning in 1917, a member of the
Control Commission of the SPD.

LONGUET, CHARLES (1839–1903), journalist and activist in French
socialist movement; active in 1871 Paris Commune; member of Proudhonist
General Council of the First International, 1866–67 and 1871–72; moved
to England after 1871; married Marx’s oldest daughter, Jenny Longuet, in
1872; editor and publisher of _Journal Officiel_.

LUBBOCK, SIR JOHN, BARON AVEBURY (1834–1913), English naturalist,
banker, and politician; member of the Entomological Society and the
Anthropological Institute; member of Parliament for Maidstone in 1870
and 1874; member of the Unionist Party; Marx commented on his work in
his _Ethnological Notebooks_.

LÜBECK, GUSTAV (b. 1873), typesetter with whom Luxemburg, in Basel,
Switzerland, in 1898, entered into a marriage of convenience so that she
could gain Prussian/German citizenship; the Lübeck family was living in
Switzerland, but the head of the family, Karl Lübeck, the father of
Gustav, was a Prussian citizen; the marriage was officially dissolved in
1903; in 1905, Gustav was expelled from Switzerland as an “anarchist.”

LÜBECK, OLYMPIA (1851–1930), Polish-born friend of Luxemburg and mother
of Gustav Lübeck; in Poland, had connections with the First Proletariat
party; in the 1890s, lived in Switzerland with her elderly husband, Karl
Lübeck.

LÜBECK, ROSALIA, name used by Luxemburg on the basis of her marriage of
convenience to Gustav Lübeck.

LUNACHARSKY, ANATOLY (1875–1933), Russian Marxist and cultural critic;
born in Ukraine, became Marxist in 1890; member of RSDRP; joined
Bolsheviks during the 1903 split with Mensheviks; influenced by ideas of
Fichte and Nietzsche; broke from Bolsheviks in 1908 in support of
Alexander Bogdanov’s position; started school in Capri, Italy (along
with Maxim Gorky) for Russian socialist workers; started Circle for
Proletarian Culture in Paris in 1913; opposed World War I; rejoined
Bolsheviks in July 1917; after Bolshevik Revolution, became Commissar of
Enlightenment (equivalent of Minister of Culture), 1917–29; purged by
Stalin.

LUTHER, MARTIN (1483–1546), founder of Protestantism; religious
reformer; translated Bible into German.

LUXEMBURG, ANNA (1855–1932), Rosa Luxemburg’s sister.

LUXEMBURG, ANNIE (birth and death dates unavailable), daughter of Rosa
Luxemburg’s brother Mikolaj.

LUXEMBURG, ELIASZ (d. 1900), father of Rosa Luxemburg.

LUXEMBURG, JÓZEF (nickname, Józio) (1868–1936), neurologist and doctor
of internal medicine; younger brother of Rosa Luxemburg.

LUXEMBURG, LINA (d. 1897), mother of Rosa Luxemburg.

MACAULAY, THOMAS BABINGTON, BARON OF ROTHLEY (1800–59), English liberal
politician and historian.

MACHIAVELLI, NICCOLÒ (1469–1527), Italian statesman, diplomat, author,
and philosopher; one of the principle founders of modern political
science.

MARA (1886–1964), daughter of Otto Walther and Hope Adams-Lehman, who
were both physicians.

MARAT, JEAN-PAUL (1744–93), French doctor, physicist, and political
journalist; published the newspaper _Ami du Peuple_; a leader of the
Jacobin Club and of “the Mountain” in parliament.

MARCHLEWSKA, BRONISLAWA (1866–1952), bacteriologist; Social Democrat;
member of the Second Proletariat party and the Warsaw organization of
the Union of Polish Workers; emigrated to Switzerland in 1893; studied
at the Polytechnic in Zurich and was active in the group around
Luxemburg; wife of Julian Marchlewski.

MARCHLEWSKI, JULIAN BALTHAZAR (nicknames, Julek, Juleczek) (pseudonyms:
J. Karski, Johannes Kämpfer) (1866–1925), Social Democrat; 1889,
cofounder of the Union of Polish Workers (ZRP); emigrated to Switzerland
in 1893; helped produce the Social Democratic newspaper _Sprawa
Robotnicza_ together with Luxemburg, Leo Jogiches, and Adolf Warski;
1893, cofounder of the SDKP (which in 1900 became the SDKPiL); in 1896,
moved to Germany; in 1898, became a contributor to _Sächsische
Arbeiter-Zeitung_ in Dresden and to _Neue Zeit_; undertook the
editorship of _Przegląd Robotnyczy_ in 1900; in 1902, together with
Alexander Helphand, founded a publishing house in Munich for progressive
international literature; also in 1902, member of the staff of the
_Leipziger Volkszeitung_, where until 1913 he was at times the editor;
belonged to the German Left; in 1913–14, together with Luxemburg and
Franz Mehring, edited _Sozialdemokratische Korrespondenz_; 1915, editor
of _Wirtschaftliche Rundschau_; cofounder of the Spartacus Group;
1916–18, interned in Havelberg; succeeded in reaching Moscow by way of
Petrograd; returned to Berlin in January 1919; husband of Bronislawa
Marchlewska.

MARCHLEWSKI, OSKAR OTTO WILHELM (nickname, Ocik) (1874–1913), active
member of the SDKP; helped with the illegal dissemination of party
literature, but later withdrew from the workers’ movement; brother of
Julian Marchlewski.

MAREK, JAN (1884–1961), prominent figure in the PPS in the
Prussian-occupied part of Poland, active mainly in the mineworkers’
union.

MARTOV, L. (real name, Yuli [Julius] Osipovich Tsederbaum) (other
pseudonym: Ignotus) (1873–1923), Russian Social Democrat; in 1895, took
part, together with Lenin, in organizing the St. Petersburg League of
Struggle for the Emancipation of the Working Class; in 1896, arrested
and sentenced to three years of internal exile; after that, a member of
the editorial board of _Iskra_; after 1903, a leading Menshevik;
1908–11, editor of _Golos Sotsial-Demokrata_ (Voice of the Social
Democrat); took part in the Zimmerwald Conference in 1915 and the
Kienthal Conference in 1916; leader of the left-Mensheviks; after the
Bolshevik Revolution of 1917 in Russia, became a sharp critic of the
regime.

MARX, KARL (1818–83), philosopher, revolutionary, and critic of
capitalism; founder of historical materialism; most renowned as the
author of the _Communist Manifesto_, the _Economic-Philosophic
Manuscripts of 1844_, the _Grundrisse_, and _Capital_.

MATSCHKE, ANNA, Berlin Social Democrat whose name Luxemburg used while
in Warsaw in 1905–06.

MAX VON BADEN, PRINCE (1867–1929), in 1918, briefly chancellor of the
German Reich and president of Prussia.

MEDI, see Urban, Marta.

MEHRING, EVA (d. 1928), wife of Franz Mehring.

MEHRING, FRANZ (1846–1919), German historian, literary scholar, and
political journalist; Social Democrat; 1891–1913, contributor to _Neue
Zeit_; from 1892 until 1895 was head of the association Freie
Volksbühne; 1902–07, chief editor of _Leipziger Volkszeitung_; 1906–11,
instructor in history at the SPD party school in Berlin; a leading
representative of the German Left; in 1913–14, together with Luxemburg
and Julian Marchlewski, edited _Sozialdemokratische Korrespondenz_, and
in April 1915, together with Luxemburg, the first issue of the journal
_Die Internationale_; belonged to the International Group (Spartacus
Group); 1917, member of the Prussian House of Deputies; cofounder of the
Spartacus League and the KPD.

MEISTER (“the Master”), see Faisst, Hugo.

MENDELS, MAURITZ (pseudonym: Ictus) (1868–1944), Dutch poet, lawyer and
writer on Jewish affairs; joined SDAP in 1899; wrote for the party’s
newspaper _De Nieuwe Tijd_; 1906, elected to Utrecht City Council;
member of the Dutch Left, he wrote for _The Tribune_ and became active
in the SDP; 1913, elected to Parliament; rejoined the SDAP after 1920.

MENDELSON, STANISLAW (pseudonyms: Gawrosz, Nadolski, and others)
(1857–1913), political journalist prominent in the Polish and
international workers’ movements; 1875–78, one of the initiators of
illegal socialist groups in Warsaw; from 1878, in Switzerland and
France, one of the leading figures among socialist émigrés; cofounder of
the First Proletariat party and the Second Proletariat, as well as the
publications _Równosc, Przedswit_, and _Walka Klas_; initiator of the
PPS Party Congress in Paris in 1892; 1889, a cofounder of the Second
International; was on friendly terms with Friedrich Engels and with the
French Blanquists; in 1895, broke from the workers’ movement.

MEYER, CONRAD FERDINAND (1825–98), Swiss poet and novelist.

MEYER, ERNST (1887–1930), German journalist and Social Democrat;
1913–15, editor of _Vorwärts_; adherent of the International Group
(Spartacus Group); participant in the Zimmerwald Conference of 1915 and
the Kienthal Conference of 1916; edited the publication
_Spartakusbriefe_ in 1916; in 1918, became head of the press department
of the Soviet Russian embassy in Germany; representative of the
Spartacus Group in the Revolutionary Executive Committee, together with
the Revolutionary Shop Stewards _(Obleute_) in Berlin; in 1918, became a
member of the KPD and of its central leadership.

MEZENTSOV, N. V. (1827–78), tsarist general; head of the security police
in tsarist Russia; assassinated in 1878 by the Narodnik S. M.
Kravchinsky.

MICHAELIS, GEORG (1857–1936), German judge; from July to October 1917
was chancellor of the German Reich and prime minister of Prussia;
1918–19, was _Oberpräsident_ (highest civilian official) of the province
of Pomerania.

MICKIEWICZ, ADAM BERNARD (1795–1853), one of Poland’s most eminent poets
and dramatists; widely regarded as the chief national poet of Poland;
his work was much adored by Luxemburg, despite his advocacy of Polish
independence.

MIETZE, see Wengels, Margarete.

MIGNET, FRANÇOIS-AUGUSTE MARIE (1796–1884), French liberal historian;
became a member of the Académie Française in 1836.

MIL, JOSEF-SZLOMA (pseudonym: John Mill) (1870–1952), in the 1880s, a
prominent figure in the Jewish workers’ movement in Wilno; had contacts
with the Narodniks; 1892–94, lived in Zurich; returned to Wilno in 1894;
1897, one of the founders of the Bund (the General Jewish Workers’ Union
of Lithuania, Poland, and Russia); after fleeing abroad in 1898, he was
a cofounder of the Committee of the Bund Abroad; from 1915 on, he lived
in the United States, where he was politically active.

MILL, JOHN, see Mil, Josef-Szloma.

MILLERAND, ALEXANDRE-ÉTIENNE (1859–1943), leading representative of the
French Independent Socialists; 1899–1902, minister of trade in the
bourgeois cabinet of Waldeck-Rousseau; in 1904, expelled from the French
Socialist Party for participating in bourgeois government.

MINK-MĘKARSKA BOGDANOWICZOWA, PAULA (1840–1901), prominent figure in the
French workers’ movement; worked with the First International and took
part in the Paris Commune.

MIRBACH-HARFF, COUNT WILHELM (1871–1918), German diplomat; 1915–17,
ambassador in Athens; in 1917 and early 1918, in Bucharest; on April 26,
1918, appointed German ambassador to Russia; assassinated in Moscow by
left SRs on July 6, 1918.

MITEK, see Hartmann, Mieczyslaw.

MOLIÈRE (real name, Jean-Baptiste Poquelin) (1622–73), French
playwright, actor, and leader of a troupe of actors; famous for his
comedies.

MOLINARI, GUSTAVE DE (1819–1912), Belgian economist; advocate of free
trade.

MOOR, CARL (1853–1932), Swiss Social Democrat and communist; 1889,
edited _Berner Tagwacht_; delegate to the meeting of the ISB in Brussels
in late July 1914, on the eve of the outbreak of World War I, during
which he supported Luxemburg’s antiwar views; after the February 1917
Russian Revolution, helped make the arrangements for Lenin and other
Russian revolutionaries to travel through Germany in a “sealed” railroad
car; helped raise money for the Bolsheviks after their seizure of power
in October 1917; sometime after 1918 become an agent for the German
government.

MORAWSKI, ALFONS (pseudonym: Koczan) (1868–1941), one of the initiators
and leading figures of the Lithuanian Social Democratic movement in
Wilno in the first half of the 1890s; emigrated to Zurich at the end of
the 1890s; later withdrew from the workers’ movement.

MORAWSKI, FRANCISZEK (1847–1906), carpenter; active in both the Polish
and the German workers’ movements; in 1891, became secretary of the
Alliance of Polish Socialists in Berlin; 1893–1901, cofounder of the PPS
in the Prussian-occupied part of Poland, becoming a member of its
executive body in 1905; a representative of the left-wing tendency in
the PPS; editor of _Gazeta Robotnicza_.

MORGENSTERN, GUSTAV (1867–1947), writer; Social Democrat; 1898–99,
editor of the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_ and, in 1900–02, of the
_Sächsische Arbeiter-Zeitung_ in Dresden, returning to the _Leipziger
Volkszeitung_ in 1902; 1917–18, editor of the SPD journal _Freie Presse_
in Leipzig.

MÖRIKE, EDUARD (1804–75), clergyman; poet; 1851–66, instructor in
literature at Stuttgart.

MORIZET, ANDRÉ (1876–1942), French socialist; assistant librarian at the
Ministry of Justice, he was dismissed from that position in 1907 because
of his socialist views; became editor of _l’Humanité_; as an ardent
anti-militarist, he co-authored with Karl Liebknecht a statement of
protest entitled “Against the International Arms Industry”; in 1919, was
elected mayor of Boulogne-Billancourt (Seine), an industrial suburb of
Paris.

MOSZORO, RUDOLF (1879–1911), member of the PPSD, to whose left wing he
belonged; he was active mainly in Kraków; in his political views, he was
close to the SDKPiL; beginning in March 1905, he signed his name as the
legally responsible editor and publisher for the SDKPiL publications
_Czerwony Sztandar_ and _Z pola walki_.

MOZART, WOLFGANG AMADEUS (1756–91), composer.

MÜLLER, MARGARETE (birth and death dates unavailable), sister of Hans
Diefenbach.

MÜNZENBERG, WILHELM (nickname, Willi) (1889–1940), worker; Social
Democrat; moved from Germany to Switzerland in 1910; joined the Zurich
group of the Swiss socialist youth organization; in 1912, became a
member of the central leadership body of the youth organization and
editor of its monthly publication, _Die Freie Jugend_; 1914–18, national
secretary of the Swiss socialist youth organization; participant in the
International Socialist Youth Conference in Bern in 1915 and the
International Socialist Conference in Kienthal in 1916; expelled from
Switzerland in 1918; joined the Spartacus Group; in 1919, became a
member of the KPD.

MUSSOLINI, BENITO (1883–1945), Italian Fascist politician; initially a
socialist and, briefly, a schoolteacher; 1911, chief editor of _Avanti!_
in Milan; in November 1914, expelled from the Italian Socialist Party
for his fervent support for Italian entry into World War I on the side
of the Entente.

NACHIMSON, M. I. (pseudonyms: Spectator, Sp., Politicus) (1880–1938),
Russian economist and political journalist; in 1889, became a member of
the Bund (General Union of Jewish Workers of Lithuania, Poland, and
Russia); supported World War I.

NETTELBECK, JOACHIM (1738–1824), seaman; in 1782, began work as a brewer
and distiller; Prussian patriot; in 1806, opposed the surrender of the
city of Kolberg to French forces and as “city adjutant” under the
command of Neidhardt von Gneisenau led the defense of the city until the
end of the war in 1807.

NEXÖ, see Andersen Nexö, Martin.

NIEMOJEWSKI, ANDREJ (1864–1921), Polish poet and nationalist; supported
democratic positions in the 1905 Revolution but evolved into a vicious
anti-Semite shortly afterwards; part of tendency known as Polish
“progressive” anti-Semitism which argued for discrimination against Jews
as consistent with aims of the workers’ movement.

NIEUWENHUIS, FERDINAND DOMELA (1846–1919), Dutch socialist and
anarchist; cofounder of the Social Democratic Workers’ Party of the
Netherlands; 1881–91, a deputy in Parliament; in 1881, corresponded with
Marx; in the 1890s, a proponent of anarchist views; 1914–18, leader of
the pacifist movement in the Netherlands.

NITZSCHE, AUGUST EMIL (1869–1931), metalworker; Social Democrat; in
1897, became editor of the _Sächsische Arbeiter-Zeitung_ in Dresden
(which in 1908 became the _Dresdner Volkszeitung_); 1913–14, member of
the state assembly of Saxony; 1919, finance minister of Saxony.

NOSKOV, VLADIMIR ALEKSANDROVICH (pseudonyms: Boris, Gleb, Boris
Nikolaevich Yefimov, and others) (1878–1913), arrested and sent into
internal exile for taking part in the revolutionary activity of the St.
Petersburg League of Struggle for the Emancipation of the Working Class;
emigrated from Russia in 1902; at the 1903 congress of the RSDRP, sided
with the Bolsheviks and was elected to the Central Committee; was active
in underground work in Kiev, Yaroslavl, and elsewhere; after 1907,
withdrew from political activity.

OBUCH, GERHARD (1884–1960), lawyer; in 1906, became a Social Democrat;
after 1914, opposed voting for war credits; in 1917, became a member of
the USPD.

OLSZEWSKI, WLADYSLAW (pseudonym: Wladek) (1863–1922), metalworker;
member of the Second Proletariat party and cofounder of the SDKP;
arrested in 1894; emigrated after his release and, until 1899, lived in
Switzerland, Germany, and France; worked in the leadership of the Union
of Social Democrats from the Kingdom of Poland Abroad; after 1904, no
longer politically active.

OPPLER, HEINRICH (birth and death dates unavailable), physician;
professor in Berlin.

OWEN, ROBERT (1771–1858), English utopian socialist who was highly
regarded by Marx; pioneered concept of using “labor tokens” instead of
money which Marx discusses in numerous places in his work.

PAASCHE, HANS (1881–1920), naval officer who resigned and became a
fighter against imperialist war; 1918, member of the Executive Council
of Workers’ and Peasants’ Councils; murdered by Noske’s troops on May
20, 1920.

PAASCHE, HERMANN (1851–1925), professor of political economy; member of
the Reichstag in 1881–84 and 1893–1918; member of the Prussian House of
Deputies in 1893–1908; leader of the National Liberal Party; after 1918,
joined the German People’s Party.

PALM, ADOLF (birth and death dates unavailable), constable for criminal
cases (_Kriminalschutzmann_) in Berlin.

PANNEKOEK, ANTON (1873–1960), Dutch astronomer; became a Social Democrat
in the 1890s; one of the first to attack Bernstein for revisionism, in
1898; 1907, one of the founders of the newspaper _De Tribune_, organ of
the left wing of the Dutch Social Democratic Workers’ Party; leading
figure in Second International; a sharp critic of imperialism and
Kautsky’s centrism; during World War I, which he strongly opposed, took
part in editing _Vorbote_, publication of the Zimmerwald Left; important
left-wing critic of Bolsheviks, emphasized “council communism” based on
direct proletarian rule through workers’ councils.

PARVUS, see Helphand, Alexander L.

PASCIN (real name, Julius Pincas) (1885–1930), Bulgarian-American
painter, graphic artist, and illustrator.

PERFALL, ANTON FREIHERR VON (1853–1912), German storyteller and writer;
many of his stories depict rural conditions in Bavaria.

PERLMUTTER, SALOME (birth and death dates unavailable); Russian Social
Democrat who took internationalist positions.

PËUS, HEINRICH (1862–1937), Social Democrat; beginning in 1891, an
editor at the _Volksblatt für Anhalt_ in Dessau; member of the Reichstag
in 1896–98, 1900–06, and 1912–18; editor of the Wendish or
Sorbian-language publication _Internaciona Socialisto_ in Ido; 1902–08,
member of the Anhalt state assembly.

PFANNKUCH, WILHELM (1841–1923), carpenter; Social Democrat; in 1863
became a member of the ADAV; member of the Reichstag in 1884–87,
1898–1906, and 1912–18; 1893, cofounder of the German Woodworkers’
Union; in 1894, became a member of the SPD Executive and, in 1917,
became secretary of the Executive; from 1900 on, a city councilor in
Berlin; supported World War I.

PFEMFERT, FRANZ (pseudonym: H. Gaday, Dr. S. Pulvermacher, August Stech)
(1879–1934), author, literary critic, political journalist, publisher;
in 1911, became editor of _Die Aktion_.

PHILIPPI (birth and death dates unavailable), woman singer.

PHILIPS, FRANZ (1868–1942), editor of the journal _Neuland_ in Berlin in
1897–98.

PIECK, FRIEDRICH WILHELM REINHOLD (1876–1960), carpenter; Social
Democrat; 1899, municipal district chairman of the SPD in Bremen;
1906–10, secretary of the SPD in Bremen and chairman of its
cultural-educational committee; in April 1910, became second secretary
of the SPD’s central educational committee and secretary of its party
school in Berlin; cofounder of the International Group (Spartacus
Group); called up for military service in 1915; in 1917 went
underground; in February 1918, collaborated on the editing of _Der
Kampf_; at the end of October 1918, member of the Revolutionary
Executive Committee in Berlin, and in November 1918 member of the
central leadership body of the Spartacus League; cofounder of the KPD.

PIUS X (GIUSEPPE SARTO) (1835–1914), became Pope in 1903.

PLATEN-HALLERMÜNDE, AUGUST, GRAF VON (COUNT OF) (1796–1835), German
poet; 1810–14, in service to the king of Bavaria; in 1826, went to Italy
to live as an exile because of the oppressively provincial attitudes in
the petty states of Germany.

PLATTEN, FRIEDRICH (FRITZ) (1883–1942), member of the Social Democratic
Party of Switzerland, becoming secretary of its Executive in 1912;
joined the Zimmerwald Left; in 1917, helped organize Lenin’s trip
through Germany in a “sealed” railroad car.

PLATTER, JULIUS (1844–1923), Swiss conservative economist who wrote a
review of Volume III of Marx’s _Capital_ in _Schweizerische Blätter für
Wirtschafts und Sozialpolitik_; professor of Staatswissenschaft in
Zurich.

PLEKHANOV, GEORGY V. (pseudonyms: N. Beltov, G. V., A. Volgin)
(1856–1918), one of the first Marxists in Russia; author of numerous
theoretical works; in 1880, left Russia to live in exile in Switzerland;
1883, founder of the Emancipation of Labor group; 1900, cofounder and
co-editor of the newspaper _Iskra_ and the journal _Zarya_; generally
hostile to Leo Jogiches and Luxemburg from their earliest encounters;
after 1903, a Menshevik; sharply opposed Luxemburg at the 1907 London
Congress of RSDRP; supported World War I; after the February Revolution
of 1917, returned to Russia; supported the Provisional Government;
strongly opposed the Bolshevik Revolution of 1917.

POKORNY, FRANZ (1874–1923), German mine worker and Social Democrat;
1897–1906, secretary of the Mine Workers’ Union and editor of the
_Bergarbeiterzeitung_; in 1918, became an editor on the SPD Bureau for
Rhineland-Westphalia.

POPE, see Pius X.

POSNANSKI, J. (birth and death dates unavailable), economist; author of
an 1880 book on the productive forces of the Kingdom of Poland.

POTRESOV, ALEKSANDR NIKOLAEVICH (pseudonym: Starover) (1869–1934), in
the 1890s, joined the ranks of Russian Marxists; belonged to the St.
Petersburg League of Struggle for the Emancipation of the Working Class;
emigrated in 1900 and took part in the founding of _Iskra_ and _Zarya_;
after the 1903 congress of the RSDRP, a leading Menshevik; emigrated
from Russia after the October 1917 revolution.

PUYT, E. DE (birth and death dates unavailable), secretary of Camille
Huysmans.

RADUIN, IDA (birth and death dates unavailable), Luxemburg’s domestic
helper.

RADWAŃSKI, TADEUSZ (1884–1960), political journalist; in 1900, became a
member of the SDKPiL; 1904–05, editorial secretary of _Glos_.

RAPPOPORT, CHARLES LÉON (pseudonyms: Arnold, Chanon, Felix) (1865–1941),
French political journalist and socialist; in 1901, became head of the
Russian library in Paris; member of the Socialist Party of France and
the SFIO; 1918, cofounder of the École socialiste marxiste (Marxist
Socialist School).

RATYŃSKI, KAZIMIERZ (pseudonyms [or nicknames]: Kaz, Kazius, Kaziuta)
(1874–1904), in 1893, helped organize the first party congress of the
SDKP, in Switzerland; arrested in 1894 and banished to Siberia, where he
died.

REICH CHANCELLOR, see Max von Baden, Prince.

REIFF, ADOLF (1831–1902), Polish printer in Paris, whose print shop,
among other things, produced _Sprawa Robotnicza_.

RENAUDEL, PIERRE (1871–1935), one of the leaders of the SFIO; editor of
_Le Peuple_ and member of the editorial board of _La vie socialiste_;
after the death of Jaurès, took over as chief editor of _l’Humanité_
until 1918; 1914–18, a member of the French Chamber of Deputies.

REXHÄUSER, LUDWIG (1863–1914), German Social Democrat and trade union
functionary; 1896–1910, editor of _Korrespondenz für Deutschlands
Buchdrucker und Schriftgiesser_; a proponent of reformist views who
denied the need for revolutionary class struggle; expelled from the SPD.

RIPPER, ALEXANDER (birth and death dates unavailable), printer in the
print shop of Wladyslaw Teodorczuk in Kraków.

ROBESPIERRE, MAXIMILIEN FRANÇOIS MARIE ISIDORE DE (1758–1794), French
statesman; one of the most prominent figures in the French Revolution;
elected to the States-General in 1789; as leader of the Jacobins and at
the head of the Committee for Public Safety, presided over reign of
terror.

RODBERTUS-JAGETZOW, JOHANN KARL (1805–75), German economist and
politician; opposed the political struggle of the workers’ movement,
advocating instead the idea of “state socialism.”

ROLAND HOLST-VAN DER SCHALK, HENRIETTE (1869–1952), Dutch writer and
socialist; active in the proletarian women’s movement; radical leftist;
broke from Second International and Dutch Social-Democratic Party in
1909 because of its reformism; became leading advocate of revolutionary
ideas during World War I; took part in the editing of the theoretical
organ of the Zimmerwald Left, _Vorbote_; in 1918, became a member of the
Communist Party of Holland.

ROLLAND, ROMAIN (1866–1944), French writer; 1903–12, professor of the
history of music at the Sorbonne in Paris; lived in Switzerland during
World War I.

ROSCHER, WILHELM GEORG FRIEDRICH (1817–94), German economist; founder of
the historical school of economics in Germany; argued against utopian
socialism and classical political economy; denied the existence of
universal economic laws.

ROSENBAUM, MARTA (1869 or 1870–1940), Social Democrat; in 1917, became a
member of the USPD.

ROSENBAUM (first name not available; birth and death dates unavailable),
musician; husband of Marta Rosenbaum.

ROSENFELD, KURT (1877–1943), lawyer; Social Democrat; 1906–10,
instructor in civil law at the SPD party school in Berlin; in 1910,
became a city council member in Berlin; in 1917, became a member of the
USPD.

RÓZGA, MACIEJ, pseudonym of Rosa Luxemburg.

RUBEN, REGINA (1858–?), teacher and writer active in the proletarian
women’s movement.

RÜCK, FRITZ (pseudonym: Juvenis) (1895–1959), typesetter; Social
Democrat; during World War I, belonged to the International Group
(Spartacus Group); in 1917, became a member of the USPD; chairman of the
Workers’ Council in Stuttgart; founding member of the KPD.

RÜHLE, KARL HEINRICH OTTO (1874–1943), teacher; editor of Social
Democratic papers; in 1907–13, toured as a lecturer for the SPD; member
of the Reichstag, 1912–18; in 1915–16, together with Karl Liebknecht,
voted against war credits; took part in the national conference of left
Social Democrats in 1915 and the national conference of the
International Group in 1916 in Berlin; 1918, chairman of the
Revolutionary Workers’ and Soldiers’Council of Greater Dresden. Became
left-wing critic of Bolsheviks and Third International after 1919.

RYAZANOV, D. B. (real name, D. B. Goldendach) (pseudonyms: Bukvoyed,
Pariser) (1870–1938), active in the Russian workers’ movement since
1889; in 1900, left Russia and lived as an émigré; contributed to _Neue
Zeit_; worked with the Menshevik newspapers _Golos_ and _Nashe Slovo_;
in 1917, joined the Bolshevik party; became leading archivist of Russian
Marxism; discovered Marx’s _1844 Manuscripts_ and other writings by
Marx; killed by Stalin.

RYAZANOV, N., see Ryazanov, D. B.

SAINT-SIMON, CLAUDE-HENRI DE ROUVROY, COMTE DE (1760–1825), French
utopian socialist and philosopher; heralded science and industry as
promoting inevitable social progress.

SALMANOFF (birth and death dates unavailable), a physician in Stuttgart.

SAPPHO (ca. 600 B.C.), Greek lyric poetess whose poems focused on
passion and love; considered by the Greeks one of the nine lyric poets.

SARRAUTE, MAURICE (b. 1869), French socialist and political journalist;
contributor to _Revue socialiste_; later a supporter of Jules Guesde,
and then a ministerialist; member of the French Socialist Party.

SARUDNAJA, see Zarudnaya-Cavos, Yekaterina.

SARUDNY, see Zarudny, S. I.

SCHEIB, JOHANNES (birth and death dates unavailable), Social Democrat in
Leipzig.

SCHEIDEMANN, PHILIP (1865–1939), typesetter; Social Democrat; 1900–02,
editor at the _Fränkische Tagespost_ in Nuremberg, at the _Offenbacher
Abendblatt_ in 1902–05, and chief editor of the _Casseler Volksblatt_ in
1905–11; member of the Reichstag in 1903–18; beginning in 1911, a member
of the SPD Executive and, beginning in 1913, of its central
cultural-educational committee; a leading representative of reformism
and, during World War I, an arch-militarist; 1917–18, cochairman of the
SPD, with Friedrich Ebert; at the beginning of October 1918, entered the
government of Prince Max von Baden; in November 1918, became a member of
the Council of People’s Delegates; contributed substantially to the
suppression of the revolution of 1918–19 in Germany.

SCHEWITSCH, SERGE (d. 1911), Russian émigré of noble birth; admirer of
Lassalle; in New York City, worked for the _New York World_ and the Sun;
edited the Sunday supplement of the _New Yorker Volkszeitung_; in 1890,
returned to Europe.

SCHILLER, FRIEDRICH VON (1759–1805), poet and aesthetician; a
representative of German classical literature; had major impact on
German romanticism.

SCHIPPEL, MAX (pseudonym: Isegrim) (1859–1928), German economist; Social
Democrat; member of the Reichstag in 1890–1905; a leading representative
of revisionism; began contributing to _Sozialistische Monatshefte_, in
1897; 1911–19, leader of the sociopolitical department of the General
Commission of the German trade unions; fervent supporter of World War I.

SCHLAF, JOHANNES (1862–1941), dramatist and translator; one of the
leaders of the naturalist school.

SCHMIDT, ALBERT (1858–1904), German Social Democrat; member of the
Reichstag in 1890–98 and 1903–04; editor of _Volksstimme_ in Magdeburg.

SCHMOLLER, GUSTAV (1838–1917), economist, historian, and “social”
politician; representative of the “socialism of the Academy”
(_Kathedersozialismus_); 1890–1917, chairman of the Association for
Social Improvement.

SCHMUILOW, see Shmuilov, V. I.

SCHOENLANK, BRUNO (1859–1901), journalist; Social Democrat; 1893–1901,
member of the Reichstag; 1894–1901, chief editor of _Leipziger
Volkszeitung_.

SCHOLTYSEK, FRANCISZEK (birth and death dates unavailable), treasurer
for the PPS in the Prussian-occupied part of Poland; chairman of the
Union of Mine Workers in Rybnik.

SCHRÖDER, WILHELM (1861–1913), writer; Social Democrat; until 1905,
editor of _Vorwärts_, and after that published his own information
bulletin, or newsletter; regular contributor to _Sozialistische
Monatshefte_; editor of the SPD’s publication _Sozialdemokratische
Partei-Correpondenz_; 1905–07, collaborator on the socialist weekly
_Neue Gesellschaft_.

SCHUBERT, FRANZ (1797–1828), Austrian composer.

SCHÜLLER, RICHARD (1871–1959), part of the Austrian school of
neoclassical economics.

SCHULZ, AUGUST HEINRICH (pseudonym: Ernst Almsloh) (1872–1932), public
school teacher; Social Democrat; leader of Social Democratic policy on
schools, education, and culture; 1897–1906, editor on the staffs of
Social Democratic newspapers in Erfurt, Magdeburg, and Bremen; 1906–19,
managing director of the SPD’s Central Cultural Committee; 1906–14,
instructor in newspaper work at the SPD party school in Berlin; 1912–18,
member of the Reichstag; for a time, defended the views of the German
Left, but supported World War I.

SCHULZ, WILHELM AUGUST PAUL (1870–?), bricklayer; Social Democrat; trade
union secretary; 1903–19, member of the “agitation commission” of the
SPD in the province of Poznań; 1914–19, chief accountant for public
welfare and social services in Bromberg.

SCHULZE-DELITSCH, FRANZ HERMANN (1808–83), economist and politician;
cofounder of the German Party of Progress (_Fortschrittspartei_); member
of the Association for Social Betterment; founder of the German
Cooperative System.

SCHULZE-GÄVERNITZ, GERHART VON (1864–1943), bourgeois “national”
economist; 1912–20, member of the Reichstag; member of the People’s
Progressive Party.

SEELEY, SIR JOHN ROBERT (1834–95), British historian; in 1869, became
Professor of Modern History at Cambridge University.

SEGANTINI, GIOVANNI (1858–99), Italian painter.

SEIDEL, ALFRED EMIL (1882–1965), teacher; son of Robert Seidel.

SEIDEL, KURT (1879–1952), engineer; son of Robert Seidel.

SEIDEL, MATHILDE ELISE (1853–1924), wife of Robert Seidel.

SEIDEL, ROBERT (1850–1933), teacher and journalist; Social Democrat;
moved from Saxony to Switzerland; in 1876, became a member of the Grütli
Verein, a radical political union of workers; 1890–98, editor of the
_Arbeiterstimme_ in Zurich; 1898, cofounder and editor of the
_Volksrecht_ in Zurich; beginning in 1898, high school teacher in
Zurich; 1898–1916, elected representative in the greater city council of
Zurich; beginning in 1899, editor of the _Grütli-Kalender_; beginning in
1905, adjunct lecturer on pedagogy at the Polytechnic in Zurich and from
1908 on at the University of Zurich; 1911–17, elected representative to
the Swiss National Council in Bern.

SERVY, VICTOR (birth and death dates unavailable), Belgian socialist;
secretary of the ISB, 1900–04.

SHAKESPEARE, WILLIAM (1564–1616), English playwright and poet.

SHAW, GEORGE BERNARD (1856–1950), Irish-English playwright; also an
essayist and author of sociological works; beginning in 1884, a leading
member of the Fabian Society.

SHMUILOV, V. I. (1864–?), Russian Social Democrat; emigrated to Germany
in 1887; 1892–93, contributor to the _Sächsische Arbeiter-Zeitung_ in
Dresden; had ties with the Russian Marxists in the Emancipation of Labor
group; husband of Ria Shmuilova-Claassen.

SHMUILOVA, see Shmuilova-Claassen, Ria.

SHMUILOVA-CLAASSEN, RIA (1870–?), literary critic; contributor to
_Sozialistische Monatshefte_; wife of V. I. Shmuilov.

SIBER, N. I., see Ziber, N. I.

SIGG, JOHANN (1874–1939), Swiss journalist; Social Democrat; in 1902–04,
was part of the administration of the _Volksrecht_ in Zurich, and of its
editorial board in 1907–15; joined the Anti-Militarist League in 1906;
in 1901–06 and 1909–16, a member of the Greater City Council of Zurich;
in 1905–06 and 1908–14, was part of the Cantonal Council of Zurich; in
1911–16, was on the National Council.

SINGER, PAUL (1844–1911), Social Democrat; became a member of the SDAP
in 1869; 1883–1911, city councilor in Berlin; in 1886, became a member
of the SPD Executive and, in 1890, one of the cochairmen of the SPD;
opposed to aspects of revisionism but far more opposed to the
semi-anarchist views of “the Young Ones” _(die Junge_) who were expelled
from the SPD in 1895; became a member of the ISB in 1900.

SISMONDI, JEAN CHARLES LÉONARD DE (1773–1842), major economic theorist,
born in Switzerland; represents one of the founding figures of
underconsumptionist theory in economics; his _Nouveaux principes
d’économie politique_ (1819) took issue with Smith and Ricardo for
presuming that business cycles lead to economic equilibrium and full
employment.

SNEEVLIET, HENK (1883–1942), Dutch revolutionary socialist and
communist; railway worker; joined SDAP in 1900; became leader of railway
union; member of left-wing current of SDAP; a fervent internationalist,
he lived in Indonesia from 1913 to 1918, where he became active in the
anti-colonial movement against Dutch rule and cofounded the Indies
Social Democratic Association, which comprised both Dutch and native
Indonesian members; left SDAP for SDP in 1916; supported the Bolshevik
Revolution in 1917; returned to the Netherlands in 1918 and organized
the 1920 transport strike; in 1920, represented the Communist Party of
Indonesia at Second Congress of Third International in Moscow; in 1921,
helped found Communist Party of China; in 1927, broke from the Third
International and joined the anti-Stalinist International Communist
League; killed by Nazis while organizing resistance to the German
occupation of the Netherlands.

SOLOMON (d. 926 B.C.), King of Israel.

STADTHAGEN, ARTHUR (1857–1917), lawyer; Social Democrat; 1889–1917, city
councilor in Berlin; 1890–1917, member of the Reichstag; 1893–1916,
contributor to and editor of the _Vorwärts_; before World War I,
defended the views of the German Left; after 1914, adhered to the
centrist forces; in 1917, became a member of the USPD.

STASIA, nickname of Stanislawa Bietkiewicz, a Polish acquaintance of
Luxemburg and Jogiches, and of Jan Bielecki.

STEIN, CHARLOTTE VON (1742–1827), friend of Goethe’s.

STEIN, LORENZ VON (1815–1890), economist, instructor in jurisprudence
and political science, sociologist, and political journalist; 1855–85,
professor in Vienna; wrote one of earliest works on socialism and
communist movements in Europe, in early 1840s; his work was studied and
critiqued by Marx.

STEPNIAK, see Kravchinsky, S. M.

STOECKER, WALTER (1891–1939), Social Democrat; in 1908, became a leading
figure in the socialist workers’ youth movement in Cologne; 1911–12, on
the editorial staff of the _Schleswig-Holsteinische Volks-Zeitung_ in
Kiel; until 1913, was the local editor of the _Rheinische Zeitung_ in
Cologne; in 1914, took up residence in Zurich; in 1917, became a member
of the USPD and was aligned with the left-wing forces in that party.

STRAUSS, DAVID FRIEDRICH (1808–74), evangelical theologian and
philosopher; a Young Hegelian; criticized the dogmas of Christianity and
countered the traditional interpretation of Christian scripture in his
influential _Life of Jesus_; after 1866, an adherent of neo-liberalism.

STRÖBEL, HEINRICH (1869–1944), German writer; Social Democrat;
1893–1900, editor of the _Schleswig-Holsteinische Volks-Zeitung_ and, in
1900–16, of _Vorwärts_; defended the views of the German Left for a
while, but during World War I, adhered to centrist views; in 1917,
became a member of the USPD; from November 1918 to January 1919,
chairman of the cabinet of the Prussian Provisional Government.

STUBBE, HEINRICH (1864–1941), carpenter; Social Democrat; in 1907,
became chairman of the Hamburg organization of the SPD; 1911–13, member
of the SPD’s Control Commission; 1915–18, member of the Reichstag.

SÜDEKUM, ALBERT OSKAR WILHELM (1871–1944), German Social Democrat;
editor of _Vorwärts_ in 1895–96, of _Leipziger Volkszeitung_ in 1896–98,
of _Fränkische Tagespost_ in Nuremberg in 1898–1900, and chief editor of
_Sächsische Arbeiter-Zeitung_ in Dresden in 1900–03; member of the
Reichstag in 1900–18; in 1900, became the editor of _Kommunale Praxis_;
was a leading representative of revisionism and supported World War I;
in 1918, as a member of the German-Ukrainian Company, had a decisive
role in the plundering of Ukraine.

SÜSSHEIM, MAX (1876–1933), Social Democrat; member of the Bavarian state
assembly.

SVYATLOVSKY, V. V. (1851–1901), Russian army doctor; after 1884, a
factory inspector in Kharkov and Warsaw; wrote works on factory labor.

SYBEL, HEINRICH VON (1817–95), historian and politician; in 1859,
founded the _Historische Zeitschrift_; in 1875, became director of the
Prussian state archives.

TASSO, TORQUATO (1544–95), Italian poet of the late Renaissance.

TENIERS, DAVID D. J. (THE YOUNGER) (1610–90), Flemish painter; director
of the Bildgalerie in Brussels.

TEODORCZUK, WLADYSLAW (birth and death dates unavailable), proprietor of
a print shop in Kraków; printed publications of both the SDKPiL and the
PPS.

THALHEIMER, AUGUST (1884–1948), German Social Democrat; 1909–12, head of
the _Freie Volkszeitung_ in Göppingen and, in 1914–16, of the
_Volksfreund_ in Braunschweig; belonged to the International Group
(Spartacus Group); 1918, cofounder of the Spartacus League and the KPD;
became a leading figure in the KPD and later of the anti-Stalinist
Communist Party Opposition (KPO); brother of Berta Thalheimer.

THALHEIMER, BERTA (1883–1959), German Social Democrat; belonged to the
International Group (Spartacus Group); took part in the socialist
antiwar conferences in Zimmerwald in 1915 and Kienthal in 1916; in 1918,
became a member of the KPD and the KPO; sister of August Thalheimer.

THOMA, HANS (1839–1924), realistic painter and graphic artist.

THOMAS, ALBERT ARISTIDE (1878–1932), French politician; syndicalist;
member of the SFIO; strongly supported World War I.

THÖNY, EDUARD (1866–1950), Austrian artist, noted for his drawings as
well as his paintings; a contributor to _Simplicissimus_ beginning in
1896.

THORNTON, WILLIAM THOMAS (1813–80), English economist; 1858–80,
secretary for public works in the India office; author of
_Over-population and its Remedy_ (1846), in which he put forward a plan
for colonizing Irish wastelands by Irish peasants; also author of _A
Plea for Peasant Proprietors_ (1848) and _On Labour_ (1869).

TJUTRJUMOWA, see Tyutryumova-Abramovich, R. A.

TOCQUEVILLE, ALEXIS CHARLES DE (1805–59), French historian and
politician; author of highly influential _Democracy in America_;
conservative politician; 1841, became a member of the Académie
Française; 1849–51, Foreign Minister.

TOLSTOY, LEO (full Russian name, Lev Nikolaevich Tolstoy) (1828–1910),
Russian writer of the realist school; pacifist and social reformer;
influential among generations of Russian writers and activists; author
of _War and Peace_.

TROELSTRA, PIETER JELLES (1860–1930), Dutch socialist; 1894, one of the
founders and leaders of the Dutch Social Democratic Workers’ Party;
member of the ISB; supported World War I.

TROELSTRA, SJOUKJE (1860–1939), Dutch socialist; author of children’s
books; wife of Pieter Jelles Troelstra.

TROTHA, LOTHAR VON (1848–1920), in 1900, as leader of a brigade, took
part in the suppression of the Boxer Rebellion in China; in 1904–05, led
the genocidal campaign against the Hereros and Nama in Southwest Africa;
extreme German nationalist, after World War I was a leader of the racist
Thule Society.

TRUSIEWICZ, STANISLAW (pseudonym: Kazimierz Zalewski) (1870–1918),
prominent figure in the Second Proletariat party; many times arrested
and sent into internal exile; in 1891–97, lived abroad as an émigré;
1897, co-organizer of the Union of Workers of Lithuania; 1900, cofounder
of the SDKPiL and in 1900–01 part of its leadership; editor of the
_Przegląd Robotnyczy_; after 1908, leader of a separate grouping that
published the journal _Solidarność Robotnicza_; after the February
Revolution in Russia in 1917, joined the Bolsheviks.

TUGAN-BARANOVSKY, M. I. (1865–1919), Russian economist, a representative
of “legal Marxism”; criticized extensively in Luxemburg’s _Accumulation
of Capital_; became a leading opponent of Bolsheviks in Ukraine after
the Bolshevik Revolution of 1917 in Russia.

TURNER, JOSEPH MALLORD WILLIAM (1775–1851), English painter; in 1808,
was a professor at the Royal Academy.

TYUTRYUMOVA-ABRAMOVICH, R. A. (1865–1920), Russian revolutionary;
arrested amid student protests in St. Petersburg in 1886 and emigrated
in 1887; in 1892, joined the Social Democrats; in 1897, returned to
Russia; sentenced to five years of internal exile in Eastern Siberia; in
1905, joined the Bolsheviks.

UNFRIED, EMIL (1892–1949), mechanic; in 1912, joined SPD; a soldier in
World War I, where he encountered and became a member of the Spartacus
League; 1918, member of the Executive Committee of the Workers’ Council
in Stuttgart; delegate to the national congress of workers’ councils in
Berlin; joined KPD in January 1919.

URBACH, IGNACY (pseudonym: Jacques Rivière) (birth and death dates
unavailable), Polish émigré in Paris; had ties with the PPS; in 1895,
came closer to the SDKP; worked for the French socialist press under his
pseudonym.

URBAN, MARTA (nickname, Medi) (1894–1963), later wife of Hans Kautsky,
Jr.

VAILLANT, MARIE-EDUARD (1840–1915), French engineer and physician;
Blanquist; member of the General Council of the First International, and
of the Paris Commune; leader of the Blanquist Revolutionary Central
Committee; later, one of the leaders of the Socialist Party of France;
between 1893 and 1914, many times elected to the Chamber of Deputies.

VANDERVELDE, ÉMILE (1866–1938), Belgian socialist and lawyer; member of
the Workers’ Party of Belgium in 1886; initially strongly influenced by
Jules Guesde; 1894, member of Belgian parliament; supported World War I;
1918–21 president of the International Socialist Bureau (ISB); 1925–27,
Minister of Foreign Affairs.

VOGTHERR, EWALD (1859–1923), merchant; Social Democrat; 1890–97, city
councilor in Berlin; member of the Reichstag in 1881–87 and 1912–18;
1916, belonged to the Social Democratic Working Group; in 1917, became a
member of the USPD.

VOLGIN, see Plekhanov, Georgy V.

VOLLMAR, GEORG HEINRICH VON (1850–1922), officer and journalist; Social
Democrat; member of the Reichstag in 1881–1887 and 1890–1918; member of
the Bavarian state assembly; in the course of the 1890s became one of
the most influential revisionists; archmilitarist, supported World War
I.

WAGNER, RICHARD (pseud.: Homo) (1868–1927), postal worker; Social
Democrat; 1903–1905, editor of the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_ in
1903–1905, of the _Norddeutscher Volksblatt_ in Bant in 1905–1908, and
of the _Volksfreund_ in Braunschweig, beginning in 1908; during World
War I, a social chauvinist.

WALECKI, see Horwitz, Maksymilian Henryk.

WALLENSTEIN, ALBRECHT WENZEL EUSEBIUS VON (1583–1634), a German general
who, during the Thirty Years’ War, while in the service of the Austrian
emperor, fought against foreign invaders of German lands; considered an
early advocate of German unification.

WALLFISCH, HERMANN (b. 1862), Social Democrat; from 1891, managing
director of the _Sächsische Arbeiter-Zeitung_ in Dresden (which in 1908
became the _Dresdner Volkszeitung_).

WARSKA, JADWIGA (nickname, Jadzia; real last name, Warszawski)
(1868–1928), Luxemburg’s school friend; member of the Second Proletariat
party and the SDKPiL; wife of Adolf Warski.

WARSKI, ADOLF JERZY (real last name, Warszawski) (pseudonyms:
Michalkowski, Jan z Czerniakowskiej) (1868–1937), member of the First
Proletariat party; cofounder of the Union of Polish Workers and the
SDKPiL; in 1892–96, lived as an émigré in France and then, in 1896–1904,
in Germany; in 1890–96, worked on _Sprawa Robotnicza_, in 1902–13, on
_Czerwony Sztandar_, and in 1901–04 as well as 1908–10, on _Przegląd
Socjaldemokratyyczny_; 1906–12, representative of the SDKPiL in the
Central Committee of the RSDRP; took part in the Zimmerwald Conference
in 1915 and the Kienthal Conference in 1916; 1918, cofounder of the
Communist Workers’ Party of Poland; husband of Jadwiga Warska.

WARSZAWSKI, MAURYCY (nickname, Morek) (pseudonym: żarski) (1873–?),
member of the Union of Polish Workers and the SDKPiL; at the
International Socialist Congress in Paris in 1900, along with three
other SDKPiL delegates, signed a PPS resolution directed against
Luxemburg; brother of Adolf Warski.

WARSZAWSKI, MIECZYSLAW (pseudonyms: Bronski, Maly, W. Mieczysnki, M. I.
Braun, Posner, Jerzy) (1882–1941), economist; in 1902, became a member
of the SDKPiL; 1907–17, lived in Switzerland as an émigré; editor of
_Czerwony Sztandar_ and _Trybuna Ludowa_; took part in the Kienthal
Conference in 1916; after 1917, worked in government positions in Soviet
Russia.

WASNER, OTTO (1857–1919), glove maker; Social Democrat; 1891–93, editor
of the specialized journal of the Glove Makers’ Union and the union’s
chief treasurer; 1893–1902, chairman of the Glove Makers’ Union;
1900–03, chairman of the SPD Regional Executive in Württemberg; 1906–12,
member of the Württemberg state assembly.

WEBB, BEATRICE (1858–1943), wife of Sidney Webb and collaborator with
him on many projects.

WEBB, SIDNEY JAMES (1859–1947), English reformist economic theorist and
politician; leading Fabian; husband of Beatrice Webb.

WEINBERG, SIEGFRIED (1880–1932), lawyer; Social Democrat; after 1917, in
the USPD.

WELS, OTTO (1873–1939), paperhanger; Social Democrat; 1906, employee of
the Paperhangers’ Union; 1907–08, secretary of the SPD in the province
of Brandenburg; beginning in 1908, chairman of the press commission of
_Vorwärts_; member of the Reichstag in 1912–18; during World War I, a
social chauvinist; in November 1918, a member of the Workers’ and
Soldiers’ Council of Berlin; bears major responsibility for the
suppression of the German revolution of 1918–19.

WENGELS (no first name or birth and death dates available), son of
Margarete Wengels.

WENGELS, MARGARETE (1856–1931), German Social Democrat; prominent figure
in the proletarian women’s movement; created the system of female shop
stewards; contributor to _Gleichheit_; participant in the International
Socialist Women’s Conference in Bern in 1915; in 1917, became a member
of the USPD.

WESOŁOWSKI, EUZEBIUSZ BRONISLAW (pseudonyms: Smutny, Wesoły)
(1870–1919), electrical engineer; member of the Union of Polish Workers;
1893, founding member of the SDKP; in 1894, arrested, held in Siberian
exile until 1903; after that, a leading figure in the SDKPiL, including
as secretary of its Warsaw Committee in 1905–08; in 1908, arrested again
and imprisoned; in March 1917, after the downfall of the tsarist regime,
he was active in party work with the Bolsheviks and in Soviet government
work after the Bolsheviks took power; in December 1918, headed a Soviet
Red Cross delegation to Poland to discuss a prisoner-of-war exchange;
assassinated in Poland on January 2, 1919, together with the other
members of the delegation.

WESTARP, KUNO FRIEDRICH, GRAF VON (COUNT OF) (1864–1945), 1903, director
of the police in Schöneberg; beginning in 1908, president of the Higher
Administrative Court in Berlin; member of the Reichstag in 1908–18;
beginning in 1912, chairman of the parliamentary group of the
Conservative Party.

WESTMEYER, JOHANN FRIEDRICH (1873–1917), Social Democrat; 1898–1902,
editor of the _Fränkische Tagespost_ in Nuremberg, of the _Volkswillens_
in Hanover in 1902–04, of the _Schwäbische Tagwacht_ in Stuttgart in
1905–11; 1908–17, chairman of the Social Democratic Association of
Stuttgart; beginning in 1911, member of the press commission of the
_Schwäbische Tagwacht_; in 1912, became secretary of the First Electoral
District of Württemberg; 1912–17, member of the Württemberg state
assembly; defended the views of the German Left; in November 1914, began
to edit the newsletter _Mitteilungsblatt_, which in January 1915 began
to be published under the title _Der Sozialdemokrat_.

WETZKER, HEINRICH (1861–1917), lathe operator; Social Democrat; worked
as an editor at the _Sächsische Arbeiter-Zeitung_ in Dresden, the
_Volksblatt_ in Bochum, and until 1905 at the _Vorwärts_; a contributor
to _Sozialistische Monatshefte_.

WILHELM II (1859–1941), German emperor (Kaiser) and king of Prussia from
1888 to 1918.

WINDHEIM, LUDWIG VON (1857–1935), 1895–1903, chief of police in Stettin
and Berlin; beginning in 1903, administrative director of Frankfurt on
the Oder.

WINKLER, ALEXANDER (d. 1917), Social Democrat; 1903, a member of the
municipal council (_Gemeindesrat_) in Arnstadt.

WINTER, AUGUST (1866–1907), German Social Democrat; at the end of 1898,
founded the Upper Silesian Workers’ Secretariat as authorized
representative of the General Commission of the Trade Unions of Germany
and the Executive of the SPD to conduct agitation and organization in
Upper Silesia, especially among the Polish mine workers of the region;
until 1903, a regular contributor to _Sozialistische Monatshefte_; in
1903, became editor of the _Volksbote_ in Stettin.

WINTER, MRS. (birth and death dates unavailable), wife of August Winter.

WISLICKA, FLORENTYNA (nickname, Flora) (d. 1930), sister of Mieczyslaw
Hartmann.

WITOLD, see Feinstein, Wladislaw.

WITTING, RICHARD (1856–1923), German judge; 1891–1902, lord mayor of
Poznań; member of the Prussian House of Lords _(Herrenhaus_, upper
chamber); director of the National Bank of Germany.

WITTRISCH, RICHARD (1869–?), bookbinder; Social Democrat; 1895–97,
editor at the _Sächsische Arbeiter-Zeitung_ in Dresden, in 1898 at the
_Offenbacher Abendblatt_, and in 1899–1905, at the _Märkische
Volksstimme_ in Forst (Lusatia); 1902–05, town councilor in Forst
(Lusatia); 1905–08, again an editor at the _Offenbacher Abendblatt_; in
1908, became editor of the _Volksstimme_ in Frankfurt on the Main.

WOJNAROWSKA, CESARYNA WANDA (1858–1911), beginning in 1877, active in
revolutionary circles in St. Petersburg, and then in Warsaw and Kraków
in 1879; emigrated in 1883 and lived mainly in France; in 1893 became a
member of the SDKP and later of the SDKPiL; 1900–04, representative of
the SDKPiL on the International Socialist Bureau; later, a prominent
figure in the French socialist movement.

WOLF, HUGO (1860–1903), Austrian composer; created the comic opera
_Corregidor_ out of songs.

WOLF, JULIUS (1862–1937), bourgeois economist; professor at the
University of Zurich; beginning in 1898, professor at Breslau.

WOLFF, THEODOR (1868–1943), bourgeois journalist and creative writer; in
1909, became chief editor of _Berliner Tageblatt_.

WOLFSTEIN, ROSI (1888–1987), activist in the German women’s and
socialist movement; friend of Luxemburg; member of the Duisberg
Spartacus group during World War I; in 1916, participated in the youth
congress in Jena as a representative of the Spartacus League; 1918,
delegate of the Düsseldorf Workers’ and Soldiers’ Council; in 1918–19,
helped form the German Communist Party; member of Communist Party
Opposition (KPO) in late 1920s and 1930s; emigrated to the United States
during World War II.

WOLGIN, A. (or Volgin, A.), see Plekhanov.

WOLNY, TOMASZ (birth and death dates unavailable), worker; official of
the PPS in the Prussian-occupied part of Poland, also active in the
German Social Democratic movement; an upholder of internationalist
views.

WULLSCHLEGER, EUGEN (1862–1931), Swiss Social Democrat; 1886, cofounder
of the _Arbeiterbund_; 1886–1902, member of a cantonal parliament;
1887–93, editor at the _Arbeiterfreund_ and, in 1893–97, at the _Basler
Vorwärts_; 1896–98, central secretary of the Grütli Verein, a radical
political union of workers; member of the Swiss National Council in
1896–1902 and 1912–17; beginning in 1912, member of the Swiss
legislature.

WURM, EMMANUEL (1857–1920), chemist; Social Democrat; 1890–1906 and
1912–18, member of the Reichstag; 1900–19, city councilor in Berlin;
1902–17, editor of _Neue Zeit_; 1907–14, instructor at the SPD party
school in Berlin; developed into a centrist; in 1916, was part of the
Social Democratic Working Group; in 1917, became a member of the USPD;
from November 1918 to February 1919, was secretary of state in the
National Office of Food Supply.

WURM, MATHILDE (1874–1934), Social Democrat; in 1917, became a member of
the USPD; 1917–19, civic deputy of the city of Berlin, becoming a city
councilor of Berlin in 1919; mainly active in the social sphere (in
welfare and social services).

YEFRON, Y. A. (1875–1917), Russian physician; from 1880, lived in
Zurich, then in Paris; supported the Russian Marxists of the
Emancipation of Labor group, and later was a member of the Paris group
in support of _Iskra_; assisted with the smuggling of illegal literature
into Russia.

ZARUDNAYA-CAVOS, YEKATERINA (in German, Jekaterina Sarudnaja-Cavos)
(1862–1917), Russian painter.

ZARUDNY, S. I. (1821–87), legal expert and government official; had a
major part in the 1864 reform of the judiciary in Russia.

ZASULICH, VERA (1849–1919); Russian revolutionary; initially a support
of revolutionary terror, she seriously wounded Colonel Theodore Trepov,
governor of St. Petersburg, in an assassination attempt, in 1878; she
was acquitted in a famous trial and went into exile in Switzerland; a
convert to Marxism, she worked closely with Georgy Plekhanov and the
Emancipation of Labor group; wrote famous letter to Marx in 1881 asking
if Russia was destined to endure a stage of capitalism before being able
to reach socialism; became leading figure of Menshevism after split in
the RSDRP in 1903; moved to the right, supported World War I, and
opposed the Bolshevik seizure of power in 1917; died after returning to
Russia from exile.

ZETKIN, CLARA JOSEPHINE (1857–1933), teacher; Social Democrat;
1892–1917, chief editor of the Social Democratic women’s publication
_Gleichheit_; 1895–1917, member of the Control Commission of the SPD;
1906–17, member of the SPD’s Education Committee; in 1907, became
secretary of the International Women’s Secretariat; in 1910, was an
initiator of the practice of holding an annual International Women’s Day
as a day of struggle for equal rights, peace, and socialism; a leading
representative of the German Left, she was a contributor to _Die
Internationale_ and a cofounder of the International Group (Spartacus
Group); June 1917–April 1919, chief editor of the newly founded women’s
supplement to the newspaper _Leipziger Volkszeitung_; from 1919 until
her death, a leading member of the KPD.

ZETKIN, KONSTANTIN (nickname Kostya, also spelled Costia) (1885–1980),
physician; son of Clara Zetkin, Luxemburg’s lover for several years
after her breakup with Leo Jogiches in 1907.

ZETKIN, MAXIM (1883–1965), physician; son of Clara Zetkin.

ZETKIN, OSIP (1854–89), Russian revolutionary; Clara Zetkin’s first
husband.

ZÉVAÈS, ALEXANDRE (real name, Gustave Antoine Alexandre Bourson)
(1873–1953), French lawyer and historian; socialist; until 1902, a
member of the French Workers’ Party; 1898–1910, elected representative
to the Chamber of Deputies; in 1905, broke with the workers’ movement
and together with Briand, Millerand, and Viviani formed a so-called
Republican Socialist Party; was a chauvinist during World War I.

ZIBER, N. I. (1844–88), Russian economist and political journalist;
professor of political economy and statistics at the University of Kiev;
contributor to radical liberal newspapers; made the acquaintance of Karl
Marx and Friedrich Engels in London in 1881; in Russia, popularized and
promoted Marx’s work on the critique of political economy.

ZIETZ, LUISE (1865–1922), German Social Democrat; active in the
proletarian women’s movement; 1908–12, held a seat on the SPD Executive
and, until 1916, secretary in the Vorstand; beginning in 1908, was
active in the central leadership of the German working-class youth
organization; advocated centrist views during World War I; 1917, was a
cofounder of the USPD and a member of its Central Committee.

ZLOTTKO, GERTRUD (birth and death dates unavailable), Luxemburg’s
domestic helper.

ZUBEIL, FRITZ (1848–1926), carpenter, then dispatching clerk for a
newspaper; Social Democrat; 1893–1917, member of the Reichstag; in 1916,
joined the Social Democratic Working Group; in 1917, became a member of
the USPD.

ZUNDEL, GEORG FRIEDRICH (1875–1948), painter; reprimanded by the
Stuttgart Art Academy for advocating Social Democracy; second husband of
Clara Zetkin.



SELECTED LIST OF PUBLICATIONS (NEWSPAPERS & MAGAZINES)


_Arbeiter-Zeitung_ (Workers’ Paper), a daily that began publication in
Vienna in 1889; in 1895, became the central organ of the Social
Democratic Party of Austria.

_Arbeiter-Zeitung. Sozialdemokratisches Organ für das
Rheinisch-Westfälische Industrie-Gebiet_ (Workers’ Paper: Social
Democratic Organ for the Rhineland-Westphalia Industrial Region), daily
paper published in Dortmund from 1902 to 1917.

_Arbeiterstimme_ (Socialist Voice), Swiss socialist paper edited by
Robert Seidel.

_Aus der Weltpolitik_ (From World Politics), a weekly newsletter edited
by Alexander Helphand (Parvus); appeared in Munich from 1898 to 1905.

_Avanti!_ (Forward!), daily newspaper, central organ of the Italian
Socialist Party; began publication in 1896 in Rome, later published in
Milan and Turin.

_Bergische Arbeiterstimme. Organ fur das arbeitende Volk des Kreises
Solingen_ (Mineworkers’ Voice: a publication for the working people of
Solingen and surrounding areas), Social Democratic newspaper, published
in Solingen; from 1890 to 1900, it came out three times a week, and
after 1900, daily.

_Berliner Tageblatt und Handelszeitung_ (Berlin Daily and Newspaper of
Commerce), bourgeois newspaper, began publication in 1871.

_Berner Tagwacht. Offizielles Publikationsorgan der sozialdemokratischen
Partei der Schweiz_ (Bern Sentinel: Official Publication of the Social
Democratic Party of Switzerland), successor to the daily paper
_Schweizer Sozialdemokrat_ (Swiss Social Democrat); began publication in
Bern in 1893.

_Board of Trade Journal_, official organ of the British government
department supervising commerce and industry; began publication, as a
weekly, in London in 1886.

_Bremer Bürger-Zeitung_ (Bremen Citizens’ Paper), Social Democratic
newspaper published from 1890 to 1919.

_Correspondenzblatt der Generalkommission der Gewerkschaften
Deutschlands_ (Bulletin of Correspondence of the General Commission of
the German Trade Unions), a weekly published in Hamburg from 1891 to
1902 and then, beginning in 1903, in Berlin.

_Czerwony Sztandar_ (Red Banner), central organ of the SDKPiL, published
illegally from 1902 to 1913 as well as in 1917–18, at first in Berlin
and Kraków and then, beginning in 1906, in Warsaw; circulated mainly in
the Russian-occupied Kingdom of Poland.

_D’r alt Offeburger_ (The Good Old Offenburg News), local paper edited
by Adolf Geck; began publication in 1899.

_Deutsche Medizinische Wochenschrift_ (German Medical Weekly), began
publication as a weekly in Leipzig in 1875.

_Dresdner Volkszeitung_ (Dresden People’s Paper), Social Democratic
daily paper founded in 1889 as the _Sächsische Arbeiter-Zeitung_
(Workers’ Paper of Saxony).

_The Economist_, bourgeois weekly; began publication in London in 1843.

_Die Freiheit. Berliner Organ der Unabhängigen Sozialdemokratischen
Partei Deutschlands_ (Freedom: Berlin Organ of the Independent Social
Democratic Party of Germany, or USPD), daily newspaper; began
publication in November 15, 1918.

_Freisinnige Zeitung_ (Free-Thinking Paper), organ of the Free-Thinking
People’s Party; published in Berlin from 1885 to 1918.

_Gazeta Ludowa_ (People’s Paper), weekly Polish language newspaper,
published in Poznań in 1902–04; an official organ of the local SPD
organization.

_Gazeta Robotnicza_ (Workers’ Gazette), a Polish weekly; organ of the
PPS in the Prussian-occupied part of Poland; published from 1891 to 1901
in Berlin, and then in Katowice until 1919.

_Die Gleichheit_ (Equality), German Social Democratic women’s journal;
bimonthly; began publication in Stuttgart in 1891.

_Glos_ (Voice), Polish weekly for scientific, literary, social, and
political affairs; published in Warsaw, 1886–1905; at first it was a
bourgeois-progressive publication, but in 1905 came under the influence
of the SDKPiL.

_Het Volk_ (The People), a Social Democratic paper in Stockholm.

_Die Internationale. Zeitschrift für Praxis und Theorie des Marxismus_
(The International: A Journal for the Practice and Theory of Marxism),
founded by Luxemburg and Franz Mehring; only one issue appeared under
the editorship of Luxemburg and Mehring, in Berlin, in April 1915, with
the subtitle _Eine Monatsschrift_ (A Monthly) _für Praxis und Theorie
des Marxismus_; the subtitle listed above was used for the theoretical
journal of the KPD.

_Internationale Korrespondenz_ (International Correspondence), edited by
Albert Baumeister; began publication twice weekly in Berlin in September
1914.

_Iskra_ (The Spark), first nationwide Russian Marxist newspaper, founded
by Lenin; began publication in 1900 in Leipzig, then was published in
Munich; in 1903, published in London, and from 1903 to 1905, in Geneva;
after Lenin’s resignation from the editorial board in November 1903
(from issue no. 52 on), it became the organ of the Mensheviks.

_Jugend_ (Youth), humorous-satirical weekly for art, literature, and
politics; began publication in Munich in 1896.

_Katolik_ (The Catholic), Polish-language clerical newspaper
representing the interests of small businessmen; beginning in 1868, it
was published three times a week in Silesia, first in Królewska Huta
(German name, Königshütte) and later in Bytom (German name, Beuthen).

_Korrespondenzblatt_, see _Correspondenzblatt …_

_Kraj_ (Homeland), Polish weekly for political, social, economic, and
literary affairs; advocated a policy of rapprochement with the Russian
liberals and supported Pan-Slavism; published in St. Petersburg from
1882 to 1909.

_Kreuz-Zeitung_ (Sign-of-the-Cross Newspaper), daily paper of the
Prussian Junkers, the conservative landed gentry; founded in Berlin in
1848 as the _Neue Preussische Zeitung_; beginning in 1911, appeared
under the title _Neue Preussische (Kreuz-) Zeitung_.

_Kunst_, see _Moderne Kunst_.

_Leipziger Volkszeitung. Organ für die Interesse des gesamten
werktätigen Volkes_ (Leipzig People’s Paper, published in the interests
of all the working people), Social Democratic daily; began publication
in 1894; in 1917, became the organ of the USPD.

_Młot_ (Hammer), SDKPiL legal publication.

_Moderne Kunst_ (Modern Art), a bourgeois newspaper intended to amuse
and entertain; published fortnightly in Berlin.

_Montagsblatt_, see _Neue Montagsblatt_.

_Myśl Niepodległa_ (Independent Thought), anti-Semitic journal published
by Niemojewski.

_Naprzód_ (Forward), central organ of the PPSD; began publication in
Kraków in 1892.

_Das Neue Montagsblatt. Berliner Sozialistische Montagsschau_ (New
Monday Paper: A Berlin Socialist Review), produced by Eduard Bernstein;
appeared from May 2 to November 21, 1904, in Berlin.

_Die Neue Welt_ (New World), illustrated entertainment section published
as a supplement for Social Democratic newspapers; appeared from 1876 to
1919, mainly in Hamburg.

_Die Neue Zeit. Revue des geistigen und öffentlichen Lebens_ (New Times:
A Review of Intellectual and Public Life), German Social Democratic
weekly; began publication in Stuttgart in 1893.

_Neuland_ (New Land), bourgeois periodical published in Berlin in
1897–98.

_Nieuwe Tijd_ (New Times), publication of SDAP.

_Osvobozhdenie_ (Liberation), illegal bimonthly of the Russian liberal
bourgeoisie; published in Stuttgart and/or Paris from 1902 through 1905.

_La Petite République_, French publication; began publication in Paris
in 1875; later became the organ of the French reformist socialists.

_Polska Robotnycza_ (Workers’ Poland), see _Sprawa Robotnycza_.

_Prawda_ (Truth), Polish political, social, and literary weekly; organ
of the positivists; published in Warsaw from 1881 to 1915.

_Proletary_ (The Proletarian), illegal weekly; central organ of the
RSDRP, edited by Lenin, published in Geneva from May to November 1905.

_Przedświt_ (The Dawn), organ of the PPS; published from 1881 to 1905 in
varying locations (Geneva, Leipzig, London, Paris, Warsaw, Kraków).

_Przegląd Robotniczy_ (Workers’ Review), newspaper of the SDKPiL;
published in 1900 and 1901 in Zurich, then in 1904 and 1905 in Kraków.

_Przegląd Socjaldemokratyyczny_ (Social Democratic Review), theoretical
organ of the SDKPiL; published in Kraków from 1902 to 1904 and from 1908
to 1910.

_Przegląd Socjalistyczny_ (Socialist Review), Polish-language economic
and political quarterly, published in Paris in 1892 and 1893.

_Robotnik_ (Worker), illegal organ of the PPS; published in the Kingdom
of Poland from 1894 to 1906; after the split in the PPS, two newspapers
of the same name appeared: one, the organ of the PPS-Lewica (left wing
of the PPS), published illegally in Warsaw from 1906 to 1918; the other,
the organ of the PPS-Revolutionary Faction, published illegally from
1906 to 1914 in Warsaw, Kiev, and Kraków, then beginning in 1915,
published legally in Dąbrowa Gornizca; in 1917, again published
illegally in Warsaw.

_Die Rote Fahne. Zentralorgan der Kommunistischen Partei Deutschlands
(Spartakusbund)_ (The Red Banner: Central Organ of the Communist Party
of Germany—Spartacus League), daily paper founded by Luxemburg and Karl
Liebknecht; issues no. 1 and 2 were published on November 9 and 10,
1918, with the subtitle _Ehemaliger Berliner Lokal-Anzeiger_ (the former
Berlin Local News Bulletin); with issue no. 3 on November 18, 1918, the
subtitle became “Central Organ of the Spartacus League”; beginning in
January 1919, the subtitle was the one first listed above.

_Sächsische Arbeiter-Zeitung_ (Workers’ Paper of Saxony), Social
Democratic daily published in Dresden from 1889 to 1908; in 1908, its
name was changed to _Dresdner Volkszeitung_ (Dresden People’s Paper).

_Schwäbische Tagwacht. Organ der Sozialdemokraten Württemburgs_ (Swabian
Sentinel: Organ of the Social Democrats of Württemburg), a daily paper
that had first been founded in 1880 as the _Schwäbischer Wochenblatt_
(Swabian Weekly).

_Il Secolo_ (The Century), Italian daily newspaper; began publication in
Milan in 1866.

_Simplicissimus_, illustrated satirical political weekly, published in
Munich since 1896.

_Słowo Polskie_ (Polish Word), daily newspaper, organ of the Polish
Democratic Party (Partia Demokratyczna, PD); from 1902 on, was the organ
of the National Democratic Party in Galicia; began publication in Lvov
(German name, Lemberg) in 1895.

_Social-Demokraten_ (Social Democrat), publication of Danish Social
Democratic Party.

_Le Socialiste_ (The Socialist), publication of Jules Guesde’s French
Workers’ Party.

_Sozialdemokratische Korrespondenz_, edited by Luxemburg, Marchlewski,
and Mehring; published in Berlin in 1913–14 three times weekly; in
January 1915, reappeared as a weekly under the title “Marchlewski’s
Economic Review” (_Wirtschaftsliche Rundschau Marchlewskis_), but ceased
publication on May 31, 1915.

_Soziale Praxis_, a social and political weekly; founded in 1892 as
_Sozialpolitisches Zentralblatt_ (Socio-Political Central Paper); merged
in 1894 with the journal _Blätter für Soziale Praxis_ (Pages for Social
Praxis) and was published in Berlin from 1895 on as _Soziale Praxis_.

_Sozialistische Monatshefte. Internationale Revue des Sozialismus_
(Socialist Monthly: International Review of Socialism), organ of the
revisionists; began publication in Berlin in 1897.

_Spartacus_, illegal publication of the Spartakusgruppe (Spartacus
Group); laid out informally, it appeared from September 1916 to October
1918; its forerunners consisted of informational materials circulated
informally beginning in autumn 1914 and the _Politische Briefe_
(Political Letters), signed “Spartacus,” which began publication in
January 1916 (also known as the _Spartacus Letters_).

_Sprawa Robotnicza_ (Workers’ Cause), a monthly; the organ of the SDKP;
it appeared irregularly from 1893 to 1896, printed in Paris.

_Tovarishch_ (Comrade), Russian bourgeois daily newspaper, organ of the
left wing of the Constitutional Democrats (Kadets); the Mensheviks also
contributed to this paper; published in St. Petersburg from 1906 to
1908.

_Trybuna Ludowa_ (People’s Tribune), legal daily newspaper of the
SDKPiL; published in Warsaw in December 1905.

_Vestnik Finansov, Promyshlennosti i Torgovli_ (News Bulletin on
Finance, Industry, and Trade), weekly publication of the Ministry of
Finance of tsarist Russia, it appeared in St. Petersburg from 1885 to
1917.

_Volksblatt_ (People’s Newssheet), Social Democratic newspaper; began
publication in Halle in 1890.

_Volksfreund_ (Friend of the People), Social Democratic daily paper in
Braunschweig (Brunswick); began publication in 1871.

_Volksrecht_ (People’s Justice), daily newspaper of the Social
Democratic Party of Switzerland and of the Zurich canton; began
publication in Zurich in 1898.

_Volksstimme. Sozialdemokratisches Organ für Südwestdeutschland_ (Voice
of the People: Social Democratic Organ for Southwest Germany), daily
paper that began publication in 1895 in Frankfurt on the Main.

_Volkswacht fur Schlesien, Posen und die Nachbargebiete_ (People’s
Sentinel for Silesia, Poznań, and Neighboring Regions), Social
Democratic daily paper that began publication in Breslau in 1890.

_Volks-Zeitung_ (People’s Newspaper), a democratic paper; began
publication in Berlin in 1853.

_Vorwärts_ (Forward), newspaper of the SDKPiL for German workers in
Poland; published in Lodz from 1906 to 1913.

_Vorwärts. Berliner Volksblatt. Zentralorgan der Sozialdemokratischen
Partei Deutschlands_ (Forward, a Berlin People’s Paper: Central Organ of
the SPD), a daily newspaper which was at the same time the organ of the
Berlin organization of the SPD; began publication in Berlin in 1894.

Vossin (nickname), _see Vossische Zeitung_.

_Vossische Zeitung. Königlich priviligierte Berlinische Zeitung von
Staats- und gelehrten Sachen_ (Voss Newspaper: Royally Favored Berlin
Newspaper of State and Learned Affairs), daily newspaper of the liberal
bourgeoisie; one of the successor publications of the weekly _Diarium_,
founded in Berlin in 1704.

_Wolny Glos_ (Free Voice), legal organ of the SDKPiL, published weekly
in Warsaw from April to October 1911.

_Z pola walki_ (From the Field of Battle), theoretical journal of the
SDKPiL, published in Kraków.



ABBREVIATIONS


ADAV, Allgemeiner Deutscher Arbeiterverein—General Union of German
Workers.

BArch, Bundesarchiv Berlin (Federal Archive).

BaF, _Briefe an Freunde_, edited by Benedikt Kautsky (Hamburg, 1950).

Bund, General Jewish Workers’ Union of Lithuania, Poland, and Russia.

_BzG, Beiträge zur Geschichte der Arbeiterbewegung_ (Essays in the
History of the Workers’ Movement).

CPSU, Communist Party of the Soviet Union (in Russian,
Kommunisticheskaya Partiya Sovetskogo Soyuza) the official name of the
organization from roughly 1952 to 1991.

ECCI, Executive Committee of the Communist [Third] International.

GLA, Generallandesarchiv (General Regional Archive) of a _Land_, or
federated state of Germany.

IAA, Internationale Arbeiter-Assoziation—the International Workingmen’s
Association, or First International.

IISG, Internationaal Instituut voor Sociale Geschiedenes—the
International Institute for Social History, located in Amsterdam.

IISH, International Institute for Social History, Amsterdam (see above).

ISB, International Socialist Bureau.

KPD, Kommunistische Partei Deutschlands—Communist Party of Germany.

PPS, Polska Partia Sozjalistyczna—Polish Socialist Party.

PPSD, Polska Partia Socjalno-Demokratyczna Galicji i Sląska— Polish
Social Democratic Party of Galicia and Silesia (that is, of the
Austrian-occupied part of Poland).

RGASPI, Russkii Gosudarstvennyi Arkhiv Sotsialno-Politicheskoi Istorii
(Russian State Archive for Social and Political History), in Moscow.

RSDRP, Rossiyskaya Sotsial-Demokraticheskaya Rabochaya Partiya—Russian
Social Democratic Labor Party. With the addition of the word
“Bolsheviks” (Bolsheviki) in parentheses, this was the official name of
the Bolshevik organization from roughly 1912 to 1918, when the name was
changed to Russian Communist Party (Bolshevik).

SDAP, Sociaal-Democratische Arbeiderspartij (Social Democratic Workers’
Party) in Holland, which later became the Communist Party of Holland.

SDAP, Sozialdemokratische Arbeiterpartei—Social Democratic Workers’
Party.

SDKP, Socjaldemokracja Królestwa Polskiego—Social Democracy of the
Kingdom of Poland.

SDKPiL, Socjaldemokracja Królestwa Polskiego i Litwy—Social Democracy of
the Kingdom of Poland and Lithuania.

SED, Sozialistische Einheitspartei Deutschlands (Socialist Unity Party
of Germany), formerly the ruling party of the German Democratic Republic
(East Germany).

SFIO, Section Française de l’Internationale Ouvrière—French Section of
the Workers’ (Second) International.

SPD, Sozialdemokratische Partei Deutschlands—Social Democratic Party of
Germany.

USPD, Unabhängige Sozialdemokratische Partei Deutschlands— Independent
Social Democratic Party of Germany.

ZA, Zentralarchiv—Central Archive.

Zb, Zentralbibliothek—Central Library.

ZK, Zentralkomitee—Central Committee.

ZRP, Związek Robotników Polskich—Union of Polish Workers.

ZZSP, Związek Zagraniczny Socjalistów Polskich—Union of Polish
Socialists Abroad.



ARCHIVE LOCATIONS OF THE LETTERS


Boris Krichevsky July 17, 1891 RGASPI, Moscow

Leo Jogiches [March 20, 1893] RGASPI, Moscow

Boris Krichevsky November 27, 1893 RGASPI, Moscow

Leo Jogiches [March 11, 1894] RGASPI, Moscow

Leo Jogiches [March 25, 1894] RGASPI, Moscow

Leo Jogiches [March 29, 1894] RGASPI, Moscow

Leo Jogiches [April 1, 1894] RGASPI, Moscow

Boris Krichevsky January 19, 1895 RGASPI, Moscow

Leo Jogiches [March 18, 1895] RGASPI, Moscow

Leo Jogiches [March 19, 1895] RGASPI, Moscow

Leo Jogiches [March 21, 1895] RGASPI, Moscow

Dean of the Faculty of Political Sciences, Zurich University, March 12,
1897 Staatsarchiv Zurich

Leo Jogiches [July 16, 1897] RGASPI, Moscow

Leo Jogiches [May 17, 1898] RGASPI, Moscow

Leo Jogiches May 20, 1898 RGASPI, Moscow

Leo Jogiches May 25, 1898 RGASPI, Moscow

Leo Jogiches May 28, 1898 RGASPI, Moscow

Mathilde and Robert Seidel May 30, 1898 Zb Zürich, Nachlass R. Seidel

Leo Jogiches June 9, 1898 RGASPI, Moscow

Robert Seidel June 23, 1898 Zb Zürich, Nachlass R. Seidel

Leo Jogiches [June 24, 1898] RGASPI, Moscow

Leo Jogiches June 27, 1898 RGASPI, Moscow

Leo Jogiches [between July 12 and 20, 1898] RGASPI, Moscow

Mathilde and Robert Seidel August 11, 1898 Zb Zürich, Nachlass R. Seidel

Boris Krichevsky August 19, 1898 RGASPI, Moscow

Leo Jogiches [September 3, 1898] RGASPI, Moscow

Georgi Plekhanov October 17, 1898, Plekhanov House, Moscow

August Bebel, October 31, 1898 IISG, Amsterdam

August Bebel, November 7, 1898 IISG, Amsterdam

Leo Jogiches December 3 [1898] RGASPI, Moscow

Leo Jogiches [December 12, 1898] RGASPI, Moscow

Leo Jogiches [December 15, 1898] RGASPI, Moscow

Leo Jogiches [December 27, 1898] RGASPI, Moscow

Leo Jogiches [March 2, 1899] RGASPI, Moscow

Leo Jogiches [March 3, 1899] RGASPI, Moscow

Leo Jogiches March 6 [1899] RGASPI, Moscow

Leo Jogiches May 1, 1899 RGASPI, Moscow

Leo Jogiches [before December 18, 1899] RGASPI, Moscow

Luise and Karl Kautsky December 30, 1899 IISG, Amsterdam

Leo Jogiches January [4,] 1900 RGASPI, Moscow

Leo Jogiches [circa January 13, 1900] RGASPI, Moscow

Leo Jogiches April 24, 1900 RGASPI, Moscow

Leo Jogiches [April 30, 1900] RGASPI, Moscow

Leo Jogiches [circa July 3, 1900] RGASPI, Moscow

Cezaryna Wojnarowska March 1901, RGASPI, Moscow

Clara Zetkin March 5, 1901 RGASPI, Moscow

Jules Guesde April 17, 1901 IISG, Amsterdam

Cezaryna Wojnarowska May 17, 1901 RGASPI, Moscow

Karl Kautsky October 3, 1901 IISG, Amsterdam

Robert Seidel [after January 3, 1903] Zb Zürich, Nachlass R. Seidel

Clara Zetkin [after January 23, 1903] RGASPI, Moscow

Feliks Dzierżyński March, 1903 RGASPI, Moscow

Luise and Karl Kautsky [June 6, 1903] IISG, Amsterdam

Leo Jogiches June 9 [1903] RGASPI, Moscow

Leo Jogiches June 13, 1903 RGASPI, Moscow

Julius Bruhns October 15, 1903 BArch, Berlin

Adolf Warski and Jakub Hanecki August 6, 1903 Polish United Workers
Party Archive, Warsaw

Aleksandr Potresov July 3, 1904 RGASPI, Moscow

Luise Kautsky [end of July 1904] IISG, Amsterdam

Aleksandr Potresov August 7, 1904 RGASPI, Moscow

Karl Kautsky [September 9, 1904] IISG, Amsterdam

Luise Kautsky [September 1904] IISG, Amsterdam

Henriette Roland Holst October 27, 1904 IISG, Amsterdam

Henriette Roland Holst December 17, 1904 IISG, Amsterdam

Henriette Roland Holst July 3, 1905 IISG, Amsterdam

Henriette Roland Holst October 2, 1905 IISG, Amsterdam

Leo Jogiches [September] 29, [1905] RGASPI, Moscow

Leo Jogiches [October] 6, [1905] RGASPI, Moscow

Leo Jogiches [October 10, 1905] RGASPI, Moscow

Leo Jogiches [October 13, 1905] RGASPI, Moscow

Leo Jogiches [October 14, 1905] RGASPI, Moscow

Leo Jogiches [October 20, 1905] RGASPI, Moscow

Leo Jogiches [October 24/25, 1905] RGASPI, Moscow

Leo Jogiches [October 26/27, 1905] RGASPI, Moscow

Leo Jogiches [November 1, 1905] RGASPI, Moscow

Leo Jogiches [November 3, 1905] RGASPI, Moscow

Luise and Karl Kautsky [December 29, 1905] IISG, Amsterdam

Luise and Karl Kautsky [December 30, 1905] IISG, Amsterdam

Luise and Karl Kautsky January 2, 1906 IISG, Amsterdam

Luise and Karl Kautsky January 11 [1906] IISG, Amsterdam

Luise and Karl Kautsky February 5 [1906] IISG, Amsterdam

Luise and Karl Kautsky [March 13, 1906] IISG, Amsterdam

Luise and Karl Kautsky August 11, 1906 IISG, Amsterdam

Franz Mehring August 12, 1906 RGASPI, Moscow

Clara Zetkin [after December 16, 1906] RGASPI, Moscow

Mathilde and Robert Seidel January 12, 1907 Stb Zürich (Stiftung)

Kostya Zetkin [May 13, 1907] RGASPI, Moscow

Kostya Zetkin May 23, 1907 RGASPI, Moscow

Clara Zetkin June 4, 1907 RGASPI, Moscow

Kostya Zetkin June 24, 1907 RGASPI, Moscow

Kostya Zetkin [September] 24, [1907] RGASPI, Moscow

Karl Kautsky [beginning of December 1907] IISG, Amsterdam

Kostya Zetkin April 14, 1908 RGASPI, Moscow

Kostya Zetkin April 15, 1908 RGASPI, Moscow

Kostya Zetkin [April] 16, [1908] RGASPI, Moscow

Kostya Zetkin May 8, [1908] RGASPI, Moscow

Kostya Zetkin [May 9, 1908] RGASPI, Moscow

Kostya Zetkin May 19 [1908] RGASPI, Moscow

Kostya Zetkin May 28, 1908 RGASPI, Moscow

Kostya Zetkin [June 5, 1908] RGASPI, Moscow

Kostya Zetkin July 14, 1908 RGASPI, Moscow

Kostya Zetkin [August 21, 1908] RGASPI, Moscow

Kostya Zetkin [August] 22, [1908] RGASPI, Moscow

Kostya Zetkin [August 25, 1908] RGASPI, Moscow

Clara Zetkin [August 30, 1908] RGASPI, Moscow

Kostya Zetkin September 2, 1908 RGASPI, Moscow

Kostya Zetkin September 8, 1908 RGASPI, Moscow

Kostya Zetkin September 27, 1908 RGASPI, Moscow

Kostya Zetkin [October 9, 1908] RGASPI, Moscow

Kostya Zetkin [after January 3, 1909] RGASPI, Moscow

N.S. Sesyulinksy March 1909 RGASPI, Moscow

Luise Kautsky May 1 [1909] IISG, Amsterdam

Hans Kautsky [May 1, 1909] Polish Workers Party Archive, Warsaw

Kostya Zetkin August 13, 1909 RGASPI, Moscow

Kostya Zetkin August 17, 1909 RGASPI, Moscow

Anatoly Lunacharsky August 21, 1909 Columbia University Library, New
York

Maxim Gorky [1909 or 1910] A.M. Gorky [Gor’kii] Archives at the
Institute for World Literature, Russian Academy of Sciences, in Moscow

Konrad Haenisch [before March 14, 1910] RGASPI, Moscow

Luise Kautsky March 17 [1910] IISG, Amsterdam

Luise Kautsky [April 13, 1910] IISG, Amsterdam

Mathilde and Robert Seidel May 28, 1910 Zb Zürich, Nachlass R. Seidel

Konrad Haenisch June 18, 1910 RGASPI, Moscow

Émile Vandervelde October 8, 1910 Archives of the Polish United Workers
Party, Warsaw

Kostya Zetkin [March 22, 1911] RGASPI, Moscow

Kostya Zetkin [end of March 1911] RGASPI, Moscow

Kostya Zetkin [April 2, 1911] RGASPI, Moscow

Leo Jogiches [between April 2 and 16, 1911] RGASPI, Moscow

Kostya Zetkin [May 3, 1911] RGASPI, Moscow

Clara Zetkin [May 18, 1911] RGASPI, Moscow

Wilhelm Dittmann [May 23, 1911] RGASPI, Moscow

Kostya Zetkin [June 8, 1911] RGASPI, Moscow

Kostya Zetkin [June 16, 1911] RGASPI, Moscow

Wilhelm Dittmann [June 17, 1911] RGASPI, Moscow

Kostya Zetkin [before July 6, 1911] RGASPI, Moscow

Henriette Roland Holst [August, 1911] IISG, Amsterdam

Kostya Zetkin [August 14, 1911] RGASPI, Moscow

Clara Zetkin [before September 7, 1911] RGASPI, Moscow

Kostya Zetkin [September 25, 1911] RGASPI, Moscow

Kostya Zetkin [November 14, 1911] RGASPI, Moscow

Kostya Zetkin [November 21, 1911] RGASPI, Moscow

Kostya Zetkin [between January 15 and 19, 1912] RGASPI, Moscow

Kostya Zetkin [January 20, 1912] RGASPI, Moscow

Kostya Zetkin [after January 26, 1912] RGASPI, Moscow

Kostya Zetkin [March 18, 1912] RGASPI, Moscow

Kostya Zetkin [March 28, 1912] RGASPI, Moscow

Franz Mehring April 19, 1912 RGASPI, Moscow

Kostya Zetkin [May 10, 1912] RGASPI, Moscow

Franz Mehring [after February 10, 1913] RGASPI, Moscow

_Social-Demokraten_ October 20, 1913 Library and Archive of the Workers’
Movement, Copenhagen

Walter Stoecker March 11, 1914 BArch, Berlin

Paul Levi [March 1914] Archiv der sozialen Demokratie, Bonn

Paul Levi [August] 31 [1914] Archiv der sozialen Demokratie, Bonn

Karl Moor October 12, 1914 RGASPI, Moscow

Hans Diefenbach November 1, 1914 BaF

_Social-Demokraten_, November 9, 1914 Archive and Library for the
Workers’ Movement, Stockholm

Camille Huysmans November 10, 1914 Camille Huysmans Archive, Antwerp

Paul Levi November 17 [1914] Archiv der sozialen Demokratie, Bonn

Marta Rosenbaum January 5, 1915 BaF

Alexander Winkler February 11, 1915 BArch, Berlin

Helene Winkler February 11, 1915 BArch, Berlin

Kostya Zetkin April 10, 1915 RGASPI, Moscow

Franz Mehring August 31, 1915 RGASPI, Moscow

Clara Zetkin March 9, 1916 RGASPI, Moscow

Clara Zetkin May 12, 1916 RGASPI, Moscow

Mathilde Wurm December 28, 1916 BaF

Luise Kautsky January 26, 1917 IISG, Amsterdam

Marta Rosenbaum [between February 4 and 9, 1917] BaF

Mathilde Jacob [February 7, 1917] BArch, Berlin (Kopie)

Mathilde Wurm February 16, 1917 BaF

Hans Diefenbach March 5, 1917 BaF

Hans Diefenbach March 27 [1917] BaF

Hans Diefenbach March 30, 1917 BaF

Hans Diefenbach April 5, 1917 BaF

Clara Zetkin April 13, 1917 RGASPI, Moscow

Luise Kautsky April 15, 1917 IISG, Amsterdam

Hans Diefenbach April 16, 1917 BaF

Sophie Liebknecht April 19, 1917 RGASPI, Moscow

Hans Diefenbach April 28 [1917] BaF

Marta Rosenbaum [April 29, 1917] BaF

Mathilde Jacob May 3, 1917 BArch, Berlin

Hans Diefenbach May 12, 1917 BaF

Sophie Liebknecht May 23, 1917 RGASPI, Moscow

Hans Diefenbach June 20, 1917 BaF

Hans Diefenbach June 23, 1917 BaF

Hans Diefenbach June 29, 1917 BaF

Hans Diefenbach July 6, 1917 BaF

Sophie Liebknecht August 2, 1917 RGASPI, Moscow

Mathilde Jacob August 6, 1917 BArch, Berlin

Hans Diefenbach August 13, 1917 BaF

Hans Diefenbach August 27, 1917 BaF

Franz Mehring September 8, 1917 _Die Internationale_

Marta Rosenbaum [after November 12, 1917] BaF

Luise Kautsky November 15, 1917 IISG, Amsterdam

Mathilde Wurm November 15, 1917 BaF

Clara Zetkin November 24, 1917 RGASPI, Moscow

Sophie Liebknecht November 24, 1917 RGASPI, Moscow

Luise Kautsky November 24, 1917 IISG, Amsterdam

Sophie Liebknecht [before December 24, 1917] RGASPI, Moscow

Franz Mehring December 30, [1917] _Die Internationale_

Franz Mehring March 8, 1918 _Die Internationale_

Rosi Wolfstein March 8, 1918 BArch, Berlin

Clara Zetkin March 11, 1918 RGASPI, Moscow

Mathilde Jacob May 28, 1918 BArch, Berlin

Luise Kautsky May 28, 1918 IISG, Amsterdam

Clara Zetkin June 29, 1918 RGASPI, Moscow

Rosi Wolfstein July 16, 1918 BArch, Berlin

Clara Zetkin July 23, 1918 RGASPI, Moscow

Julian Marchlewski [July or August 1918] RGASPI, Moscow

Karl Liebknecht August 8, 1918 RGASPI, Moscow

Stepan Bratman-Brodowski September 3, 1918 RGASPI, Moscow

Sophie Liebknecht September 12, 1918 GLA Karlsruhe

Adolf Geck September 14, 1918 GLA Karlsruhe

Julian Marchlewski September 30, 1918 RGASPI, Moscow

Sophie Liebknecht October 18, 1918 RGASPI, Moscow

Paul Löbe [November 8, 1918] BArch, Berlin

Marie and Adolf Geck November 18, 1918 GLA Karlsruhe

Wolfgang Fernbach November 18, 1918 RGASPI, Moscow

Clara Zetkin November 18, 1918 RGASPI, Moscow

Clara Zetkin November 24, 1918 RGASPI, Moscow

Clara Zetkin November 29, 1918 RGASPI, Moscow

Adolf Warski [November or December 1918] RGASPI, Moscow

Clara Zetkin [probably December 20, 1918] RGASPI, Moscow

V. I. Lenin December 1918 RGASPI, Moscow

Clara Zetkin December 25 [1918] RGASPI, Moscow

Clara Zetkin December 26 [1918] RGASPI, Moscow

Clara Zetkin [December 1918] RGASPI, Moscow

Marta Rosenbaum January 4, 1919 BaF

Clara Zetkin January 11 [1919] RGASPI, Moscow
